SOME 
CONSIDERATIONS 

TOUCHING THE 
USEFULNESSE OF 
EXPERIMENTAL... 

Robert Boyle, Giovanni Alfonso Borelli 



Google 



Digitized by GoogU 



I 



/ 

SOME 




Q0 P(S I T> E%AT I 0 N$ 

Touching the 

V S E F V.L NESSE 

Of Experimental 

Naturall Philofophy^ 

Propos'd in a Familiar Difcourfe to a Friend, 
by way of Invitation to the Study of it, 

1 — 'i gi.ii. *rn " 




t By the rionorafefe Robert Boyle - Efc 
FcUowofthc ROYAL SOCIETY. 




Printed by Hen:Hall Printer to theUniverfity, for 
Ric: Davis, Anno Dom- 1664. 




Digitized by Google 




The Publisher to the R e a d e r 




is, Courteous Reader , pare of the 
Satyr of Tetronin againft the Vice of 
his own Time. Prifcii temporibus y cum 
adhuc nuda Virtus placeret , *vigebant 
Artes ingenu* , fummumque certamen inter homines 
erat,ne quid profuturum ftculis diu lattret . Demecri- 
m omnium Herbarumfuccos exprefit, <sr ne lapidutn 
Virgnltorumque >is lateret, Atatem inter Experiments 
mfumpfit. Other Examples of the like Induftry 
ie brings, and then concludes againft the Lazinefs 
and Luxury of his own Agc.^r N^faith Hc,nepara* 
:<ls quid em Artes audemus cognojeere f fed acctt/ato»i 
res Jntiquitatis vitia tantum docemus <& difcimu*. It 
was for want of a Democrim or two that he cafts 
this hard Ccnfure upon his own Time. For, not* 

O] z withftan- 





Digitized by Google 



The Quhlifler to the (Reader. 
withftanding all his Harangue in Commendation 
of (ome Ages which were ancient to his Own, It is 
evident out of Hiftoiy, that there was never at once 
any great Number , who ferioufly and in earned 
for the Benefit of Mankind applyed themfelves to 
che-fe fevere* Scrutinies of Natural Bodies, It is true 
that now and then, in all Centuries from the Be- 
ginningofthe World,there have appear'd (bmePer- 
fons of a Nature more refin'd, a s if indeed ( accor- 
ding to thatPhancy of the Old Poets) fome (Prowo 
theus had made them either of another Mecall, or of 
another Temper, from the Vulgar, utterly above all 
Mixture with, or Embafement by the common 
Faflhiotis of this World; who did make it the End of 
their Lives, by Severing and Mixing, Making and 
Marring, and multiplying Variety of Experiments 
on all Bodies.to difcover their hidden Vertues,and fo 
to enlarge the Power and Empire of Man. But th efe 
were ever very few and fingular. Even in that fo 
much celebrated Time of Democritus thefe Studies 
were fo rare, that hisufual Exercife of the Anatom\ 
of Beads was look'd upon, as that which made the 
Soundnefle of his Mind queftionable, even as a 
Spice ofMadnefTe in him: and probably much more 
mighc the Vulgar of his Age have been amufed, had 



Digitized by G 



The Tuhlifrer to the Reader". 

they teen him torturing Minerals and Metals in the 
more toiMbme Anatomy of Fire. 

Now if it be a dishonourable Crimination to an 
Age,that it hath brought out no Perfons who make 
ic their great Endeavour lS(e quid profuturum ftculis 
Jateat: and if the Difcovery of one or two perfons 
©f this Kind be enough to expiate for, and take off 
the Diflionour of the Proletarian Lazinefle and 
Luxury of the reft, I think I may juftiy efteem that 
the exhibiting to the World the Hiftory of the Stu« 
dies of the Honourable "Author of this Piece may 
ferve to He the Apology and Defence of our Age 
againft fuch Cenfures as that wherewith the newly 
cited Satyri/l ftained his own Time. 

And this was one great Reafon that hath made 
me very forward to promote the Publication of 
This, and diverle other Writings of the fame Noble 
Author. For were there only Tokens of Endea- 
vour in Them, the proof of This Endeavour (even 
without Attainment ) ought to wipe off all Imputa- 
tions of this nature. ButthisMotive(though I do ac- 
count that by exhibiting this Expiation i dofomc- 
what oblige the Age, whofe Honour is thereby de* 
fended, yet) was far from being the mod great and 
forcible. For the Excellence of the Works them- 

J clves > 



Digitized by 



The Tuhlifier to the Reader. 

felves, cveii as foon as they fell from the pen ofthe 
Author,did long fincein all Equity fct an Imprimatur 
on them. 

Ifec fumunt aut ponunt femes 
Sirbitrio pofularis jfur<* % 

Epicurus, when he was cafting up the account of his 
life- upon the very Day of his Death, mentions a 
very great pleafure that he even then took in two 
Parts of his former Studies: And thefe were his (2^*. 
tiones, and his InVentd; Tbints well argued^nd things 
happily found out. The two very fame "particulars 
are principally confpicuous in this enfuing Piece. 
There are good Conclufions againft the Enemies of 
the Being and Providence of God in the Firft Part, 
and in the Second there be Notices of divers IriVenta 
profitable to the Ule of Man. By the one found 
Notions are propofed to the Readers apprehenfion 
from the Contemplation of God's Creation and Go- 
vernment of the World, and thereby good Matter is 
fuggefted to his Affe&ions for the Advancement of 
his Devotion; by the Other, there arc clivers things 
delivet'd, which may tend to enlarge Man's power 
of doing Good: By them, in the whole, both our 
Honour to God, and our Charity to our Neigh bors 

may 



Digitized by 



He <PnlUJJ?er to the fyaiefl k 

may be aflifted: in which two the Subftantial part 
of all the mod Noble,not only Humane but Chnfli- 
an Vermes, both Speculative and Pradlical, are cer- 
ainly contained. 

I muft not omit, that an Argument of this Nature, 
at this Time, may juftly be commended for its Sea- 
bnablenefle, when divers Perfons, who know not 
:he way of Experimental Tkilofophj , and are loath 
now to give themfelves the trouble of learning ir, 
have been making fomeattempts,vcry unthankfully, 
to traduce both it,and its Promoters. 

Theft Confiderations pafled with me for Rca« 
fons,and had upon me this force and prevalence , 
that as loon as 1 had the Authors leave, I durft not 
forbear the committing of them to the Prefs, not- 
withftanding his Many arguments , which were 
plaufible enough to the Contrary: as, namely, that 
much of the FirflPart was wjitten when he was • 
offo immature Years, that fliould I be particular 
concerning his Age then , to any perfon who hath 
read the piece, the paucity of fuch Inftances might 
juftly make me dilpair of begetting Credit to my 
Relation. Another Objeftion was, That, though 
Ws Method did of neceflicy lead him to it, yet it 
might be look'd upon as unbecomming for Him to 

meddle 



Digitized by Googl 



Tfo TubliJJnr to the %eaden 

meddle with the Phyfitians Art, of which he never 
did, (nor could, byreafon of his Native Honour) 
make any Profeffion. But thefe Oppofitions beinf 
raifed upon points of Curiofity inCejremony and 
outward Decorum, were of little Weight, when the 
forementioned Noble Offices of Charity and doinf 
good were in the other Scale. 

The greater Queftion was. Suppofc them to be 
pubhfht,But why now? Why fo foon? Should not 
iathcr the Edition have been delay'd, untill it might 
have come out together with The Second Section of 
the fecond Tart! (which difcovers the Life that may 
be made of Experimental Learning, to advance the 
Empire of Man over other Creatures) or untill the 
Common preface, and fome other little Trails, all 
written long fince,and intended to accompany this, 
might be revifed by the Author,- or at leaft untill the 
Author might have had ieifure to have made fome 
more new and full Aniroadverfions to the Receipts 
and procefles contained in the Appendix?The Confi- 
deracion which anfwer'd this Obje&ion was, That 
this Piece, as now Printed alone, would make (as 
you fee it dothj a very competent Book,which would 
have by it Self the perfection, if not of the Whole yec 
of a more principal part; and of that part, which to 

Profeflbrs 

■ 



Digitized by 



The Tuhlifber to the 7(ea der. 
Profeflbrs or Candidates of Learning is mod deflre* 
able. And then the Author s Avocations and other 
Studies being fo many-, that we could prefix no cer- 
tain time for the complement of the mention'd re- 
maining parts, I was loath to hazard the Prefervati- 
on'of Theft by deferring the lmpreflion ; ilnce I 
know there is no Security of the continuance of 
thofe Writings which arerepofed only in fingle, or 
at moft in few written Copies. I remember , the 
Author had once loft for a good while one of thefe 
veryEffays which are now here Printed, and put 
beyond that Danger for the future, Befides other 
Cafual accidents, the very Contigency of Humane 
life, and the chance of a man's papers after Death, 
(For to them the Queftion of King Solomon is moft 
proper and pertinent, VVbo knoTts whether then they 
may happen to fall into the hands of a Wife man or a Fool?) 
were of force enough to perfwade me to fecure thefe^ 
when it was ingiy power, unto the Common U(e. 
Would not Printing in all probability have preferv'd 
unto Us that Univerfai Hiftory of Vegetables from 
the Cedar of Lebanus unto the MoflTe that groweth 
upon the Wall, written by that Wife and Learned 
King,and the loffe of which we now in vain lament? 
Would not Printing have fav'd that Excellent Book 
of t>e mocrit jw^hich he inferibed his X E I P o'K M H- 

D**l TA. 



Digitized by Google 



The TuhUfrer to the fydieri 

ta or Experiments ofhis ownperfonalTrial^o 
utterly loft, that the Name of the piece is not menti- 
on'd among the Catalogue ofhis Writings in Laer- 
tim* And may not the Printing ofthis Piece be a 
meanes of the prefervation (befides the Notional 
partj of divers very ufeful xeipokmhta of the Ho» 
nourable Author? who hath been ever unwearied in 
the Tryal of all probable Experiments, that may in- 
creafethe Light or advance theProfit ofMankind,& 
whom I may now name to be that moft Learned 8c 
Noble Perfon Mr Boyle: For the ceaGng of certain 
Confiderations that beforemadehimwillingto have 
his name fupprefs't,& the general very good" accep- 
tance ofthisDifcoutfe have extorted from hisHonot 
thatHeno longer conceal Himfclfto bcthe Author. 

But before I leave the Reader,Imuft give him this 
fingle Advertifement, that the Paflages included 
within the Paratkejes or Crotchetts, as the Prcfs ftiles 
them^hat is, between any two fuqfr Kirks as thefe 
[ 3 were inierted longfince the writing ofthefe 
Eflays,uponthc Reledionof lomcpartsoftheBook 
before He fent it to me: Which 1 therefore did fo di- 
ftinguifh,and do intimate, that there may appear no 
inconfiftency in our Author, and the Reader may , 
not marvel to find fomethings very Recent in aBook 
written feveral Years agoe. Farew4k 

RO: SHARROCK. 



% Digitized by Google 



The njfutbors 

Advertisement about the following 

ESSAYS. 

Hat theTttle of the following Treatife 
might not raife in the Reader an Expe* 
Elation of more then he will find in the 
Book, I think my felfobligd to inform 
him, 'float , though it come not forth be* 
fore,divers ptrts were/ent tothe Prejfe ini66o,or 1 661 
and this pre fent Tear 16 6^ yet the Very Lafl Effay of 
it was written d'pers Years before: Since when thofe 
Papers were Uft,fometimes in the hands of Fr tends, and 
Jometimes in dlflant places where I could not come at 
tbemlwhicb I mention y that the Reader may neither won- 
der nor blame Me, ifbenoft meet with fome things in 
them that have already been publiflnd by others, or are 
more vulgarly knoTt>n then my Tt> ay of mentioning them 
hnflyes. For it may, this notwithflanding, Very well be, 
that wbenlTtrittbem, nobody had yet lighted on fome of 
them , and that others of them did then but begin to be 

C***} taken 



Digitized by 




The Authors Advertifcment 
taken notice of And as for the Five fir (I F flays^ which 
treat of The Ufefulnefle of Natural Philofophyto 
the Mind of 'Man, though by my addreffing them all the 
way to the Gentleman I call Pyrophilus , they may feem 
to have been Originally written to the fame Per/on, and 
about the fame time with the Eflays , that make up the 
Second Part; yet indeed a great Tortion of the Firft 
part was written, as 1 remember , 10 or 12 years ago, 
(when Iwasfcarce ahoneix oriiyears old) to another 
Friend, to 1»hom the Qonftderations that ftrVd to con* 
firm p iety 9 and excite Devotion, were far more accepta- 
ble then thoje that Veremore purely Phyfological : fo that 
haying, whether through lazjneffe, or Tt> ant of lei fur e 
contented my [elf to fubjlitute the name of Pyrophilus 
for that of my other Friend ( who Tbxs not unwilling 
I flwdd do fo) in a Difcourfe written Tbben 1 was fo 
Young} I would not have the Reader think, that I do noTt> 
fo approve ofalltbofe Youthful Dijcourfes ("tohicb I there- 
fore Juffer to pap abroad without a 2{ame) as to think 
aO the Tenets they proposed to be irrefragable Truths, 
or all the ^eafonings they contein, to be Demon fl rat ive ; 
and that I Tbould at prefent ha Ve my Judgment efltmated 
according to their Cogency. Sutyet I do without much 
3(eluc~tancy comply withthofe Friends, Tbho Tbould by no 
means confent 9 that the Five firft Effays of this Treatife 
JJmldnotcome forth with the %ffc partly becaufe not 

, Writing 



Digitized by Google 



About the following EffayesJ 

writing all things for all Readers, 1 hold it not unfit to 
fnUijb fomethtng to gratify thofe , who deftre with me 
to fa both excited and ajfifled to admire and praifethe 
Gmt and Wife Author of all things ; partly becaufe 
tht Treatije would feem maimd and incompfeat, if the 
Utter Bjfays (houlJ come abroad without the ^eft-, and 
partlytoo becaufe Learned Men have been pleas' d toaf- 
jure me, that thofe Fffays art not destitute of ]>{otions 
and Ratiocinations, that are not altogether Vulgar or 
contemptible. How ever thofe Readers , that either can- 
not relltfh, or at haft defire not any thing , but what is 
meerly Phyfiologtcal, may, thus advertis d, paffe by the 
former part of this Treatife, and content thenfdvts to 
read over the Latter, though the) who /hull take the 
fains to read fiotb, mil not perhaps think their Labour 
/of?: Since 1 have taken Care to leave even the former 
part 44 little disfurntfh'e H>itb Experiments and ufeful 
2^9tions^ as, the Argument conftdtrd , / conveniently 
could. And flnce al(o for the Paucity of fuch things in . 
the Fir ft fart, 1 have endeavoured to make amends in 
the Second, which is almofl wholly fbyfiological ; con* 
cerning which nevertheleffe Ifhall admonijh the Reader} 
^fnd indeed the Tbhole Tenets that make up the following 
Sook, are by no means to be looKd upon as Publifhed for 
an accurate Treatife of the Ufefulnefc of true fhjfiology, 
but as Familiar VVntingt jthat want only the formality of 

Salve 



Digitized by Google 



T 



The Author's Advcrtifemcnt 

Salve and Vale to paffe for Topological and Medical 
Epiftles ; confifting of fuch loofe ObferVations , as I 
thought might be this Tfc ay pre ferVd y and did not fo pro- 
perly belong to mj other Writings as they Jeem'd fitted for 
the ufe } and thereto I have applyed them. y namely % that 
being dralon up together into one Treattfe y their Union 
Plight enable them to make the greater lmpreffton y and 
might (fomelchat at leaft) recommend that fort of Lear- 
ning to a Beginner. And one thing that muft be efpecially 
comprehended in this Admonition is y that the Particulars 
1 have mentioned \ to fhew of what ufe Chymical Expert, 
ments may be to a ( Phyfitian ) are not,poffibly, the chief eft 
that even I could fit do"wn, ifllberenot reft rained by 
fome justifiable Con federations; efpecially' till 1 fee 'what 
Entertainment, the things 1 now Venture abroad, will 
meet with there : Some of thofe I re ferVe appearing fuch 
to me % that 1 confefs I do not flight them enough to be fond 
of obtruding them upon the ( Publick y if I thought they 
i would not be Welcome to it. Md 1 dofo little defire to 
baVe y "what I have "written, hoKd upon di the mojl that 
can be faid, to [hew the Uftfulnefteof Experimental 
Philofophy, that Ifcruplenot to ackno^ledg there are 
things 'which incline me to [ufpecl, that fome in the world, 
though not particularly known to me y may have Arcana, 
toit>hich mofe of the Troceffes lrejerVe,04 Bellas all 
that is commonly knVwn in Cbymtftry, may proVe little 
more then Trtftes. 



■ • » 



Digitized by Google 



1 



OF THE ' 

VSEF VLNESSE 

OF 

Naturall Philofophy. 

The Firft Pare. 



Ofits VTefuIncfTc in reference to 
the Minde of Man* 



essay. L 



5d by Google 



t ^ 



Digitized by Google 




Of the US EFULNE SSE of 

Experimental Philosophy,. 

# . ■ • 

Principally as it Relates to the 
A4i A[Z> of M A^' 

HE Natural Phtiosopy wontto fttwtfkwtj 
be taught in mod Schools, being little l f AwSm Si 
other then aSyfteme.of the Opinions flTVyrM** 
of ArifiotU , and fome few other Wri- with farm 

?*' ,s , not v ,c ? nfcfle '/ r ''f y/,< '' vef y 

difficult to be Learned , as being attai- $ h 
nableby the perufall or a few of the 
more Current Authors, But, PjropMltu, 
that Exp irimbntaiPhi losop h y, 
vh s h you will find treated of in the rollowng ElTayes,isa 
itudy, it duely profecuted , to difficulr, fo charge ib!e , ?nd (o 
oilefome, that \ think it requifite, bt fore I propofe any parri- 
:ular Subje&s to your Enquiries , to poll lie you with a juft 
/aloe ot true and folid Phyfiology* and fo convince you, True 
by endevouring to addict you to ir,l invite you not to mifpend 
pur time or trouble on a Science unable to merit and rtquLd 
it. In order , Pjrephslus , to the giving you this fatisftftion, 
Give me leave to mind you, that icwa* a laying of fjth igoras* 

B worthy 




(*) 

worthy fo celebrated a Philofopher, That there are two things 
which moil ennoble Man,and make him referable the Gods-, To 
know the Truth, and To do Good For, Pyropbilus, that Diviner 
part of Man, the Soul, which alone is capable of wearing the 
Glorious Image of its Author, being en :'owed with two chief 
Faculties, theUnderftanding and the Will* the former is bleft 
and perfection ated by Knowledg, and the tatter's Lovelieft 3nd 
moft improving property is GoodneiTe. A due Reflection 
upon this excellent Sentence of him to whom Philofophers owe 
that modeft name, (hould,me thinks, Pyopbilfujrery much en- 
dear to us the Study of Naturall Philofophy. For there is no 
Humane Science that does moregratifte and enrich theUnder- 
ftanding with variety of choice and acceptable Truths nor 
fcarce any th3t does more enable a willing mind to exercifea 
Goodnefle beneficiall to others. 

mdtarpbiiifo; ^° man -kft tne -" e truths more diftin&\y ^Pjrophiltujndyet 
fb y isco*ducivt without exceeding that brevity my Avocations and the Bounds 

tfffftTSSfa? °^ an ^^ a y exa< ^ °f" Qie,I fh ill, among the numerous advantages 
prndhtMi i*" accruing to Men from the Study of the Book of Nature, con- 
:beacreaftng(>f tent my felfe to infhnceonly in a Couple,that relate more pro. 
liw fowir. p er jy t0 t h e Improving of Mens Under /landings ,and to mention 
a few of thofe many, by which it encreafes their Power. 

The two chief advantages which a reall acquaintance with 
Natur/ brings to our Miuds,are, Fu ll, by inftru&ing our tin- 
derftandings and gratifying our Curioffties and next, by exci- 
ting and cneriihifig our Devotion. 
'Arpmnts to And for the fii ft of thefe: fince,as Ariftotle teacheth,and was s 
rtr't* fa" tau § n thimfelf by Common Experience,,-// Men arc Naturally 
frrttdgt "is defirous to Know : that Propenfity cannot but be powerfully 
mud> thtnby engaged to the Works of N iture, which being inceffantly pre* 
fratif/ed. ^ e ^ t tQ om f en f es> £ Q continually follicite oui Curiofities s Of 

whofe potent inclining us to the Contemplation of Natures 
Wonders, it is not perhaps the inconfiderableft Irvftjnce, that 
though the Naturali Philofophy hitherto taught in moft 

Schools, 



Digitized by Google 



Schools, hath been fo Litigious in its Theory, and To barren 

as to its Productions $ yet it hath found numbers of Zealous 
and Learned Cultivators, whom fure nothing but Mens in- 
bred fondntile for the Objtd it converfes with, and the end it 
pretends to, could fo paflionately devote to it. 

An J fince that ( as the fame Ariftotle taught by his mafter 
rUto well obftrv.es ) Admiration is the Parent of Philo- 
fophy , by engaging us to enquire into the caufes of the 
things- at which we marvail 5 we cannot but be powerfully 
invited to the Contemplation of Nature, by living and con- 
verting among Wonders , fome of which are obvious and con- 
fpicuous enough to am9ze even ordinary Beholders and o- 
tbei s admirable and abftrufe enough to aftoniih the molt inqui- 
fitive Spe&ators. 

The bare profpect of this magnificent Fabrick of the Uni- 
verfe , f urnilhed and adorned with fuch ftrange variety of cu- 
rious and ufefull Creatures, would fufheeto tranf port us both 
with Wonder and Toy, if their CommonnefTc did not hinder 
their Operations. Of which Truth Mr Stepkins^ the famous 
Oculift, did not long fince fupply us with a memorable In- 
fiance: For ( as both himfelfe and anliluftiious Perfon that 
was prefent at the Cure informed mee^ a Maid of about A uUim •ftH 
Eighteen yeares of Age, having by a couple of Cataracts, that # ?J 
flie brought with her into the World, lived abfolutely blind huidio.nbitndi 
from the moment of her Birth $ being brought to the free life J*** ***** 
of her Eyes, was fo raviftitat the furprizing fpe&acle oi iop r ' ^"Zld 'thl 
many and various Objects , as prefented tWnfeives cohere -tffr </ tit 
unacquainted Sigh% that almoft every thing (lie fa w tranfpor- JX^J^ 
ted her with fuch admiration and delight,; hot the was in danger ii^h prcftttci 
to loofe the eyes of her Mind by thole of her Body , and ex* ht< Wltb * 
pound that Myfticall Arabian Proverb, which auviles,' To jhut 
% e Windows, that the Hottfc may be light. 

But if the bare beholding of this admirable Structure is ca- 
pable of pleafiog men fo highly , how much fariibdion, Py- 

B 2 rojthiluf. * 



Digitized by Google 



w 

n* m \n** nfhilu4 % may it be fappofed to afford to an Intelligent Spedh- 

$*4 tor > who is ablc ***** t0 "ndcrftand and to relifli the admirable 
tture^idim- Archite&urc and skilfuil contrivance of it : For the Book 
irfeMfiff of 0 [ Nature is to an ordinary Gazer, and a Naturahft, like a rare 
Ew-XtoT Book of Hieroglyphicks to a Child, and a Philosopher : the 
the h ht9 f tbe one is fufficiently pieafed with the Odnefleand Variety of the 
»mrdlh*tcs. c ur i ous Piaures that adorn it-, whereas, the other is not 
only delighted with thoCe outward objects that gratifie his 
fenfe, but receives a much higher fatisfa&ion in admiring th* 
knowledge of the Author, and in finding out and inriching 
himftlfe with thofe abftrufe and vailed Truths dexteroufly 
hinted in the m. 

Bxmpift **d Yts, Pyrophibs , as the Under ft an ding is the higheft fa- 
in(ia*'tt •/ r J ? culty in Man , fo its Pleafures are the htsheft he can naturally 

prtvjlettt t[ toe i AJi^rr i_ » i. i. *.* 

pitaf*reibst *- receive . And therefore I cannot much wonder thjt the te- 
rifts fm the mous Archimedes lightine in a B3th upon an Expedient to 
knmudl* rt(o\vc a perpltxng difficulty in Naturall Phlofo.hy, 
mould leap out of the Bath, and run unclothed like a mad- 
man, crying nothing but Ew.u^/e^h^, / have found it, I 
hdvc found it. Nor do I fo much admire as deplore the fa- 
tally venturous curiofity of thi Elder Plirtj, who, as the 
Younger relates , could not be deterr'd by the formidable- 
neiTeofthedeitru<5t»ve flames vomited by Fefuvius, from en- 
deavoring by their Lightio read thi Nature of fuch Vulca- 
nian H Is-, but in fpightof ail the duTwafionsof his Friends, 
Bf^thc fTrightin^ eruptions of that hideous Place, he refol- 
ved that Flaming Wonder ftiould rather kill him , then efcipe 
him and thereupon spproch'd faneer trmheloft hisLifcto 
faci fie his Curiofity, and fell ( if I may fo fpeak ) a Martyr to 
Phy fi >logie. For we daily fee Alchymifts hazard their lives on 
Minerall Experiments in Furnaces, whete though the fires 
are not fo vaft and fierce, as thofe that Pliny went to confi- 
der 5 yet the ( dangerous when not pernicious ) Fumes do 
lometimes prove as fatal!. 
• One 



zed by Google 



(5) 

One would think, Piropbilus , that the converting with 
dead and ft inking Car kafles ( that are not only hideous objects 
in them lei ves, but made more ghaftly by putting us in mind 
that our felves muft be fuch ) mould be not only a very melan- 
choly, but a very hated imployment. And yet, Pyrophilua^ 
there are Anatomifts who dote upon it 5 And I confeflfe its In- 
ftru&ivenefs hath not onelyfo reconciled me to it, butfoen- 
amor'd me of it , that I have often fpent houres much lefs de- 
lightfully, not onely in Courts, but even in Libraries, then in 
tracing in thofe fbrfaken Manfions, the inimitable Workman- 
ftiipof the Omnifcient Architect. 

The curious Works of famous Artificers, are wont to in- tbtttu 
vite the Vifits, 3nd excite the wonder of the generality of in- ^1$%™$. 
quifitive Perfons. And I remember , that in my Travels, I c hu w»k s * 
hivt often taken nofmallpaift to obtain the pleafure ofga- ut mmtdeOAt*' 
zing upon fome Mafterpiece of Art: But now, I conic fs, I y^jS \f 
could with more delight look upon a skilfull DiiTe&ion , then \at*riu. 
the famous Clock at Strasbutg. And, methinkes , AriftotU 
difccurfes very Philofophically in that place, where pafling 
from the consideration of the fublimeft productions of Na- 
ture, to juftinc his -diligence in recording the more homely 
Circumftances of the Hiftory of Animals, hethusdikourfes : 
R cftat{ faith he)«f de animanti natura difieramus , nihil pro viri- t 4rfn.j t fg n} • 
bmomittentes vcl villus vel nobtlitts. Nam & in its qu* hoc in Awm-Mk.**$ 
genere minus grata nofiro oecurrunt fenfui^ Natura far ens & 
author omnium miras excitat voluptates hominibus, qui intetti- 
gunt cjufas & ingenue Pbilofopbantur . Abfurdum enim null a 
ratione probjndum eft , ft imagines quidem rerum uaturalium nen 
fint deleft at ione propterek inflreftamus, quod ingefiium content- 
x flamur quod ill as condidertt, tdeft, artem pihgendi aut fingendi^ 
rerum autem ipfarum naturd ingenio miraque folcrtia conjlitn* 
tarn contemplationem non magis profequamur atqut exofcale- 
mux ^ modo caufas per fp tare valeamus : It remains ( faith he) 
tbatwedifcourje of the- Mures of Animals, being circum/pejt 

u 



1 



Digitized by Google 



(6) 

to omit none either of the ncblen or info tor fort • Tor evrn from 
thofe Creatures which lefs pieafcoar \enfc dies the waiver fal Pa- 
rent, Nature i afford incredible contentments to fuch Persons, as 
under ft dnd their caufes . gad fhiUphize ing'atoufa. Since it 
mre abfurd and inconftftent torcafon, if we fo°n!d beheld the 
Pottrtitmes cf N.uutal things with dehcidtun^b;caufc we ob- 
ftrve the accuratenefs wherewith they arc depgned namely the shd 
of Paint me or Sculpture and not much more gff cl gnd pttrfae m 
th* esntewphtion of things themfches, contrivtd by the exqtu* 
fite slrtifuc andSjgacit] of Nature^pro'vid.dwe be iblc to un- 
Th.it ihe dd'rjrt der(l,wd their caufs. And the better to make out to y ou, Py« 
fc^fia'*y''^-r^//w 1 thedelighcfu!nefs of the ftudy or Natural Plulofo- 
thcr uofaint. phy ^ j etmeobfcrve toyou> That thole pleating Truths it 

Ceachcth us, do highly gratifie our intelle&ual Faculties, with- 
out difpleafing any of them : f#r they are none of thole Cri- 
m;nal # Plea lures, which injur'd andinceafed Conference docs 
very much alby,even in the Fruition, and turns into Tor- 
ments after it. Nor are the Enquiries I am recommending of 
that trifling and unferviceable fort of Imploymenrs, which 
though Conicience condemns not is unlawful tor a Chrftian, 
Re3fon difapproves as not worthy of a Philofopber; and 
wherewith to be much delighted, argues a weaknefs as to be 
pleafed with Babies and Whittles, fuppofes unripe and weak 
Intellectuals : But the contemplation of Nature,is an Imploy. 
ment, which both the Pofleflbrs of the fublimeft Reafon, and 
thofe of the fevered Virtue, have not onely allowed,bur. cul- 
tivated. The Learned Author of the Book De oflf/W^afcrib'd 
to u^ri^V, begins it with this Elogittm of Natural Philo- 
fophy iMihtquidem jgpe (fayes he) diving ejugdem res , Alex- 
lnflmctt if the gnder^admiratione^ digna it fa eft Pbilo[ophia,pr*c/pue vero tn 
Bjleme diverfe eg parte in qua foU ipfa fubltme fcfe tollens ad contcmplandts 
imLdfffit rerum ^^ttraJ^mggno iUtc ftudio contendit exiflentem in cis vt* 
pwr ' 9r ' ' rttatem pernefcere. Phylofophj (faith hej O Alexander, hath 
of untunes feem'd to we a Divine And Admirable Thing ; but 

chiefly 



Digitized by Gc 



(7) 

tfocfly, that part of it, which afpires to contemplate the Natures 
of things, implcying its ut mo ft power in (e arching out the truth 
contained in them. The reafonablenefs of which Commen- 
dation, he handfomely enough profecutes in the fubfequent 
Difcowfe: To which I fliali refer you, that I may proceed to 
minde you, that Pythagoras, Democritas, Plato ,and divers o- 
thci s of thofe whole Wifdom made after-ages reverence An- 
tiquity, did notonely efteem the Truths of Nature.worth ftu- 
dying for, but thought them too worth Travelling for as far 
as thofe Eaftern Regions, whofe Wife-men weie then cry'd 
up for the beft Expofitors of the obfcure Book of Nature. 
And that fevtre Teacher, and perfwafive Rccommender of the 
ftn&eft Virtue, Seneca (whofe eminent Wifdom made him in- 
vited to govern Him that was to govern the World, and who 
fo Qften and fo excellently prelTes the husbanding of our time) 
does not onely in feveral pafl'ages of his Writings praife a con- 
templation of Nature, but Writes himfelf feven Jiooks of 
Natural Queftions, and addreffes them to that very LucilittSy 
whom in his Epifties he takes fuch pains to make compleatly 
Virtuous \ and in his Preface, after he had faid according to 
his manner, loftily , Equtdem tunc Nature rerum vratias aro, m . _ - 
cum i Ham non at hac parte video, qu& pHbltcajfl, Jed cum 
cretioraejas tntravi^cum difcoqud Hmverfi UVlateria fit, quit .^P- 
Auihor^aut Cuftos^ &c. Then do I pay my ackowledgements to 
Nature, wh r n I he hold her not on the out* fide, which ts cbvictts 
to public k view^but am enter d into her more fecret Jieceftes: 
when I under (land what the Matter of the Univerfe is, who its > 
Author, and Preserver, crc. He concludes in the fame llrain, 
Nifiad b<et admitterer^non fuerat operd pretium nafct : Had I 
been debarr d from thefe things , it would not have been worth 
coming into the World. And to adde what he excellently fays 
in another Treatife, Ad hue qu^renda natus ( fayes he, having 
fpoken or Enquiries concerning the Univerfe) £(lima ejuam non 
• mnltum acceperit temporis, etiam ft illud mum fibi vindicet, cut 

Use: 

■ 



Digitized by Google 



(9) 

licet nihil facilitate eripi,nihil negtfgrntia fatiatur excidere^ li- 
cet boras fu.u avari[stmt fcrvet, ejr ufque tn ultima At At is ba- 
rn an a tcrminos procedal; nec qu'tcqutd tilt ex eo quod Naturacon- 
[tituit fortuna concutiat; t. ut.cn homo id immortal turn cogtiti,* 
nemnimis mortalis eft. Ergo fecandum Naturam vivo, ft to- 
turn me tlli dcdiffttlltn Admirator Cult or (urn* NAtura Autem 
utrumjf facere me volutt ejr Agere, & content f I Atiom vocarc. 
sen. de o.io $ e ing b 6rn deftgnedly for (e Arching out tbefe things, conftder that 
*t' e ' i% the portion of ttme A/Jotted to Man, is not great, if this fludy 
fhould ingrofs it all ; fnee though he (houid prefer ve his hours with 
the grcAieft frugality si his life, ttme, not fujfering any to be/to- 
lenfrom bim^ or jl>de aw aj negligently* And never be djlurbedby 
Accidents of Fortune in the Impldyment Nature has Appointed 
him^yetishe too LMortAlto AttAintbe knowledge of Immortal 
ihtngs* Wherefore^ I Uve agreeably to Nature, when I give 
up my f elf wholly to Her, And am Her ^Admirer and Ahoren 
Moreover, NAture hAth deftgnedme to ail , and tmploy my (elf 
this S tudy i # contemplation. H >w tar Religion is from dif- approving 
jSp** Study of Phy fiology , I (bill have occaiion to manlfeft ere 

long, when we (hall come to ihew, That it is anaft of Piety 
to offer up for the Creauires the Sacrifice of praife to the Cre- 
ator $ For, as anciently among the Jewes, by vertue of an 
Aaronical Extraction, Men were born With a Right to Prieft- 
bood y fo Rcafon is a Natural Dignity, and Knowledge a Pre- 
rogative, that can confer a Priefthood without Unelion or ira- 
polition of Hands. And as for Reafon , that is fo far from 
making us judg that Imployment unworthy of Rational Crea- 
tures, that thofe Philosophers (as AnflotU, Epicurus, Demo' 
critus, &c.J that have improved Reafon to the greattft height, 
have the moft ferioufly and induftrioufly imploy'd it to inve- 
ftigate the Truths, and promote the ftudy or Natural Philo- 
fophy. 

And indeed, that noble Faculty call'd Reafon , being con- 
f&ous of the great piogrek it may enable us to makeinihe 

Knowledge 



digitized by Google 



(9) 

knowledge of Natures Myfteries, if it were induftrioufly im- tbtdfMkptf 
ployM in the ftudy of them, cannot, but like a great Com- |22]fi&« 
mander,thinkit felfdifobliged by not being connderably em. th tMcmput'm 
ploy'd, And certainly we are wanting to our felves, and are ^ t] ^ll°ff s m 
guilty of little Irfs then our own Degradation, that being by jj^" UeyATe 
Gods peculiar vouchfafement, endowed with thofe noble Fa- 
culties of Undei (landing, and Difcourfing, and plac'd amidft 
a numberlefs variety of Obje&s, that incerTantly invite our 
Contemplations, can content our felves to behold fo many 
Inftructive Creatures which make up this vaft Univerfe, whole 
nobleft Part we are defing'd to be, with no more, or but lit- 
tle more difcerning Eyes then thofe lefs favored Animals , to 
whom Nature hath denyed the Prerogative of Reafon , as we 
deny our felves the ufe of it. Arifiotle well obferves , that 
among Animals, IVbn alone is of an erecled Stature and adds, 
That it is becaufe his Nature hath fomething in it of Divine : 
officium autem DivinL (inter's he ) c 0 intclliecre atque Sapere: _ _ . 

Jr, „ i -r /• ~ • « • *t j a j- i Dc Part. Amu, 

The Qualifications of a Dtvtne Bctng^ are Under ftandtng ana i.b.^c.io. 
Wt(dom. And it cannot but mil-become the dignity of fuch a 
Creature to live Ignorant or Unftudious of the Laws and Con. 
ftitutions of that great Commonwealth ( as divers of the An- 
tients have not improperly (tiled the World) whereof he is 
the eminenteft part: And were we not lulled afleep by Cuftom 
or Senfuality,it could not but Trouble, as well as it Injures a 
reafonable Soul to Ignore the Structure and Contrivance of 
that admirably Organiz'd Body in which fh<; lives, and to 
whofe intervention (he owes the Knowledge flie hath of other 
Creatures. 

'Tis true indeed, that even the generality of Men, without 
making it their defign, know fomewhat more of the Works 
of Nature, then Creatures deftirute of Reafon, can, by the 
advantage of that Superior Faculty, which cannot but even 
unurg'd, and of its own accord make fome, though but flight, 
reflections on the Information of the Senfes: But if thofe im- 
preffions be onely receiv'd and not improv'd, but rather neg- 

C i€^edj 

Digitized by Go< 



fio) 

le<3ed$ and if we (contenting ourfelves with the fuperficial 
account given us of things by their obvious Appearances and 
Qualities ) are beholding for that we know, to our Nature, 
not our Induftry, we faultily loofe both one of the nobleft Im- 
ployments, and one of the higheft Satisfactions of our rational 
'Mrstcd by tbe Faculty : And he that is this way wanting to himfelf, feems 
spktu a pj. to live in this magnificent Structure, calVd theUniverfe not 
hcetakmgmkt unlike a Spider in a Palace who taking notice onely of thofe 
h^mcS^ t" ac obtrude themfelvesup ^n her Senits, lives igno- 

yrtb. " rant of all the other Rooms of the Houfe, favethat wherein 
fhe lurks and decerning nothing either of the Architecture of 
the (lately Building, or of the Proportion of the parts of it 
in relation to each other, and to the intire Stru&ure, makes 
it her whole bufinefs, by intrapping of Flies to continue an 
ufelefs Life ; or exercife her felf ro fpin Cob webs, which 
though confining of very fubtle Threeds , are unferviceable 
for any other then her own trifling ufes. And that the con- 
templation of the World, efpecially the higher Region of it, 
was defign'd for Mins* Imployment by Natures Self, even < 
the Heathen Poet (perhaps inftru&ed by ArifiotU) could ot> 
ferve, who Sings, 

PronafccumfoeZient Animalia cater a terram y ~ 
OS homini fublime dtdit, caelu m% tueri 
*fufit, & ereftos ad fidera toller c vultus* 

■ 

Wife Nature, framing Brutes with downward looks* 

KjMan with a loft j Affttt did indue , 

And bad him Heave* with tts bright Glories view* 

I might annex , Pyrophilus , the Story fofrphus tells us in the 
ovid^sl" ' A*- beginning °f ms Antiquities , that 'twas the holy Seth 

kraham,**/ so. and his Pofterity (who are in Cenejis ftil'd the Sons of God) 
fomon hsdtf that wcrc the Inventers of Aftronomy, whofe more Funda- 

fht^H^of Z mental Obfervations (to perpetuate them toMan-kindc, «"nd 

fever 



Digitized by 



fever them from the foretold deftruftions by Fire and Watery fimmy a*i #• 
they engraved upon two Pillars, the one of Brick, the other ther ?h )f !0lt iJ% 
of Stone 5 the latter of which our Hiftorian reports to have f . 

been extant in Syria in his time. And it is an almoft uncon- j mct iiUtfj 
troll 'd tradition, that the Patriarch whom God vouchfafes to * 
(tile his Friend, was the firft Theacher of Aftronomy and Phy- 
lofophy to the Egyptians, from whom , long afterwards? the 
CrcctAns learn'd them, Berofus himfelf records him to have 
beenskill'd in the Science of the Stars, as he is cited by J>ofa 
fbus, (Ant.Ub. i.e. 8.)whoalittleafter fpeaking of K^ibra* 
ham snd the Egyptians ^ exprefly affirms, that Numtrorum fci» 
entiam & fide rum benigne tilts communicavit : Nam ante <lsf- 
brahami ad fe adventum,*A.gyptii rttdes trant hujufmodi dtfcipli- 
varum s qud k Chaldeis ad ^tgyfties prof eel d , bine ad Grtcos 
tandem fervenerunt. 

Bar, PyropbiUs, to put it out of queftion that the fublimeft 
reafon needs not make the Polleflbr of it think the ftudie 
of Phyfiologiean Imployment below him, that Unequalled 
Solomon, who was pronanced the Wifeft of men by their 
omnifcient Author , did not onely Juftifie the Study of Na- 
tural! Philofophyby addicting himfelte to it , but ennobled 
it by teaching it , and purpofely compofing of it thofe match- 
lefTe Records of Nature, from which I remember fome Jewfli ; 
Authors relate Ariftotle to have borrowed diverfe* which (if 
it be true) may well be fuppofed to be the choiceft pieces that 
adorn'd his Philofophie, and which Providence ptrh.ips de- ^Sffj^ 
priv'd the World of, upon fuch a fcore as it did the Jewes of of uiomiu 
the Body otCMofes^ left men fh >u!d Idolize it or as fome 
Rabbies are pleafed to informe us , left vicious men mould 
venture upon all kinds of Intemperance , out or Confidence of 
finding out by the help of thofe excellent Wi itings the Cure 
of all the diftempers their dtilblutenefiefhould produce. 

And, Pyrpphi'us^ yet a little fuither to difcover to you, the 
Delightfulneife of the Contemplations of Natures workes, 
Give me leave to mind you of then almoft unimaginable Va- 

C 2 riety 



Digitized by Google 



(11) 

riety as of a Property , that fliould methinkes no" faintly 
recommend Naturall Philofophy 3 tp curious snj active In. 
telle&uals. 

oftbedttkht p or mo ft otner Sciences, at leaft as they are wont to be 
from Zvallty taught, are fo narrow and fo circumfcrib'd , that he who has 
t>f obpas wbkb re ad one of the beft and recenteft Sy ftems of* them , fh illfind 
tfome fnduts \ n tne other Books publifht on thofe fubje&s, but dif- 
guis'd repetitions; and a diligent Scholar may in no long 
time learn as much as the ProfeiTors themfelves can teach him. 
But the objecls of Naturall Philofophy , being as many as 
the Laws and Works of Nature are, fo various and fo num* 
berleffe, that if a Man had the Age of LMtthufeUh to fpend, 
he might fooner want time then matter, for his Contempla- 
tions: And fo pregnant is each of that vaft multitude of 
Creatures, that make up the Naturalifts Theme, with ufefull 
matter to employ Mens ftudie, that I dare fay, that the whole 
lifeofaPhilofopherfpent in that alone, would be too flaort 
to give a fall and perfect account of the Natural properties 
andllfes of any one of feveral Minerals, Plants, or Animals 
that I could name, Tis an almoft incredible Variety of Ve- 
Tfof thire be a- g etables 5 tnat lne teeming Earth , impregnated by Gods Pro* 
bovc6oo> [ub- ducat Terra, does in feverall Regions produce. B atnmfts have 
i ( (itofihcvcgc. a pretty while 11 nee, reckon'd up ne«r 6000 Subjects of the 
idle K^m* Vegetable Kingdom * fmce when, divers other not-defcribed 
Plants have been oblerved by Herbarifts; the chief of which 
will, I hope, be fliortly communicated to the World , by that 
Curious and Diligent Botanift my Indubious Acquaintance, 
Dr. //tffl»,to whom I not long fince prefented a peculiar and 
cfantxceiUnt excellent kind of Pepper, whofe Shell taftes not unlike C in - 
Jamaica fwpo namon, and fmells fo like Cloves, that with the OJorlhave 
ncwiy bron%bt deceived many , which he confefl: to be new even to him it 
having been lately gathered in famaica{where it abounds ) and 
prefented me by the inquifitive Commander of the Englifli 
Forces there. And yet, Pjroj>bilus y this great variety of Sim- 
ples could not deter either Ancient or Modern Inquirers from 

Writing 



Digitized by Gooq 



f!|> 

Writing entire Treatifes of fome particular Ones. So ?Ud Sjj^f^ 
tels us, ■ ThatTbemifon the Phyfitian publiflic a Volume ( for quire i ar g e tra- 
fo he call'd it ) or that vulgar and difpifed Herbcalled Plantain: ti/attmfMd 
So the fame b Author tells us, That Ampbilocus*writ aVo- \ *{ ]Rt llb 
lurre De Medica Herba } ejr Cytsfa 5 and King c Juba another, cap.8. 
of a fort of Nympbta by him found on Mount Kotlas. And b J ? d ^' lZ ' 
in our Times, not to mention thofe many Books that have c i'd.i.b.iv 
been written by Phyfitians, of the Structure of Mans Body, ca P-7 5 
and De Ufa part turn : Carolus Rofenbcrgiut writ fome Years 
fince an entire Book of Rofes,' which he calls his Rhodologia*. 
Martinus Blochwitius fince pabliflied another Book of Elder, 
under the Title of Anatomia Sambuci . Among the Chy- 
mifts, ^ingelus SaU publifht in diftinft Treatifcs,his Vitriol 
logia, Tartarologia, Saccharobgta. Untzerus alio writ peculi- 
ar Trails 9 De Mercurio^ De Sulphur e, De Sale, And Par ah 
telfus himfelf vouchfafed diftinft Treatifes to hipertcon, Pcr- 
ficaria^ Hcllcborus, and fome other particular Plants. Bafilius 
V*lentinu$ (one of the moft Knowing and Candid Chimical 
Writers) publ fln long fince an excellent Treatife of Antimo made immv 
tiy % inferib'd Currus Triumphal* Antimonii^ but though in %?£ h 3$£ 
his other he hath alio taught us divers other things concerning ™'d\faw % L ' 
it, yet he left fo much undifcoveied in Antrmonj, that Angelus 
Sala was thereby emboldned to publifh his Anatomia Antfr 
monii. And Hamerus Pofpius ( if that be h s true name ) fa* 
hannis Tholdius , and the experienced Alexander Van Suchten\ . 
thought fit to write entire Treatifes oi that fame Mineral* 
by which if they feem to Eclipfe the diligence of Baflius y at 
leaft they bore witnefs to his Judgement: for modeftly invU 
ting his Headers to make further enquiries into the Nature and 
Preparations of that abftrufc Mineral, He gives this account 
of his leaving many things unmention'd, That the fhortnefiof 
Life makes it impofjible for one man throughly to learn Anti* 
mony, in which every day [omething cf new is dtfeovercd. And 
I remember, that having lately given a Chymift, upon hi$ 
requsft, fome Directions for drawing, not an imaginary Mer^ 

cory ' 



Digitized by Googl 



(i4) 

wlfMto' CUr5r of Alimony, as thofe which are wont to be taught by 
VJ , "Cbymifts, but a real fluid Qiick-filver * he fome days fince 

brought me about an Ounce of it (which you may command 
when you pleafe j as the fii ft Fruits of Directions , differing e- 
nough from thofe which I hive hitherto met with in Authors. 
A peculiar way likewife of feparatmg from Antimony, not 
fuch a Subftance as thofe which are as improperly as vulgarly 
'Andirau call'd Antimonial Sulphurs, but a really combuftible Body, 
y*rff%*m. which looks and burns foiike common Brimftone, that it is 
nythu bums not eafily diftingui (liable from it, we llullelfewhere, God wil- 
iik> ordtwjr i| n g 5 pyrophilut, teach you. And I remember, that whereas 
iimjm. according to the way mentioned by Bafil/ut in h s Currus Tri- 
umpbalis, and both generally tranlcrib'd by Authors,and for- 
merly pradis'd by our felves, the Tin&ure of the Glafs of An- 
tinomy is very tedious to make, being to be drawn with Spi- 
rit of Vinegar, I once made a Mcnftruum to draw it more expe- 
ditioufly, which having not hitherto met with in any of the 
Authors I have read, I (hall not conceal from you: Taking then 
^Jfl^Zm- an arbitrary quantity of the bed French Verdegrece,and diftil- 
maU a<ff wii; ling it orderly in a ftrong naked Fire, I found the extorted Li- 
tbt entire pr*- q UOr t0 extract ( even in an ordinary digefting heat,) from pow- 
pftv dra*it. Antimonial Glafs, a Blood- red Tindure in three or four 
hours § and my curiofity leading me to abftraft the Mcnflw 
urn from the tinging Powder, and put it again upon pulveris'd 
GlaEs,I found it again highly Tinned in a very few houres. And 
profecuting the experiment. I found that by drawing off the 
Mtnftruum^d digefting Spirit of Wine upon the remain ng 
Calx, I could foon obtain a red Tincture, or Solution, From 
which forae Chymifts, It I fliould tell them what I have now 
told you, would perhaps expect no ordinary Medicine. But 
this, I fuppofe, you will think lefs ftrange, then that with a Li- 
quor eafily feparated, by a way which I may clfcwhere teach 
you, from an obvious Vegetable, of which you may fafely eac 
a whole Pound at a rime , I have drawn a deep red Tindure, 
even from crude Autiraony, and that in not many hours, and 
.without heat. Aad 



05) 

And to thefe Experiments of Antimony, I might (partly 
from the communication of my Friends, and partly from fome 
tryalsof my own) adde divers other undivulg'd Experiments 
relating to that Mineral 5 if it were not now more feafonable, 
referving them for other Papers, to mindeyou, That the 
Learned Ktrchtrus hath inrich'd us with a great Volume in °£^ t ^ 
Folio* of Light and Shadows-, and another In gadrto, of the Kidxr 
Load-ftone : and yet none of thefe have fo exhaufted the Sub- lu b CCt £ vet ^i 
jecls they have treated of, but that an after- Enquirer may be l/^SS./!^ 
able to recruit their Obfervations with many new ones,perhaps 
more numerous or more confiderable then the former : As af- 
ter our Learned Country- man Cilbertus had written a Volume 
ofthe Load-ftone, the Jefuit Cabeus was not by that deterr'd 
from writing another ot the fame Subject: And though fince 
Cabens, the Ingenious Kircherus have fo largely profecuted ic 
in his Voluminous Ars LMagnetica, yet he has not re3p*dhts 
Field fo clean, but that a careful Gleaner may ftill finde Ears 
enough to make fome Sheaves. And what I have lately try'd 
or feen, makes me think it very poffible to recruit thofe many 
of Kircherus , with fome further Magnetical Experiments un- 
mention'd in his Book. And I have, the very day I writ this a . 
made in that admirable Stone a not-inconfiderable E xperi- 
ment, not extant (that I remember) there : For taking an ob- 
long Load-ftone, and heating it red-hot, I found the attractive 
Facultie in not many minutes, either altogether abolifh'd, or 
atleaft fo impaired and weaned, that I was fcarce, if at all; 
able to difcern ir. But this hath been obferved, though not offimne» " 
fo faithfully related, by more then one* wherefore I (hall adde* bSondrfcoi 
That by refrigerating this red-hot Load-ftone either Nortb \ier y dtftbat 
or South, I found that I could give its Extreams a Polarity (\{ stmtm - 
I may fo tpeak) which they would readily difplay upon an exci- 
ted Needle freely plac'din v£tj*iltbrium: And not onely fo,but 
I could by refiigerating the fame end fometime North and 
fometime South, in a very fhort time change the Poles ot the 
Load-ftone at pleafure, making that which was a quarter of 

an - 

Digitized by Google 



(i6) 

an hour before the North- pole, become the South ; and. on 
the contrary, the formerly Southern Pole become the Nor- 
thern .• And this chsnge was wrought on the Lo3<j-ftone, noc 
onely by cooling it dire&ly North and South, but by cooling 
in perpendicularly that end of it which was contiguous to 
the Ground, growing the Northern Pole, and fo (according 
to the Laws Magnetical) drawing to it the South end of the 
Needle; and that which wastemoteft from it, the contrary 
one: As if indeed the Terreftnal Globe, were, as fome Magne- 
tick Philofophers have fuppof'd it , but a Great Magncs, hnce 
its Effluviums are able, in fome Cafes, to impart a Magne- 
tick Faculty to the Load- flone it felf. Some other Experi- 
ments of this nature, not extant in Kircherus^ we may have 
elfewhere fit opportunity to mention. And indeed, that E- 
nigmatical Mineral (if I may fo cal it) the Load-ftone, is a 
fubjeft fo fertile in Rarities, that I hear, he himfelr is Re- 
printing that accurate Treatife, with new and large Additi- 
ons. 

That timubie ^ or are ^" malle ft an ^ mo ^ defpicable productions of 
speculations may Nature fo barren, but that they are capable both to invite our 
arife frm the Speculations, and to recompenfe them. Pliny in the eleventh 
plX^7 Book of his Natural Hiftory , where he treats of Infeds, is 
%<aur ( . ' a little after the entrance, tranfported with an unwonted admi- 
ration of the Workmarimip of Nature in them: Nufquam 
alibi ffayes he) [peCtaticre Nature rerum artificic : In Nothing 
cl [where (faith he) is the workmanjhip of Nature more remark- 
able then in the contexture ofthefe little Creatures. And after 
a Wonder, not unworthy a Philofopher, he concludes, Rerum 
Natura nufquam magis quam in minimis tota ejli Nature in her 
whole Power is never more wholly feen then in her fmaUefl Works, 
To which Epiphonema he adds this Sober and Philofophical 
Admonition, £>*apropter, qu.tfo nehac legentes^ quoniamcx 
his fp ermine mult a ^ etiam re lata fa/lidio damnent, cum in con • 
tempi at l one Nature nihil pofiit vtdert fupervacaneum : Where- 
fore I would requeft (he Perufers of thefe Difcourfcs, that al- 
though 



Digitized by Google 



fi7) 

though the fubjccJs we trtit of Are contemptible in their eyes, the) 
wouid not therefore difdain the relations rve (hall make of them 5 
fine c nothing ought to fecm fuperfluous in the contemplation of Na- 
ture. I remember that it is from the confederation of fodefpi- 
cable a part as the skin of the Sole of the Foot, that Galen takes 
occafion to magnifie the Wifdom of God in thofe excellent 
terms that we fhall have oceafion to mention hereafter. And, as 
he fays rarely well, though fome Creatures feem made of much 
courfer Stuff then others,yet even in the vileft the Makers Arc 
Shines through the defpicablenefs of the Matter. For Idiots 
admire in things the Beauty of their Materials, but Artifts that 
of the Wot kmanfhip:to vvhich^after a great deal of Philofophi- 
call Difcourfe, he adds, Nequc oculo nec cercbro deter ius eft pes 
cor>ftruc~lus$utrafy pars ad ac7/oncs,cujus gratia fuit fatfa, fc ha- 
le At optime t neque cerebrum fine pede fe probe haberet , ncque pes 
fine cerebro : Eget enim, opinor, tllud vehiculo , hie autem fenfu : 
Nor is the Foot worfe contrivd then the Brain or Eye , provided 
tach part be duly difpofd for the performance of the actions to 
which it was dt fign d • Since the Brain could not conveniently 
want the Foot, nor the Foot the Brain. For, I conc^ ive, that one 
Jlands in need of a fr/pport for local mot /on , and the other of a 
four ce fr cm whence to derive the faculties of Feeling. To which 
we may annex that Judicious reafoning of Ari(lot!e^\\\o defen- 
ding from the contemplation of the^fublimer Works of Na- 
ture^o treat of the Parts of Animals, thus endeavors to keep 
his Readeis from thinking that the Object of it muft render 
that Enquiry dtfpicable : Xcflattfays he) ut dc animanti NaturA 
drfcramus : And hiving fet down thofe Words which you have 
DOC long fince read inconnt&ion to thefe,he thus pioiecutcs his 
difcourfe : tjjteamobrem, vilicrum Animal/urn difputat/cnew prr- 
penfwnemj f fajlidio qtiodam / ucrili (previQe , pielefli j { tuliffe di- 
gnum ncquaqtum c(l:Cum nulLi res fa NAturdjnqu/»o;i mir 'ari- 
dum aliqucd habcatur . Et quod Ileraclttum fa unt dixific ad eor y 
qui cum aHoqui cum vellcnty an od forte in Capfumaria qv.\dam 
CAloris gratia fedentcm vidt[]c;,t y .icccdcre temper at ur.t, irtgrcdi 

D tnim 



mirers , the Angels were Created the Firft Day, as Divines 
generally infer from the Words of God in J-ib; when waft 
thou when I laid the Foundations of the Earth ? and a little after: 
When the UMorning Stars fang together^ and aff the Sons o\ Cod 
fronted for $oy. Where by the <JH owing Stars and Sons of s. % « ; 
Cod art fuppos'd to be meant the newly Created Angels one 
ofwhofeearlieftexercites was,itfeems, to applaud the Crea- 
tion, and take thence ocafionto fing Hymntstothe Almigh- 
tie Author of it. 1 mould not, Pjropht/us, addeany thing fur- 
ther on this fu!*je<ft, but that having fince the writing of thefe . 
thoughts met with a Difcourfe of Seneca's y very consonant 
to fome of them, 1 fuppofe it may tend to your delight as 
well as to their ac vantage, if I prefent you fome of the Truths 
you have feen in my courfer Linguage , dreft up in his finer 
and happier Expreflions. Curtofum nobis ( faith he ) natura | cn - 
ingeniumdedit^ & artis fibi Vulchritudtnify confcid y fpeftato~ f ,,V - 
res n os t ant is rerum fpeclaculis genuit , perdttura fru&nm fut\ 
ft tarn magna^ tarn clara tarn fubttliter duel a , tarn nitida ejr non 
ttnogencreformofa folitudins oftenderct-, Ut fcias tllam fpeclari 
wlutfie,nontantum afptci ,vide quern locum nobis dedit; ncct- 
rexit tantummodo homwem, fed etiam ad contempt at ionem 
jatfum , ut ah ortu ftdera tn occafum iabentta profequi poffet 
<jri-ultum fuum ctrcurrferre cumtoto , Sublime till fecit caput^ 
ey collo flcxtbtlt smpojuit. Deinde fena per dtem , fena per 
noclem ftgna produx't^ nullam non partem (ui cxpltcuit^ut per 
hac qu& obtulerat ejus oculis cuptdttatem ftccrct ettam Cdtcro- 
rum: nee enim omnia nee tanta v/ftmus quanta funt , fed acses 
noflra apertt (ibt ihveftigando vi<tm , & fundament* veri jactt, 
utinqutfttto tr an feat ex apertis in obfeura^ ejr aliqntd ipfo Mundo 
invent at \^inttquius. And leaft you might be offended at his 
- mentioning of Njture^and filence of God, give me leave to 
inform you, that about the dole of the Chapter immedi- 
ately preceding that, whence the Pilfage you come from Rea- 
ding is tranferib'd, having fpokenof the Enquiiies of Phi- 
lofophers into the Nature of the Univerfe, he adds, H*c qui 

COntemflatur^ 



Digitized by Google 



: (*o) 

that great Variety of Man's Productions, that is to be found in 
the fliops of Artificers,^ Laboratories of Chymifts,and other 
well-furniflied Magazines of Art, he would admire to fee whit 
a new world, as it were,or fet of Things has been added to the 
Primitive Creatures by the Induflry of His Pofterity. 

And though it be very true, that man is but the Mnifter of 
Nature,and can but duely apply Agents to Patients(The reft of 
the Work being done by the applied Bodies themfeives ) yec ' 
by his skill in making thofe Applications, he is able to perform 
fuch things as do not only give him a Power to Mafter Crea- 
tures otherwife much ftronger then himfelfe-, but miy ennable 
one man to do fuch wondei s,as another man mall think he can- 
not tufficiently admire- As the poor Indians lookt upon the Spa. 
niards as more then M*n,becaufe the knowledg they bad of the 
Properties of Nitre, Sulphur and Charcoale duely mixt, enna- 
bled them to ThunJer anJ Lighten fo fatally, when they plea- 
fed. An J this Empire of Man,as a Naturalift,over the Creatures 
may perch ince be to a Philosophical Soul preferved by reafoti 
untainted with Vulgar Opinions, of a much more fatista&ory 
kjnd orPo wer orSoveraignty then that for which ambitiousMor. 
tals are wont fo bloodily to contend.For oftentimes this Latter 
being commonly but the Gift of Nature or Prefent of Fortune 
and bat too often the Acquift of Crimes, does no more argue 
any true worth or noble fupen'ority in the pofltllbror it, . 
then it argues one Brafle Counter to be of a better Mettal then 
its Fellows, in th t it is chofen out to ft and in the Account for 
many Thou fan J Pounds more then any of them- Whereas the 
Dominion that Phyliologie gives the Profp rous Studier of it 
(bsfides that iti> wont to be innocently acquired, by be ng the 
Effect of h s knowledge') is a Power that becomes Mm ss Man. 
And to an ingenious- fpirit, the Wonders he perr«>rmes bring 
perchance a higher fatisfaclion, as they are Proofes of his Know, 
ledge, then as they are Pro jucl.ons of his Power, or even bring 
Acafti ;ns to h;s Score, - 

ESSAY II. 

Digitized by Googl 




. Tbtt the 

T He next Advantage, fyrephilus } that we mention CLudyof mm 
the Knowledge of Nattire to bring to the Minds of *£ tes f!!i- chCm ' 
Men, is, That it therein excites and cheriflies Devo- ri * a tm ' 
tion; Which when I fay, Pyropb.l forget not that there 
are feverall Divines (and fome of them Eminent ones ) that 
out or a Holy Jealoufie(as they think) for Religion, labour 
to deterre men from addicting themfelves to fenous and tho- 
rough Enquiries into Nature, as from a Study unTafe for a 
Chriftian, and likely to end in Atheilme, by making it poffi- . 
blefor Men (that I may propofe to you their Objection as 
much to its Advantage as I can) to give themfelves fuch an 
Account of all the Wonders of Nature, by the fingle Know- 
ledg of Second Cautes , as may bring them to disbelieve the 
Neceflitie of a Fir ft. And certainly, Pyrspbi/uf , if thisAp- 
prehenfion were well grounded , I fhould think the threat- 
ned Evill fo confiderable, that inftead of inviting you to the 
Study of Naturali Philofophy, I lliould very earneftly La- 
bour to din wade you from it. For I, that had much rather 
have Men not Philofophers then not Chriftians, Ihould be 
better content to feeyou ignore the My fteries of Nature then 
deny the Author of it. But though the Zeal of their Inten* 
trons keep Me. from harbouring any unfavourable Opinion 
of the Perfons of thefe Men, yet the Prejudice that might re. 
dound from their Doctrine (if generally received) both to 
the Glory oiGod from the Cre:iarts, ariirQ the Empire oi 

D ? /^0 mr ^^' ' Man 

Digitized by Google 



on 

enim tot f Center juffit % guoniamjnquit^ne hulcquidem loco Dii 
defunt immortales-, Hoctdem in indaganda quoj. nature animctn- 
ttum faciendum ifl . Aggrcdi enim qudqut fine ullo pudore debe* 
. - mustfum in omnibus Natur* numcn* & honifltimfulchrun j; in- 
fit Ingenium: Where jore tt is altogether unfecmlj to rt\ttt with A 
kind of ChildiQ) nicitic, of be offendtdat the Difcourfe and specif 
lation of inferior Animals Since there is nothing in all Nature , ; 
but contames in it fomenhat worthy of Admiration . And as it is 
recorded cf Her acinus, that feeing (omeperfons defirous to fpeak 
with him* nfufc to approach towards him, becaufc they beheld him 
-warming hmf If tn a mifcr^bte Cottage , hthd'tfrm come in 
without fcruple, [wee here aifb ( laid he) are the Immortall Gods 
frefent : So in like mar.ncr ought we to be highly pcrfwadtd cf the 
Dignity ef Animals ^when we make Enquiries into their Natures* 
Which we ought in no wife to be ajhtrndef^ ftnce the mighty Power 
and laudable Wifdom cf Nature is ccnfpuuous tn all things. N >y 
taracelfus himfelf, as haughty ;s he was, was Phtlofopher e- 
nough not to dtfdain to write a Bnok De Myflertis Vermium ; 
whtrein,though according to His mannet he ruve fet down m • 
nyextravagances,he is more Candid in tht Delivery of fever all 
tihattvifCod Remedies r vihich Experience ruth recently taught u<tobe 
b.u ibo'tbtrnr. ppoje tfh&uall then probable; then in moft other of his Wr- 
mn f Jho}d%t tin £ s! And inthatlreatifehejullly reprehend the L zinelTe 
thinh unnortbj anc Pride of thofe Phyfitians, who not only negltft and (corn 
•fl*>™»&- Enquiries of Nature themfelves:but when the hut* of fuch En- 
quiries are prefented them by others, inftead of a gratefull ac- 
ceptance, receive them with contempt and dei ilton. To which 
a while after he adds, what is moft true, That God hath Created 
nothing fo Vile % De(pic able ,AbjecJ, or Filthy in the World, that may 
not make for the Health and life of Man. And certainly what evef 
God himielfe hss been pleafed to think worthy his Making, its 
Fellow- creature^an, mould not think unworthy of hrs Know- 
ing. Norisic adifparagement to a Humane Notion, torepre- 
fenc a Creature, which has the Honour to have been framed ac- 
cording to a Divine ldca:md cheiefore the Wife ft of Men in His 

Naturall 



Digitized by Google 



f'9) 1* 
Natural H<Aory,fcruplesncttowriteas well of abjeft Jt^f/T/i 
as ot /./a*/, Eagles ^Elephants* and other Noble Antmals : and 
dtdnot only 1 1 eat or the call Cedirs of Lf £4**0, bur th it defpt- 
cab'e Plant ( what ever ic be that is defigned by the Hebrew 
Ezoh) which growes out or the Wall. For my part, It I <mrft 
think my Anions fit to be Eximples, I ill uld tell you, that I 
have been lofir trom that effeminate fqutanvlhntfle, that one 
of the tbilofofbicali Trtatifes^ tot which I have been gathering 
Experiments, is 01 the Natu.e and life of Dungs And though 
my condition does (God be prated ) enable me to make Expe- 
riments by others Hands $ Yet I hive not been fo nice as to de- 
cline diflecling T>ogs y Wolves* Fifli's, and even Rats anJ M*ce % 
with my own Hands. Nor when 1 am i'i my Laboratory do 1 
fcruple with them naked to h in :le Lute an J Charcoale. 

I ihould htxn^Pjrofhltu.ceMt to entertain you with Difcour- 
fesot thepleafantnetsot Natural Phil ofophy, but that I remem- 
ber I luvc not yet told you, that the ftu 1y of Ph) fiologieis not 
only Delightful, as it teachers us to Know Niture, but abb a* it 
teaches us mm my G*l« to Matter and Co nm in l he .For the 
tiue Natural. ft ( as we (lull fee hereafter ; does not only Know 
f many thing$,which other men Ignoie, but can Per forme many 
things that other men cannot Doe ; being emubledSy his skill 
not barely to underftand leveral Wonders ot Nature , but alfo 
partly to imitate, and partly tomulnply 3nd improve them. 
An! how nuurally weatfed ihe Exercife or thisPower over the 
creatures may appear in the Delight Children take to do m my 
thingsC which we may haveoccafion to mention elfew here) that 
feem 1 3 proceed from an Innate Propenfity to pleaie them- 
fe^s in imitating oribanam° the Productions ot Nature. 

And fure 'tis 1 great Honour that the Indulgent Creator ^fjJS 
vouchf ires to N ituralifts, th it though hegives them not ihe '™« rl.fioH" 
power to produce one A tome of Matter * ytt he allowes them s«w» Hv*. 
the power to introduce fomany Formes ( which Phdofophers ' 0 ^ tittii,Vi9 * 
teach to be nobler then M itten and work fjthchm°es among 
the Creaturesjthat it dd*m were now alive, and Ihouid Survey 

Da that 



Digitized by Google 



f 35) 1 ! 

tion, Whilft the three refolute Jewes with their Prote&our 
walk'd unharm'd in the mid'ft of thr>fe flWes that deftroy 'd *King.«.j,$. 
the Kindlers* and as the heavy Iron emerg'd up to the fwim- 
ming piece of wood, miraculoufly by Elt/ha made Magne- 
ticall.) And you may' alfo, Pyrofhilui , take noticcthat when 
x^fdam had tranfgrefled,immediatly the ground was curfed for 
his fake. And as it is not unufual in Humane juftice to raze 
the very hoafes of Regicides and refcmbling Traitours •, So 
When the provocations of Sohom fwell'd high enough to reach 
Heaven, God did not only Deftroy the Inhabitants from the 
Face of the Earth, but for the Inhabitants Sins deftroy'd the 
very Face of the Earth- So when in Noah's rme a Deluge 
of Impiety cail'd for a Deluge of Waters, God looking upon 
the living Creatures as made for the life of Man, ftuck not to 
Deftroy them with him , and for him-, but involv'd in his 
Rnihe all thofe Animals that were not necefiary to the per- 
petuation of the Species, and the Sacrifice due for Noah's pre- 
servation. And fo when fin the Laft dates ) the Earth fliali • 
be replenifh'd with thofe Scoffers mention'd by S' Peter, 
who will walk after Mr own lufts, and deride the Expe&ati- 1*";* 1 ' 1 ** 
on of God's foretold coming to Judg and Punifh the Ungod- 7> 
ly , their Impiety (hall be as well puniftit as filcnc't by the un- 
expected Flames (perhaps haftned by that ver> impiety; than 
fliall either Deftroy or Transfigure the World. For as by 
the Law of CMofes, the Leprous Garment which could not Lw - «M4»ffJ 
be recover'd by being wafht in Water, was to be burnt in the 
Fire, fo the World which the Deluge could not Cleanfe, a 
generali Conflagration muft Deftroy. 

Nor is reafon it feife backward to countenance what we , 
teach. For it is no great preemption to conceive, that the ^'jK™ 
reft of the Creatures were made for Man, fince He alone of Ambmj 
the Vifible World is able to enjoy, ufe, andrelifli many of 2 7i lS « 
the other Creatures, and to difcerne the Omnifcience, Al- 
mightinefte and Goodnefle of their Author in them, and re- 
turne Him praifes for them. Tis not for themfelves that the 

E Rubies 



Digitized by Google 



(it) 

Rubies flame, other Jewels fparkle, the Bezar-ftone is Anti- 
dotalU nor is it T^or their own advantage that frnitfull Trees 
fpend and exhauft themfelves in Annual profufions. The 
Light which he diffufes through the World is ufeleffe to the 
Sun himfelf, whofe inanimate being makes him incapable of 
delighting in his own fplendor-, which he receives but to convey 
it to the Earth, and other by him illuminated Globes: whence 
Hw lhe Sun probably the Hebrewes call'd him Shemijk , which Gramma- 
ifhemefh)ii the rians derive from the Root Shemafh fignifying in the Chal- 
fftst mmfa dean Tongue, to [erve, or minifter to j the San being the 
n e " jr great Minifter of Nature,and Servant general of the Univerfe. 

And as Animals alone among the Creatures feem to have a 
proper fenfe of, and complacency in, their own Beings So 
Man alone among Animals isendow'd with Reafon, atleaft 
fuch a pitch of it, as by which he can difcetne God's Creatures 
to be the Gifts of God, and referre them to their Creator's 
Glory. This truth I find not only em brae' d by Chriftians, 
but aflented to even by Jewes and Heathens ; Among the 
in FrttL di Jewes my Learned Acquaintance, iManafteh Ben ifrael, pro- 
W» felTedly labours to prove it by Scripture and Tradition 
(though in fome of his Arguments he might appear more a 
Philofopher, if he would haveappear'd ltffeai?*^) anda- 
mong other paflages I remember he alledges that , whereia 
the Wife man faies (as our Tranflators Englifh it ) That the 
Righteous is an everhfiing Foundation^ which he renders, 
Prov.io.iy. fins eft columns Mundi, The Jufi man is the Pillar of the 
Gen.*.?, World, And indeed if the Context did not fomewhat 
disfavour the Interpretation, the Hebrew words [_tzaddik 
yefodoUm'} would well enough bear the fenfe afligned them. 
Congruoufly whereunto, I remember that when Noah (who 
is call'd in Scripture a Righteous man , and Awmrto, a 
Herald , or Ploclaimer of Righteoufmfe ) offer 'd up that 
noble Sacrifice of all the forts of clean Beafts and Fowles, as 
a Thank- offering for the Reprieve of the World, God is faid 
- PccxIj*. iQ\\we[meUedaSavQurof Reft) and to have refolved in his 

Heart 



Digitized by 



(*7) 

Hearc never to Curfe the ground for Man's fake, bat to con- GcM.it,**: 
tinue the viciflitudes of Summer, ani Winter, Day, and 
Night, &c. as long as the Earth (hill remain. And among 
the Philofophers themfelves, the Truth we are now mam- 
fefting, has not been altogether ignor'd. For though Seneca 
fomewhere, more wittily then truely, faies, Non cau(a mundo 
fumus hjemem aflat cmque referenda juas ifla leges babent, qui- gccundo T>t 
bus divina cxercentur* Ntmis nos fufpicimus^ fi digni nobis ir*. cap.*7i 
Hjidcmur , propter quos ta?U4 move Ant ur\ Yet LacJantius 
(not to mention other Authors) tels us that the Stoick ge- 
nerally believed the World to have been made for man. Vera eft ft ^ ^ 
(faies he) fententii Stohorum 9 qui a\unt nofira caufa Mundum cap.ij, 
fuifje conflruclttm. Omnia enim quibus con [I at , quxquc gene* 
rat ex fe Mundut , ad utilitatem hominis accommodata font. 
And Seneca hirafelf fpeaks elfewhere almofl as if he had read 
and believed the beginning of Genefts- 7 Dti { faies he) Hon fer ^ BftM / cap ; 
negligent iam nosgenuere^ quibus tarn multagenuerant : Cogi- %$ % 
tavit enim nos ante Natura quamfeciu 

Nor were the Stoicks the only Philofophers to whom the« 
Contemplation of the Univerfe difcover'd this End of it. For 
toinftancenow iaCicerooaly ; Quorum igitur caufa (faies j^^f* 
that great Orator J eff:elum e(fe mundum? Eorum (ciltcet Ani- 
tnantium, qua ratione utnntur : Hi font Bit & Homines , quibus 
frofefto mhtl eft melius. 

Having thus premifed, Pyropbilt# y that two of God's prin- 
cipal aicnes in the Creation, were the manifeftation of his own 
Glorious Attributes , and the Welfare of his nobleft Vifibie 
Creature, man * It will not be perhaps difficult for You to 
difcerne, that thofe who labour to deterre men from fedulous 
Enquiries into Naturcdo, (though I grant,defigneleftely) take 
a courfe which tends to defeat God of both thofe mcntion'd 
Ends. 

For to fpeak firft to the Laft of them*, that man s exter- 
nal fruition of *he Creatures, and the Delight and Accommo- 
dation which they may afford him, muft be highly pre/udicM 

E 2 and 



Digitized by Google 



(28) 

Thnittdjmo- an d impairM by his ignorance of that Natural PhilofophyJ 
hgkrntub the wherein his Dominion over the Creatures chiefly confifts , 
ctemm might what we fhall fay hereafter concerning the ufefulnefTe of the 
Afford Ma, is Knowledg of Nature to humane Life, will fufficiently evince. 

m *cb impaired D . . . r . • , 

i y r/« of Bat iuch an Animal fruition (it I may to call it; of the Works 
vernal pbjrto* 0 f Nature, affords not Man all the good that God defign'd 
him in them. For Religion-being not only the great Duty 
of Man, but the grand Inftrument of his future HappinelTe, 
which confifts in an Union with 'and Fruition of God, during 
that endielTe Terme that (ball fucceed the expiration of his 
tranfitory Life on Earth; what ever increafes or cheriflies his 
Religion deferves to be lookt on as a great contributer to his 
Happioefle. And we may therefore venture to affirme thac 
the knowledg of the Creatures does leflfe advantage Man, as 
if eumbles him to Mafter them; then as it Aflifts him, by ad- 
miring and ferving him, to become Acceptable to their Author* 
And what ever our diftruftful Adverfaries are pleas'd to fur» 
rnife to the contrary, certainly God intended thac his Crea« 
* tures mould afford not only N^ceflaries , and Accommodati- 
fraffnlfitwr ^s to our Animal part, but Inftru&ions to our Intellectual. 
'iauikOu.il pan The World is wont to be ftil'd not unfitly by Divines , The 
•re more roifide. cbriflhns tone % but perchance it may be altogether as pro- 
mLuSSh parly call'd bis Ship: for whereas both Appellations fuppofe 
m suvefrom him a Traveller, the Inne, though it refrefli him in his Jour- 
v ^'l'JVJt ney , does not further him in it, but rather retard his progrefte 
by detaining him in one place whereas a Ship not only 
ferves the Paflenger for an Inne when he is weary, but helps 
to convey him towards his Journey's End. And according 
to this Notion, to fuppofe that God hath placed in the World 
innumerable things to feed Man, and delight him, and none to 
inftruct h'un, were a conceit little lefTe injurious to God , then 
it were to a wife Merchant, that fends Perfons, he loves, to a 
farre Country, to think that he would furnifh their Cabinets 
with plenty of Provifions, foft Beds, fine Pictures, and all 
other accommodations for their Voyage, but fend them to 

Sea 



Digitized by Google 



(*9) 




Sea difprovidedof-C*4- cW/j and Mariners Compares, and 
other requifite helps to fleer their Courfe by, to the defired 
Harbour. 

And indeed fo farre is God from being unwillinc, that we °f tkcMntttf 



for that end the very firft Verfe in the Bible might have fuf- 
fic'd : But he voucbfafes us by retaile the Narrative of each 
Day's Proceedings, and in the two fir ft Chapters of Genefis^ 
is pleas'd to give nobler hints of Natural Philofophy, then 
men are yet perhaps aware of. Though that in moft other 
places of the Scripture , where the Works of Nature are men- 
tioned but incidently , or in order to other purpofes, they 
tire fpoken of rathepin a Popular then Accurate manner, I dare 
cot peremptorily deny, being unwilling to interefle the re- 
putation of Holy Writ ( defi gn'd to teach us rather Divinity 
then Philofophy) in the doubtful contentions of Naturalifts, 
about fuch matters as may (though the Hiftory of the Crea- 
tion cannot) be known by the meer Light of Natural Reafon. 
We may next obferve, that God has made fomc knowledg 
of his Created Book, both conducive to the bjiiefe, andnc- 
ceflary to the Underftanding, of his Written om: Our Savi- 
our making it one oaufe of the Sadduces great Error about the 
Refurreclion, that they knew not the rower of God. And the ■ 
Scripture being fo full of Allufions to, and comparifons bor- 
rowed from the properties of the Creatures, that there ate 
many Texts not clearly Intelligible without fome knowledg 
of them 5 as may appear even by the firft Gofpei ( The 
Promife that the Seed of the Woman jhould Brut fe the Serpents 
If cad, and have his Beele bruised hy that fubtle feature) prea- 
xhei to fallen Man in Paradife/ and by the reprefentation of 





d by Google 



M 

of them under, the Notion of Four Beads, in Darnels pro^ 
phetick Vifion: and that often repeated Precept of our great 
Mafter to his Difcipies, is coucht in anexpreflion alluding to 
the properties of Animals: For where he commands them 
to be Wife as Serpents, andHarmlefle as Doves, he does 
not only recommend to them a Serpentine warinefle in dedi- 
ning dangers, but feems alfo to prefcribe not alone an inoffen- 
fivenefie towards ot hers ( the conipicuoulntfle of which quality 
in Pigeons have made them, though erroneoully, be fuppo- 
fed to have no Gall ) But alfo as harmleile a way of efcaping 
the dangers they are actually ingaged in, as that of Doves, who 
being purfued by Birds of Prey, endeavour to fave themfelves 
not by fight but, only by flight. 

And indeed fo many of the Texts in Scripture are not td 
be competently illuftrated, without fome knowledg of the 
properties of the Creatures related to in them, that I wonder 
not, that Ltvinm &fm*im 9 Ffttitzius, Kmus, and other Lear- 
ned Men have thought it requifite to publifli entire Treati- 
fes, fome of the Animals, others of the Stones, and others of 
the other Works of Nature mentioned in Scripture : Only 
I could wifti that they had been as wary in their Writings , 
as commendable for their Intentions, and had not fometimes 
admitted doubtfull or fabulous accounts into Comments upon 
that Book % whofe Prerogative it is to teach nothing buc 
Truth. 

Nor ought their Labors to deterre othtirs from cultivating 
the fame Theme For as (fuch is Gods condefcention 
to Humane wcaknefle) mod of the Texts , to whofe Expo- 
lition Phyfiologie is neceffary , may be explicated by the 
Jtnowledg of the external, or at leaft moreeafily obferved qua- 
lities of the Creatures 5 So, that there are divers not to be 
fully underftood without the Affiftance, of more penetrating 
indagations ofehe Abftruficies of Nature and the more unob- 
vious properties of things, an Intelligent and Philofophical 
perufer will readily difcerne. 

Now 

i 

. . Digitized by GoogI 



Now if yon fhould put me upon telling you, Tyrofhilui^, 
tohat thofe Attributes of God are, which I fo often mention to 
bevifibly difplay'dintheFabrickoftheWorld, lean readily 
3nfwcr you, that though many of Gods Attributes are legible 
in his Creatures, yet thofe that are moft confpicuous there, 
are his Power, his Wifdome, and his Goodnefle, in which the 
World; as well as the Bible, though in a differing, and in fome 
points a darker way, is defigned to inftrud us, which that you 
may not think to be alhrrnd gratis , we muft infift a while on 
each of the Three. 

And firft, How boundlefle a power, or rather what an ^f 0 ° n f^\ 
Almighdneffe is eminently difplayed in Gods making out of LJ^ SS 
Nothing all Things , and without Materials or Inftruments 3*»IM*< i 
conftructing this Immenfe Fabrick of the World , whofe 
Vaftnefle is fuch, that even what may be prov'd of it, caa 
icarcely be conceiv'd and after a Mathematical Demonftra- 
tion, its Greatneffe is diftrufted f Which yet, is I confefle, 
a wonder lefle to be admir'd then the Power exprefled by 
God in fo immenfe a Work, which neverthelcfTe fome mo- 
dern Philofophers (whofe opinions I find fome Cabalifls to 
countenance; fuppofe to be not the only Production of Gods 
Omnipotence. Not to mention EUfbants^ or Whales , fome 
of which an Hyperbolift would not fcruple to call moving 
Mountains and Floting Idands* and to pafle by thofe ftupen- 
dous Hils, and thofe Seas, where the Light loofes it fclie, as 
Objects which their neernefle only reprefents fo Bulky, let 
us haften to confider , that whereas the Terreftrial Globe we 
Men inhabit, cOntaines, befides all thofe vaft Kingdomes the 
Unions of fome of which conftituted the Worlds four cele- 
brated Monarchies, thofe fpacious (Gncc detected) Ameri- 
can Regions, that have been defervedly (tiled The New World: 
And that whereas the Common Account makes the circuit 
of this Terreftrial Globe to be no lefle the 22600 Italian 
miles, confifting each of 1000 Geometrical Paces( which num* 
feer the more recent account of the accurate GaQendu* makes 

amount 



amount to i6 1 ? 5 Miles of the fame meafure) whereas, ffayj 
this Globe of Earth and Water feems to us fo vaft , Aftrono- 
mers teach us, that it is but a Point in comparifon of the Inv; 
menfity of Heaven-, which they not irrationally prove by the 
Parallaxis ( or Circular difference betwixt the place of a Star, 
fuppof'd to be taken by two Obfervations, the one made *c 
the Centre, and the other on the furface of the Earth ) which 
Gafjendus confelTeth to be undifcernable in the fixt Stars: as if 
the Terreftrial Globe were fo meer a Point, that it were not 
material, whether a fixt Star be look'd upon from the Centre, 
or from the furface of the Earth. This may leflen our won- 
der at the PtclomAdtis, making the Sun (which feems not half 
a Foot over) to be above a hundred fixty and fix times bigger 
then the Earth-, and diftant from it One thoufand one hundred 
fixty and five Semi- Diameters of the Earth, each of which 
contains, according to the afore- mentioned computation of 
CA^endm^ 4177 Miles^ and at their fuppofing the fixt Stars 
(whofe diftance the fame Author, as a Ptolonntan^ fupput's to 
Giffend. inft. be i ?ooo Semi-Diameters of the the Earth)fo great, that they 
Apj.tx.ii. conc [ ac i e each of the fixt or fmalleft magnitude to be no lefle 
then 18 time greater then the whole Earth,and each St3r of the 
Firft or Chief Magnitude to exceed the Terreftrial Globe 108 
times. And as for the Cefermcans (that growing Sext of A- 
ftronomers) they, as their Hjfothefts requires, fuppofe the 
vaftnefle of the Firmament to be exceedingly greater then the 
Ancients believed it. For Philiffus Lambergius, who ven- 
tured to affign Diftances and Dimenfions to the Planets and 
Fixt Stars ( which Coftrnicvs forbore toAo ) fuppofes as well 
G4Mh+ as nis M a fter , that the Great Orb it felf (as the Coper means 
wp,M ' call that in which they efteem the Earth to move about the 
Sun)though its Semi- Diameter be fuppos'd to be 1 500 times 
as great as that of the Earth, is but as a Point in comparifon 
ofthe Firmament or Sphere of the Fixt Stars-, which he fup- 
pofes to be diftant from the Earth no lefle then 28000 Semi- 
Diameters of the Great Orb, that is, 42000000 of Semi-* 

Diameters 



Digitized by Google 



iiiameters of the Earth- or according to the former Compu- 
tation of common Miles 175434000000 , which is a Diftance 
Vaftly exceeding that which the Fiolomxans ventur'dto affign, 
and fuch as even imagination it felf can hardly reach to. I con- 
fefs indeed, thatlamnotfowellfatisfiedwith the exaclnefl'e 
(nor perhaps with the Grounds) of thefe kind of Computa- 
tions, by reafon of the Difficulty ltuve met with in making 
exaft Celeftial Obfervations with either Telefcopes, or other 
Inftruments, fufheiently witnefs'd, by the great difparity re- 
markable betwixt the Computations of thebeft Artifts them- 
fclves. But on the other fide I am nor fare, Jbut that even 
the Coper means afcribe not too great a d itance to fome of the 
Fixt Stars*, fince ( for ought we yet know) thofe of the fixth 
Magnitude, and thofe which our Telefcopes difcover ( though 
our bare Eyes cannot) are not really lefie then thofe of the fir ft 
Magnitude, but onely appear fo by reafon of their greater 
Diftance from our Eyes -, as fome Fixt Stars feem no bigger 
then Venus and Mercury , which are much letter then the 
Earth. And therefore upon fuch Confederations, and becaufe 
the modefteft Computation allowes theFirmament to be great 
enough to make the Earth but a Point in comparifon of it-, it 
Will be fafe enough, as well' as juft, to conclude with the Pfal- 
mift, Great is the Lord, and greatly to be praifed; and his great- 
ness is nnfearchable. 

The next Attribute of God that mines for thin his Crea- 
tures, is his Wifdome-, which to an intelligent Confiderer ap- umGodsmfe- 
pears very manifeftly exprefs'd in the World, whether you J^MSt 
contemplate it as an Aggregate or Sy ftem of all Natural Bo - 
dies or confider the Creatures it is made up of, both in their 
particular and diftin3 Natures, and in Relation to each other, 
and the Univerfe which they conftitute. In fome of thefe the 
Wifdome of God is lb confpicuous, and written in fuch large 
Char^6ters,that it is legible even to a vulgar Reader ; But in 
many others the Lineaments and Traces of it are fo delicate 
andilender, or fo wrapt up and cover'dwith Corporeity, that 
k. F it 



Digitized by Google 



V" 



it requires an attentive and intelligent Perufer. So numberlefs 
a multitude, and fo great a variety oi Birds, Beafts, Fifties, 
ReptileSjHerbSjShrubs^rees^toneSjMetals^ineralSjStars, 
drc. and every one of them plentifuly furnifh'd andendow'd 
with all the Qualifications requifite to the Attainment of the 
refpecttve Ends of its Creation, are productions of a Wifdome 
too limitleiTe not to be peculiar to God: To infift: on any one 
of them in particular (befides that it would too much fweli 
this Difcourfe) might appear injurious to the reft? which da 
all of them deferve that extenfive Exclamation of the Pfalmift, 
Pfal. 104. 14. #09 manifold art thy works , O Lord; in Wifdome haft thou made 
thtm all. And therefore I lhall content my felf to obferve in 
general. That as highly as fome Naturalifts are pleafed to va- 
lue their own knowledg, it can at belt attain but to underftand 
and applaud, not emulate the Productions of God. For as 
a Novice,when the cunofeft Watch the rareft Artift can make, - 
is taken in pieces and fet before him , may eafily enough dif- 
cernthe Workmanfliip and Contrivance of it to beexcellent? 
but had he not been fti )wn it, could never have of himfelf de-j 
viied fo skilful and rare a piece of Work : So, for inftance, 
an Anatomift, though when by many and dexterous Directi- 
ons of humane Bodies, and by the help of Mechanical Prin- 
ciples and Rules (without a competent skill wherein, a Man 
pjnlcM ob- 030 fcarce be an Accompliih'd and Philofophical Anatomift) he 
lervttim of°tk has learn'd the Structure , life and Harmony of the parts of 

tne BocJ y 5 he 1S aWe t0 difcein tn3C matchlefte Engine to be 
ma* ftrfjr. admirably contrived, in order to the exercife of all the Motions 

and Functions whereto it was defign'd .* And yet this Artift, 
had he never contemplated a humane Body, could never have 
imagin'd or devis'd an Engine of no greater Bulk, anything 
near fo fitted to perform all that variety of Actions we daily 
fee perform'd either in or by a humane Body. Thus the Cir- 
cular motion or the Blood, and ftructure of the Valves gf the 
Heart and Veins f The consideration whereof, as himfelf told 
me,firft hinted the Circulation to our Famous U trvtj) though 

* 

• .Digitized by Google 



now Modern Experiments have for die main(the Modm feem- 
ing not yet fo fully explicated,) convine'd us of them, we ac- 
knowledge them to be very expedient and can admire Gods 
Wifdome in contriving them: Yet thofe many Learned Ana- 
tomifts, that have for many fucceeding Ages preceded both 
D: Harvey , and Columbus, Cafalpinus, Padre Paulo , and M c 
Warner ( for each of thefe four iaft are fuppof'd by fome to 
have had fome notion of the Circulation ) by all their diligent 
contemplation of humane Bodies , never dream'd (for ought 
appears ) of fo advantagious an ufe of the Valves of the Heart, . 
nor that nimble Circular motion of the Blood, of which our 
modern Circulators think they difcern fuch excellent Ufe, not 
tofay,Neceflity. 

And though it be true, that the greater Works of God do 
as well declare his great Wifdome as his Power, according to 
that of the Infpired Philofopher 5 The Lord by Wifdome hath ptw, l} 
founded the Earth, by Under /landing hath he cftablifi'd the Hea^ 
i>cns. By his Knowledge the depths are broken up, and the Clouds 
drop down the Dew: Yet does not his Wifdome appear lefTe in 
lefler Creatures 5 for there is none of them fo little, but it 
would deferve a great deal of our Wonder, did we attentively 
enough confider it. And as Apelles (in the Story) wasdif- 
cover'd by the skilful Protagoras Jay fo neat and (lender a Line, 
that Protagoras , by being icarce able to difcerne it, difcern'u it 
to have been drawn by apelles: So God, in thsfe little 
Creatures, oftentimes draws traces of Omnifcience, too de- 
licate to be liable to be afcrib'd to any other Caufe. I have # 
feen Elephants , and admir'd them lefs then the ftruclure of a J 
difleded Mole, which hath better Eyes then thofe,that will not 
fee a defignation in the dimnefie of its Eyes (made onely to fee 
the Light, not other Objecls by the helpofitj a'ldtheun- 
wonted pofture of its Feet, given it not to run on the Ground, 
but to dig it felf a way under Ground, And, as defpicable as 
their Littlenefle makes theVulgar apt to think fome Creatures, 
t tnuft confefs my wonder dwells njt io much on Natures 

F 2 Clocks 



m 

Clocks ( if I may fo fpeak) as on her Watches, and Is more 
exercif'd i/i the coynefle of the fen fit ive Plant, and the Mag- 
netical Properties of a fmalland abje& Load-ftone, then the 
bulk of the talleft Oakes, or thofe vafl Rocks, made famous 
by Shipwracks. I have paff'd the jlpes, and have feeaas 
much to admire at in an Ant-hill, and have fo much wondred 
at the Induftry of thofe little Creatures themfelies that inha- 
bited it, that I have ceas'dto wonder at their having given a 
Theme to Solomon's Contemplation. Thofe vaft Exotick 
Animals which the Multitude flocks to fee, and which Men 
give Money to be allow'd to gaze on, have had many of them 
lefle of my Admiration,then the Tittle Catterpillar, (as Learn- 
ed Naturalifts efteem it) to which we are beholden for Silk. 
of th: silk- For (not to mention all the Obfervables crouded by Nature 
wwm. i n that little Worm) 1 thought it vefy well deferv'd my won- 
der ( when not long fince I kept fome of them purpofely to 
try Experiments,) how this curious Spinfter, after he had bu-; 
ryed himfelf alive in the precious Tomb he had wroughtfor 
himfelf out of his own Bowels , did caft off his former Skin 
and Legs, and, in fliew, his former Nature, appearing for di- 
vers dayes but analmoft moveleffe Magot •, till at length, dim 
veftingthis fecond Tegument alfo ( in which Neft, Phenix- 
like, he had been regenerated out of his own Remains) he 
came forth (if I may fo fpeak) out of this attiring Room un- 
der another form, with Wings, Eyes, and Leggs/cJr. to 
ad anew part upon the Stage of the World ; which (having 
fpent fome dayes without feeding (that I could obferve)in pro- 
viding for the propagation of his Species) he forfakes and 
dies. And I the rather mentionnhe Silk- Worm, becaufe 
that there have been of late divers fubtle Speculators, who 
r;,at it *0vty would fain perfwade us, That Animals do nothing out of In- 
tyinfcaa*nd ft in ^ Qti if y 0 u pleafe, innate or feminal Imprtflions* but 
m by tmiutm. SpIn ^ build Neft$5 and perform all the other Aa[ons for wbich 

they are admir'd, barely by Imitation of what they havefeen 
done by others of the fame Kind. But in the Silk -Worm* 

(at 



Digitized by Google 



07) 

7at lead herein England) this plaufible Opinion will net hold : 
For the Silk- worms 1 kept 5 were not hatch'd but in the Spring, 
out of Eggs laid fome Dayes in the Sun •, and the Worms that 
laid thofe Eggs, being every one of them dead the Winter be- 
fore, ic was impoffible thefe new Silk- Worms, when they 
firft began to fpin their fcarce imaginable fine Web,and inclofe 
themfelves in Oval Balls of a very Artificial Figure and Tex- 
ture, fhould have wrought thus by Imitation there not ha- 
ving been for many Moneths before, in the place where they 
were hatch'd (nor perhaps in the whole Country) any Silk- 
Worms alive which they might imitate. But I muft leave 
thefe curious Spinfters to their Work,and proceed to tell you, 
that Seas and Mountains, with the other Hyperboles of Na- 
ture (if I may fo term them ) proclaim indeed Gods Power, but 
do not perhaps more manifeft his Wifdorae, then the contri- 
vance of fome living Engines , and ( if I may fo call them) 
Breathing Atoms, that are fo fmall that they are almoft all 
Workmanflup-, fo that, as before, in the Pfalmifts Expreffi- 
on we truly faid of Gods Greatnefle, That it was un(earchable^ 
we may now as truly fay of his Wifdome in the Prophets 
Words, and in the fame Text where he reprefents him as the 
Creator of the ends of the Earth , Thdt thtre is no 
lis Under (landing. 

And if I durft, Pyrcpbilus, make this part of this EflTay of 
a length too difproportionate to the reft, I could eaiily,3s well 
as willingly, reprelent to you divers things which might ferve 
to Illuftrare the m*vre,rU& <n*U £ etf, manifold Wtfdomc cf E?h ' i,l ° : 
Cod < as S r Paul fpeaks on another occafionj But though I 
dare not expatiate on this Subject, yet neither dare I altoge- 
ther conceal from you, that I have fometimes admired to fee 
what fcarce imaginable variety of living Engines his Plaftick 
skill (if I may fo fpeak) has been able to produce, (efpecially 
in the Waters) without fcarce any other refemblance betwixt 
them, then that they are each of them excellent in its own 
Kind, and completely furniuYd according to the exigency of 

, . * * Digitized by Google 



(**) 

its Nature. AriS that which much encreafes this Wonder, is 
the difproportion of thole living Engines, wherein the great 
Jcr.io.x*. [rotz'ccr hakkoi] Former of all things (as the Scripture juftly 
calls God) has been pleas 'd to difplay an almoft equally skil- 
ful Contrivance.Amongft Terreiiriai Animals we have tbeE- 
lephanr,of whofe ftupendious vaftnefle fuch fttange things are 
related, even by eminent Writers, that I know not well how 
either to dif- believe thcm,or give credit to them : And there- 
fore we fliall content our felves to mention that which is left on 
c*jM. i r '<> Record by the accurate Gaflcndus in the Life of ?tirtskiut\ For 
ftMfcW*. t his matchlelTe Gentleman having caus'd an Elephant, in the 
Year 1631, to be weigh'd in a Scale, purpofely provided, he 
was found to weigh, of the Roman Pounds "(confifting of 
of the vafittffc twelve Ounces a piecej very near Five thoufand: And yet fure- 
eftkiUpbut ly that this Elephant was very far from being one of the lar- 
^t'muZ geft of that fort of Beafts, he that mail confider the bignefs 
a'y^exandfmh and length of fome or their Teeth, as they are commonly 
ubma- ^11^, which are to be feen at divers places, both in England 
and elfewhere, and is not rcfolv'd not to believe the confonant 
Relations of Eaftern Travellers (among whom LinfckounteWs 
us there have been fome Teeth found to weigh Two hundred 
pounds a piece, each pound confift;ng of twenty four Ounces) 
may be eafily perfwadcd. On the other fide let us reflect up- 
on the fmalnefle of fome Teneftrial Animals^and not to men- 
tion that little white Creature bred in Wax, which Arifiotle 
calls 'A^d! , end fpeaks of :s fuppes'd to be the leaft of all li- 
ving Creatures whatfoever: Let us confider thofe little Mites 
that are bred in mouldy Cheefe* for divers of thefe fcarce a- 
' mount to the weight of a Grain, and every Pound containing 
Five thoufand feven hundred and fixty Grains 5 fuppofing 
each Mite "did weigh a whole Grain, yet that formerly men- 
tion'd fmall Elephant would exceed him near ?88ooooo 
time. And yet though a Mite feem bura moving Atome, and 
unlefs there be divers together,is not eafily difcern'd by the un- 
aflifted Eye,yet in an excellent Microfcope I have,you know, 

ftveral 



Digitized by Google 



(19) 

feveral times both feen and (hewn to others, even in a gloomy 
Day, and a difadvantageous Place, not only the Limbs of 
this little Animal, but the very Hair growing upon his Legs, 
Now let us but confider how ftrangely skilf ul and delicate a 
WorJcmanfliip muft be employ'd to contrive into fo narrow a 
compafs, the feveral Parts Internal and External, requifite to 
make up this little Animal* how many muft goto the texture 
or the Ey?s, and other Organs of Senfe how many to the 
Snout (which he has, not unlike a Hog) and the feveral parts 
of it; how many to the Stomach and Guts, and the other In- 
ward Parts addicted to the digeftion of Aliment , and excluil- 
on of Excrements-, and to be ftiort, how inimaginably fub- 
tlemuft be the Animal Spirits running too and fro in Nerves 
fuitable in fuch little Legs And if, as we have obferv'd them 
to multiply by Eggs, the little Creatures be hatch'd nrt thofe 
little Eggs, after the manner of divers other Oviparous Ani- 
mals, how much fmaller then a hatched Mite muft be a Mite 
upon the Animation of its delineated Parts f fince in Hens 
Eggs we have fometimes feen the Chick manifeftly alive, and 
its Limbs clearly delineated, whilft yet it took up fo fmalla 
portion of the Egge, that both the White and the Yolk ( be- 
twixt which it is generated,and not of the Chala*,* or TrcdU> as 
quafcndente and other Moderns teach J feem'dto be fome- 
times yet intire,as well as involv'd in their peculiar Membranes. 
But it is not fo confpicuous in gradient Animals (if I may fo 
fpeakj as in fwimming ones How vaftly difyroportionate 
MatTes of Matter the wife Former of ail things can falliion into 
living Engines. For Whales are much more ftupendious Crea- 
tures then Elephants : And not to mention what Hartentm 
(Afudfchnfionum) tells us of twenty forts of Whales, where- 
of the eighteenth Species, which he calls Nordbwal> is by him 
related to be Ninety Ells long but what Ells he means, "I 
know not : Nor to mention thofe leile incredible Accounts 
which are given of the vaitnefie of Whales by our Englifti Na- 
vigators, who are wont to Fifti for them $ I fliali onely fet 

down 



O) 

down what is related by one of the eminenteft Modern 

>: F.:Jvr ut 'cetx Philofophers, becaufe he fpeaks as an Eye-witnefTe, when 
pfitioo<rf io^c he tells us, That in the Year i z^there was caft upon a place 
raflagcs of a, near Sever 4, about 30 Miles from Home, a de3d Whale 

on'be vafinrfTe °^ 9 1 Pa,ms in length , and 50 in thicknefs-- He adds, That 
tffonbSkSi its Mouth was 16 Palms long, and 10 high-, in which, being 
m mmmm opened and kept gaping* a Man on Horfe-back might find 
mm Tm* competent room; this Mouth being ufed to harbor a Tongue 
Uuti, MfcoJcred of twenty Palmsfwhich may make out fifteen Foot; in length, 
hrmgp* The fame inquifitive Writer adds, That four Years before, 
near the I (land ot'Corftca, not far from the Coaft of Italy, ano- 
ther Whale was caft,One hundred Foot long, which beingaFe^ 
male, was found to be big with a Cub of thirty Fodt long, 
1 500 pound weight. But that which will let you fee, Pyro. 
fhtlus , -the difproportion betwixt thefe kind of Fifhes and 
common Elephants, is, that which the fame Author adds, 
ThAttbcLardonely^orFAt (as he fpeaks Cat /tea pnguedo) ef 
this corpulent Creaturejveighd One hundred And thirty five thou- 
fand pund^ th3t is, above Twenty fcven times the weight of 
the whole Elephant, which was caus'd to beweigh'd by fti* 
teskim. And though the Omnipotent Creator be able to 
make fwimming Creatures of fuch prodigious bignefle, that 
the Ocean it felf may frem to be but a proportionate Pond for 
fuch Fiflies * yet is the fame Omnifcient Continuer, as able 
co make a fwimming Engine more llender then a Cheefe mite, 
and fo little, that a fmalf part of a Grain may out- weigh di- 
vers of them. For, Pyrophilns, I muft here acquaint you 
with a ftrange Obfervation, which I have been inforra'd to 
have been fome while il nee made in ItAly by PAnsroU aFa- 
mous Phyfitianin Rome^ who is faid, by the help of an ex- 
cellent Microfcope, to have difcern'd in Vinegar fmall Living 
Creature?, which he takes to be Worms, The mention of 
fo unlikely an Experiment, made me engage fome excellent 
Philofophers and Mathematicians toaflift me in examining it: 
But though our Microfcopes exceeded the beft that were 

brought 



Digitized by Google 



(40 

brought us over from Home, yet all our diligence and attention 
did but make them conclude that PMiraroU's Eyes had been de- 
luded. Notwithftanding which, caufingafomewhat hollow 
bottomeofpureChryftallineGlaffe to be fitted to my Mi- 
crQfcope,I profecuted the Enquiry my felf 5 and at length was 
fo lucky, as not only to difcover thefe little Creatures with 
a Microlcope, but by holding the Liquor in a Chryftal Viol, 
almoft upon the ftrong Flame of a Candle, to difcover multi- 
tudes or them with my naked Eyes, as weak as they are. But 
though I have already convinc'd thofe that formerly derided 
fuch Oblervations, as not to be made with the beu Microf- 
cope , yet the great weaknefle of my Sight has not permitted 
roe to per fed my Obfervations concerning thefe Creatures. 
And therefore refcrving the more particular mention of this 
oddeObfervation till another time, I (hall now only tell yott 
as much as is pertinent to our prefent purpofe-, namely, That 
having with a certain parcel of ftrong White- wine Vinegar 
ffor 'tis not in every Vinegar that they are conftantly to be 
foandj fili'd up to the top thin Viols with long and (lender 
Necks-, and having likewifc with the fame Liquor fili'd other 
fmall Cry (hi line Viols, though fliort-ncck'd, and held them 
betwixt my Eye and the Sun, or a Window open towards it, 
or very near a great Candle, I have ofcen in thefe Glafles, es- 
pecially in their (lender Necks, after h iving a while hVd my 
Eye on them (attention being in this cafe very neceflaryj ad- 
miringlyobferv'd great numbers ( and fometimes as it were 
Shoals) of living Creatures, which leem'd to be rather Fillies 
th§n Worms* for they fwim freely up and down the Liquor, 
and often hover about the top of it, with a wrigling motion, 
like thjt of Eels, to which likewifc their long and (lender fli.ipe 
refembles them. And though thefe fwimming Creatures be 
not all exactly of a iize, yet fome of them feem'd flenderer 
then 3ny fort of living ones, that hath hither c > been taken no- 
tice of by the unafTifted Eye : And I remember, thst having 
look d in a gooo Microfcope upon one of them, and a Chcefe- 

G mite 



(40 

mite much about the fame time , the Fifli appear'd fo (lender, 
that we judg'd k not much thicker then one of the Legs of the 
Mite: So that confidering what a vaft deal of matter the great 
Creator can manage and falhion into a Whale, and in how lit- 
tle room he can contrive all the parts requifite to conftitute«a 
f Fifli.we may juftly fay to him in the Pfalmifts l anguage. There 

is none like unto thee (O Lord) neither are there any works like 
unto thy works. 

ftft The laft of the three Pro P erties of Goc *> which we menti- 
Cmdmffe * oned him to have manifefted in the Creation, is his Goodnefle ; 
toifpicumi* ^ Of which all his Creatures do in tMrir due meafure partake, 
b» pmSnf P lrt, y *>y tneir h .ving a being vouchfafed them , and partly 
mommiomm by their being prelervcd in it as long as their fabordination to 
S^M*S^ l S^ ef P u P°fe»i anito more powerful cfeatu es do permit, 
(nwiu mm. by that fuppircitig Influence of G >J which keeps them from 
relapfing into theii flilfc Nothing', according to that memo- 
rable Pjfl'jge , where Nthcmtah h iving mentioned G >d as the 
Cr eat our of the H ravens . the Esrth, the Seas , and all the Crea. 
tures belonging to them , He calls Hun the Prcferver, or fas 
the Original I has it) The entturner of them all. And as for, 
Animalst who are more capable or enj >vmg, though not mo t 
of them ofdifcernmg HiS B >unty, Hi* Goodneflc to them 
is more confpicuous. For befides th it in Scripture he is 
called The Preferver both of \jMan and Beafl , and accor- 
•*? dingly is faid to give food even to the young Ravens that cry, 
and to have after the Flood rememSred not only Notth , but 
every living thing that was with him in the \^irk , His Good- 
ntfle to them is apparent by the plenttfull an J eafiiy attainabte 
provi(ion he makes according to the exigence of their fe- 
veral Natures. For that innumerable fwai m of various Birds, 
Beafts, Fifties , Reptiles, and other Animals that People the 
Terrefttal Globe , and the contiguous parts of the World, 
and by his endowing ea6h of them , with all the Qualifications 
requifuetothe perpetuation of their Species, and the preferva- 
ttion ©t their Lives, as far forth as is wnfiftcnt with his Ends 

ifl 

w — - 

Digitized by G 




nefle of God appear towards his Favourite Creature, Man, 
whom having vouchfaf'd to ennoble with his own Image, he 
makes moft of the Creatures of theworld vifible to us, pay 
homage to him, and in fome manner or degree do him fervice: 
God's liberality at once bcftowing on him all thofe Creatures 
by endowing him, with a Reafon enabling him to make 
ufe ot them; fo that even thofe Creatures which he is not able 
to fubdue by Power , he is able ro make ferviccable to hm 
by h:s Knowledge ; as thofe v?fl Globes ot L^ht, which are fo 
farre above him, that their Immenfity and Brightnefle can 
fcarce render them vifible to him, are by man 5 Mathematicks 
forced to give him an account of all their Motions, and wai- 
ting upon h;s I ial? keep time tor him 5 and even the defecls 
of luch worksor N.rure,aie by man's skill mace ferviceable! 
to him, as the Ecl^fes of the moon ferve Geographers notably 
- in that c ffitult and ufetul work of finding Longitudes. The 
Stars ieive for Candle* to give man light, and the celeftial 
Orbs are his Can^lefticks. He breaths the At, the fire 
warms him, and fe/ves bin not only in his kitchin, but to 
matter moft other Bodies in bis furnaces. The Clouds wa- 
ter his Land, the Earth fupports him and his Buildings, the 
Sea and Wines convey him and his Floating houfes to the re- 
moteft parts of the World , and enable him to poflefle every 
where almoft all that Nature or Art has provided for him 
any where. The Earth produces him an innumerable mul- 
titude of Beafts tofeed,cloath, and can y him 5 of Flowers and 
Jewels to delight and adorn him * of Fruits , to fuflaine and 
refrefh him % ot ftones and Timber, to lodge him , of Simples, 
to cure him -, and in fumme, the whole (ubJunary World is 
but his Magazine. And it feems the grand bufinefle of reft- 
lelTe Nature fo to conftitute and manage his Produ&ions , 
as to furni/hhim with Neccflaiics, Accommodations, and 





G a 



of 



Digitized by Google 



('44) 

Of fucha Namber of Plants, Animals^Metals^Minerafs,^.' 
that people and enrich the Tcrreftrial Globe, perphaps there 
rs not any one, of which Man might not make an excellent 
ufe, had he but an infight into its Nature: nor are the mod 
abjecl and defpicable therefore the lejft u r eful. There is 
not any Stone, no not the fparkling Diamond it fclf, to 
whom Man is fo much beholden,asheis ro the dark and unpro- 
mifing Load ftone^ without which the New World probibly 
had never been detected, and m3ny Regions of the Old W >rld 
would have little or no commerce with each other. Nor 
have the Lton, the Eagle, and th- JT&j/?, joyned alltoseth.T 
(though reputed the Chief of Birds, B^afts , and F the >) 
been fo fciviceable to Man, as th it defpicab'.e In r ect, Tbr Silk'- 
mrm. And if we impartially confider the Lucriferoufntfli (if 
I may fpeakinmv Lord -of S c ^Ibws St'te/of the properties 
of Things,anJ their Medical Vi tues, we (h ill find, Th it we 
trample uponmanv things, for which we (h >uld ruveciuTe to 
kneel, ando.fer God P.jues, if we knew all their Qjilities 
and Ufes: Bat of this fubjeft we may elfcwru*re pupofely 
treat- 

Ifthtunkuf** To which I mu ft only ailde^Pyopbilus, Tfnt vou will injure 
f^Jp^dtV«i« Nature, if you fuppole, either that all the Concretes, en- 
gud i^ettues of do wed with excellent properties, hive long lince been no- 
diwrfe con- torious, or that all the Medicinal Virtues of Simples, com. 
iUHu monly uf'd, are already known; or that all thofe C >ncrt*te> are 
deftitute of confiderable Properties, to whom none have been 
yet afcrib'd by eminent Authors. For almoft every day ei- 
ther difclofes new Creatures, or makes new Dtfcoveries or the 
ufefulnefle of things-, almoft -each of which hath yet a kind 
of Terra incogniti, or undetected part in it : H >w nnny new 
Concretes.rich in Medicinal vertues,does the New World pre- 
fers the Inquilltive Phyfniansof i\vtOW Notitudignum favs 
the Ingenious Ps(o,m his newly pubhfh'd Afrdicina Brafilecnfts^ 
lib I,) quodcxtmtAtot arbores, frutsces, & innumcr*. herb*, 
H Hr4 > f°t ,f * & frufahm i vetcris or bis yegeubtltbm, f*ucis 



Digitized by Googltt 



(45) 

txceptis, difimiDimd appafeant. idemde avito, animantt- 
but & pt\ctbm dtprehendttur^ ut & infttfis alatts. atque alts dt- 
jlttutis; qu* inffabili color um pulchntudtne & \ortcnto[amul~ 
titudtnc gentramur, partim not a nobis partim incognita. And 
or the known American Simples, How many latent Virtues 
does experience from time to time difcover i And {to men- 
tion now no others ) the Febritugal property of that Peruvian ff W^ ff 
Trie, ailed by the Natives Gannanaperide^ whofe £ark,caH'd c ZudZ jefu- 
coromrnly Chtna Febris, has been at Rome* and fieflliy alfo Pouder, of 
at London, found fo wonderfully effectual agamft thole flub- 
born I lfeatcs, guartaw Agues; and though a I earned Au- tacco in the 
thorendeavots.io ctpieciate it, by allecging, That it is wont 
rather tofufpemi the Fiis, thtn tiuly cuie the Diieafe, whuh J^i/ir. 
alter a while wll ietum again^ yet, befides tha, it maybe wife f#riWr 
often very btmficial to a weaknec Patient, to have his Fits put 
orT.the Phyiitian thereby alfo gaining Of pom nicies to imploy 
ftiengthning and prtv; ni ne Remedies .• Btficts this, I fay, 
if y«u will credit that great Perton, Sir Kenelm Dtgby, it is 
rather the Patients or Doctors fault, then the Medicines, if 
the Difeafe return. For having purpofely confulted him about' 
th s Objection ayainft the Ufe of the Cortex Fibrtfugus^ he * 
folemnly afliii'd me, That o betwixt 1 wenty an^ Thirty 
Pcrfons, that he had himfelf cur'd ot Suartancs by this Reme- 
dy, not fo many as Two fell into a Rriapfe. 

And now I am upon the more frdhly difcover'd Virtues of 
American Drugs, I might acqu lint you with the admirable 
Properties, not onely in Difeales, but even in Wounds of a 
certain Mineral, which (though careful examination or it has 
not yet taught me to what Species of Stones to reduce it ) you 
cannot but have heard mention' d with wonder, under the name 
of Sir Walter Rawleirb's Stone, which mv Father, 
enjoy 'd, and did ft range things with foi many year*, and by his 
Will bequeathed ( as the h'gheft Legacy he could leave him) 
to his de.ireft Friend, the rnoft: Learned and Famous Brt/^r, - 
Primate of Ireland: But of this Stone, the merit ot the lub- 

G 3 jccV 



Digitized by Google 



C4<S) 

}e<5l makes me referve what I have to fay , to a Difcourfe; 
wherein I may be allowed to fay more to it then now 1 dare : 
and therefore I (hall proceed to tell you, that 'tis not in the 
Simples of the New World onely, thmvew Medicinal pro- 
perties may be difcover f d •, for even thofe which daily obtrude 
tbemfelves upon our carelefs Eyes , or are trampled under our 
regardlefle Fett, may poflcfle Virtues, to which the major part 
of Botanifrs are mere Strangers. To which purpofe, I remem- 
ber that I have often gather'd a little (h nt-hv d an i defpcable 
Plant,{namcly Paronychia folto Rutaceo)miX\ which alont(flight. 
ly infuf'd in Beer) I lately knew a younii Kinfnnn of S 'r Kemlm 
Digby's in fewDays, and without pain,as botrj Him'elf,his Mo- 
ther, and his Phyfitian aflur'd me, cur'd of that ftubbom and 
feldome vanquiuS'd Difeafe of the Kigs Evil,agam(l «hichit 
doth Wonders 5 and yet having confulted nut onely fotne of 
the famoufeft and recenteft Herbals, both Engliih and Litioe, 
about this, bur alfo enquired of two or three em nent Herba- 
rifts, I could finde neither any fuch Viitue, nor almoft any at 
all,afcrib'd by Authors to that excellent Plant. . 
of the ufeofii' ^ oc j vvhereas Gods bounty to Man iruthe Creatures , feems 
nnctitamd a clouded and ftreightned by his permitting fome Poifon- 
that thty attain ous Plants and Venomous Animals to have a Being in Naturej 
d«ta! WH Ant " t0 tnat itma y DC reply'd, Fit ft, That many Poifonous Bo- 
dies contain their own Antidotes $ Infomuch that the diligent 
Hh , who hath had great opportunities to examine the EfTccls 
of both, ventures to fay, treating of the Poifons and Anti- 
dotes to be met with in Braftl , Equtdem vix dixtris, Venena 
an Alexiteria plura ftnt pronata: and a little lower , Sic folia, 
flores, tjrfruclus herb arum Tangaraca ejr Juquerii, venena Bra* 
filu facile prima, propriam (nam unaqtufy radicem oppofitum 
habct^nttdetumx and a little after, Barbart viper arum p/n- 
guedtnem tjr capita, turn ejrintegra Infect a qua vulnera intule- 
rint , ex arte par at a, audafttS& feltci cum fttcce(Ju venenata 
icttbus applicant \ adcoj. per ipfos effect us comprobare nituntur 
in omni vtneno contincri [unm Antsdotum: And next , thac 

the 



Digitized by Google 



(47) 

the noxioufneffe of many (and therefore not improbably of 
all of them; is not fo incorrigible, but that by Mans Art and 
Chymical Preparations, they may be made, not onely inno- 
cent and harmefeffe, but ufeful too. This Truth, Pyrefhtltu, 
Antimony and Quick- filver , and fome other noxious Bodies 
(which Men have learn'd to make Medicinal) have already 
taught our Modern Phyfitians* who prefcribe, even in their 
Difpenfatories , divers Medicines made out of thofe churlifh 
Minerals, to which, in the enfuing Difcourfes, you will find * 
divers others (perhaps not interiour ) added. That Opium is 
reckondby Phyfitians among Poifons, I need not tell you 5 
and yet fuch powerful Remedies may be made with it for many 
defparate Ofes,efpecially in hot Countries, that the good it 
may doe, fo much exceeds the harm, that Phyfitians would be 
forry there were none or it n the World. The Oyl of Scor- 
pions is not onely Antidotal againft their Stings f but is wit- 
neflcd by experience , to >e very ufeful to bring away the de- 
fending Stone of the Ki n^ys and to remedy divers other 
Mifchcfs, befid s thofe that Scorpions can doe. And to thefe 
Ilhjil need but to ad e one inftance more, becaufe of the no- 
blencileof that fingle one, and that is the Root Mandthoc*, 
fo com non all over the Wtft Indus : for Nature is fo far from 
having btena ft ep mother to Man in making that plant a- °ff <n ' l xCltttn i .* 
bound fo much in thofe Countries, though in its crude fimpli- %^-,bw» 
city ! as the Hetmontians fpeak it be confefledly a rank Poifon, 
that (lie huh force in any one Phnt been fo bountiful to the • 
k^a nunc* n - . For by a fl ghtand eafie preparation, which we 
fliall hereafter mention, it affords many populous Nations al- 
moin all the Bread they eat , and fome of them a good part of ' 
their Drink j the Root freed by a ftrong Prefs from the noxi- 
ous Juke, and dry'd, affording them that Cafj^it Meal*- 
whereof they make their Bread-, which by the tafte and co- 
lour I could not difcern to be other then good . Nor is this 1 
the onely ufethis Poifonous Plant affords them : For the a- 
bwe»comnicaded H\ 0 gives us thi$ Jhort , but cpmprehfcnfive ' 

*" Cha- 



(4«) 

Character of if, Ex Mandihoca radice maximo [entente veneno* 
o'pttmum Alimentumnon [olum, [ed& Anttdotum concinnatur. 
(lib. 3°) But concerning the ufe that may br madeofPoi- 
fonous Creatures, we elfewhere profeffedly difcourfe: And 
fliall therefore now proceed to obferve to you here, that I have 
not yet mencion'd to you the inftance wh ch moft manirefts 
the greatnefle of the Good which God intended Man in the 
Creatures : For, not content to have provided him all that 
was requifite cither to Support or Accommodate htm here,he 
hath been pleas'd to contrive the World fo, that (it Man be 
th^Jmthl not want,n 8 t0 himfelf) it may afford him not oncly Necefla- 
. (hu&dto vc ries and Delights, but Inftru&ions to* For each Page rn the 
ww. gceat Volumeof Nature is full of real Hieroglyphicks, where 
^ (by an inverted way of Ex predion ) Things (land for Words, 

8 ? W anil their Qualities for tetters. The Pfalmift obferves, That 
' the Heavens declare the glory of God: And in <eed, they cele. 
brate his Praifes, though with a foundlefT Voice, yet with fo 
loud a one (and which gives us the Moral of Plato's exploded 
notion of the Mufick of the Spheres) to our intellectual E^rs, 
that he fcruples not to affirm, that There is no Speech nor lan* 
guage where their voice is not heard ( or as Junius and TremtSL 
us render it,without violence to the Hebrew Texr, 7 here is no 
Speech nor Words, yet without thefe thttr Voice is under flood) and 
that their Ltne is gone throughout all the earth; that is (as the 
Learned Diodati expounds it) their Writing ingrofs and plain 
. Draughts, and their Words to the end ot the World : Their 
Language having fo efcap'd the confufion of Tongues, that 
thefe Natural and Immortal Preachers give all N itionsocca- 
fion to fay of them, as the AfTembly at Pentecoft did of the 
Infpir'd Apoftles,W* do hear them [peak in our Tongues the won- 
A«i*.u, derful Works of God. 

Nor can we without liftning to thefe Sermons, derive the 
entiref perhaps not the chiefeft)Benefit defign'd us in the Crea- 
tures : For fure, that God, who hath compof'd us both of 
Bpdy and Soul, hath not coafm'd the ufes of fo many admi* 

rable 



Digitized by Google 



I 



(49) 

rable Creatnres,and fo much inimitable Workmanfhip to that 
ignoble part of Man which coupleth him to the Beads , with 
the neglect of that Diviner Portion , which allies him to the 
Angels-, vouchfaflng to the Lord or the Creatures, in the 
fruition of this his Palace, no higher Prerogative then he is 
pleas'd to allow to the Brutes, that ferve but to com pleat the 
variety rcquifite foriits embellimment. Of this Opinion I 
lately found that excellent Writer, S c Aufline, to have been 
before me ; For, Non debts uti oculis (fayes he) ut pecus, tan- 
turn ut vidt as \qu a adda* ventri,non menti: utere,ui homo jnten- 
de Calum^ejr inundc Fattajir quart Faclorem^afpict qua vidts, 
& quart quern non vidts, crtdt in turn quern non vides, propter 
ifta qua vides. Nolite fieri ficut tquus ejr mulus y &Q. 

Nor can the Creatures onely inform Man of Gods Being 
and Attributes (as we have already feen) but alfo inftruA him 
in his own Duties : For we may lay of the World, as Sr A»* D « A^iHm\ 
ftitr did of the Sacraments, that xtiivirb^mviftkle.' Ami *- 
certainly , God hath never (6 cenfin'd himfelf to inftrufr 
Men by Words or Types, as not to referve himfelf the liber- 
ty of doing it by things: Witnefle his appointing the Rain- 
bow to Preach his Goodnefle to all Nations, and fortifie the 
Faith of Mankind again ft the fear of a lecond Deluge." 'Tis 
fomething too high a faying for an Heathen, that of Plato, 
' where he teaches, That the World is Gods Fpi/llt, mitten to 
Mankind. For by Solomon God fends the Sluggard to fchool 
to the Ant^ to learn a provident Induftry : Chrift commands 
bis Dticiples to learn of Serpents and Ptg(ons prudence and in- 
ofFenfivenefle : The fame Divine Teacher enjoyns his Apo- 
iUes to conftder the Li flies > or (as f°me would have it) the Tu- . 
lips of the Fields and to learn thence that difB. ulc Virtue of a 
«hftruftlefsrelyance upon God: And S r Paul leems.almoft an- 
gry with the Corinthians , That their Faittyn fo abftrufe My- x Cor.i^if, 
fteries as that of the Refurre&ioii, was not infbrm'd'and \7* 
ftrengthned , by confidcring the meliorating death of Corn 
committed to the Earth; And the Royal Poetlearns Humili- 

Digitized by Google 



(To) 

ty, by the Conttrrptation of the moft elevated parts of Na- 
TfiLf'M ture-, H hen 1 confider ffayeshe) the Heavens, the mrkofthy 
Fingers, the iJMoon and Stars which thou h<*ft trdained. What is 
<LMan,that thou vtfttefl him ? Thus you may fee that God in- 
tended the World mould ferve Mao , not onely for a Palace 
to live in, and to gsze on, but for a School of Virtue to 
which his Philanthropy refervts luch incftimable Rewards » 
that the Creatures can,on no account, be fo beneficial to Man, 
as by promoting his Piety, by a competent degree of which, 
Gods goodoefle hath made uo iefs then Eternal Felicity auaia- 
able. 



ESSAY 




Digitized by GoOgle 



(50 




ESSAY III. 

Containing a Continuation of the Former. 

HAving thus, Pjrofhilus^ endeavored to evince, that ^^uiu 
the Opinion that wooid deter Men from the fcrutiny j e um mnfrm 
of Nature , is not a little prejudicial to Mans Inte- tb < of 
f efts,and does very much leiTen the Advantages he may derive iSZ'ffiJ* 
from the Creatures, both in relation to his accommodation in much if that Gio* 
this Lifcand his Felicity in the next : Let us proceed to confi- r l£i* 4 
der, whether the Doftrine we oppofe do not likewife tend, in tm ' 
irs own nature ( though not in the Intentions of its Patrons ) to 
defeat God of much of that Glory which Man both ought and 
might a ten be to him, both for him felt" and the reft of the 
Creatures. How unlikely is it that wefhould be able to offer 
to God that Glory, Praife, and Admiration, he both expedte 
an i merits from fuch a contemplation of the Creatures, as 
though it be requifite to the true knowledge of their Nature 
and Properties, is yet fuppos'd either pernicious, or at leaft 
dangerous, You, Pjrofhilm^ox any other impartial Perfon may 
eafiiy determine. 

For the Works of God are not like the Tricks of Juglers, 
or the Pageants that entertain Princes, where concealment is 
requifite to wonder $ but the knowledg of the Works of 
God proportions our admiration or them, they participat'ng 
and difclofingfo much of the inexhauftcd Perfections of their 
Author,, that the further we contemplate them , the more 
Foot-fteps and Impreflions we difcover of the Pefections of 
their Creators and our utmoft Science can but give us a juftet 

H 2 venera- 



Digitized by Google 



(5>) 

veneration of his Omnifcience. And as when fome Country 
Fellow looks upon a carious Watch, though he may be huge- 
ly taken with the rich Enamel of the Cafe, and perhaps with 
fome pretty Lindskip that adorns the Dial-plate 5 yet will not 
his Ignorance permit him fo advantageous a Notion of the ex- 
quiiite Makers skill, as that little Engine will forme in fome 
curious Artift, who beGdes that obvious Workmanfhip that 
firft entertains the Eye, confiders the exa&nefle, and knowes 
the ufe of every Wheel, takes notice of their proportion, 
contrivance, -and adaptation altogether, and of the hidden 
Springs that move them all: So in the World, though every 
Perufer may read the exigence of a Deity, and be in his de- 
gree affe&ed with what -he fees, yet is he utterly unable to de-; 
fcry there thofe fubtler Cbara&ers and Flourifhes of Omnifci- 
ence,which true Philofophers are ftiarp-fighted enough to dif- 
cern. The cxiftence of: God is indeed fo legibly written on 
the Creatures, th3t ( as the Scripture fpeaks in another fenfe) 
lt Be maj run that reads it% that is, even a perfunctory Beholder, 
that makes it not his bufineffe* may perceive it. But that this 
Godhasmanifefted inthefe Creatures a Power, a Wifdome, 
and a GoodneiTe worthy of himfclf,needs an attentive and dili- 
gent Surveyor to difcover. How different notions of Gods 
Wifdomedothe Eggs of Hens produce in the ordinary Eaters 
of them, and in curious Naturaiifts, who carefully watch and 
diligently x>bferve from time to time the admirable progrefte 
of Nature in the Formation of a Chick, from the firft change 
appearing in the Cicatrical* (or little whitifti fpeck difcernable 
in the Coat of the Eggs Yolk)to the breaking of the Egg- (hell 
by the perfectly hatched Bird, and on Natures exquilite me- 
thod in the order and faftiioning of the parts, make fuch Phtlo- 
fophical reflections as you mr/ meet with (not to mention 
what Arijlotle and Fa rictus ab Aqnaptndcntc^ have obferved 
on that fubject Jin the Ingenious Treatife of Generation, which 
our accurate md juflly Famous Anatomift, D r Htghmore^ has 
been pleated to Dedicate to me and in the excellent Exerci- 

tations 



Digitized by Google 



'(•si) 

> tions, De ovff* of that great Promoter of Anatomical Know- 
ledg, D r Harvey. And whereas it may be alledg'd, That 
the Attributes of God,which are not taught us, but after much 
fpeculation of theWorld,are things of which no Man but an 
Atheift doubts; to this it may be reply 'd, That befides that, 
it ill becomes thefenfe we ought to have of oar weaknefle to 
defpife any helps vouchfaf'd us of God to afl! It us to know or 
ferve him; befides this, I fay , God loving, as he defer ves, to 
be honor'd in ail our Faculties, and confequently to be glori- 
fi'd and acknowledge by the afts of Rcafon, as well as by 
thofe of Faith, there mutt be fure found a great difparity be- 

* t wix t that general, cont us'd, and lazy Idea we commonly have 
, of his Power and Wifdome, and the diftin& , rational, and af- - 
fe&ing notions of thofe Attributes which are form'd by an ac 
tentive infpc&ion of thofe Creatures in which they are moft 
legible, and which were made chiefly for that very end. The- 
Queen of Sheba had heard in her own Country a very ad van 
tageous Fame of the Wifdome of Solomon $ but when the cu- 
riofity ofaperfonal Vifit made her an Eye-witnefleof thofe 
particular both exquifite Structures, and alraoft Divinely pru- 
dent Condu&s and Contrivances wherein thatWifdome did in- 
irritably difplay it felf,flie then brake forth into Pathetick and 
Venerating Exclamations, that acknowledged how much jufter 
and improved a Character (of his Wifdomejher Eyes had now ' 
given her, then formerly her Eares had done- 
Very like a Philofopher, mcthinks, does the Great CMcr- 
curt/a Trijmcgijlus ( if we grant him to be the Author of 
the Books afcribed to him) fpeak, when he tells his Son, 
There can be n* Religion more true or /#/?, then to know the 
things that are, and to acknowledg thanks for all things to him bybrVvertfrrf, 
that made them • which thing I {ball not cfafe to-do: (he conti- 
nues ) Be Pious and Religious, O my Son 1 for he that does fo is the 
be (I and higheft Philofopher and without Philofofhj it is tmpof* 
fible ever to attain to the height and exaclnejk of P/ety and Reli- 
gion. And 'twas perhaps, Pjrophiltts, to ingage us to an in- 

H j dufiriou* - 



Digitized by Google 



(54) 

indubious indagation of the Creatures, that God made Man 
fo indigent, and furnifh'd him with fuch a multiplicity of De- 
fi es», fo that whereas other Creatures are content with thofe 
few obvious and eaftly attainable necefiTaries, that Nature has 
almoft every where provi ied for them-, In Man alone, every 
fenfe ha> (tore of greedy Appetites, for the mod part of Su- 
perfluities and Dainties, that to relieve his numerous Wants, 
or latibfie his more numerous Defires, He m ; ght be oblig'd 
with an inquifitive In Juftry to Range, Anatomize,and Ranfack 
Nature, and by that concein'd furvey come to a more exqui- 
fite Admiration of the Omni fcient Author. To illuftiate 
rbitvhWof*- this fuhjedt yet 3 little further, Pyrophilus, give me leave to 
pbtrs if *n Re obferve to you, That Philofophers of almoft all Religions 

'fimdikwiA ** ave bten > b y the c <> nte| nplation of the World, mov'd to 
mitrtbt Ntm confider it under the notion of.a Temple: Ne adoremus f faves 
itfOodtTcmpU. Plutarch) Elementa, Coelum, Solem, Lunam, &c fpecula funt 
hac, in quibus artem illim fwgularemintueamur, quimundum 
condtdit, tjr adornavit; nec eft aliud Mundus qiiam Tcmplum 
ejus: Let us not verier Ate the Elements, the Heaven , the Sun, 
the LMcon&c. thefe are but Miroirs, wherein we may heboid his 
excellent i^frt y who f ram 'd and adorn' d the World; nor is the 
World any thin? cl[e but his 7 em fie. Homines ffaies Cicero) tu • 
entut ilium Globum, quern tn T emtio hoc medium vides, qut terra, 
dicitur: Men abide upon that Globe which you fee in the middle of 
. this Temple, and ts called the Earth which Macrobms hand- 
(omely thus expounds: , Quicquid humano afpeliut fnbjicitur, 
Tcmplum ejus vocavit qui fold mentc cencipitur, ut qui h*c ve* 
TierAtur ut templa , cuhum tamen maximum dcbeat Conditori, 
jet at que quifquis in ufum Templt hujus tnduciturjttu ftbt viven- 
dum facerdotisi All that humane view reaches , he terms his 
l - Temple, who is apprehended by the minde alone j to the end that 

who fo reverences thefe things as Temples %mrght render the great- 
eft worfhip to the Maker ; and every one that is brought to cop- 
per fc in this Temple , might know himfelf obligd toitvc ltkcd 
rricft. 

And 



Digitized by Google 



C55) » 

" And the Lofty Seneca ( to mention now ho other Hea- 
thens; in divers pafiages of his excellent Writings, ftilesthe 
World a Temple* 3nd I remember in his Treatife, De Sent' 
fati) re avers in terms not unworthy his Mind or his Subject, 
Totum mundum Deer urn (ffe immortal turn Trmplum^ folum senJft.1U4.7l 
quidtm amplitudtne illorum ac magntficentia dtgnum. That 
the whole World is the T em fie of the immortal Cods , being alone 
mrthy of their Grandeur and Magnificence. The aflent of 
the JewimPhilofophers to this Notion, you may be pleafed 
to receive from their Eloquent Phito, who not only gives pM* fud. de 
the World the Name of Temple, but gives as this account ^ lMArtb ": 
of that appellation* Templum Dei fupremum & vert tale , 
exifttmare totum hum mundum^ qui facrarsum quidtm hahet y 
funfimam rerum natur a partem* Cerium-, ornamenta t fteOasi 
facerdotes, ahminifltos potent id ejus , Angelos, tjr tncorporea*- 
animasvrhe whole World is to he accounted the chtefefl Temple of 
Cod\ the San&um San&orum of it is the purefi part of the Uni- j 
verfc^Heaven-ythe ornaments >the Stars^t he Prnfls,the Mini/lers 1 
of His Power , Angels , and immaterial Sou! s* And as for 
Chriftian Philofophers,I fuppofe it would be needleilc toenu- j 
merate the parages wherein they adapt the Notion of the 
World already mention'd* and therefore I ih ill content my 
fclf to adde, that the Scripture it felf feems to Authorife it by H<u « f >fc 
reprefenting to us in the Eighth and Nineth Chapters of the 
Epiftle to the Htbrewes, the Mofaical Tabernacle, as an adum- 
bration of that Great Temple of the World * and particularly h j 
there is afignal Text in the latter of tbofe Chapters,whereitis 
faid thatChnft is not enter'd into Holy pi; ce s made with Hands 
Cx«&*»<«» <*;/ <t 3^hich are copies of the trueO^™*- ri <»&nM> j 
but into Heaven it felf, now to appear in the pretence of God 
for us. 

Upon what account, Pyrophilus , I efteem the World a^j,^ 
Temple, I ma v cite where have occafion to Declare* but this rmpk Hm 
for the prefc. t : It will not be r J(h to infer that if the World m "? bt «** 
^ilTempl^MuniuremuftbethePUwftjOrdain'd (by being Pm ^ . 

qualified * 



•'fp 



qualifi'd) to celebrte Divine fervicenot only in it, but for 
it. For as in Schools, when the Prince or fome munificent 
Benefactor confers fome large pofleflion or rich annuity upon 
the Foundation, though all the Boyes be concern 'd in the 
benefit, yet becaufe moft of them are too yong to be fen- 
fible of it, or too unlearned to be able to make the retribution 
of a handfome acknowledgment, either the Mafter or that 
other perfonof fociety, who is moft capable and the beft 
fpoakefman, is by a kind of natural right engag'd to the duty 
of returning praife and thanks,not for him felf alone, but in the 
name of all the reft: So in the World, where there are fo many 
inanimate and irrational Creatures, that neither underftand 
how much they owe to their Creator, by owing him even 
themfelves, nor are born to a condition inabling them to ac- 
knowledg kj Man, as bornthePrieft of Nature, and as the 
moft oblig'd and moft capable member ofit, is bound to re- 
turne Thanks and Praifes to his Maker not only for him- 
felfe out for the whole Creation. In which fenfe we may 
reconcile thofe two current AiTertions, That God made all 
things for His own Glory, and that God made all things for Man* 
and Man for himfelf; Since whether or no Man be a Mi- 
crocode or Little World in Paracelfus's fenfe, if not as a 
refembler, yet as a reprefenter of the Macrocofme or Great 
World , he prefents with his own adorations the Homages 
of all the Creatures to their Creator, though they be igno- 
rant of what is done, as Infants under the Law were of the 
facrifices offered on their account* And in this Relation may 
the Creatures anfwer the Solemn invitation made them in the 
Whole 14.8 Pfalm, and numerous other Scriptures.- which 
they may do (to borrow abatbarous but figniricant School- 
terrae) objectively, though not formally I mean, by pro- 
ving occaTions, though not fingers of his prait'es, and being 
fuch objects as prompt and invite Man to pay God that praife 
upon their fcore, which they cannot actually pay him them- 
felves j even God's muteft works being capable of being faid 



Digitized by Google 



(57) 

topraifehim in the fame fenfe ( though in an incomparably 
tranfcendenrer degree) that Solomon faies of his virtuous 
Woman (in the laft Verfe of the Proverbs) Let her own Works PcoT.51.13; 
Praife her in the Gates \ that is, give the conliderers of them 
occafion to extol her: and thus by man's referring the know- 
ledgotthe Creature to. the Creator's Glory, it becomes in 
fome fenfe, and congruoufly to its own Nature,, the praifer^ 
of its Maker, as may ieem intimated in this O Economy of the 
L31I pattof one of the Pfalmes, Blfflt the Lord^ all ye His Hofts, f 
-the Mtn.fters of His that do Hts pieafure. Blejfe the Lord, * l ° z ' 
Jill His Works i in all places of Hts Dominion: Bleffe the Lord y 
/) mj Sottle. Where by ihutting up the reft or God's Crea- 
tures betwixt Angels ana Mjn's Soul, he feems to mfinuate 
that the irrational Creatines biefle the Lord by the mouth of 
thofe that are Intelligent. 

And truly, Pyophiim, I fear it may reliih a little of fel- ™' <»<J>!>!<* 
fifhnefle, to tn.ke luch a difpanty bctwix: Perfections, all C y»ught m{9t$ 
of them equal, becaufe allot them infinite, as to let God's w^w* w 
mercy, becaufe it moft advantages us, fo to ingrotfc our [Jjg^ J! 
thoughts, and wonder, as to make us neglect the contcmpla- tbt Gltry of his 
tion of thofe other Glorious Attributes, his Power and his ? ° wtr and wiu 
Wifdome, which were thofe that exacted both Man and <ww * 
Angels adoration, before (in gave occafion to the exercife 
oi the firft. And I (hall not fcruple to confefle unto you, 
that I dare not confine trie A&s of Devotion to thofe which 
mod men fuppofe to comprifethe wholeexerciieofit* not 
that I at all undervalue, or would depreciate any, even the 
meaneft pra&ifes of Devoiton, which either Scripture prreafon 
confonant to it recommends-, but that 1 efteem that God 
may be alfo acceptably (and perhaps more nobly) ferv'd and 
glonfi'd by our entertaining of high, rational, and as much as 
our nature is cap able of worthy notions, attended with a pro- 
found and proportionable admiration ot thofe divine Attri- 
butes and Prerogatives for whofe manitefting he was pleas'd to 
conftruft this vaft Fabrick. 

I To 

Digitized by Google 



(5&) 

To which purpofe I confider,that in the Life to come, wheo 
we (hall queftionlefs glorifie God exadlieftjWe fliall hauelittle 
either need or ufe of Faith,Prayer,Liberality, Patience,and re- 
fembling Graces i but our Worfiiip will chiefly confift in ele- 
vated Notions, and a proftrate Veneration or Gods Omnpo-; 
tence, Wifdom,Goodnefs y and other Perfe&ions-, and fuch a 
• one as this is reprefented in the i^4pocaljps y to be the prefent 
employment of the Bleft Spitits in Heaven, where the Elders 
that aflift about the Throne of God are defcrib,d, cafting their 
Crowns before it, and faying to him that (its on it 7hon Art 
mrtbj, O Lord, t* receive Glory, and Honor ^ And Power : for 
tho* h Aft creAtedAll things ,A»df or thj pie Afure the] Art Atidwtrt 
created. 

Rcy 4.11. By this time, Pjrophilm^ I hope you begin to think, that 
the Dottrine that tends to deter Men from enquiring into Na- 
ture, is as well derogatory from Gods Glory, as prejudicial to 
M.insincerefts- And indeed, Ipurpof'd to content my felf 
with the having difperft throughout the paft Difcourfe, the 
grounds of anfwering their Objection again ft the ftudy of Phy- 
fiology, who pretend it is apt to make Men Atheifts: but be- 
caufe I am much concei n*d to have you fatisfied of fo important 
a Truth, as that which we have hitherto been laboring to e- 
vince, 1 muft beg your leave, Pjrophtlus to adde ex AbundAnti 
(as they fpeakj to what has been already alledg'd, fome things 
that may more dire&ly anfwer the Oo/e5tion of our Adverfa- 
ries, and manifeft how little their feverity is befriended, either 
by Scripture, Realon, or Experience. 

And firft, it feems not at all probable, That if the Omni- 
fcient Author of Nature knew that the ftudy of his Works 
did really tend to make Men dif- believe bis Being or Attri- 
butes, he would have given Men fomany Invitations, and al- 
moft Neceffines, to ftudy and contemplate the Natureofhis 
Creatutes : Of thefe Invitations divers have been mentioned 
alreiiv, and more might be added to them, if we thought ic 
requifitc. Bat what has been above alledg'd, will make us 

forbear 



Digitized by Gc 



(59) 

orbear the annexing of sny, fave that of the ancient Inftltu- p™** fkrtinr 
tion of the Sabbath, which many eminent Divines do not ^J^m^JT 
groundlclly hold to have been ordain'd to commemorate the sMsth ' 
Creation , and give Men the opportunity every Seventh Day 
to contemplate God in his Works , as he himfclf was pleaf'd 
to reft on thefuft Seventh Day, and contemplate Him felt in 
the works of the firft fix. And though our Weftern Churches, 
for certain Reafons (not here to be inquired into; have long 
fince difuf'd the Solemnizing of the Saturday , and appointed 
the Sunday tor the Celebration of both the Works of the 
Redemption, and Creation of the World together 5 yet 'tis 
evident enough that the Primitive Chnftians did for the moft 
part keep the Saturday as Holy-day , as well as the Sunday : 
For that ancient Book ( whoever be refolv'd to have written it,) 
which goes uncer the Name of Clement's Conftttuttons , affords 
us, among others, thefe two memorable PatTages to our pur* Lft.7«e*£ 
pofe: Andfirft,T*2«'cc*To» M it7o# ( fays he) 4 # w*M bHM 

Keep the Sabbath and 
the Kords Day ds Holy dayes \ that hting dedicated to the remem- 
brance of the Creation, and this to that of the Redemption . To 
which we (hall adde thisfecond Paflage of the fame Author, 
'E f yt^U^mmp w imha &c Let Servants work for five days $ but 
on the Sabbath , aad the Lords day , let them attend in the 
Church the DocJrine of Gedltncf. To which purpofe, Ire- See of the ^ty, 
member the moft Learned Grottus obferves, That the con- ^chrSiw 
verted Emperor Conffantine, forbad the compelling Chrifti- and Lkcwifcof 
ans to appear before Tribunals on cither of thofe Day es, as be- Mvmtxta 
ing their Feftivals: Nay, and if Modern Travellers do not V^^f 

■/■• i _ » » r _ _ reference to 

mil- inform me, I nnde that divers of the Eaftern Churches, tbirCeiebnti- 
particularly the Abjfsine Chriftians, to this day do as well ° nof ^ cS i ) tu ; : 
fanflifie the Sabbath* day in commemoration of Gods having J&ISfSu 
created the World . as the Lords- day to commemorate the Relcom, and 
Refurreaion of Chrift. And as for the Jews fenfe of the 
Fourth Commandment, fome of theLearnedft of their Cri- 
ticksute pieaf d to diftioguifh betwixt the Words Zachbr and 

1 2 Smor 

..... 

Digitized by GoogU 



Smor, Remember and Keep, imploy'd in the Comman 
folcmnizing the Sabbath : For , the remembring of it they 
hold to bean a<5lof Religion, performable by all Man- kind 
that are capable of it , and acquainted with its having been 
commanded % though the keeping of it Holy they fuppofe 
onely enjoyn'd to the Ijraelites : On which occafion,I remem- 
ber I was one Sabbath-day entertaind at his own Lodgings,by 
a Learned Jew (who taught me the Holy Languige) with 
Meat then newly dreflM: to remove mv wonder at which, he 
told me, That it yp. is drtfj'dby Cbrtfliam. who y being Gen* 
tiles, were not obl/g'd to the jlrttf and legal obfervitton of the 
Sabbath. But what ever be to be thought of this Jewi<h No- 
tion, yet queftionldfc if the Fourth Commandment do not,, 
atleaft, divers other Pillages of Scriptures do muchdifcoun- 
tenance their feverity, who would fright Men from themdi- 
gation of N uute. Aid he that ftirll d«ily confi.fcr divers 
Texts obvious enough in the Bookof fob, and the Pfalmes' 
(befides other parrs of the Bible) will not readily conclude, 
that Natural Philofophy and Divinity are at fuch variance , as 
^ e Di v i nes we <j ea i Wltn would pcrfwade us. S i P awl feem* 
to inform us, that the invifible things of God from the Crea- 
tion of the World, are cleerly feen, being under ftood by the 
things that are made, even his Eternal Power and Cod head: 
So that they that were mention d before are without excufe; 
And though I ignore not, that not onely feveral of the Sod* 
wans following their Matter Socinus i but fome few Orthodox 
Writers, are plea f'd to give a very differing Interpretation of 
that Text, and make the M»™ IvdMitTiViw to fignifle 
thofe things of God that have been Invifible ever fincethe 
Creation of the World , and referring the ™»u** to things 
notmades.% weTranflateit, but done (as the Miracles of Chrift 
and hi> Apoftles) yet I fee no neceflity why the uu^a*™ lliould 
betaken.nalenfeexclufive of the Creation, and not at lead 
admitted to take in all the Wayes and Methods imployedby 
God to maniieft the uwtftble things there intimated unco Mat: 

And 

Digitized by Google 



(6i) 

And certainly, however S* Paul may be fuppos'd to appear 
but darkly , yet fob was clearly of a differing Opinion from 
theirs, who teach, That the Study of Nature leads to Atheifm: j ob< u. 7l t,„ 
For ask now the Beafts (fayes he) and they Will teach thee, and 
the Fowls of the Air, and they fluli tell thee , or [peak to the 
Earth, and tt fhall teach thee, and the Ftfhes of the Sea Jhall 
declare unto thee. Who knoweth not in al. theje that the hand of 
the Lord hath wrought thitf Andconfonantly hereunto.whichf • 
'twere not amiis tor our Adverfaries to take notice of j we 
may obfer ve, That almoft all the Writers of Natural Tfceo* 
logy, and the- mod alio of thofe that have labored to demoor 
ftrate the Truth of Chrifhan Religion ( divers of whem have 
been as wdl Profound Divines , asorherwife Eminent Scho- 
lars^ have urtcei taken to evince, by the conlideration of the 
Univcrfe , both th.;t there is a God, and that he is the Au- 
thor of it : Which I rhe rather mention, Pycfhilus, becaufe 
I would not be roiftaken, as it I difputed sgiinft Lrvinrsift 
general, or wtre guilty or the Jeafl Irreverence towards a Fa- 
culty, in whofe Stuay I have thought my felt oblig'd, as a 
Chnftian, to fpend much of my time*, ana efpecially , I would 
not appear dil reipecliul to Divines in England, where they 
have already been but too much v.lified, though queftionlefl'e 
for their Sins Jgainft God, yet, I fear, not without the Sin of- 
their OppreiTois. 

In the next place I confider , That fince Phyfiology is Tb*tM&* 
faid to tempt to Atheifm, but by enabling Men to give an 
account ot all the Phenomena of Natore , by the knowledge ^ 
of Second Caufes, without taking in the Firft, it will not be vhmomnaof 
fo eafie a matter as many prefume, for the contemplation of $?*fit&" 
Nature, to turn a confidering Man Atheift. For we are yet, frfl, 
for ought I can find, far enough from being able to expli- 
cate all rhe Phenomena of Nature by any Principles whatfoe- 
ver. Andevenof the Atomical Philoiopheis, uhofe Sert 
fiems to have the moft ingen/ouily attmpted it, fonfc of 

I 3 the - 



Ifigitized by Google 



(62) 

the eminenteft have themfelves freely acknowledged tome, 
their deing unable to do it convincingly to others, or fo much 
as fatisfa&orily to themfeives: And indeed, not onely the 
Generation of Animals is a Myltery, which all that Natural- 
iftshave faidto explain it, hath been far enough from depri- 
ving of that Name : but we fee that to explicate, all the vari- 
ous Phenomena that belong to that fingle inanimate, and 
# feemingly homogeneous Body, LMercury, fo as not to make 
any Hjfothefis aflum'd to make out one of its Properties or 
Effects incongruous to any other Hjft thefts requifite to the 
explanation of any of the reft, hath been hitherto found fo 
difficult, that if our Pofterity be not much happier Unriddlers, 
then our Fore- Fathers, or we have been, it is like to prove a 
Task capable of defeating the InduQry and Attempts, I fay 
not of more then one Philofopher, but of more then one Age ; 
even our Chyraical Tortures hitherto, having, from that de- 
luding Proteus , fore'd no Confcilions that bring us not more 
Wonder then Satisfaction , and do not Beget almoft ma^y 
Scruples as they Refolve. « 



ESSAY 



if www w ww mm 



Digitized by Google 



>^Pfl «^™* w *Md«Ai<M3MsnHM0M3MHy|i3 

ESSAY IV. 

Containing a requijtte Digreftion concerning 
tbofe that would exclude the Deity from 
intermedling with flatter. 



I Ignore not that not oncly Leuchfm Eticurus , and other ^ - r fti 
x^t$*i/lsoi old, bat of late fome Pcrfons, for the mo«2^Sf/S 
part Adorers of \^£ri/t0tU's Writings » have pretended to <>* &i*rfm 



be able to explicate the firft Beginning vf Things , and the*"*" 1 *" 
Worlds Pbtnomcna, without taking in, or acknowledging 
any Divine Author of it : And therefore, though we may 
cliewhere, by the aflifhnce of that Author, have an oppor- 
tunity to give You an Account of our unfatisfiednefle with the 
Attempts made by fome bold Wits in favor of fuch Pretenfi- 
ons\ Yet fince the main Ttuth We plead for , in this Dif- 
coorfe,ts fo nearly concern d in what hath been taught by thofe 
that would keep God from being thought to have any (hare in 
the Production of the Univerfe $ lean fcarce forbear fas un- 
willing as 1 am to digrefs) to reprefent to You v on the prefent 
occafion , a few. Confiderations which may affift You , if not 
to leflen the Arrogance of fuch Perfons , at leaft, to keep Your 
felf from thinking their Evidence as great as their Confidence 
is wont to be. Now of the Philofophers we fpeak of, fome 
being Atomifts; and others not* it will be requifite to fay 
fomethtng to each of the two forts And becaufe we not long 
fince, in an lliuftrious Company, where You , Fyofbtltu > are 
not unknown, met with one of them , who avowedly ground- 
ed his^Opinions on the Ariftot clean or vulgar Pbyfiology, We 

(hall 



Digitized by Google 



(H) 

fliall fir ft recommend to You two or three Confiderations con- 
cerning fuch arrogant Peripateticks (For I fpeak not of that 
Sect in general, of which I know there are divers excellent 
Men.) 

ffffffi Fjrft then> you will in many Paflbges of the following Ef- 
fuulfauftltits. fays, find, that divers things that have been very Magifterially 
taught,and confidently believ'd among the Followers or Ari- 
fiotle, are Errors or Miftaks-, and that as feveral, even of the 
obvious Phenomena of Nature , do contr,adi& the common 
Peripatetick Dcctrine, fo divers , at leaft of thofe that are 
tnoreabftrufe, are not explicable byit^ and as confidently as 
thefe his Followers talk of the expounding the very Riddles of 
JNatore • yet ,1 remember that he himfelf fomewhere (for I 
jcannotcafytomind tjieplpce) did not fcraple toconfefs, that 
Jsthejiyq of Owls are to the fplendor of the pay, jo are thofe of 
our tjtftnds even to things obvious ana mam ft fl \ 
ciudm'lf&e I fliall'next take notice, That Phdofophers, who fcorn to 
Deity mlkJhlt ^fcribeany thing to God,do often deceive them'elves,in think- 
imptrfenerpu- jng they have fufficicntly fatisfied our Enquiries, when they 
Phenomena <>f ^ave §i ven us IDe nejreft and mod immediate c3ufesof fome 
Viturt. things; whereas oftentimes the alignment or thofe Caules is 
but the manirefting th.it fuch and fuch Effects may be dedue'd 
from the moreCarhoiick affections of things, though thefe 
be not unfrequently as abftrufeas the -Phenomena explicated 
by them, as having onely their Efredh more obvious, not 
their Nature better underftood: As when,for inflance,an ac- 
count is demanded of that ftrange fuppofed Sympathy be- 
twixt Quick- ill ver and Gold; in that we find, that whereas 
all other Bodies fwirt* upon Quick -filver, it will readily fwal- 
lowup Gol j.andhideit in its Bofome. This pretended Sym- 
pathy the N.ituralift may explicate, bv faying, That Gold 
being the onely Body heavier then Quick- filver of the fame 
bulk, the known Lawes of the Hydroftattcks ma^ke it neceflary, 
that Gold lh )uld fink :n ir, and all lighter Bodies fwi.nonit: 
But though the caufeot this Effect be\hus plaufibly ahlgn'd > 

by 



Digitized by Google 



by deducing it from fo known and obvicms an affection of Bo- 
dies, as Gravity, which every man is apt to think he fufficient- 
ly underftands yet will not this pat a fatisfactorie period to a 
fevere Inquirers Cariofity , who will, perchance, be apt to 
allcdge, That though the Eflectsof Gravity indeed be very Piiyfaogo qui 
obvious, yet the Caufe and Nature of it are asobfcure as thofe JSJS! SS- 
of almoft any Phenomenon it can be brought to explicate. 
And that therefore he that defires no further account,de(ifts too JJKjfiy^' 
foon from his Enquiries , and acquiefces long before he comes St prmS* 
to his Journies end. And indeed, the inveftigation of the true fopremarque 
nature and adequate caufe of gravity, is a task of that difficulty, ** oficif - 
that in fpight of ought I have hitherto feen or read, I mult rWch: lib. 
yet retain great doubts whether they have been clearly and fo- dc J*' xmo Pri * 
lidly mad* out by any Man* And furc, Pjropbtltu, there are r 3 °^ ro , fa 
divers Effects in Nature, of which, though the immediate rm^-nivfn- 
Caufe may be plaufibly aflign'd , yet if we further enquire in- Zt^uhk^ 
to the Caufes of thofe Caufes , and defift not from af- Nicom. lib. 
cending in the Scale of Caufes till we are arriv'd at the top of ca P- 8 ; 
it, wc fhail perhaps finde the more Catholick and Primary ^ i^SV 
caufes of Things, to be either certain, primitive , general and ^ 
fix'dLawsof Nature for rules of Action and Paflion among 
the parcels of the Univerfal Matter) or elfe the Shape, Size, 
Motion, and other primary Affections of the fmalleft parts of 
Matter, and of their fTrft Coalitions or Clutters : efpecially 
thofe endowed with feminal Faculties or Properties, or (to 
difpatchj the admirable confpiring; of the feveral parts of the 
Univerfe to the production of particular Effects of all which 
it will be difficult to give a f atisfactory Account , without ac- 
knowledging an intelligent Author or difpofer of Things; 

And the better to clear fo weighty a Truth , let us further rtf. 
conficer on this occafion , That not onely Ariftotle y and thofe 
that, mif led by his Authority , maintain the Eternity of the 
World, but very many other Philofophers and Phyfitian?, 
who afcribe fo much to Nature , that they will not be reduc'd 
to acknowled ge an Author of it, are wont very much to delude 

K both 



zed by 



(66) 

jnfonen of both themfelves and others in rhe account they prefume togiv£ 
%w«"mA us > as latisfa^ory of the Caufes or Reafons of very many 
ntt (athfjOoy: Ejects: I will nor inftance in the Magnetick Properties of 
T in the a t' things, nor anv °* tno ^ c numerous abftrufitics of Nature, 
f/^x w;! f 'L'o which 'tis well known that the K^Arijioteleans are wont to re- 
§fvbiebtbey fer to Sympathy, Antipathy, or Occult Qualities, and ftrive 

^Stics^' 10 P ut Men off w i tn empty Names, whereby they do not fo 
much lefl'en our Ignorance, as betray their own. 

But I mall inflance in thofe more obvious ThMomcna, of 
which they fuppofe they have given us very fatisfa&ory Ac- 
counts: If you ask one of thofe I fpeak of, whence it comes to 
pais that if a Man put one end of a long Reed into a VefTel full 
of Water, and fuck at the other end, his Mouth will be im- 
mediatly hi I'd with that Liquor ^he will readily tell you, That 
the Suction drawing the Air out of the cavity of the Reed, the 
» nUa th - Water muft neceflarily fucceed in the place defcrted by the 
fm Natms Air, to prevent a Vacuity abhorr'd by Nature. If you like- 
alimrtncy if w i( e a sk fuch a Man, Why to Women about a certain Age, 
tbcc^cVa tne * r P«r$4tioncs Mcnflru* do commonly fupervene, he will 
iFMcrMaf. think hehaslufficiently anfwered you, when he has-told you, 
sad m Sutton that about that Age.beginning to be ripe for Procreation, Na- 
ture has wifely provided th.it their fuperfluous Blood Ihould be 
fenr to the Uterine Veflels, partly to dif- burthen the Mafs 
of Blood of an ufelefs load, and partly to contribute Matter, 
or at Ieaft afford Nourilhment in cafe of Conception. But 
though thefe Solutions are wont to be acquiefc'd in by fuch as 
thofe that give them, yet I fee not how they can fatisfie a ri- 
gid Reafoner. For not now to mention what may be objected 
againft them out of fome Modern Mechanical and Anatomical 
6bferv3tions, let us a little confider, that to fay that the afcenc 
of the Water in thefirft Problem } proceeds from Natures De- 
tefhtion of a Vacuity, fuppofes that there is a kind of KAnima 
Mttndi , furnilhed with various Panlons, which watchfully 
provides for the fafety of the Univerfe-, or that a Brute and In- 
animate Creature, as Water, not oneiy has a power to move 

its 



Digitized by Google 



to) 

its heavy Body upwards contrary( to fpeak in their Language) 
Co the tendency of its particular Nature, but knowes both that 
Air has been fuck'd out of the Reed, nnd that unlefs it fucceed 
the attracted Air, there will follow a Vacuum * and that this 
„ Water is Withall fo generous^as by afcending,to a& contrary to 
its particular inclination for the general good of thr Univerfe, 
Jike a Noble Patriot, that facr.fices his private Interefts to the 
publick ones of his Countrey. 

Buttofhewmenbyaneafie Experiment how little Attra- "hxraitbe 
£ion is perfbrm'd to avoid a Vacuum , 1 have fometimes done TdVtblsrti 
thus i I have taken a llender Pipe of Glade, of about four oa of the £*Mh 
Foot long, and putting one of the open ends of it into a Vef- f lvtr : 
fel full of Quick- filver, I have fuck'd as ftrongiy as I could at 
the other, and caus'd one to watch the afcent of the Quiet 
filver, and mark where it was at the higheft, and I found not 
that at one fuck, I could raife it up much above a Foot? and 
having caus'd a couple offtrongMen, one after another, to 
fuck at the fame end of the fame Pipe, I found not that either 
of them could draw it up much higher. Nor did it appear 
that by repeated Suctions, though the upper end of the Pipe 
were each time ftopp'd, to hinder the relapfe of the Quick- 
filver, it could at all be rais'd above the feven and twenty Di- 
gits at which it us'd to lubfift in the lorrcccllian Experiment 
Dc Vacuo: Whereas the fame end of that Tube being put in- 
to a fmall Veflel of Water, I could at one fuck make the Wa- 
ter fwiftly afcend thorow the perpendicularly held Tube into 
my Mouth, which argues, that the afcenfion of Liquors up- 
on Su&ion,rather depends upon the preffure of the Air(againft 
the Liquors and the Suckers Cheftj and their refpeCtive mea- 
fures of Gravity and Lightnefs compared to that PrelTure, then 
it proceeds from fuch an abhorrency ohVacuum as is prefum'd. 

And fo likewife in the other Queition propos'd,it is imply 'd, ; *Un they 
that there is in aFemale Body fomething,that knows theruleof 
Phyfitians, that of a Plethora, the Cure is the convenient Eva- n C $ mffiu*T 
cuation of Blood, and that this intelligent Faculty is wife e- 

. K a nough 



oy Google 



nough alfo to propofe to it fclf the double end above -mention 3 
ed,in this Evacuation, and therefore will not provide a Quan- 
tity of Blood great enough to require an Excretion, nor begin 
it till the Female be come to an Age wherein 'tis poffible for 
both the Ends to be obtained-, and that alfo this prefiding Na- 
ture is fo charitable, as that Man - kind might not fail,it will make 
the Female fubject to fuch Monethly Superfluities of Blood, 
from which Experience informs us, that a whole Set of Difea- 
fes peculiar to that Sex, does frequently proceed. And in 
a word, there is a multitude of Problems , eipecially fuch as 
belong to the ufe of the Parts of a humane Body, and to the 
Caufes and Cures of the Difeafes incident thereunto, in whofe 
Explication thofe we write of, content themfelves to tell us, 
That Nature does fuch and fuch a thing, becaufe it was fit for 
her fo to do i but, they endeavor not to make intelligible to us, 
what they mean by this Nature,and how meer,and confequent- 
ly biuir, Bodies can act according to Laws, and for determinate 
Ends, without any knowledg cither of the one or of the o- 
W-mbe* m lner - *- et ln cm therefore, till they have made out their 
$ti*r cafes ibey fotbcfts more intelligibly , eithetceafe toafcribeto irrational 
n&*?«Z* CieatDrcs fa cn Actions as in Men are apparently the Prodacti- 
fucb ttTums as ons of Reafon and Choice, and fometimes even of Induftry 
% Vdik aHlh e and virtDe "> or cl^e 1« them with us acknowledg, that fuch 
P F.eafo/ml Actions of Creatures in themfelves Irrational, are perform'd 
Cboue, under the fuperintendence and guidance of a Wife and Intel- 
ligcnt Author of Things. But that you may not miftake 
me, TyofhtlMy it will be requifite for me, to acquaint you 
in two or three words with fome of my prefent thoughts con- 
cerning this fubject .• That there are fome Actions fo peculiar 
to Man,upon the account of his Intellect and will , that they 
cannot be fatisfactorily explicated after the manner of the Act* 
ingsof meer corporeal Agents, I am very much inclin d to be- 
lieve: And whether or no there may be fome Actions of iorae 
other Animals, which cannot well be Mechanically explt* 
caied, i have not here leifuce or opportunity to examine. 

But 



Digitize^ by Google 



m 

TWfor(moftof) the other Fhtnomena of Nature, methmks 
we may, without abfurdity, conceive, That God, of whom 
in the Scripture 'tis affirm'd , That all his Workj are knotvn to *«$ ■ w _ 
him from the Beginning •, having refolved , before the Crea- 
tion, to make fuch a World as this of Ours, did divide ( at Ue ^ M]mi 
leaft if he did not create it incoherent) that Matter which he coveit c*uer- 
had provided into an innumerable multitude of very varioufly mngGidscw 
figur'd Corpufcles, and both connected thofe Pai tides into T&ZldU 



fuch Textures or particular Bodies, and plac'd them in fuch (o pUcing them 
Situations, and put them into fuch Motions, that by the 
afliftance of fns ordinary prcferving Concourfe, the Pbtno- ordinary u _. 

which he intended ihould appear in the Univerfe, muft ) «g 
as orderly follow, and be exhibited by the Bodies DCCdBrUy^gS* 
a&ing according to thofe Impreffions or Lawes, though they men* 
underftandthemnotatall, as if each of thofe Creatures had 
a Defign of Self- pre fervation,and were furnifli'd with Know- 
ledg and Induftry to profecute it 5 and as if there were 
diffus'd through the Univerfe an intelligent Being, watchful 
over thepublick Good of it, and carelul to Adminifter all 
things wifely for the good of the particular Parts of it, but 
fo far forth as is confident with the Good of the whole, and 
the prefervation of the Primitive and Catholick Lawes efta- 
bliflied by the Supreme Caufe. As in the formerly mentiond 
Clock of Stratsburg, the feveral Pieces making up that curi- 
ous Engine, are fo framed and adapted, and are put into fuch 
amotion, that though the numerous Wheels, and other parts 
of it, move feveral wayes, and that without.any thing either 
ofKnowledg or Defign-, yet each performs its part in order m^j^ 
to the various Ends for which it wascontrivd, as regularly tbe&*imf 
and uniformly as if it knevv and were concern'd to do its Duty* *■ 
and the various Motions of the Wheels •, and other parts con- rau urg * 
cur to exhibit the Vhtnomena defign d by the Artificer in the 
Engine , as exactly as if they were animated by a common 
Principle, which makes them knowingly confpire to do fo , 
and might, to a rude Indian, feem to be more intelligent then 

K 3 • CUA; 



Digitized by Google 



(jo) 

CfMddus Dafypodiushitnfclt, that publiilied a Defcriptibn <5f 
it, wherein he tells the World, That he contrived it, who 
could not tell the hours and meafure time fo accurately at his 
Clock. And according to this Notion, if you be pleasM to 
mwfjYfu.h bear it in your memory, Pjrofhilut , you may eafily appre- 

M^'hincfi nencJ in wnac 1 ule manv comraon Phrafes, which cuftom 
hath fo authorized, that we can icarce write of Phyfiological 
tto 5*3 hM r ^i c ^ s without employing either them, or frequent and te- 
pf<£ ma> e dious Circumlocutions in their ftead: Thus when I fay, that 
a done endeavors to defcend towards the Centre of the Earth, 
or that being put into a Vefiel of Water, it affecTs the loweft 
place: I mean that not fuch a Mathematical Point as the Centre 
of the Earth,hath power to attract all heavy Bodies,the leaft of 
which, it being a point, it cannot harbor-, or that a Stone does 
really aim at that unknown.and unattainable Centre 5 but that, 
as we fay, that a Man ftrives or endeavors to go to any place, 
at which he would quickly arrive, if he were not forcibly hin- 
dered by fome Body that holds him f aft where he is, and will 
not let him go : So a Stone may be faid to ftrive to defeend, 
when either by the Magnetical Steams of the Earth, or the 
preflure of fome fubtle Matter incumbent on it, or by what 
ever elle may be the caufe of Gravity , the Stone is fo deter- 
mined to tend downwards, that if all Impediments, interpos'd 
. by the Neighboring Bodies, were removed, it Would certain- 
ly and dire&ly fall to the ground - 7 or being put into a Veflel 
©w4to ft. with Water, or any other Liquor much lefle heavy then it felt 
Ugbsivter the* (for on Qu ck-n>er, which is heavier, Stones will fwim) the 

^tZmlltm fame Gravit y wi U makeit fubflde t0 the bottom of the Veflel, 
Uii&tUvm. and confequently thruft away its bulk of Water,which though 
heavy in it t'elf,yet becaufe it is lefle ponderous then the Stone, 
feems to be light. And fo in our late inftance in the Clock,ific 
be faid that the Hand that points at the Hours affeCts a circular 
motion , becaufe it conftantly moves round the Centre of the 
Dial- plate, 'tis evident that the inanimate piece of Metal af- 
fe&s not that motion more then any other, but onely that the 

ira- 



Digitized by Google 



f70 

impreffion it receives from the Wheeles,and the adaptation of 
the reft of the Engine, determine it to move after that man- 
aer. And although if a man mould with his Finger ftop that 
Index from proceeding in its courfe, it may befaid, infome 
fenfe, that it drives or endeavors to profecute its former Cir- 
cular Motion * yet that will fignifie no more, then that by 
virtue of the Contrivance of the Engine, the Index is fo im- 
pell'd, that, if the Obftacle, put by the Finger of him that 
itops it, were taken away, the Index would move onwards, 
from that part of the Circle where it was ftopt, towards the 
mark of the next Hour. Nor do I by this, Pyr op hilm ', deny 
that it may in a right fenfe be faid , as it is wont to be in the 
Schools, that Of us Nature eft opus Intelligent id i Neither do 
I reject fuch common ExprefTions as Nature alwaies affetfs and 

. intends that which is beft, and Nature doth nothing in vaim 
For fince I muft, according to the above- mentionM Notion, 
refer many of the aftions of irrational Creatures to a moft wife That the Ufaz 
Difpofer of Things, it canfearce feem ftrangc to me, that in 
thole particulars in which the Author intended, as it was re- 1 ™ "Ifmbtg 
quifite that irrational Creatures mould operate foand fo for ^fwtmmt** 
their own Prefervation, or the Propagation of their Species, ft 
or thepublick good of the Univerfe, their Actions being or- 
der ed by a Reafon tranfeending Ours, mould not only often* 
times refemble the Adings of Reafon in Us, but fometimes 
even furpafs them. As in effect we fee that Silk-worms and 
Spiders can, without being taught, fpin much more curioufly 
their Balls and Webs , then our beft Spinfters could, and 
th3t feveral Birds can build and fallen their Nefts more Artifiw 

' ci3liy then many a Man, or perhaps any man could frame and 
fatten fuch little and elaborate Buildings. And the Indulges 
of Foxes, Bees, and divers other Beafts, are fuch, that 'tis nqt 
much to be wondered at that thofc Creatures mould have Rea- 
fon afcrib'd to them by divers Learned Men.- who yet perhaps 
would be lefle confident, if they confidered how much may, be 
laid for the Immortality of all rational Souls , and that the 

fubtlc 



Hi* '■ -■*. 



digitized by Googl 



to 

fubtle Agings of thefe Bsafts are determined to fome few Par- 
ticulars requifice for their own Prcfeivation, or that of their 
Species 5 whereas on all other occafions , they feem to betray 
their want of Reafon , and by their Voice and Gefturesfeera 
to expreiTe nothing, but the Natural Paflions, and not any Ra- 
tional or Logical Conceptions. And therefore, as when (to 
refume our former comparifon) I fee in a curious Clock, how 
orderly every Wheel and other part performs its own Moti- 
ons, and with what feming Unanimity they confpire to (hew 
the Hour , and accompluli the other Def\gns of the Artificer, 
I do not imagine that any of the Wheels, &c. or the Engine ic 
felf is endowed with Reafon, but commend that of the Work- 
man who fram'd it fo Artificially. So when I contemplate the 
Actions of thofe feverall Creatures that make up the World, 
I do not conclude , the inanimate Pieces, at leaft, that 'tis ma de 
up of, or the vaft Engine it felf, to 3& with Realon or D efign, 
but admire and praile the moft wife Author, who by his admi- 
rable Contrivance can fo regularly produce Effects , to which 
fo great a number of fucceflive and confpiring Caufcs are re- 
quired. 

And thus much , Fyrofhilus , having been reprefenred con-- 
cerning thofe, that rejecting from the Production and Prefer- 
vationof Things, all but Nature, yet imbrace the Principles 
of the vulgar Phdofophy , you will perhaps think it more then 
enough : but Ob;edt, That what is not to be expected from 
the barren Principles of the Schools, may yet be performed by 
thofe Atomical ones which we our felves have within not very 
many Pages feem'd to acknowledge Ingenious. And I know 
indeed, that the modern Admirers of Epcurtu confidently e** 
nough pretend, that he and his Expofitors have already, with- 
out being beholding to a Deity, clearly made out , at lead the 
Origine of the World, and of the principal Bodies 'tis made 
up or : But I confefle, I am fofar from being convine'd of this, 
that I h3ve been confirm'd rather, then unfetled in my Opini- 
on, of the difficulty of making out the Original of the World, 

and 

■ 



Digitized by Google 



hi) 

and of the Creatures, efpecially the living Ones that com- 
pofe it , by confidering the accounts which are given us of the otfeOs in the 
Nativity (if I may fo fpeak ) of the Univerfe, and of Ani- E*?ixatk*if 
. mais, by thofe great Denyers of Creation and Providence, ^miki 
JEpicurus. and his Paraphraft Lucretius : Whofe having mown deny the mcwri 
themfelves (as I freely confefle they have) very fubtile I hilo- °f GU 
fophcrs in explicating divers Myfteries of Nature, ought not 
fo much to recommend to us their impious Errors, about the 
Original of Things, as to let us fee the'neceflicy of afcribing 
it to an Intelligent Caufe. This then is the account of this 
matter, which is given us by Epicurus himfelf, in that Epiftle 
of his to Herodotus % which we find in Diogenes Laertiusz 
JHuod ad (Meteors attinet exiftimari non oportet^aut mot umlaut 
convcrftonem,*aHt Ecclipfin, ant ertum occafumve , ant alt a hw 
\u fee modi ideo fieri quod fit Prtfcftus alt qua , qui fic dtfponat^ 
difpofuerituh as ftmul beatitudinem immortalitatemque pofcideat: 
And having interpofed fome Lines, to prove tMit the Provi- 
.denceof God is not confident with his Felicity, headdes, 
Snare opinandum eftjum cam Mnndus procreatus eft Jaclos fu* 
ifje eos circumflex us convolventium fe sid tomorum, ut nata fne» 
rit bde neccfiitas^ qua circuttus tales obierint : And elfewhere 
in the fame Epiftle,/*/fof*j(fayes he)funt mundi^alii (miles ifti 9 
aliivero di ft miles. Quippe K^dtomi cum fint infinite y nt non 
multo ante demon ftratum eft per inpnttatem fpatiorum, ejr alibi 
alia, ac procul ab hoc ad fabrcf actionem Mundorum snfinitorum 
<uarit concurrunt. And lead this Epicurean Explication of 
the Worlds Original mould feem to owe all its unfatisfa&ori- 
oefle to its obfeure brevity, we ihail not fcruple to give you 
that elegant Paraphrafe and Expofition of it, which Lucretius 
has delivered in his 5^ Book, De Rerum Natura: 

Sedquibus ille mcdis/onjetfus, material 
Fundarh Coelnm^ ac Terr am Pontiff, profunda 
Sells ^Lun at cur (us ex or dine ponam, 
Nam certc, neque conciliis primordia rernm 

L OrdJnc 

* • • _ 

Digitized by Google 



m 

Or dine fequtque At que fdgdd menu he arum] 
Nec quos qudque ddrent motssspepigere profecroi 
Sed quid mult a mod is mull is primer didrerum 
Ex infinite jdm tempore percita pldgu^ 
ponderibufque fuss, conjuerunt conatdferri, 
Omnimodtf que coir e, at que omnia vert ent are, 
gu&ctsnque inter fe pejjent congrejjd ere Arts 
Propter ed fit } ut magnum volgdtd per duum 9 
Omnigenos cott'sss & motm experiundo, 
Tdndem convenidnt: ed qud cenjunttd repentc 
UWdgndrum return fidnt exordid farpe 
Terrdi mdrii^r cvl/genertfque dnimdntum* 

The Hypothecs expreff'd iothefe Vcrfc ( which pleafe out 
Author Co well , chat he has almoft the Came Lines in fever al 
other places of his Poem ) he profecutes and applies to fome 
particular patts of the Univerfe in the fame 5 th Book: But 
whilft he thus refufcth to allow God an Intereft in the Worlds 
production, his Hypothecs requires that we fhould allow him 
feverai things, which he doth aflume, not prove: AsFirft, 
That Matter is Eternal.- a. That from Eternity it was actu- 
ally divided, and that into fucb infenfibly fmall parts, as may 
deferve the name of Acorns * whereas it may be fupppos'd, 
that Matter, though Eternal, was at firft one coherent Mafs, 
it belonging to Matter to be divifible, but not fo of neceflity, 
to be actually divided. 3. That the number of thefe Atoms 
is really infinite. 4. That thefe Atoms have an hdne Infini- 
tum (as the Epicureans fpeak) to move in. 5. That thefe 
Atoms are endowed with an almoft infinite variety of deter- 
minate Figures, fome being round , others cubical, others 
hooked, others conical, &c. whereas not to mention before- 
hand what we may clfewhere object, befides againft this Af- 
fumption,he mewes not why, nor how this Atome came to be 
Spherical rather then Conical, and another Hooked rather then 
Pyramidal: But thefe Ailumpnons I iniift not on,becaufe of 

two 



Digitized by G 



(75) 

two others much more confiderable, which our Author is fain 
to take for granted in his Hjfothtfu: For 6\y ,He fuppofes his 
Eternal Atoms to have from Eternity been their own Movers, 
whereas it is plain that Motion is no way neceflary to the Ef- 
fence of Matter, which feeras to confift principally in Extenfi- 
on: For Matter is no lcfle Matter,when tt refts, then when it 
is in Motion 5 and we daily fee many parcels of Matter paflc 
from theftate of motion to that ot reft, and from this to that, 
•communicating their motion to Matter that lay ftill before,and 
thereby looting it themfelves. Nor has any Man , that I 
know, fatisfa&orily made out how Matter can moveitfelf: 
And indeed, in the Bodies which we here below converfe with- 
811, we fcarce find that any thing is mov'd but by fomething 
-rife 5 and even in thefe motions of Animals that fecm fponta- 
taeous , the Will or Appetite doth not produce the motion of 
the Animal , but guide and determine that of the Spirits, 
which by the Nerves move the Mufcles, and fo the whole 
Body , as may appear by the wearineffe and unweildinefle of 
Animals, when by much motion the Spirits are fpent. And 
accordingly I find that Anaxaeoras , though he believed, as 
**4riftotU did after him, that Matter was Eternal, yet he dif- 
cern d that the notion of Matter not necefl'arily including mo- 
tion, there was a neceflity of taking ma Mem % as he ftiles 
God, to fee this flaggifh Matter a moving. And I remem- 
ber AriftotU himfelf , in one place of his Metaphyficks , di- 
fputing againft fome of the antienter Philofophers , aske?, * ***** . 
guonamquc modo mwebuntur ft nulla crit aclu Cdufd ? non enim * h) * M ' 1 
jpfdm*tcriafeip[4mmovebi$ A 'K\i % rtKn9i*n rerum ofifcx Virttm 
But though elfewhere I have met with Paflages of his near of 
kin to this, yet he feems not to exprefle his Opinion uniform- 
. ly and clearly enough to engage me to define it or make a 
Weapon of it : And therefore I (hall rather proceed to take 
notice, That according to the Epicurean Hypotbefts, not onely 
the motionjbut the determination of that motion is fuppofed. 
For Epicurus will have his Atoms move downwards , and that i . 

L 2 not 

■ 

• Digitized by Google 



(7*) 

not mi paralel Lines, left they mould never meet to Conftltute 
the World, but according to Lines fomewhat inclining to- 
wards one another-, fothat there mnftbe not onely motion, 
but gravity in Atoms, before there be 3ny Centre of gravity 
for them to move towards-, and they muft move rather down- 
wards then upwards, or fide ways,and in fiich Lines as nothing 
is produc'd capable of confining them to. Which are Aflbm« 
ptions fo bold and precarious, that I finde fome, even of his 
Admirers, to be aftiam'd of them : Which will fave me the la- 
bor of arguing againft them, and allow me to. take notice in 
the feventh place, That this Epicurean Do&rine fuppofcs thar 
a fufficient number of Atoms,and their motion downwards be- 
ing granted, there will need nothing but their fortuitous con- 
cur fe in their fall, to give a Being to all thofe Bodies that 
make up the World. Indeed, that the various coalitions o; 
Atoms, or at leaftfmall Particles of Matter, might have con,, 
flituted the World, had not been perhaps a very abfurd Opv 
nion for a Philofopher, if he had, as Reafon requires, fuppos'i 
that the great Mafsof lazy Matter was Created by God at the 
Beginning, and by Him put into a fwift and various motion, 
whereby it was actually divided intofmall Parts of feveral Si- 
zes and Figures, whofe motion and croffings of each othei 
were fo guided by God, as to conftitute, by their occurfiors 
and coalitions, the great inanimate parts of theUniverfe, a& j 
ftjfct t>m- tne kminal Principles of animated Concretions. And there- 
ww,Ub!i. " fore I wonder not much that the Mihftan Thales ( the firft 
of the Grecian Philofophers fas Cicero informs us) that in- 
quir'd into thefe matters - ) fhould hold that Opinion which 
Tuily exprefles in thefe Words : A<\uam dixit tffe initium re- 
rum^Deum autem earn Mentem qua ex aqua c unci a finxtr at. And 
that oiAndxAgitdSy the fame Author mould give us this ac-. 
Mim ibidtm" count 5 Omnium rerum defcriptionem & modum mentis infinite 
vi ac rat tone dtpgnari & confici voluit : For though 
thefe great Men exceedingly err'd, in thinking it neceflary that 
Godihould be provided ox a pre exiitent, and by him noc 

crea- 

Digitized by Google 



Irr) 

created Matter to make the World of, yec at Ieaft they dif- 
cern'd and acknowledge the neceflity of a Wife rnd Powerful 
Agent to difpofe and fafhion this rude Matter, and conn ive ic 
into fo goodly a Structure, as we behold, without imagining 
with Eficurvs, that chance iliould turn a Chaos into a World. 
And really it is much more unlikely, that fo many admirable 
Creatures that conftitute^jiis one exquifite and ftupendous 
Fabrick of the World fhouW be made by the cafual conflu- 
ence of falling Atoms, juftiing or knocking one another in 
the immenfc vrcuity, then that in a Printers Working- houfe 
a multitude of fmall Letters,being thrown upon the Ground, 
lliould rail difpos'd into fuch an order, as clearly to exhibit the 
Hiftory of the Creation of the World, defcrib'd in the g or 4 
firft Chapters of Genefts^ of which Hiftory, it may be doubts 
ed whether chance may ever be able to difpofe the fallen Let- 
ters into the Words of one Line. I ignore not that fometimes 
odde Figures, and almoll Pictures may be met with, and may 
feem cafually produe'd in Stones, and divers other inanimate 
Bodies: And 1 am fo far from denying this, that I may elfe- 
where have opportunity to mew You,that I have been no care- 
lefle O bferver of fuch Varieties. 

But tuft, even in divers Minerals , as we may fee la That the fignret 
Nitre,Chryftal, and feveral others, the Figures that are admi- Tf^jfir 
red are not unqueftionably produe'd by chance, but perhaps by at 
Something analogous to feminal Principle*, as may appear by pv*W mby 
their uniform regularity in the fame fort of Concretions,and by f 0 ^*%k 
the practice of fomeof theskilfulleft of the Salt peter Men, logout to jmi* 
.who when they have drawn as much Nitre as they can out of the nal rt*<&* 
Nitrous Earth, cart not the Earth away, but preferve it in 
heaps for fix or feven Years* at the jend of which time, they 
find it impregnated with new Salt-peter, produced chiefly 
by the feminal Principle of Nitre implanted in that Earth. To 
prove that Metalline Bodies were not all made at the begin- 
ning of the World , but have fome of them a Power, though 
flowly to propagate their Nature when they meet with a dif- 

Li, ' ppfcd; 

Digitized by Google 



pofeJ Matter* you may find many notable Teftimonies and 
Relations in a little Book of Phyfico-ehymical Queftions y 
Written by J>o\ Conradm Gtrhardns a Germane Do<5h)r,and 
moil of them recited ( together with fome of his own ) by 
the Learned Stnntrtusi But left you fhouid fufpeel: the Nar * 
ratives of tbefe Authors, as fomewhat partial to their Fel- 
low Chymifts Opinions, I (hal| tiere annex that memorable 
Relation which I find recorded by Linfchotttn^ and Garcixs 
ab Horto, a pair of unfufpe&ed Writers in this cafe concerning 
Diamonds, whereby it may appear that the feminal Principles 
of thole precious Stones , as of Plants , are lodg'd in the 
Bowels of the Mine they grow in: Diamonds (fayes the firft, 
in that Chapter of his Travels where he treats of thofe Jew 
els) art digg'dLikt Gold out of Mints ^whort thty dtggd one year 
the length o fa Man into the Ground^ wtthin three or four y tars 
after there are found Diamonds again in the fame flace, which 

s'mpi- h lndii £ r0 " $ ^ re 5 f omt ' m€s fi*** Diamonds of 400 or 800 
n.ifcentiMb,t, Grains. Kjtdamantcs ( fayes the latter) qui altifiime in terra 
WM7« *vt[ctrtb«4,multt(qut annisftrfict debtbant infummoftrefologt- 
mrantur ejr duorum aut trium annornm fpatio ftrficiuntur: Nam 
ft in if fa fedina hoc anno ad cubit i altitudintm fodias Adamant** 
r tf eras. Pofi biennium rurfusWc txcavato tbidem^ invenies 
Adamantts. And next, bow inconfiderable, alafs, are thefe 
fuppofed Productions of Chance, in comparrfon of theela- 
Tbat fa gene- borate Contrivances of Nature in Animals/* fince in the Body 
rdt'm vf Am- 0 t Man,for inftance,of fo many hundred Parts it is made up of, 
"•lyJcZnlf tn€re 1S ^ carce any that can be either left out, or made other- 
the pmduffm ej wife then as it is, or plac'd elfewhere then where it is, without. 
Q>mt. an a pp ar€n t detriment to that curious Engine* fome of whofe 
parts,as the Eye, and the valves of the Veins,would be fo unfit 
for any thing elfe, and are fo fitted for theufes that are made 
of them, that s tis fo far from being likely that fuch skilful 
Contrivances fhouid be made by any Being not intelligent, 
that they require a more then ordinary Intelligence to compre- 
hend how skilfully they are made. 

As 



Digitized by Google 



h9) 

As fot tbeaccount that Lucretim.ovx of Eptwus, <* Tama erg0 quI vldMtj & ^ 
gives us of the firft Produ&ion of Men, in I know ^ft exiihmarc nuiio afiecu 
..ot what Wombs adhering to the Ground and S^^'g*-* 
' which much more becomes him as a Poet, then as m.s fubtiiibui etta-ii concreta 
a Philofopher, I (hall not here wafte time to ma- cUc tama m.racuia ? Nonna 
nifeft its unlikelineffe, that witty Father UtTan. 
tins having allready done that copioufly for me. mLucippum , aac witifle qui 
And indeed itfeems fopureaFiaion,That,wereit Z^Z^^T^ qui 

i l • /* I • i • auditor ejus iuit.vel Epicurum 

not that the Hypothecs he took upon him to main- inqucm vamt as omn,; dc Lu.; 

tain, could fcarce afFordhimany lelTe extravagant tWfaw v^i^iib.i.(.iu 

account of the Original of Animals , the unfuitablenefl'e of , 

this Romance, to thofe excellent Notions with which he has 

enriched divers other parts of his Works, would make me 

::pt to fufpecl, that when he writ this part of his Poem, he 

was in one of the Fits of that Phrenfie , which fome, even of 

his Admirers, fuppofe him to have been put into by a Philtre 

given him by his either Wife, or M™ LnciUi^ in the Intervals 

of which, they fay, that he writ his Books.* 

And here let us further confider , That as confidently as T ha tht Hpoi 
tnany Atomifts, and other Naturalifts, prefumeto know the <f 
true and genuine Caufes of the Things they attempt to expli- [jj^^fe* 
cate, yet very often the utmoft they can attain to in their Ex- Ma; be produced 
plications, is, That the explicated Phanomena May be produe'd *. 
after fuch a Manner as they deliver , but not that they really ** tbat n m " 
are fo: For as an Artificer can fet all the Wheels of a Clock a 
going, as well with Springs as with Weights, and may with 
violence difcharge a Bullet out of the Barrel of a Gun, not 
onely by means of Gunpowder , but of compreffd Air, and 
even of a Spring. So the fame Effects may be produe'd by 
divers Caufes different from one another 5 and it will often- 
times be very difficult, if not impoffible forourdimReafons 
todifcern (orely which of thofe fevcral wayes, whereby it is 
poflible for Nature to produce the fame Phenomena (he has re- 
ally made ufeof to exhibit them. And fure, he that in a skil- 
ful Watch- makers Shop fttfll obferve how many feveral wayes 

•* Watches 

Digitized by Google 



Watches and Clocks may be contriv'd, and yet all of them 
fhew the fame things, and fhall confider how apt an ordinary 
Man,that had never feen the infide bat of one fo> t or Watches, 
would be, to chink that ail thefe are contrived after the fame 
manner, as that whofe Fabrick he has already taken notice of? 
fuch a Perfon; I fay, will farce be backward to think that 
fo admirable an Engineer as Nature, by many pieces of her 
Workmantbip, appears to be, can, by very various and dif- 
fering Contrivances, perform the fame things* and that it is 
a very eafie miftake for Men to conclude, that becaufe an Ef- 
fect may be produe'd by fuch determinate Caafes, it muft be 
fo, ot actually is fo. And as confident as thofe wefpeakof 
ufe to be, of knowing the true and adequate Caufes of Things, 
yet £/>/V»r#f himfelf, as appears by ancient Teftimony , and 
by his own Writings, was more modeft, not onely contenting 
himfelf, on many occafions, to propofe feveral poflible wayes 
whereby a Phenomenon may be accounted for, but fometimes 
Teeming to dill ike the fo pitching upon any one Explication* 
as to exclude and reject all others: And fome Modern Philo* 
fophers that much favor +us Do&rine, do likewife imitate his 
Example, in pretending to aflign not precifely the trae, but 
poflible C3ufes of the Phenomenon they endeavor to explain. 
And I remember, that K^riftotie himfelf (what ever confi- 
dence he fometimes feems to exprefs) does in hisfirft Book 

** concerning many of Na- 
mttftmConhsp' tures Phenomena, he thinks it fufficient that they may befo 
£ c f perform'das he explicates them. But granting that we did 

Zirt CllTiy never fo certainly know in the general that thefe Phenomena of 
tfee Gfifra/ 1>« Nature muft proceed from the Magnitudes, Figures, Moti- 
ciia kMkr ons 5 and thence re ^ ultin g Qualities of Atoms, yet we may be 



very much tofeek as to the particular Caufes ofthisorthat 
particular EfteS or Event : For it is one thing to be able to 
iliew it polTible for fuch and fuch Effects to proceed from the 
Various Magnitudes, Shapes, Motions, and Concretions o£ 
Atoms, and another thing to be able to declare what precile, 





(Bi) 

and determinate Figures, Sizes, and Motions of Atoms, will 
fuffice to make out the proposed fhtnomcna, without incon- 
gruity to any others to be met with in Nature : As it is one 
thing for a Man ignorant of the Mechanicks to make it plaufi- 
ble, that the motions of thetam'd Clock at Stratsburg are 
perform'd by the means of certain Wheels, Springs, and 
Weights, &c- and another to be able to defcribe diftin&Iy, 
the Magnitude, Figures, Proportions, Motions,and (infliort) 
the whole Contrivance either of that admirable Engine, or 
fome other capable to perform the fame things. 

Nay,a Lover of difputmg would proceed farther, and que- 
ftion that way of reafoning, which even the eminenteft Ato- 
mifts are wont to employ to demonftrate that they explicate 
things aright: 

For the grand Argument by which they ufe to confirm the ^J^lf]? 
truth ot their Explications, is, That either the Phenomenon Kw**?»"*/Ji 
muft be explicated after the manner by them fpecified, orelfe h * tmi : 
it cannot at all be explicated intelligibly: la what fenfe we M9t Atml ^ 
dtTallovf not, but rather approve this kind of Ratiocination, 
we may elfewhere tell you. But that which is in this place more 
fit to be reprefented, is, That this way of arguing feems not 
mour prefent cafe fo Cogent, as they that are wont to tmploy 
it think it to be : For beiides that, it is bold to affirm and 
hard to prove that, what they cannot yet explicate by their 
Principles , cannot poflibly be explicated by any other Men, 
or any other Philofophy 5 befide this, I fay, that which 
they would reduce their Adverfaries to.as an Abfurdity, feems 
not to deferve that name: For fuppollng the Argument to be 
conclufive, That either the proposd Explication muft be al- 
low'd, or Men can give none at all that is intelligible, I fee not * 
what abfurdity it were to admit of the confequence For who 
has demonftrated to us, That Men muft be able to explicate 
all Natures phenomena^ efpecially fince divers of them are fo 
abftrufe , that even the Learned'ft Atomifts fcruple not to ac- 
knowledg their being unable to give an account of them. 

M And 

Digitized by Google 



(80 

And how will it be prov'd that the*Omnifcient God , or that 
admirable Contriver, Nature, can exhibit Pb<enom»4 by no 
waves , but fuch as are explicable by the dim Reafon of 
M3o ? 1 fay,Expiicable rather then Inteiligible^became there 
may be things, which though we might under ftand well e- 
nough, if God, or fome more intelligent Being then our own, 
did make it his Work to inform us of them, yet we mould ne- 
ver of our felvcs find out thofe Truths. As an ordinary 
Watch maker may be able to underftand thecurioufeft Con- 
trivance of the skilfulleft Artificer, if this Man take care to 
explain his Engine tohim,but would never have underftood it 
if he had not been taught. Whereas to explicate the Nature 
and Caufes of the ThtnomenAwe are fpeaking of, we muft not 
onely be able to underftand, but to inveftigate them. 

And whereas it is peremptorily infiftedon by fome Epicu- 
reans, who thereby pretend to demonftrate the excellency and 
certainty of their Explications, thn according to them, Na- 
ture is dedar'd to produce things in the way that is moft facile 
and agreeable to our Reafon.* It may be replyed,Th3t what we 
are to enquire after, is, how Things have been , or are really 
produced , not whether or no the manner of their Producti- 
on be fuch, as may the moft eafily be underftood by us: 
Tor if all things were, as thofe we reafon withali maintain, 
cafually produced, there is no reafon to imagine that Chance 
confidered what manner of their Production would be the moft 
eafily intelligible to us. And it God be allowed to be, as in- 
deed he is, the Author of the Umverfe, how will it appear 
that He, whofe Knowledge infinitely tranfcends ours, and who 
may be fuppos'd to operate according to the Dictates of his 
own immenfe Wifdome,fhould,in bis Creating of things,have 
rcfpect to the meafureand eafe of Humane Underftandings, 
and not rather,if of any,of Angelical Intellects,fo that whether 
it be to God, or to Chance, that we afcribe the Production of 
things, that way may often be fitteft or likelyeft for Nature to 
work by^hich is not eaficft tor us to underftand. 

And 



Digitized by Google 



And as for the way of arguing, To often imploy'd (efpecinl- 
ly againft the Truth we now contend for ) and fo much rely 'd 
on by many Modern Philofophers, nimely, That they can- 
not clearly conceive fuch or fuch a thing propos'd, and there- 
fore think it fit to be iejf fled-, I mall readily agree with them 
in the not being forward to aflenttoany thing, efpecially in 
Philofophy, that cannot well be conceiv'd by knowing and 
confidcring Men : But there is fo much difference among 
Men, as to their faculty of framing diftindt Notions of things, 
and through Mens partiality or lazynefle, many a # particuiar 
Perfon is fo much more apt, then thefe Men feem to be aw3re 
of, to think, oratleaft, toptetend, that he cannot conceive, 
what he has no mind to allcnt to, that a nun hid need be wa- 
ry how he rejects Opinions, that are impugn'd onely by this 
way of Ratiocination. By which, I hope, it will not be ex- 
pected that we mould be more prevaiTd with, then that Se& of 
Philofophers that imployestt moft. And among thofe that 
refolve the Phdnometta of Nature into the Mechanical Powers 
of Things, or the various Figures, Sizes and Motions of the 
parts of Matter 5 I meet with fome, as the Epicureans, who 
tells us, They cannot frame a Notion of an Incorporeal SuS- 
ftancc or Spirit, nor conceive how, if the Soul were fuch , it 
could ad upon the Body : And yet others that feem no ieiTe 
fpeculative, fericufly and foiemnly pr jfefle, That they cao 
conceive a clear and diftintfl Notion of a Spirit, which they bc- 
lievenhe humane Soul , that regulates at Jeaft, if not produ- 
ces divers Motions of the Body, to be ; denying on the other 
fide, That it can be clearly conceiv'd, either that any thing 
that is onely material can think, or that there can poflibly be 
any Vacuum (that is, Place without any Body) in the Univerfe* 
both which the Ef icureans profefs themfelves not onely to 
conceive as Poflible,but to believe as True. 

And thus much, Pycfktlus, it may fuffice to bavefaid in 
reUliBn to thofe who would reject God from having any thing 
to do, either in the Production or Government of the World, 

M 2 upon 



(8 4 ) 

flpon this ground, that they, if yoa will believe them, can ex- 
plicate the Original and Phenomena of it without him-, but 'tis 
. not all, nor the greateft part of the Favorers of the Atomical 
Philofopby, that prcfumefo much of them felves, and dero- 
gate fo much from God: To fay therefore fomething to the 
more moderate and judicious of that Perfwafion, we will can- 
didly propofe on their behalf the moft plaufible Objection we 
can forefee againft the Truth we have been all this while plead- 
ing for. They may then thus argue againft us, That though 
the Atomifts cannot fufficiently demonftrate from what Natu- 
ral Cauies every particular Effect proceeds, and fatisfactorily 
rht mofl tiaufi. explicate after what determinate manner each particular Phkno- 
bu erimmt'tftncnon is product yet it may fuffice to take away the necefli- 
7> e ?t ? ^Td^* W °* nav i n S recourfe to a Deity, that they can make out in 
nV c ' general, That all the things that appear in the World, may, 
and muftbeperform'd by meerly corporeal Agents-, or if you 
pleafe, That all Natures Ph enomena, may be produe'd by the 
parcels of the great Mafs ofilniverfal Matter, varioufly 
ftup'd, connected, and mov'd. As a Man that fees a fcrew'd 
Gun (hot off, though he may not be able to defcribe the num- 
ber, bignclTe, fhape and coaptation of all. the Pieces of the 
Lock,Stock, and Barrel, yet he may readily conceive that the 
Effects of the Gun, how wonderful foever they may feem, 
may be perform'd by certain pieces of Steel of Iron, and fome 
parcels or Wood, of Gun powder, and of Lead, all fefhion'd 
and pat together according to theexigency of the Engine, and 
will not doubt, but that they are produe'd by the power of 
fome fuch Mechanical Contrivance of things purely Corpo- 
real, without the afliftance of fpiritual or fupcrnatural A- 
gents. 

In anfwer to this Objection, I muft fn»ft profeffe to yon, 
That I make a great doubt whether there be not fome tfm** 
mena ivi Nature, which the Atomifts cannot fat isfatforily ex- 
plain by any Figuration, Motion, or Connection of material 
Particles whatfoever : For fome Faculties and Operations of 

the 



Digitized by Google 



(85) 

the reafonable Soul in Manure of fo peculiar and tranfcendent 
a kind, that as I have not yet found them folidly explicated 
by corporeal Principles, fo I expect not to fee theminhafle 
made out by fuch. And if a fpiritual Subftance be admitted 
• ro enter theCompofitionofa Man, and to aft by and upon 
his Body | befides that , one of the chief and fundamental 
Doctrines of the Epicureans (namely, That there is nothing in 
the Univerfe but Corpus and Inane /will thereby be fubvertedj 
it will appear that an Incorporeal and Intelligent Being may 
work upon Matter, which would argue, atlcaft apoffibility 
that there may be a Spiritual Deity,and that he may intermed- 
dle with, and have an influence upon the Operations of th-ngs 
Corporeal ; But to infift no longer on this, let us give a fur- 
ther and direct Anfwer to the propos'd Objection,by reprefen- 
ting,That although as things are noweftabiifbed in the World, 
an Atomift were able to explain the Phenomena we meet with, 
by fuppofing the parts of Matter to be of fuch Sizes, and fuch 
Shapes, and to be mov'd after fjich a manner as is agreeable to 
the Nature of the particular th.tnomenon to be thereby exhi- 
bited^ it would not thence neceflarily follow, That at the 
firft produdion of the World, there was no need ofa mod 
powerful and intelligent Being to difpofe that Chaos > or con- 
Jus'd heap of numberlefie Atoms into the World, to eftablifli 
theuniverfaiandconfpiring Harmonie or things s and efpeci- 
ally to connect thofe Atoms into thofe various ftminal Con- 
textures , upon which moft of the more abflrufe Operations, 
and elaborate Productions of Nature appear to depend : For 
• many things may be performed by Matter varioully figured 
and mov'd, which yet would never be performed by it, if it had 
been ft ill left to it felf without being , at firft at leaft, fafliiond 
after fuch a manner, & put into fuch a Motion by an Intelligent 
Agent. As the Quill thaw Philofopher writes with,being dipt in 
Ink 5 and then mov'd after fuch & fuch a manner upon white Pa- 
pcr,ail which are Corporeal Things.or their motions may very 

well. 



Digitized by Google 



(«0 

well trace an excellent and rational Difcourte * but the Quill 
would never have been raov'd after the tequifite manner up- 
on the Paper, h id not its motion been guided and regulated by 
the Underftandmg of the Writer : Or rather, yet once more 
to refume our former Example of the Strdtsbourgh Clock, . 
though a skilful Artift, admitted to examine and confider it, 
both without and within , may very well difcern that fuch 
Wheels, Springs, Weights, and other Pieces of which the 
Engine confifts, being fet together in fuch a coaptation, are 
fufficient to produce fuch and fuch Motions, and fuch other 
Effects as that Clock is celebrated for,yet the more he difcems 
the aptnefs and fufficiency of the parts to produce the ErTedls 
emergent from them, thelcfshe will be apt to faCpeti that fo 
curious an Engine was produe'd by any cafual concurrence of 
the Parts it confifts of, and not rather by the skill of an intel- 
ligent and ingenious Contriver ^ or that the Wheels, and o- 
ther parts, were pf this or that Size, or this or that determi- 
nate Shape, for any other regfoo, th?n btcaufeit pleas'dthe 
Artificer to make themfo-, though thereafon that mov'd the 
Artificer to employ fuch Figures and Quantities, (ooner then 
others, may well befuppos'd to have been, that the Nature of 
his Dcfign made him think them very proper and commodious 
for its accomplifliment, ir not better then any other iuitcd to 
the feveral Exigencies of it. 

If an Epicurean mould be told, that a Man, after having 
been for fomedayes really dead, became alive again, I think it 
will not be doubted, but that he would rejetf fuch a Relation 
asimpotfible, and therefore too tmn-feftly falfe to be belie- 
ved by any Man in his Wits: , And yet,according to his Prin- 
ciples, the Man, as well Soul as Body, confifted onely of 
divers Particles of the Univcrfal Matter, by various Motions 
brought together, and difpos'd after a certain manner : And 
confequently,he muft ground his perfwafion that 'tis impoiTi- 
ble to redintegrate the Engine once fpoil'd by deatb,upon this, 

That 



Digitized by Google 



That as Chance cannot with the Jeaft probability be prefum'd 
to have produc'd Cuch a ftrange Effect; fo according to him, 
there can be no Caufe aflign d, knowing and powerful enough, 
to rally and bring together again the disbanded and fcattered 
parcels or Matter Cor fubftitute other equivalent ones ) that 
together with the remaining Carcafc,corapof'd the dead Man^ 
fo to reunite them to the reft ; and laftly, fo to place and put 
into Motion both the one and the other, as were rcquifite to 
make a living Man once more refult from them. I know that 
this Example reaches not all the Circumftances of theCon- 
troverlle we have been debating-, but yet, if I miftake not, it 
will ferve the turn for which I propofe it: For,not now to in- 
fill upon this inference from it, That a confidering Man may 
confidently reject a thing that is not abfolutely impoflible, 
provided it be highly incredible; not to into* ft on this, I fay, 
the thing I aim at in the mention of it, is onely to (hew* 
That fuch things may polTibly be effected by Matter and 
Motion, as no wife Man will believe to have been produc'd 
by a bare Agitation of the Particles of Matter, not guided 
by the fuperintendency of a Powerful and Knowing Di- 
rector. 

N*ow that the Atoms, or Particles of Matter of which the 
World conlifts, made no agreement with each other to con- 
vene and fettle in the manner requifite to conftitute the Uni- 
verfe, Lucreti/M does not fo properly confefs,as affirm,in that 
fore- cued Paflage where he judicioufly tells us, That 

~— Cert} nej. conftliis FrimordU rentm 
Or dine fe qttdqxe^ dtque fagAci mcnte Ucarunt: 
Nec quo s qutqne ddrent cMotus fefigcre frofeclo^ 

And the thing it felf is manifeft enough, from the Nature 
of Atoms confefledly inanimate and devoid of underftand- 
ing. 

So that although we fliould grant, Pjrophilfts, the poflible 

Emer- 



(83) 

Emergency of the innumerable Effects we admire in the 
World;from the various.Properties and Coalitions of Atoms, 
yet ftill you fee the formeily mention'd difficulty (touching the 
Reiultine of Ail things from Matter left to it lelf) would re- 
cur j and it would as well be incredible that an innumerable 
multitude of infenfible Particles, as that a leffer number 
of bigger Parcels of Matter, mould either confpire to confti* 
tutc , or fortuitously juftle themfelves into fo admirable and 
harmonious a Fabrick as the Univerfe 5 or as the Body of Man$ 
and confequently it is not credible that they mould conftitute 
either, unlefs as their motions were (atleaft, in order to their 
feminal Contextures and primary Coalitions; regulated and 

fuided by an intelligent Contriver and Orderer of things.And 
fliould fo little think it a Difparagement to have but fo much 
faid of any Hjfetheftsoimm^ that I fuppofel may affirm it, 
without offending either the moftfober, or the generality of 
the Atomical Philofophers, to whom, and to their Doctrine, 
my Writings will manifeft me to be no other wife affe&ed then 
I ought* 



ESSAY 



! 



» 

Digitized by Googli 



ESSAY V. 

Wherein the difcourfe interrupted by the late 

T>igrefiion,u re/umed and concluded. j 

IT remains now, Tyrofh: that we at length return into the 
way from whence the foregoing l)igremonhas,Ifear, too 
long diverted us and that to profecutc and finifli our Dif- 
courfe, we take it up where we left it and were tempted to di- , 
grefs, namely ,at the end of the III Ejfay * betwixt which, 
and the beginning of this V, all that has been interpof'd may 
be look'd upon but as along Parenthefis 

In the Third place then 1 confider , That whether or no it be 
true which our Antagonifts fuggeft. that there are forae things 
in Nature which tempt Philotophers more then they doe the 
Vulgar, to doubt or deny a God 5 yet certainly there are di- 
vers things in Nature that do much conduce to the evincing of I*Jf Jj? w 
a Deity , which Naturalifts either alone difcern , or at leaft dif- MtUi&tfe 
cern them better then other Men: For befides the abftrufe conduce much t§ 
Properties of particular Bodies, not difcovcrd by any but o^Sti 
thofe that make particular Enquiries intothofe Bodies, there meijmKkP** 
are many things in Nature, which to a fuperficial Obferver ,#2 t' ^wr<,< ^ ^ • 
fcem to h,we no relation to one another 5 whereas to a know- 
ing Naturalift , that is able to difcern their fecret Correfpon- 
dencics and Alliances , thefe things which feem to be altoge- 
ther Irrelative each to other , appear fo Proportionate and fo 
Harmonious both betwixt themfclves , and in reference to the 
Univerle they are parts or , that they reprefent to him a very 
differing and incomparably better Profpeft then to another 

N Mia 

1 

v * Digitized by Google 



(90) 

txihh'dhuht Man: As he that looks upon a Pi&ure made up of fat- 
t<m.vjrifaof,hf ter'd and deform'd pieces, beholding them united into one 
p2Cc v b y a Cyndrical Looking-glafs aptly plac'd, ditcerns 
l/iio one /".iff by a theskillofthe Artift that drew it , better then he that looks 

ti l '*uf C s alUo '* onel y on tne ** D § le P 3rts °f tnat p i# ure > or u Pon the whole 
*^ f ' Picture, without the uniting Cylinder. Which brings into my 

minde , That whereas in the Sacred Story of the Creation, 
when mention is made of Gods having confider'd the Works 
of each of the firft fix Days, at the end of it, it is faid of the 
Work of every Day , That Gbd Jaw that it was good (except of 
thefecond Day , becaufe the feparation of the Waters was but 
Imperfectly made on that day, and compleated in the nexr, on 
which it is therefore twice faid , That God (aw that it wxs Good) 
whereas . I fay , when God look'd upon his W orks in particu- 
lar, it is onely faid, That he (aw that they were good $ when 
He is introdue'd at the clofe of the Creation, as looking upon, 
and furveying his Creatures in their Harmony , and entire Sy- 
ftem , it is emphatically faid , That he faw every thing that he 
had made , and behold it was very good. And if Artftotle be in- 
deed the Author of the Book De (JHundo ad -Akxandrum y 
which pafies for his , and is faid to have been Written by him 
towards the end of his Life , it would not be unworthy our 
ihjttibmf Obfcrvation to take notice, how he that in his other Wri- 
To$(t?Mi#!h t,n g s * s wont to talk of Gods Intereft in the Creatures darkly, 
cfcribidto An- and hefirantly enough, is wrought upon by the Contemplation 
foil: iruroduttd 0 f t ^ e Univerfe , as it is an orderly Aggregate or Syftem of 
the Works of Nature, to make Expreffions of the Divine 
Architect , which are not unworthy of Arijlotle^ though being 
meerly humane they cannot be worthy of God. Amongft 
many I Hull (ingle out fome 5 and I hope, Pyrophilus, you will 
excufeme, it in this Effay, and fome of the precedent ones , I 
do contrary to my cuftom , employ pretty (tore of Pallages 
taken out of other Authors. For firft , the nature of my De- 
fign makes it requilitc for me to (hew wh it Opinion the Hea- 
zhea Philofophers had of the Study of Phyfioiogy , and what 

Power 



Digitized by Google 



Power their Contemplation of Nature had to engage them to 
Acls of Religion. And next, fince divers of the fame Paf- 
fages wherein they had fet down their Opinions, contain'd alfo 
the Grounds and Reafons of them , whereby they have antici- 
pated much of what we fhould fay upon the fame fubjedts , I 
was unwilling to deprive you of their pertinent Ratiocinations, 
or rob them of the Glory of what they had well Written- 
And this neceflfary Apology premif'd, let us proceed to confi- 
cer his PafTages 5 and firft, Reftat (faycshe)ut fuwmatim dc Arin.de Mum 
Caufa differ amu* , qud cunclarum ipfa rcrum vim habet tutricem do » Ca P«*- 
& continentem^ quemadmodum cater a perftrtnximus : Flagitti 
enim inftar eftet , cum dc mundo diccrc inflituerim , traelattt ft 
minus exquiftto fortafie, at cert c qui fat efj/poftit adformulam 
doftrin* craft tor em^ wtatfam pro-dp nam mundi partem princi- 
• t e P r *terirc. And a little after, Etenim ( fayes hej cunfta- 
ram qu£ rcrum natura complecfitur , cum fcrvator eft Deus, turn ibidem; 
vero qudcunque in hoc mundo quoquomcdo perficiuntur coram 
omnium idem eft Genitor: Non fie tamen'ipfc ut optficis in morem y 
animalify Uftitudincmfcntientis. labor e affici poftt^ut qui ea fa- 
cuitate utatur , qux nulli cedat dtfficultati , cu\us ipfevi facuU 
tat is omnia in pot c (late continet , ncc minus etiam qax longius ab 
ipfo videntur effe fummota: To whjch purpofe he eliewhere EoicmCap} 
lays, Auguffius decenttvffy exiftimanaum cfi,Dcum fummoin 
locotta effe collocatum: Numinu ut tamen e\m vis per univerfum 
mundum pertingem , turn Sclem , Lunam(j { moveat, turn Coelum 
omnc circumagat ^fimulj^caufam prdbeat eorum qu£ in ^terra 
ftunt falutis Atfk incolumttatis: And in the fame Book he adds,W/ Eodcm Ca P- 
vcro fumatim loquamur quoditnavi Gvbernator eft^qnod in Cur- 
7H agitator, quad in Choropraccntor quod den; % lex in Civitate,& 
dux in exercitujjoc Deus eft in mudo. Nifi ft b&cienus intcrefl.quod 
labor >& mctus multiplex illos exercct & curd angunt varid, cum 
huic illaborata fuccedunt omnia^ owns mokjtis cxj>trtia. And 
certainly he that is s ftr *n»er to Anatomyjruii nevor be r.ble to 
difcern in the circulation of the blood 5 ths motion of the Chyle, . 
and the contrivance of all the parts or" a haawne Body , thofe 

N 2 Proofs 

* Digitized by Google 



"(pi) 

Proofs, aswellasEfFe^ofanOmnifcicnt A«u%®-, or Ar- 
tift, which a curious Aaatoraift will difcover in chat elaborate 
and macchlefs Engine: as Iremember,Ihadoccafion not long 
fince to take notice of in thelhapeof thatftrange Mufcle (the 
oftheiim'tabu obturator intemus ) which fome call from its Figure Marfufidis^ 
S^2k5,{£ fervingto the motion of the Thigh. For this Mufcle teems fo 
Mufcu'us Mar- made, as if Nature bad defign'din it, to msnifeft, That me is 
fupxaiis. skiird in the Mechanicks, not onely as a Mathematician that 
underftands the powers of Diftance,Weight, Proportion, Mo- 
tion and Figure * but as an Artificer, or Handy-crafts man, 
who knows by dextrous Contrivances tofurnifh the moreen* 
danger 'd parts of his Work, with what is more ufeful to make 
it lafting: There being (to omit other Obfervables,belonging 
to that Mufcle ) a deep notch mide in the Coxendix^ to ftiorten 
the way betwixt the two extremities of the Mufcle, and malce . 
it bear upon the Bone with a blunter Angle. And becaufe the 
Tendon is long, left, notwithftandingthe former provifion, it 
fhouli be apt to fret out upon the edge of the Bone, Nature 
has proxided for it a Mufculoos, piece of Flefti, wherein it is as 
it were fheath'd , that fo it might not immediately bear, and 
grate upon the Bone; juftas our Artificers ufe to (ow Cafes of 
Leather upon thofe p. rts of filken Strings , which being to 
grate upon harder Bodies, were otherwife endangered to be 
fretted out by Attrition. 

And a like skilfulnefs of Nature in the Mechanical Contri- 
vanot of the Parts, is more Obvioufly difcernable in the Stru- 
sf*mHud. SrtS & ure °f tnat admirable Engine, by wnich fuch variety of other 
Engines are made, the Hand : wtiere ( not to mention the Lijr*- 
jntnium Latum, or Wrift -band , that keeps the Tendons that 
move under it from inconveniently ftarting up upon the Con* 
traftionof therefpective Mufcles ) the won Jerfull perforations 
that are made through the 1 endons of the Mufculi perforati, by 
thofe of the" (JHufcutt perforates , for the more commodious 
motion or the Joyntsor the Fingers, may confpicuoully. ma- 
mfcftihc Mechanical Dexterity of Nutmeias icmay her Hat 

banding 



Digitized by Googl 



(93) 

banding ( if I may fo fpeake ) of her Work, That in a T*i*u 2\lT% c T- 
whil'ft it lies in the Womb, becaufe the Lungs are not to be „^ 0 f tht mm 
difplay'das afterwards, and fothe Blood needs not circulate" *Fxti»*i- 
thorow Them from the right Ventricle of the Heart, into the 
left, for the ufc of Rcfpiration, as it muftin grown Animals, 
flie contrives a nearer way ■, and by certain (hort Pipes, pecu- 
liar to fuch young Creatures, (he more commodioufly per- 
forms in them the Circulation of the Blood, proportion^ to 
their prefent condition % and afterwards, when the Animal is 
brought out of the Womb into the open Air, and put upon 
theconftantexercifeof his Lungs, thefe temporary Conduit- 
pipes little by little van.fh. So careful is Nature not to do things 
in vain. 

And therefore I do not much wonder, thatGMfctf, though 
I remember he fomewhere (unprovokedly and cauielefly e* ofu parcium 
nough) derides cfl/*/w,and feems not over- much inclin'd to™" H > m * s - 
make Religious acknowledgements \ yet when he comes to"' ' C>M ' 0N 
confider particularly the exquifite Structure of a humane Bo- 
dy fliould break forth into very elevated , and even pathetical 
Celebrations of God , and tell us , That in his Books, Cc- Gil «ius,1ib. Jo 
ufuPartitim.ht compof^d Hymns to the Creators praife. And £ c " f " P 1 "' 1 "* 
certainly he that (hall fee a skilful Anatomilt dextroufly dif- 2\)emf^ 
feci that admirable part of Man, the Eye, and (hall confider r«/> 
the curious Contrivance of the ftveral Coats, Humors , and 
other Parts itconfifts of, with all their adaptations and ufes, 
wouidbeeafilyperfwadcd, Thata good Ana tomi ft has much 
ftronger Invitations to believe, and admire an Omnifcient Au- 
thor of Nature , then he trnt neverfawa Diffeclion, efpeci- 
ally if he Oiould feehow all of thefe concurto make up one 
Optical Inftrumenr to convey the Species or the vifible ob- 
ject to the Optick Nerve , and fo to the Brain as 1 have with 
ple3'ure confider'd it , in the recent Eye of a Cat (for with 
keeping , it will grow flaccid) cut cleanly <rff, where the Op- 
tick Nerve enters the Sclerotis y and is going to expand it felt 
into the Retina, ior holding this Eye at a convenient diftanse 

N i betwixt 



Digitized by Gc 



( 94) 

some experL betwixt yours and a Candle , you may fee the Image of a 
muUBo'ftr. Flame lively expreft upon chat part of the back fide of the 
luT**d l *bt Eye at which the Optick Nerve enters the above-mention'd 
ufeofiis pgrtt Sclerous: Something of this kind we hive alfofliowne our 
HmianVty Friends with eyes of dead Men , carefully fever 'd from 
* their heads-, and with the (dexteroufly taken out;ChnthIline 

humor of a Humane Eye , we have often read , as with a 
Lens Magnifying glafs. And to aflift you in fo pleafinga 
fpeculation, as that of the Eye, wefballadde, Thatbyrea- 
fonOx Eyes are much larger, and more eafier to be had then 
Humane ones, wc^are wont to make much life of them, and to 
difcern fomethings better in their Coats, we immerfe them 
for a little while in boy ling Water, and to he able toconfider 
the form and bignefs of the Vitreous and Chryftalline humors, • 
better then the fluidity of the one, and the foftnefs of the o- 
ther are wont to allow Anatomifts to do j we*have fometimes, 
by a way hereafter to be fee down, fpeedily frozen Eyes, and 
tktwntt pre- thereby haveturn'd the Vitreous humor into very numerous 
fsre the E } c< of and Diaphanous Films ( as it were of Ice, and the Chryftalline 
hu' f Tm!(]ni * ntoa ^ rm Subftancc,) but (which perhaps you will wonder at) 
Cbftrvaimta not Tranfparent. An Eye thus frozea, may be cut along that 
ftm. which Optical Writers call the Optica! Axis^nd then it affords 

an inftru&ive Profpcft, which we have not been able to obtain 
any other way. But becaufe, notwithstanding this Expedient 
in the Eyes of Men, and the generality of Tcrreftrial Animals, 
the Opacoufnefs of the Sdcrctis hinders :hc Pictures that out- 
ward Objects funlefs they be lucid ones J make within the Eye 
to be clearly difcern'd. We think our Pelves oblig'd to that ex- 
cellent Mathematician of your Acquaintance, Pjrcphilus, who, 
upon fomeDifcourfc we had w:th him concur niag this Subject, 
lately advif'd us to m ike life of the Eyes of white Rabbets 
( for if thofe animals be of another colour , he fays , their 
Eyes will not prove fo fit for our pilrpofe ) For having held 
fomeof thtfe Eyes at a convenient diftance betwixt my Eyes 
and the Win Jow 3 l found tbem to be fo cranfparent, That the 

r3yes 



Digitized by Google 



raycs proceeding from the Panes of Glafs , Iron Bars, &c, cfsmtpdrtlgkUrt 
the Window, palling through the Chryftalline humor and in jfZ£ 1 %fi£ 
their paflage refracted, did on the Retina exhibit in an inverted arc better the* 
Pofture, according to the Optical Laws , the contracted , but • the,s f« tycr- 
lively Pictures of thofe external Objects 5 and thofe Pictures, zitm ' 
by reafon of the tranfparency of the Sclerotis y became vifible 
through it to my attentive Eyes : As in a darken'd Room the 
fhadows of Objects without it 5 projected on a fine ilicet of 
Paper , may , by reafon of the thinnefs of Paper , be feen 
thorow it by thofe that ftand behind it. By Candle- light we 
could fee little in the bottom of thefe Eyes but lucid Objects, 
fuch as the flame of the Candle , which appear'd tremulous , 
though inverted-, but by Day- light we could manifeftly 
difcern in them both the motions of very neighbouring Ohr t 
jeets, and the more vivid of their colours. 

And really , Pyrophilus, it fems to me not only highly diC- natit 
honourable for a ReafonableSoul to live in fo Divinely built a ^ uhmu- 
Manfion, as the Body (he refides in , altogether unacquainted <puuuettmthtbe 
with the exquifitc Structure ot it 5 but I am confident, it ^'^f'Sf^^j 
a great obftacle to our rendring God the Praifes due to him,for ^ tie™ * 
his having fo excellently lo ig'd us , that we are lb ignorant of M«&m* 
the curious Workmanlliip of the Manfions our Souls live in ; 
for notoriety the Pfalmift, from the confideration of the Di- 
vine Art difplay'd by God, in the moulding and faiflioning his 
!Wy in the Womb , takes a juft occafion to celebrate his Ma- 
ker , I will praife the (fayes he )beeaufe I am fearfully and won- 
derfully made, marvellous are thy works, and that my Soul know- pf a! 
eth right well : CMyfubflancc was not hid from thee, when I w<x 1 s.if. ' 
made in fecret^and curioufly wrought (with as much curiofity as 
Tapftry or Ernbroydery,as the Hebrew Rnkkamtt feems to im- tJ^TtotH 
port J In the lowefi parts of the Earth thine eyes did fee my fub- ?[ilmt$ <*d 
fiance, yet being unperfetf and in thy Book all my members G4fc *- 
mre written , which in continuance were fajhioncd, when as yet 
there were none of them. But even irom Galen biml&lf 
Anatomical Reflections have been able to extort Expreffions 

mm m* m mmM m*m mmu *m . ■ m ~-m m m _j_ f . mmm ^mmMmm • • > * 

Qt 



Digitized by Google 



of Devotion: Cum igitur ffays he) quod in omnibus rette fit- 7 
Galen de f»Uc: omncs ad artcm refer unt , quod autem in uno , aut duobus non ad 
Ifol* Jtrtem y ftd for tun am 7 merttoex nofiri fltutlura corporis licet ad* 
tnirart fummam art em , tquit&tcm rjr vim naturat^qttd nos con* 
Jlruxit. Conflat fiquidem corpus noftrum ex of thus plurtbus 
quam ducentis 5 ad fmgula off a vere pervenit nutriens vena 7 fi* 
cut ad mufculos : cum bacettam arteria,& Ncrvi $ p art aL add- 
rnufitm funt^ & omnino ftmilta tn dextra snimantis parte (it a, its 
qud in altera funt; Os ofst^ Muf cuius mufculo 7 Vena vent, Artt- 
ria arterid^ac Nervus nervo \ idfy excepts .vifceribus s atque 
npnnullis particults qua habere propriam defcriptiontm videntur. 
Dupliccs itafc corporis noflri partes, omnino inter [e [unt fimiles 
& magnitudme & con for mat tone , ficuti & confijlentia quam vo- 
€0 juxta mollitiem^duritiemque differentia. Quemadmodum igi- 
tur de Humanis ffft tfibus judicium faciamuSfCx navt fumma arte 
conflruila cognojeentes perttiam artificis y ita etiam de Divinis 
facere convenit , corporijfy nofrriopificem admirari , quicuflfy 
tandem is Deornm cxtflat, etiamfi turn non videmus 

Perhaps it may be truly faid yet farther , That although in 
humane Bodies , many Wonders,as we have lately mention'd, 
have been difcover'd to us by Anatomy , yet Anatomy it felt 
has not difcover'd to us all the Wonders to be met with in a 
humane Body, nor will deted them, till Anatomifh be skil'd 
in fome other things over and above that of dexteroufly Dif- 
le&ing: For it feems very probable, that the excellent contri- 
vance of fome parts will never be fully apprehended , without 
a competent knowledge of the Nature of thofe Juices that 
are to pafs thorow them , and fome of them recieve their be- 
ginning or fome alteration in them 5 And the Nature of thefe 
Juices will fcarce be exactly known , without fome skill in di- 
vers parts of Phy fiology , and efpecially in Chymiftry. Be- 
fides the reafon of the Origination, Shape, Bulk, Length, 
Progrefs ,and Infertionof each particular Mufcle, can hardly 
be'well accounted for without fome skill in the Principles of 
Mechanicks, and in the nature and properties of Leavers, Pur- 
leys, 



Digitized" by Google 



leys,e?v. Moreover, there is a certain Harmonious Propor- 
tion betwixt the parts of a humane Body, in reference both 
to the whole, and to one another, which is not woot to be 
heeded by Anatomtfts, but much taken notice of by Statuaries 
and Painters : For they reckon, that when a Mans Arms are 
difplay'd , the diftance betwixt his middle Fingers is equaj to 
the height of his Body ; fo they reckon fometimes (even, 
{ometimes eight lengths of theHead,to the length of the Body, 
and four times the length of the Nofe to that of the Head, 
as three times the fame length to that of the Face: And divers 
fuch Obfervations we have met with among them, which we^^J^ 
fhall not now infill on,but rather tell you, That without fame e,,, Cbf jn to be 
skill in Opticks, it will be hard for an Anatomift to (hew the < spheric* 
Wifdome of God in making the Cryftalline humor of the 'j^/* * 
Eyes of Men, oncly of a fomewhat convex or lenticular form, 
rather then as thofe of Fifties of an almoft perfe&ly Spherical 
one (as to the anterior part, which is obverted to the outward 
objects. ) Nor do I remember that in Anatomy Schools I have 
heard any account given of this difference, which yet tends much 
to manifeft the Wifdome of the Author of Nature, who has fo 
excellently fuited the Eyes of Animals to the fcveral parts of 
the Univerfe he defign'd them to inhabit. For Men , and o- 
tber Terrcftrial Animals living in the Air,the Beams of Light, 
reflected from vifible Objects, & falling over the Cornea^ the 
Aqueous humor, do neceflarily fuffer a Refra&ion there, as co- 
ming from the Air,which is a thinner Medium into a thicker, & 
fo there needs the lefs of further Refraction to be made by the 
Chryftalline humor,& confequently its Figure needs to be but 
moderately convex* whereasFirties living conftantly intbcWa- 
ter, the Medium, through which they fee things, is almoft of a 
likethicknefs with the Cornea & Aqueous humor-,fo that there 
being little or no refraction made in theirEyes but by theCry- 
ftalline it felf, it was neceflary that that fliouid be exceedingly 
convex,that it might make a very great Refraflion, & thereby 
unite theBeams nearer at hand; which if theCry ftalline were lefs* 

O convex, 



Digitized by Google 



convex,would tend to a point ofConcourfe bey ondtheJto/VwJ 
and confequently paint on it but a languid and conf us'd Picture 
of the O bjeft they mould reprefent. 

ST «wn7** ^ s ?ArACt tf w * certainly he is injurious to Man, if (as 
titmrufi? fome eminent Chymifts expound him) hecallsManaMicro- 
mige but bis cofm, becaufe his Body is really made up of all the feveral 
kinds of Creatures the Macrocofm or greater World confifts 
iji>.i.Dt yftt of,and fo is but a Model or Epitomy of the Univerfe : For(to 
Firf ' omit that the Antients (as G alien inform us) gave the Title of 
Microcofmes to Animals in general ) 'tis the Glory and Prero- 
gative of Man, that God was pleas'd to make him not after the 
Worlds Image, but His own. On which occailon, give roe 
leave to tell you, That however, the confideration of the dig- 
nity conferr'd on us in the Image of God, ( in whatever that 
That the image Image be refolv'd to confift) fliould, methinks, be fome en* 

Vmiitn T g a § cment t0 QS to look u P on our felm as belonging unto 
utnclmlur us God-, As our Saviour, from the Image of Cdfar ftampt upon 
fetes m btiang. a Coyn, pronouncM it fit to render unto C*hr the things of Ca\~ 
"* t0 °* L far, and to G djhofe of Cod. 

In the fourth place, I confider that the univerfal experience 
of all Ages manifefts, That the contemplation of the World 
has been much more prevalent to make thote that have addict- 
ed the rafelves to it, Believers, then Benyers of a Deity: For 
jrgmtnit from * tl% vcry a pp 3rcnt t h a t the old Philosophers, for the moft part, 
^rim^rf acknowledg e a God, and as evident it is by their want of re- 
tgeuha - tb-coi. velation, by many PafTagcs in their Writings, and by divers 

Tofidhn S* other thin S s not now t0 bc infilled on, That the confideration 
tadMsmo of the works of Nature, was the chief thing that Indue d them 
tefevertm »/ ro acknowledg a Divine Auuthor of them.This Truth I could 
eafily make out, were I at leifure to tranferibe Teftimonies, 
which, becaufe I am not, I mall content my felf to mention to 
you one, which may well ferve for manv,it being a Confeflion 
made by K^friftetle, or whatever other Learned Philofopher it 
wa$,who writ the Book De Mmdo^ That Gods being the Ar* 
chicect and Upholder of the World, was the general belief of 

the 



Digitized by 



(99) 

the Ages that preceded his.7Vf«*(fayes ht)(ermo eft mma]oribus 
fnditmjntcr omnts homines y univer fa turn ex Deo turn perDeum L \y 9 4, Mm . 
const itutafuiffe^dtque coagmentata, nullamque mturam fat is in- do % ca^.g, 
fir net am ad falutem effe po([e,qu* citra Dei prafidium,fua>ipfa de* 
fnumtuteUpermiffa fit: And as for both the Opinion of that e- 
minent Author himfelf,and the Gronnds of it,he fpeaks of God ., . . 
and the Creation almoft in the terms of S< PauLProinde (fayes Ct ^ tt$ cM 
he ; h*c etiam de Deo fentienda nobis funtjUo quidem ,fi vim Jpe- 
Bes % VdlenttQimO) ft decorem, Formofiffimo^ ft vitam Immortati, 
denique ft virluttm Praftantiffimo. gua propter cum fit incon* 
fpicabilis naturdomni interiturd, ipfts nthtlominus ipfe cernitur 
ab optnbus^atque ea quidem q«d acre quoquomodo affect o> qud in 
ttrraflu.t in aqua>ea certe Dei opera tffe merito dtxcrmtu: Dei 
inqntm c per a, cum imperio fummo Mundu ac pro poteftatc obti» 
nentis, Ex quo deo ut tnquit Empedocles Phjftcus. 

Omnia quotquot erunt.quot funt prdfentia.quotquc 
Ortafuere antebac for pes, hominefque fer tque 
lnde etiam volucrc>,ptfcefque humor is \4lumni. 

And thofe few Philofophers (if ever there have been anyac 
all)that have been really Atheifts,are no wayes confiderable for 
their number,in refped of thofe that have afferted a Deity h and 
their Paradoxes have beenlookt upon as fo Irrational , that as 
foonas they have been propos'd, they have been difdainfully 
rejected and condemn'd by all the reft of Man-kind , who 
have look'd upon the Patrons of them as Monfters rather then n>1t thc r epe9?u 
Philofophers. And if there be, at this day,any Nations (as *b, vo&ip net 
Navigators inform us there arein Brafil, and fome other parts ****** 
of the indies) that worfhipno.God, they conflft not of N* tSmsSSm 
turalifts, but Bruit, and Irrational Barbarians, who may be M Athcifms 
fuppos'd rather toignore the Being of God, then deny it* and tfjjto'JZ 
who at lead are little lefle Grangers to the tyly fterigs of Nature, timpht'mof the 
then to the Author of it- And if it be a Truth that there 

O 2 ar$ 



Digitized by Google 



fioo) 

arc reallyfuch Athciftical People, it may ferve to recommend 
to us the Study of Phyfiology, by (hewing us, That with- 
out the help of any fuch innate beliefe, or perfwafion of a God, 
as is fuppos'd connatural to Man, Reafon exercis'd upon the 
Objects the Creation prefents us with, is fufficient to convince 
Philofophers of a Deity ? and indeed fuch a care has God ta- 
ken, to make his Being confpicuous in his Greatures,that they 
all feem loudly and unanimoufly to fpeak to their attentive 
VUhn ioo.f t Confiderers, in the Pfalmifts Language, Know ye that the Lord, 
he is God: 'tis he that hath made us, and not we our f elves : And 
Judg-Mo, as it is faid, That the Stars in their courfes fought again [I Si[era y 
fo it may be truly faid, That not onely the Stars, but all the 
reft of the Creatures do in their courfes fight againft the Athe- 
ifts, by fupplying an unprejudic'd Confideierof them with 
Weapons fit to over -throw his impious Error. To which pur- 
pofe, I remember Ariftotle^ in his Book De Mundo y makes 
ule of a pretty Simile to declare the confpicuoufnefle of the 
C if tf< Creator in his Creatures:!^ « a eft ( fay es he) Phidiam ilium (la- 
taarium, quum Minervam illam qua, eft in Arse, coagmcntaret, 
in medio ejus fcuto facie m fuam expreflijfe, oculofque fa lieu ti ar- 
ttfcio it a devinxiffe ftmulachro^ eximere ut inde iff am fiquis cu* 
A nmpirifa ef fcret, mini me fojjet, aliter quidemcerte, quam ut iffum folveret 
tZttTJt fimulachrum, ofufc e\ufmodt comf affile conf under et 5 Banc c 
utbatofph'di. andem rationem Deus habet in Mundo ut fote qui univtrfcrum 
foM Mimv * ts coagmentauonem coharentem cohtbeat & caartttt , incolumita* 
umque Univerfttatis confervett, Nift quatenus non medio ille loco 
in Terra falicet, uhi Turbida Regio ejl, fed in excetfo fitsss eft, 
fur us iffe in furt locom 

But to declare how Atheifts may be reduc'd cither to con- 
fefs a firft Caufe, or to offer violence to their own Faculties, 
by denying things as certain as thofe, which 'tis apparent that 
(in other cafes) themfelves firmly afTentto, would require a 
Difcourfetpolargetobe proper to be profecuted here; and 
therefore if I have not, in another Treatife, an opportunity of 
infifting on that fubjeft, I jnuft content my fclf to refer you 

for 



Digitized by Gc 



ifioij . 

for further fatis faction on it, to the Writers of Natural Theo- 
logy. 

Nor does Phyfiology barely conduce to make Men believe 
thecxiftenceof a Deity, but admire and celebrate the Perfe- 
ctions of it: • And the nobleft Worfhip from that greater pare 
of the World , to which God did not vouchfafe any expltcite 
and particular Revelation of his Will, hath been paid^im, 
by thofe whom the beauty of this goodly Temple of the Uni- 
▼erfe, tranfported with a rational Wonder at the Wifdome, 
Power, and Goodnefle of the Divine Architect. And this 
kind of Devotion being commonly proportionate to the dis- 
coveries of Nature that begot it, it needs not feem ftrange, 
that divers of the beft Philosophers amongft the Heathens, 
mould be the greateft Celebrators of God: And 'twas there- 
fore perhaps not without caufe that the Indian Gymnofophifts 
the Pcrfian Magi^ the Egyptian Sacrificcrs, and the old Gauls 
Druides, were to their Peoples both Philoibphers and Priefts; 
and that in divers Civiliz'd Nations, Philofophy and Prieft- 
hood were fo ally'd, that thofe whofe Profeffion mould give 
them moft intereft in the definition of Man,made a more ftrict 
proteflTion of celebrating andprfifing God. I might eafily, 
with divers Inftances, manifeft how great a Veneration the 
Study of the Creatures has given Philoiophers, for thofe At- 
tributes of God that are ftamp'd upon them, and confpicuoos 
in them : But my willingnefie to haften to the more Experi- 
mental part of what I have to fay concerning the ufefulnefle of 
Phyfiology, makes me content my felf to prefent you with a 
couple, or a leafti of Authorities , for proof of what has been 
alledg'd* the fir ft (hall beon Galen ^ in his third Book Deu(» 
Tarttum^ where treating of the Skin that inverts the fole of the 
Foot : Cutem ip(am(hyts hc)non laxam^aut fftbtiUm,autynol- 
hm y fedconftrictam> &mediocriitr duram, fen file mque ut non 
facile pater etur {ubdidit pedi fapjentifiintvs Conditor nofter : Cui 
aommentarios hos^ ceu hjmnos quofdam compono, & in eo pitta- 
Urn ejfe exiftimans, non ft 7 aur or urn 1^7^% ci flurimm qutfr 

O 3 fiam 



Digitized by Google 



. (ioi) 

]h?££™* f' tam f acri P €Ari ^ & cafias aliaque fexcenta unguenta fuffumigd- 
pr.i God f »m ritl Sed ft noverim ipfe primus deinde expofuertm alt is qu.tnam 
notVd° l>V ~ e f lt *?f 1fU St ¥* ent **-i 4 U * Virtus, qua Provtdentia, qua Bonitas^ 
Ur Rtv^mtf*^^***** quorum fumma Impictas eft, nonfi a facrificio ah {li- 
bit vritlhas a'tfc ncas. £j*od enim cult a convenient* exornavtt omu'ta, nuh '/ que 

£Sw Jr JJST" ' WM ** X f * % f&fo&ifi*** Bonitatis fpecimcn effe flatuo,In. 
H>ifidJjnf,Pew- veni/jeautem quo pail $ omnia adornarentur fumma Safientt£ eft, 
c,\ani GtoAtttfe at effeciffe omnia qua. voluit Virtutis t(i invicfa. To which II- 

l*/crfiit'r c ^ uftrious Pafla gc he annexes much more, worthy oiGalens 

Pen,and your perufal. 
Tht Ttfkmkt To this let me adde,in the fecond place,that of Hermes Trif~ 
m«?*araccif« mc ^ m ^ almoft at the very beginning of his fir ft Book, 
L. 6 Bawn? Engliftied by D r Everard : He that fhali learn and Study the 
things that are, and how they are ordered and governed, and 
by whom % and for what caufe, or to what end, will acknowledge 
thanks to the Workj man, as to a good Father, an excellent Nurfe, 
and a faithful Steward^ and he that gives Thanks jhaUbe Ptout 
or* Religious , and he that is Religtous jh ill know both where the 
Truth is , and what it is^ and learning that he will be yet more 
and more Religious: To which I cannot but ad ie a refembling 
Paflsge of that great Hermetical Philofopher (as his Followers 
Tmttude Mi- ' ove t0 ca ^ him' Paracetfus: opptdo (layes he) admtrabtlis, in 
ntrdiTrafri. fuis Operibus y Dense fl-^ a quorum contemplation ncc inter diu, 
mc noil* deft fie ndum, fed )ugitur tllorum tndagationi vacandum 
efl, Hoc enim eft ambulare inViis Dei. All which bears witnefle 
to, and may, in exchange, receive Authority from that re- 
markable paffage of that Great and Solid Philofopher, Sir 
Sir ttsnth b> Francis Bacon, who fcruples not fomewhere toarlirm, " That 
Uaminv i ,. lt ls an allured Truth, and a conclufion of Experience, That 
°" ' 'a little or fuperficial tafte of Philofophy, may, perchance, 
incline the minde or a Man to Atheiim, but a full Draught 
thereof, brings the Mind back again to Religion- For in 
the entrance of Philofophy, when the Second Caufes, which 
are next unto the Senfcs, do offer themfelver to the Mind 
of Man, and the Mind it feif cleaves unto them, and dwells 

there, 



Digitized by Google 



there,a forget fulnefs of the Higheft Ca&fe may creep in : Bat 
when a Man paffeth farther, and beholds the Dependency, 
Continuation, and Confederacy of Caoles, and the Works 
of Providence, then according to the Allegory of the Poets, 
hewilleafily believe that the highcft Link of Natures Chain 
muft needs be tyed to the foot off up iters Chair-, or (to fpeak 
oar Chancellors thoughts more Scripturally) That Phyfiolo- 
gy, like Jacobs Villon, difcoversto us a Ladder, whofeTop Gcn «*!» 
reaches up to the foot'fiool of the Throne of Cod : To which he 
defervedly addes. Let no mm, up on a weak conceit of fobriety, 
trill apply ed moderation, think or maintain that a OH an can 
fearch too far, or he too well fludied in the Book of Gods Word, or 
in the Book of Gods Works, Divinity or Philofophy : But nather 
let Men awake themf elves, and chear fully endeavor and Purfue 
awendlefsprogrefsor proficiency in both . onely let them hew art 
lefl they apply Knowledge to Swelling, not to Charity, to oftenta- 
t ion, not to Ufe: K^ind again, That they do not unwifely mingle 
and confound the fe diftincl Learnings of Theology and Philofo* 
phy^and their fever al Waters together. 
, Jn the fifth place, Pyrophilus, I confider, that when the Di- 
vines we are anfwering fuppofe Phyfiology likely to render a 
Man an Atheift, they do it (as hath above been noted already ) 
upon this Ground, That Natural Philofophy may enable him 
to explicate both the regular Ph&nomcn*, and the aberrations 
of Nature, without having recourfe toafirftCaufe or God. 
Butthough this fuppofal were as great a Truth,as we have en- 
deavored to make its a Miftake, yet I fee not why a Studier of 
Phyfiology, though never fo great a Proficient in it, may not 
rationally be an utter Enemy to Atheifm: For the Contem- 4 
plation of the Creatures, is but one of the waves of coming to 
be convine'd that there is a God \ and therefore, though Reli- 
gion were unable to make ufe of the Argument drawn from the 
• Works of Nature, to prove the exiftence of a Deity , yet has 
flic other Arguments enough befides, to keep any Conudcrate 
^ - and 

» 

Digitized by Google 



(7b4) 

mt utiigm and Impartial Man from growing an Atbeift. And here give 
h m«%(fdT ' me leave, for the fake of thefe Divines, to obfervc, That 
tbofediamftom though the Devils be Spirits, not onely extreamly knowing in 
thtmr\tfiff 1 | 1C Properties of Things (by their hidden skill in Phyfiology, 
T«?Myu*t W which they teach Magicians, and their other Clients, to 
dtmg manfiom do divers of the flrange things for which they are admired) But 
Atbafmt. ^fo unrne a(ureably proud, and willing to pervert their know- 
ledge to the cherilhing of Atheifna-, yet S c fames informs us, 
Jara.i.i* Yfrat thej them [elves believe there is a God, and tremble at him-, 
which argnes, either that skill ill Natural Philofophy does not 
necclTarily lead to Atheifm,or that there are other Arguments, 
befides thofe drawn from Science, fufficient to convince the 
moftrefra&ary of the exiftence of a Deity. 

But not to infift on any thing of this nature , nor fo much as 
to mention what proofs the confideration of our own Minds, 
and their in- bred Notions, may afford us of a Deity, I (hall 
content my felf to mind you , That the feveral Patefa&ions 
which God has been pleas'd to make of himfelf, to Man efpe- 
cially, thofe made by feafonably accomplifh'd Proprieties, and 
by Miracles,do not onely demonftrate the Being,but the Pro- 
vidence, and divers of the Attributes of God. *And indeed, 
methinks, the Divines wereafon with may well allow thefe 
Patefa&ions to be capable of et hiring the exiftence of a God, 
fince they arc fufficient, and, for ought I know, the beft Argu- 
ments we have to convince a rational Man of the truth of the 
Chriftian Religion. For the Miracles of Chrift (efpecially his 
Refurreclion) and thofe of his Difciples, by being Works al- 
together fupernatural,oierthrow Atheifm and being owned 
to be done in Gods Name,and to authorize a Doclrine afcrib'd 
to his Infpiration-, his GoodnefTe, and his Wifdome, permit us 
not to believe that he would fuffer fuch numerous, great, and 
uncontrouled Miracles, to be fet as his Seals to a Lie, and de- 
lude Men little lefs then inevitably into the belief of a Doctrine • 
cot true. And as for the Miracles themielves(efpecially that 

of 



f'°5) . 

ofChriftsRefurrection, fomuch, and fo defervedly infifted 
on by Peter to the Jewes, and PauI to the Gentiles) the truth 
of them is fo afcertain'd to us by many of the folemneft, and 
moft authentick waves of Atteftation, whereby the certainty 
of Matters of Fad is capable of being fatisfa&orily made our, 
that 'tis hard to mew how thefe Teftimonics can be deny'd, 
without denying fome acknowledge Principle of Reafon , or 
fome other received Notion, which thefe Contradictors Opi- 
nions or Practice manifeft them to look upon as a truth. And 
upon this accounts fo much might be faid to evince the reafon- 
ableneffe of aflenting to the Chriftian Religion, and to mew, 
that as much may be faid for it, as need be faid for any Reli- 
gion, and much more then can be faid for any other-, that it 
need be no wonder, that, as Learned Men as ever the World 
admir'd, have not onely been many of them Embracers, but 
' fome of them Champions of ir. But having more fully , in ano- 
ther Treatife, difcourf'd of this fubject, I (lull content my 
feif to make this Inference from what has been alledg'd, that 
fince the moft Judicious Propflgners of Chriftianity have 
held and found, that, upon the fcore of Gods miraculous Re- 
velations of himlelf, rational Men might be brought to be- 
lieve the abftrufer Articles of the Chriftian Religion , thofe 
Revelations cannot but be fufficient to convince them of fo 
fundamental and refulgent a Tiuth (which all the others lup- 
pofe) as that of the exiftence of God. 

In the fixth and laft place, I will here adde' (on this occafi- 
on) that an infight into Phyfiological Principles, may very 
nauchaflifta Man to anfwer the Objections or Atheifts,againft 
the Being of a Deity, and the Exceptions they make to the 
Arguments brought to prove that there is one: For though ic 
has long been the cuftome of fuch Men,to talk as if themfelves, 
and thofe of their mind, were not alone the beft, but almoft 
the onely Naturalifts-, and to perplex others with pretending, 
thai, whereas.it is not concciveable how there can be a God, 



Digitized by Google 



all things are by the principles of the Atomical Philofophy, 
made clear and faal. Though this, I fay, have long been ufri 
among the Oppofers of a Deity, yet he that not regarding 
their confidence, mall attentively confider the very firft Prin- 
ciples of things | may plainly enough difcern , that of the 
• Arguments wherewith Natural Philofophy has furnifh'd A- 
thcifts, thofe that are indeed confiderable , are far fewer then 
Wjstthtdifii* one would readily think; and that the difficulty of concei* 
2f? °[ T, cc ' : Vin & tne Eternity , Sclf-exiftence, and fome other Attributes 
(SfexWaut 7 <rf Cod (though that afford thern their grand Objection) 
And oiber attri* proceeds not fo much from any abfurdity belonging to the 
ifuifabent^ N° t!0n of a Deity , as fuch $ as from the difficulty which our 
tJShe Tnfimte dim humane Intellects finde to conceive the nature of thofe 
tumai M-<* 1 ' firft Things ( whatever we fuppofe them) which, to be the 
ming Atmet. Caofes of all others , muft be themfelves without caufe s 
For he that (hall attentively confider, what the Atomifts ' 
themfelves may be compelled to allow concerning the Eterni- 
ty of Matter, theorigine of local Motion (which plainly be- 
longs not to the Nature of Body) the infinity or Bound* 
lefnefs oFfpace, the Divifiblenefs or non-Divifibility of each 
Corporeal Subftance into infinite Material Parts, may clearly 
perceive that the Atomift, by denying that there is a God, 
cannot free his Underftanding from fuch puzling Difficulties 
as he pretends to be the Reafons of his Denyai. Forinftead 
ofoneGodhemuft confefle an infinite number of Atoms 
to be Eternal, Self exiftent, Immortal, Self- moving, and 
muft make fuppofitions, incumbred with Difficulties enough 
to him that has competently accuftomed his Thoughts to 
leave Second Caufes beneath them , and contemplate thofe 
Caufes that have none. But I am unwilling to (well this Eflay, 
by infifting on fuch Confideracions as thefe, efpccially fince 
you may finde them more aptly dedue'd in other Papers,fome 
of which treat of the Truth of Chriftian Religion, and o- 
thers are defign'd for the IUuftrationof fome things in this- 

and 



Digitized by Google 



and the fore going Eflayes. For I muft confefs to you, Pyr*. < 
fhilwt that by reafon of the fundry Avocations, I have been fo 
diverted from piopofing foroe of the Reafons I have employ 'd 
to their beft advantage, that I my felf, at another time, could 
have both menttond them with letter difadvantage, and have 
added divers others : And therefore I have not onely bad 
thoughts of enlarging upon forae PaiTages of our paft Dif- 
courfe, but I long fince made a Collection (though it be not . 
row in my power) of Obfervacions , and .Experiments to elu- 
cidate a Point in one of thofe Difcourfes, whereby may be ener- 
vated one of the three chief Phy fiological Reafonings, that I 
have met with among the Atheifts. 

» * 

Upon confideratioo of all jhe Premifes, I confefs, Py*l 
fbilw, that 1 am inclined to think there may, perhaps , be 
more caufe to apprehend, that the delighcfulnefle of the Stu- 
dy of Phifiology mould too much confine your Thoughts 
and Joyes to the Geatures, then that your Proficiency in 
it mould bring you to dif- believe the Creator: For I 
have obferv'd it to be a fault, incident enough to Ingeni- 
ous Perfons , to let their minds be fo taken up, an J, 3s it 
were , charm'd with that almoft infinite variety of pleafing 
Objects, which Nature prefents to their Contemplation, 
that they too much dif relifli other Pleafures and Employ- 
ments, and are too apt to undervalue even thofe wherewith 
the improv'd Opportunities of ferving God, or holding 
Communion with Hioi, are capable of BlefCog the Pious * 
Soul. 

But, Pfrifhslwi though comparatively to Fame, and Mi- 
ftrefles ,and Baggs*and Bottles, and thofe other tranfient, unfa- 
tisfa&ory , (in a wordjdeluding Objects, on which the greateft 
p t art of miftaken Mortals, fo fondly dote, the entertaining of 
our Nobleft Faculties, with Obje&s fuited to them, and pro- 
per both to gratifie our Curiofity, and to ennch our 

Pa Under- 



Digitized by Google 



(to2) 

undcrftandings,with variety of acceptable and ufefol Notion^ 
affords a fatisfa&ion that very well deferves the choice and 
preferrence of a rational Creature: Yet certainly, Pyr of ki- 
lns y as God is infinitely better then all the things that he has 
a* God u infit made , fo the Knowledge of Him is much better then the 
alVSSaSl knowledge of them* •aodbe that has placVJfo much delighc- 
/• the knowicdg fulnefle in a Knowledge, wherein he allowes his very Enemies 
9fhim is better to b eC ome very great Proficients, has fare refer v'd much 
[JS^feKOM- Higher, and more contenting Pleafurcs to fweeten and endear 
um. thofe Difclofures of Himfelf , which He vouchfafes to none 
but thofe that love Him,and are lov'd by Him. 

And therefore, Pyropbilus, though I will allow you to ex. 
pea from the Contemplation of Nature a greater fatisfaclion, 
then from any thing you need decline for it, yetlwouldnoc 
have you expect from it any fuch fatisfa&ion as you may entire- 
ly acquiefle in, for nothing but the enjoyment of him that 
made the Soul for himfelt can fatisfieit, the Creatures being 
as well Jincapable to afford as a compleat Felicity by our Intel- 
lectual Speculations of them , as by our fenfual Fruitions of 
them*tor though the knowlcdg of Nature be preferrable by 
odds to thofe other Idols which we have mentioned, as inferior 
to it , yet we here attain that knowledge, but very imperfed- 
Tbe tmptrfeft- jy an( j our acquifitions of it coft us fo dear, and the Pleafures 
them is fo allay'd with the difquieting Curioiny they are 
bmm ftkm. wont to excite, that the wifeft of Men,, and greateft of Philo- 
fophers among the Antients, fcruplesnot, upon his own ex - 
Ecckf.i.ih p er j encej t0 C all the addidingof ones heart to feek and fearcb 
cut by Wifdomc , concerning all things that are done under tbt 
Hea ven, a fore travel given by God to the font of Men* to be ex* 
trcis'd (or, as the Original hath it, to afflia tbemfelves) there- 
with: And the fame experiene'd Writer elfewhere tells us, 
EcckHiat; T ij At betbdt encreafes knowlcdg, encreafes forrow. And 'twa£ 
perhaps for this reafon that Adam was form'd out of Para- 
dice,and afterwards by God brought into it, to intimate, That 

Felicity 



zed by 



Felicity is not a thing that Man can acquire for himfelf , but 
muft receive as a free gift from the liberal Hand of God .• And x King C i P .», 
as the Children of the Prophets fought tranflated Elias with 
very great diligence, but with no fuccefle, fo do we as Fruit- 
lefly as Induftrioufly, feek after perfect HappineiTe here, both 
they and we, miffing of what we feek for the fame reafon* be- 
caufe we feek for that onEai th,which is not to be found but in 
Heaven : And this I forewarn you of, Pyropbilus, not at all 
to difcourage you from theftudy of Phyfiology , but to keep 
you from meeting with that great Difcouragement of finding 
in it much lefs of fatisf3&ion then you expecled,and overgreac 
expectation from it, being one of the di fad vantagioufe ft Cir - 
cumftances with which it is poffiblefor any thing to be en- 
joyed. 

But at length, Vyfhilus^ though late, I begin to difcern ior 
to how tedious a digrtflion my zeal for Natural Phiiofophy, 
and for you, has mif-led me, and how it has drawn from my 
Pen fome Paflages, which may feem to relifh more of the 
Preacher, then the Naturahft* yet I might alledge divers 
things to juftifie, or, at lcaft, extenuate what I have done : 
As fuft, That it in making this Excurfion I have en 'd, I have 
not done fo without the Authority of great Examples* fo* 
not only Seneca doth frequently both feafonhis Natural Spe- 
culations with Moral Documents and Refleclions, and owns, 
that he purpoiely does fo, where he faves, Omnibus rebm, cm- 
wfafa [ermcnibm aliauid fahttre mifcendttm eft, cum mm per 
occult* Nature &c. but even Plinj (as far as he was from be- 
ing guilty of over much Devotion; does from divers Paflages 
in his Natural Hiftory, allow himfclf to take occafion to in- 
veigh againft the Luxury, Exceffes, and other Epidemical Vi. 
cesof bis time. And I might next reprefent, that perhaps the 
endeavoring to manifeft, that theknowledg of the Greatures 
fhould, and how it may be referr'd to the Creators Glory, is 
not altogether impertinent to the defign I have of promoting 

P 3 PhyllO" 



Digitized by Google 



(no) 

Phyfiology, for it leems confonant both to Gods Goodaefle, 
n<n» tfeFuiwr and chat repeated Axiome in the Gofpel, which tells us, That 
of God comets he that improves bis Talents togeodufes, fball be tntrufted with 

That the imployiog the little Knowledge I haveinthe 
the fludjafxa* fervice of Him I owe it to, may invite Him to increafe that 
tHrc - little, and make it lefle defpicable. And perhaps it is not the 

lead caufe of our ignorance, in Natural Philofophy it felf, 
that when we ftudy the Great Book of Nature, calTd The 
Univerfe, we confute, perad venture, almoft all other Expo- 
sitors to under ft and its My fleries, without making any addrefc 
for inftrudion to the Author, who yet is juftly ftil'd in the 
Jam.i \f. Scripture, That Father of Lights (in the plural Number)/™** 
tvhem defcends every good and every per fed Gift, not only thofe 
fupernatural Graces, that relate to another World, but thofe 
intellectual Endowments, that qualifie Men for the profperous 
Contemplation or this: And therefore in the Evangelical 
ih.xt.x$,x4. Prophet, he is faid, to inftrud even the Plough- man, and 
teach him the skill and understanding he difplayes in his own 
Profcflion. And though I dare not affirm , with fome of the 
HelmontUns and Paracelftans , that God difclofes to Men the 
Great Myftery of Chyraiftry by Good Angels , or by No- 
cturnal Virions, as he once taught facob, to make Lambs and 
Gca.ii. K^s conQC wto tnc World fpeckled, and ring-ftreaked 5 yec 
perfwadedIam,thatthefavorof Goddoes (much morethen 
moft Men arc aware of ) vouchfafe to promote fome Mens 
Proficiency in the ftudy of Nature, partly by protecting their 
attempts from thofe unlucky Accidents which often make In- 



genuous and Induftrious endeavors mifcarry; and ,'partly by 
making them dear and acceptable to the PoiTeflorsof Secrets, 
by whofe Friendly Communication they may often learn that 
in a few Moments, which coft the Imparters many a Years toyl 
andiludy-, and partly too, or rather principally, by direding 
them to thofe happy and pregnant Hints, which an ordinary 
skill and induftry may fo improve as to do fuch things, and 

make 



Digitized by Go 



(Hi) 

make fucb difcoveriot by virtue of them, as both others, and 
theperfon himfelf, wbofe knowledge is thus encreafed, would 
fcarce have imagin'd to be polfible : And in effetfhthe chiefeft 
of the Secrets that have been communicated to me, the Own- 
ers hate acknowledge to me to have been attain'd, rather, as 
they were pleas'd to fpeak, by accidental Hints, then accurate 
Enquiries.* confeflions of this nature I have divers times met 
with in the Writings of the more Ingenious oftheChymifts, 
and of other Naturalifts, and by one of thefe accidental Hints, 
of lace , the acute and lucky Pecquet was diteAed to find the 
newly difcovcred Laclea Tboracca, as before him Aft Kim 
found without feeking, as himfelf conftffeth, the L*tle*Me- 
[enteric and by an accident too fas himfelf hath told me) did 
our indubious Anatomift, Dxjolive^ firft light upon thofe 
yet more frcflily dcte&ed VelTels, which afterwards the Inge- 
nuous Bartbilinw, without being informed of them, or feek- 
ing for them, hath met with, and acquainted the World with, 
under the name of Vm(a Lymphatic* $ and the two great In- 
ventions of the later Ages ; Gunpowder, and the Loadftones 
refpec* unto the Poles,are iuppos'd to be due rather to Chance, 
then any extraordinary skill in Philofophical Principles (which 
indeed would fcarce have made any Man dream of fuch extra- 
vagant Properties, as thofe of Magnetick Bodies) As if God 
defignd to keep Philofopbers humble, and (though he allow 
regular Induftry, fufficient encouragement, yet ) to remain 
Himfelf difpenfer of the chief My fteries of Nature. 

To what hath been reprefented, Pyrepbilm, Imightaddc 
much more to excufe my Excur fions, it I were not content to 
be beholden to pou for a Pardon , and to invite you to grant it 
me, I mail promife you to be very careful not to repeat the 
like offence* and whereas moft Chymical Writers take occa- 

fion 



(ion from almoft every Difcovery or Procefs they acquaint us 
with, todigrefs and wander into tedious, and too often dull 
and impertinent Theological Reflections or Sermons. I have 
nercafaoftke trouble d you with almoft all that I have to fay (to you J of 
d$Z)!'£lL Theological at once, and I have endeavored to fprinkle it as 
siibjea. far as the fubjecl would allow me, with fome Paflages Experi- 
mental. And indeed I mould not at all have engag d my felf 
into fo long a Difcourfe of the not onely Innocency , but Ufe- 
fulneiTe of the knowledgof Nature , in reference to Religion, 
but that I could not acquiefle in what I had met with on thac 
fubject in any of the Writers 1 have perus'd, Divines being 
commonly too unacquainted with Nature, to be able to ma- 
nage it Phyfiologically enough, and Naturalifts commonly 
efteeming it no part of their work to treat of it at ail. And 
therefore I fcruple not to confefs freely to you, Pjropbilw, 
that, as I fliall think my felf richly rewarded for ail the enfuing 
Effays, if the paft Difcourfe but prove fo happy as to bring 
you to value, and to make the Religious ufe of the Creatures 
recommended to yoft in it: So I had rather any of my Papers 
fhould be palf d by unperufed, then thofe parts of thefe Ellays 
that treat of that ufe.- And indeed 'tis none of the leaft of Sa* 
tisfactions, I hope, to derive from my Phyfical Compofures, 
that by premifing before them the now almoft finiuYd Dif- 
courie,! have done my hearty endeavor to roanifeft and recom- 
mend the true ufe of all the Difcoveries of Nature, which ei- 
ther my Enquiries, or your own, may afford you. And in- 
deed for my part, Pjrofhtlus^ I efteem the Doctrine I have 
been pleading for of that importance , that I am perfwaded, 
That he that could bring Philofophical Devotion into theri- 
queft it Merits, mould contribute as much to*he folemnizing % 
of Gods Praifes, as the Benefactor of Chorifters andFoun-, 
<ters of Chauntries, and not muchleffe then Davids fo cele- 
brated 



Digitized lay Google 



brareddefignationandfett!ement of that Religious Levitical 
Mufick, inltitutcd for the folemn Celebration of God. 

For the fenfible Reprefentations of Gods Attributes to be 
met with in the Creatures, occurring almoft every where to 
our obfervation, would very afliduoufly folicit us to admire 
Him,did we but arightly difcern Him in them : And the Im- 
preflfions made on the Mind by thefe Reprefentations, pro- 
ceeding not from a bare (and perhaps languid) whether Btlicfe 
or Notion of the Perfe&ions expreiT'd in them, but from an 
actual and operative iotuition of them, would excite an admi- 
ration ( with the Devotion fpringing thence ) by fo much the 
more intenfe ? by how muchfit would be) more rational. And 
Cure, Pjropbilw, fo much admirable Workmanmip as God 
hath dilplay'd in the Univerfe, was never meant for Eyes that 
wilfully dofe themfelves, and affront it with the not judging 
it worthy the fpeculating.Beafts inhabit and enjoy the World: 



the Homage we pay for the Priviled ge of Reafon: Which was * 1 ' 
given us, not oncly to refer our felves, but the other Crea- 
tures, that want it, to the Creators Glory. Which makes me 
fometimes angry with them who fo.bufie themfelves in the 
Duties and Imploymcnts of their fecond and fuperinduc*d^»'W*Rri»e 
Relations, that they will never find the leifure to difcharge 55SfS^ 
tha # t Primitive and Natural Obligation, who are more con Gtdtbthmr 
cern'd as Citizens of any place, then of the Worlds and ^ l ^ 9 f t ^ t Cf ^ tHr " 
worfhip God fo barely as Catholick or Proteftants, Anaba- /e"»J'^J»/v- 
ptifts or Socinians, and live fo wholy as Lords or Councel.*«<W Duties. 
lors, Londoners or Pan (tarts, that they will never find the lei- 
fare, or cdnfider not that it concerns them to worfliip and live 
as Men. And the neglect ofthisPhilofophical YYorfhipof 

Q. God, 



Digitized by Google 



Y"4) 

God, for which we are pleading, feems to be culpable in Mefi 
proportionally to their being qualified, and comply with thac 
invitation of the Pfalmift, to fing Praifes to God mth under' 

Pfal.47.7. fiandtng^ or (the Expreffion in the Original being fomewhat 
ambiguous; to ftng to him a learn d Canticle , as he elfewhere 

Pfal.ijci, f peaks, to praife htm according to his excellent Grcatnefs. For 
Knowledge being a gift of God, intrufted to us to glorifie 
the Giver with it, the GreatnetTc of it muft aggravate the neg- 
lect of imploying it gratefully* and thefublimeft Knowledg 
here attainable will not deftroy,but onely heighten and enoble 
our admiration, and will prove the Incenfe or more fpiritual 
and acceptable part, of that Sacrifice of Praife fror thofc re- 
flections which their Nature makes onely acts of Reafon, their 
End may make acts of Piety) wherein the Intelligent Admi- 
rer offers up the whole World in Eucharifts to its Maker. For 
admiration (I do not fay aftoniibment or fur prize; being an ac- 
knowledgment of the Objects tranfcending our Knowledge, 
the learneder the tranfcendent Faculty is, the greater is the ad- 
mired Objects tranfcendency acknowledged : And certainly, 
Gods Wifdome is much lefs glorifi'd by the vulgar aftoniib- 
ment of an unlettered Starer { whole ignorance may be as well 
fufpected for his Wonder , as the excellency of the Object; 
then from their learned Hymns, whofe induftrious Curiofity 
hath brought their underltandings to a proftrate Veneration of 
of wtot their Reafon, not Ignorance, hath taught them not to 
be perfectly comprehend ble by them. 

And as fuch Perfons have fuch piercing Eyes, that where a 
tranfient or unlearned glance fcarce obferves any thing, they 
can difcern an adorable Wifdome, being able (as I may fo 
fpeak) to read the Stenography of Gods omnifcient hand*, fo 
their skilful Fingers know how to choofe, and how to touch 
thofe Strings thac may found fweeteft to the Praife of their 

, Maker 



Digitized by Goo 



C"5) 

Maker: And on the opend Body of the fame Animal, a rhstthtdifa 
skilfai Anatomift will make reflections , as much more to the re h n e t F e "lf e " t 
honor of its Creator, then an ordinary Buccher can; as the i w J^S^£g im 
Mufick made on a Lute, by a rare Lutanift, will be preferable renuk the h<»- 
to the noife made on the fame Inftrument by a Stranger unto T r ^ u the 
Melody. And give me leave to tell you, Pyrophiltts, that 
fuch a reafonable Worihip ( ao^a*?**/* ) of God (to ufe 
S< Paul's Expreflion, though in an other fenfe) is perhaps a Rom.iM? . 
much nobler way of adoring him, then thofe chat are not qua- 
lified to pra&ife it, are aware of, and is not improper even for 
Chrifti3ns to exercife; For Pjrophilus, it would be confidered, f 
TJjat as God hath not by becoming (as the Scripture more Tit^i©! 
then once ft iles him) our Saviour laid by his firft Relation to 
us as our Creator (whence S< Peter exhorts, even the fuffer- ip C t. 4 i 9 ; 
ing Chriftiansofhis time, to commit their Souls to God un- Goib . 
dcr the notion of a Faithful Creator ) fo neither hath he given mint L- 
up his right to thofe Intelligent Adoration^ from us, which aur h « « ot 
become us upon the account of being his rational Creatures; ^/aCn^r. 
neither are fuch performances made lefie acceptable to him by 
the filial relation into which Chrift hath brought us to him, 
that Glorious relation as well endearing to him our fervices as 
our perfons. 

r Andletmeadde, Pyophilus^ that notonely^k* (as we tt*b*kf** 
have fcen already) tells us, That the difcerning ones felf, and 
difcovering toothers the Perfections of God difplay'd in the 
Creatures, is a more acceptable a& of Religion, thenlthe 
burning of Sacrifices or Perfumes upon his Altars-, and not 
onely Trifmegiftut forbidding Afclcpiu* to burn Jncenfe, tells Meme * 
him, That the Thanks and Pratfes of Afen y are the noble fi In- ^ff^? t y ; 
cenfc that can be offered up to God: But God himlelf fin his 
written Word j\% pleaC u to fay , That he that (acrtficeth Praife 

CL* (for 



(u6) 

m cmtuStn. ( *° r *° lis 10 OHg" 1 *!) honor eth him : And the Scriptore 
' confonantly mentions as a very acceptable part of Religious 

tub.ii.tu Worfhip, the Sacrifice of Fraife, and the Calves of our tips: 
By offering up of which, we make that true ufe or the Crea- 
tures, of fo referring them to their Creators Glory, that (to 
conclude this Dilcourfe by Crowning it (as it were) with that 
excellent Circle mentionM by the Apoftle) As all things are 
i if. ofte m% An d Through him f fo they may be To him to whom U 
Clor j for ever Amen. 




THE 



Digitized by 



Googlj : 



f»7> 

. The Citations Englijfid. 

Pag. 24. Seneca deOtio Sap.Cap.ii. 
"NjAture , confcioos to her Self of her own Beauty and 
Artifice, hath given us a curious fearching Wit, and to 

* fo excellent and great fliewes,bega.t us to be Speclar orsiother- 

* wife, flie would have loft the Fruit of her Self, if to a de- 
c f3rt and folitude (he fliould have fet forth fo magnificent , fo 
f famous, fo finely drawn, fo fair and many wayes beautiful 
« Pieces. That you may know (he would not only have them 

* feen, but look'd upon, take notice of the place flie hath given 
f us : For (he hath not onely made Man of an upright Stature, 

* but being fo made, for better Contemplation,that he might 
c follow with his Eye the courfe of the Stars , from the Rifing 
e to the Setting, and carry about his Looks, together with his 
« whole Body, (he hath both given him a tall Head, and placed 
« that upon a flexible Ncck:Then me fliewes fix Conftellations 
1 by Day , and fix by Night 5 She hath laid open every part of 
1 her Self, that by thofe things which flie hath offered to the 
« Eyes of Man , flie might breed a defire of knowing the reft. 
c Yet neither do we fee all her Works, nor thofe that we fee 4 
5 do we fee in thofe Proportions which they truly have:But our 

* Sight, by fearching, docs open a way unto it felf, and lay the 

* grounds of Truth, that fo Inquiry may pafs from things that 
f are plain to things that are obfeure, and find fomewhat more 
c Ancient even then the World it (elf, See Sen. de Vita Bcata± 
tCap.ji. 

6 Pag. 28. What does he that contemplates the Nature of 

* the Univerfe, of honor unto God 5 This, that his great 
I Works are not without a Witncfle. 

jr. 28, 



(n8) 

P. :8. Sen. 7. dt Ird. cdf. 27. 

* Wc are not the caufe of the feafons and returns of Sum- 
4 mer and Winter to the World: Thefe have their own Lawes, 
c accommodated to the Exercife of Divine Beings: We arro- 
gate too much honor to our felves, if weefteem otir felves 

* worthy thatfuchvaft Bodies mould fulfil fuch Motions for 
[ our fakes. 

lb- Ldttdntius de Ird Dei, cap.13. 
c True is the Opinion of the Stoicks, that fay, How that 
€ for our fakes the World was made for all things that are, and 
1 the World doth by it fclf generate, are accommodated to the 
J Advantage of Man. 

• 

lb. seneedde Bene/ c*f-*l* 
c The Gods were not carelefle or unconcern'd in the making 
c of Man, for whom they made fo many other Creatures : For 

* Nature defign'd us, and drew us out in Idea before the made 
*us. 

lb. Cicero 2. Ve NdtiDeorum. 
'And for whofe fake then was the World made? For thofe 
•Beings that have Rcafon and Intelligence viz, Gods and 
; Men,thcn whom no Being is more excellent. 

P. 43, Pifo in Medici ft d Brafil: Lib.f. 

* It is obfervable, That (o many excellent Trees, Shrubs, 
'and an innumerable company of Herbs, fome few excepted , 

* lhould all appear fo unlike the Vegetables of the Antiently 

* known World, both in Figure, Leaf, and Fruits : And the 
« fame Obfervation is made of Birds, Beafts, and Fillies* and of 
' Infe&s both Flying and Creeping, which are monftroufly. 

numerous, 



Digitized by Googl 



c numeroi]5,and of unfpeakable Beauty in Colour, fome known 

* to us,and fome unknown. 

P. 47. Pi ft, ib. "You can fcarce determine, whether in 
4 thefe Countries there are found more Poifons or Anti- 
dotes: The Leaves, Flowers, and Fruits of the Herbs 
c Tanearack and fuquer 9 the two m oft potent Venoms of 
( Brafil , each of thefe hath its proper Root for an oppo- 
4 fite Antidote The Barbarians apply the Fat and Heads 
4 of Vipers, and the whole Bodies of thofe Infers, prepared 
•according to Art, that ftung or (tuck any Perfon,and that 
' with boldnefle, and happy fuccefle, to the Wounds made 
■ by thera, and Co by the effe&s do attempt to prove, That 
\ in every Venom its own Antidote is contained. 

P;4p. Pifcib: 
c From the Root M A ndihoca > that abounds with a very po- 
c tent Poifon, there is made not onely excellent Aliment, but 
c even Antidote too. 

P. 50. Ex Augujlino. 
c You ought not to ufe your Eyes as a Bruit , onely to take 

* notice of Provifions for your Belly, and not for your Mind: 
« life them as a Man : Pry up into Heaven : See the things 

* made, and enquire the Maker : Look upon thole things you 

* can fee, and feek after Him whom you cannot fee, and believe 

* on Him you cannot fee,becaufe of thofe things you fee : And 
I be not like the Horfe and Mule f rjrc 

P.75. Epicurus in Efift: ad Htrtd.in Laerth. 
c As to the Meteors , you ought not to believe that there 
J is either Motion , or Change, or Ecclipfe , or the rife or 

fetting ( 



Digitized by Google 



Tag. 77. driflot.Mctjph. I i.e. 6. 
c How (hall things be mov'd if there be no actual caufe; For 
4 Matter cannot move it felf , bat requires to be mov'd by a 
*TtttoniC thing- creating Power. 

P. 78. Ciceroni* dt Thalete. 
J * He faid,. Water was the Principle of all things, but God 

* was that Intelligence * that made all things out of Water : 

* Ejufdem dc An&xAgtrk'. The delineation and manner of all 

* things he thought to be defign'd and made by the power and 
f reafon of an infinite Intelligence. 

J\ 80. Csrcias ab Horto^LA. fwp c.+J. 
< Diamonds, which ought to be brought to perfection in the 

* deepeft Bowels of the Earth , and in a long tract of Time, 

* are aim oft at the top of the Ground , and in three or four 
f Years fpace made perfect : For if you dig this Year but the 
c depth of a Cubit.you will find Diamonds ^and after two Years 
I dig therejou will find Diamonds again* 

P. 9 5. thrift: de Mundo y cap.6. 
c It remains that we fpeak briefly concerning that Caufe, 
f whofe Power preferves and fup ports all things, in like man- 

* ner, as we have compendioufly handled other matt crs : For 
f it would feem criminal to pafs over the chief part of the 
•World untouched, having defign'd to difcourfeof theUni- 
4 verfe in a Treatife, which, if lefle accurate, yet certainly may 
J be fufficient for a rough platform of Doctrine. 

ibid, 

i For God is both the Preferver of all things contained in 

* the Univerfe, and iikewife the Producer ot every thing 

* whatfoever which is any wife made in this World : Yet not 

* foastobefenfibleof labour, after the manner ofaWork- 
« man, or a Creature, which is fubject to wearineffe-, for he is 

1 f indued with a power which is inferior to no difficulty, and 

R 'whereby 



Digitized by Google 



C124) 

c whereby he contains all things under his authority, evenfuch 
c as feem mod diftant from hira. 

* c Tis more magnificent ajid agreeable to conceive God, fb 
'refident in the Higheft Place , that never theleflc his Divine 

* Energy being diffus'd throughout the whole World, moves 
1 both the Sun and Moon, turns round the whole Globe of 

* Heaven, and affords the caufes of Safety and Prelervationof 
' fuch things as are upon the Earth. 

c But to fura up all in brief 5 what the Pilot is in a Ship$ 

* what the Driver in a Chariot; what the chief Singer is in a 
'Dance: finally, what Magiftracy is in a Commonwealth, 
c and the General in an Army, That is God in the World: 

* Unlefle there be this difference, That much toil and manifold 
'cares perplex tbcm-,but all things are performed by God with- 
'out labour or trouble. 

?>9%.GAlen.dt PUc:Hipp:& Plat: Lib.7. 
* Whereas therefore (faith he) all Men afcribe that to Arr^ 

* which is made aright in all refpedts 5 but that which is fo only 
'in one or two, not to Art, but Fortune: The ftru&urc of 
•our Body gives us caufe to admire the excellent Art , exa&« 
1 nefTe and power of Nature which fram'd us^ For our Body 
'confifts of above Two hundred Bones $ to each of which 
•tends a Vein for conveying of nourifliment ( in like manner 

* as to the Mufcles ) which is accompanied with an Artery and 

* a Nerve-, and the parts are exactly pairs , and thofe plac'd 
c in the right fide of an Animal , are wholly alike to thofe in 
'the other, Bone to Bone, Mufcle toMufcle, Vein to Vfin, 
c Artery to Artery, and Nerve to Nerve - y excepting onely 
c the Bowels, and fome other parts, which feem to have a pe- 
culiar conftruSion. So that the parts of our Body are 
•double, and altogether alike among themfelves, both in 
'greatneflcandfliape, as alfo in confiftence, which I place in 



Digitized by 



* the diverfity of foftnefle and hardnefle. As therefore we ufe 
, c to judg of things made by Men, acknowledging the skill 

« of a Work-man,by the building of a Ship with extraordinary 
Art ; foalfo it behoveth to do in thofe of God, and to admire 
theFramer of our Body , whofoeverof the Gods he were, al- 
though we do not fee Him. 

/.loi. Arift: de Mundo t Caf >6. 
. c Tis an ancient Tradition ( faith he) diffused amongft all 
.« Mankind from our Anctftors, Th3t all things were made 
« and produced of God, and by God-, and that no Nature can 

* be fufficiently furnifh'd for its pwn fafety, which is left with- 
out the fupport of God, to its own protection, 

' P. Bad: 

1 Thus therefore we ought to conceive of God-, If we con- 
*fider His Power , He is Omnipotent-, if His Shape, mod 
f Beautiful-, if His Life, Immortal-, and finally, if His Vir- 

* tue, molt Excellent. Wherefore though undifcernable by 

* any corruptible Nature, yet He is percerv'd by fuch , in 
f His Works * and indeed thofe things which are pro- 
« duc'd in the Air, by any mutation whatsoever, in the Earth,or 
c in the Water, we ought defervedly to term the Works of 
God; which God is the abfoluteand foveraign Lord of the 
k World,and out of whom(as faith Empcdocles the Naturaltftj 

At things beginning have, which e're Jhal/ be % 
Art prefent or to come, Plants ^Men and Be a (Is, 
K^ind Fowl, and Ftjh the offering of the Sea. 

rag, 102. Arifl.de Mundo, Cap. 6. 
c Ti* reported, That when Phidias, the excellent Statu jry, 
c made the Image of Minerva, which is in the Caftle at A- 
'thcns* he coutriv'd his own P.#are in the middle of her 

R 2 '(lucid, 



Digitized by Google 



(tz6) 

€ Shield, and feftned the Eyes of it to the Statue by fo conning 

• Workraanfhip , that if any one were minded to take it away, 
1 he could jiot do it without breaking the Statue, and diforder- 
c ing the connexion of the Work. After the fame manner is 

• God in the World, retaining and upholding the coherence 
c of all things, and preterving the fafety of the Univerfe: 
1 Onely ,He is not in the midft of it (namely the Earth)which is 

* a turbulent Region, but in the higheft place, which isfutable 
' to His Purity. 

P» 103,104. GdlendeUfufartium. 
' Our moft wife Creator hath plac'd under the Foot a skier, 
'not loofe, or thin, or foft , but clofe, and of indifferent 
1 hardnefleand fenfe,to the end it might not eafily fufFer injury. 
1 To Him I compofe thefe Commentaries as certain Hymns, 
c efteeming Piety not to confift in Sacrificing many Hecatombs 
•of Oxen to Him , or burning Caffia, and a thoufand other 

* Perfumes-, but in this, firft to know my fclf, and then to 

• declare to others, what His Wifdome, Power, Providence 
'andGoodnefsis: the ignorance of which, not the abftaining 
c from Sacrifice, is the greateft Impiety. For I account it an 
4 evidence of moft perfo5t goodnefle, that He hath furnifli'd all 
'things with convenient ornament, and deny 'd His benefits 
' to none. Now , to have devis'd how all things might be 
'handfomlyfram'd, is the part of higheft Wifdome* but to 
'have made all things which he would, of infuperable Power. 

P. 1 04. Paracclfus de Mineral: Trait. 1 . . 
c God is very admirable in His Works-, from the Contem- 
'plation of which we ought not to defift Night or Day, bat 

* continually be imploy'd in the inquifition of them. For this 
' is to wdk in the rvayes of God. 

The 

- 



Digitized by 



it b 

The INDEX to the Fhlt Part. 



ESSAY I. 

Of tbetlfefulnefle of Experimental 
philofophy, principally as it re« 
late« to che Mind of Man. 

THe reafon why the Author endea- 
vors to pojftffe Pyrophilus with 
the true value of Experimental 
Phylofophy. i 
That Experimental Fhilofophy it con. 
duciveto the improving of man's Vnderftan. 
dmg^and to the increasing of mans power, z 
Arguments to prove that Mans Curio- 
ftty for Knowledge much thereby gratified. 

ibid. 

A relation of the tranfport and furprifal 
cfa Maid born blind; when being about 1 8 
years old fht oh fined the frfi fight of theva* 
riouiObjeth thisWorld prejented her with.$ 

That the lencwledg ofthtinwad Arc hi- 
ttelure and contrivances of Nature is more 
dJightful tkn the fight of the outward 
Jhapes. 4 



Examples and lnftanccs of the prevalence Loadfione. 



The Opinions that Setb Abraham,Sok)i 
rron, Ovi4 had of man's fitnefjefr the flu- 
ty °f Aftronomy t and other Phyfivlogy. \ i 
Why rr evidence might deprive us of So- 
lomons Phyfi log. ib # 
Of the delight that may arife from the va+ 
riety of ObjtUs * hichNature produceth. iz 
7 hat there be above 6000 Subjects of 
the Vegetable Kingdoms ib. 

Of an excellent Jamaica Pepper newly 
brought over. . ib. 

Of diverfe fmgle fub':et~ls that require 
large Treat ifes to unfold them. 13. 

How many T natifes are already made of 
Antimony, which yet hath not bten perfect 1 1] 
dij "covered. 13 
Of a real Mercury «f Antimony. 14. and 
a reall combuftible Sulphur of Antimony, 
/ hat burns like ordinary Brimflone * 14 
A mw Tincltire of Antimtnial Glajje, 
with the entire proa fje to draw it. 1 q 
Of Gilbcrius, Cabcus, and Kircher, who 
[ucajfively writ the Experiment of the 



ofthe pie afure that aril es from the attain- 
ment of Kncwledg. 4 

That the knowledg of the moji curious 
Artificial works is nut more delightful then 
the knowledg of Natural. 5 . That the de 
light herein is altogi thcr inojfenfive. 6 

Infiances^f the Efteem diverfe ancient 
Philofoplnrs had for it. 6, 7/ How this 
fiudy con0s Kith Religion, 8 

The abfurdity of not impldfkg humane 
faculties on the ccntcmplatnn »f thofe Ob* 
jells to which the J are fitted. 9. Jlluftra- 
tedbj the pmilitude of a Spider in a Palace, 
taking notice of nothing be fides her own. Cob- 
Web. 10 



Offome new Experiment j hitherto undtf* 
cover d of that Stone. ib. 

That admirable f peculations may arife 
from the moft dtf pic able productions of Na- 
ture. 16,17 
What ever God has thought northyof ma* 
king , man fhould not think, unworthy of 
knowing. . 1^*9. 

Of the Dominion and Power that Ph)fio- s 
logy gives the prof per Q m fiudiers of it 20,21 

ESSAY- II. 
Of the fame. 

That tlx Kmwlcdg of Nature excite* 
and chtrifha Vtvotion. 22. The 

' Digitized by Google 



The 1 N D EX. 



The Ends of God's Crettion, his o*» 
Glory. 22 23 

That Mans Good is a fecond End, pro* 
vedby Serif ture. 24. The fame proved 
by Reafon and authority. * 25, 26,27 

How the Sun £Sheme(h]<a the great mi- 
nlfierofthe Vniverfe. 26. 

That accommodation and delight which 
the Cnatures might afford Man is much 
impaired by the want of Natural Philofo- 
fbk. 28 

That the inftrnftions to our IntelUclual 
fart are more confiderable thin the accom- 
modations we have from Natnre to our A- 
nimal part. ib. 

Of the Hints ef Natural Phiiofophyin 
the Hiflorj of the Creation, and other refe- 
rences to tt in other plac ts. 2 9, 3 0. 

How Go£s Vower ts confptcuoui in the 
Creatures. 31,32,33. How God s wjf- 
dome is confpicuom in them. ib. 

Varticular Obfervations of the ftrufture 
if Humane Body. 3 4- 

Of the eyes and feet of Molts. 3 5 

Of the Sill{'Wirme.l6. That it worktth 
b) lnflinll and not bj Imitation. 36, 37. 

Of the vaflntfjeoftlx Elephant,- and its 
difproportion to th: «&ei , and fuch likf 
Mites. ' 38,39- 

Of the vafineffe of the Whale, and its dif* 
proportion to the fmall Worms or FifhiS late, 
iy difcover d in Vin ger. 4 9, 4 1 . 

How God's Gooun fje is confpicuom in hU 
Creatures, by his provijim if accemmodati* 
ens for them all, but efpuially for his Faze 
rite, Man. 4243,44 

Of the unknown and new detttled Vrope*- 
ties and Vertues of dtverfe Concretes. 44. 

Of the Peruvian Bark, comma ly called 
the Jeluits Powder, of tin Vfe ofVaranych. : a 



other Concretes obftrvM for their unknown 
Properties. " 45. 

Of th: ufe of divtrfe noxious Concretes, 
and that thy contein their own Antidotes. 

Of that Excellent Weft-Indian Hoot 
Mandihoca. 47. 

How we are by the Creatures inftrucltd 
to Devotion* 48 . 49, 5 0. 

ESSAY. III. 
Containing a continuation of the fame. 

That their Opinion who would detcrre 
men from the fcrutiny of Nature tends to 
defeat God of much of that Glory lAanJiould 
afcribe unto him. 5 1 , 5 2, 5 3 

That Philofophers of all Religions have 
cenfidered the World under the noti:n of 
Cod'sTemple. 54 

That in this Temple Man mufi be the 
Prieft. 55,56. 

The contemplation of Gods mercy ought 
not foto ingroffc our thoughts, as to make us 
negltd the Glory of his Power and Wifdcme. 

57 

That the fludy of Phyfiohgy is not apt to 
make men Atbeifis.tf. Prov'd further from 
the ancient Inflitution of the Sabbath. 5 9. 

That Phyftology cannot explicate by fecond 
caufes all the Phenomena of Nature ,fo as to 
exclude the fit fi. 61. Prov'd by the In- 
fiance of the unknown nature of Mercury, 
&c* 62. 
ESSAY. Ill I. 
Containing a require DigreiTion con- 
cerning thole who would exclude 
the Vcay from intermedling 
wiih Matter. 
That fome of the Peripatetick Seel art 
entity of this t»dfav ur, 63. That their 

64 
That 



fol. rutacto in the Kings evil, and of diverfe Hypotkfis is very fiM of misUk. s t 

Digitized by Google 



The INDEX: 



That the fe excluders of the Deity ma\e 
but imperfect explications of /fo Phenomena 
of Nature, ib. And do ni t explain t he Scale 
of Caufes to the lafl Caufe. 6$. 

Instances of things when in their account 
it net fatisfaclory. 66. as I. In the particu* 
iars, the caufes of which the) ajfton Occult 
Qualities, ib. Z.whcn they afjign Nature's 
abhorremy of Vacuity to be the cauff that 
Water doth afcend in Suction, ib. whereas 
the contrary is proved in the Suction of 
guick-fslver. 67. 3, When they affign the 
caufes of the Purgitiones Mcnftruac.67,68. 
And when in other cafes thy afcribt toir- 
rational Creatures fuch attions as in men 
awe tlx prodssflion of reafon and Choice. 68 

The Author s conceit concerning God*s 
Creation of the parts of the Wor\d,and fo pla. 
ring them, that they {by the ajfijtance of his 
ordinary concourfe) muft needs exhibit theft 
F ha?nomena.6 9. Illuft rated by the Cloc^at 
Scratsburg. ib. 

How far fuch borrowed and }A(taphorical 
Phrafes } which Cuftome has authorised, way 
be u fed. 70 



£uickr fiver being heavier then Stones, parts of the Hand. 



flnw that an tfc& may be produced by fuch 
a caufe, not that it mutt. 79 
That to a perfect Kncwlcdg there tfiuft 
not only appear the pojjib/e, but the definite 
an J real^ot only the genial, but the parties 
/ar caufes. 80. 

Si me defers in the waies of Reafoning ufed 
by the mop eminent Atomifts. 8 1,82,8 3. 

The rr.eft planfble argument of the Oppo* 
fers of a Deity conftdered. 84.8 5 ,8 6 ,8 75 

ESSAY. V. 
Wherein the Difcourfe interrupted by 
the late Digreilion is returned 
and concluded^ 

That there are fome things in Naturl 
which conduce much to the evincing of 4 
Deity, which are onely known to Natursh 
lifts. 8 9 Explained by the com par if on of the 
Vniting f cotter d pieces of Paint into one 
face by a Cylindrical Lioltjng Glafs. 90. 
The Tcflimoni of the Author of the Bool(Dc 
Mundo afcribed to Ariftotle introduced, ib. 

Of the admirable contrivance of the Afaly 
of the Mufculus Marfupialit. 92. and of tlx 

ib. 



they fwim the*eon,yct jincl^in lighter liquors 

70. 

That the Inflances of the Aclions of divers 
Creatures refembling Reafon commend the 
Wifedome of God. 7 1 , 7 2 . 

D felts in the Explication of Nature by 
the Epicureans , whodiny the concurrence of 
Cod. 73,7475.76- 
That the figures in Nitre, Chryttal, and 
divers Minerals are produced not by chance, 
but by fomewhat Analogous to fminal prin- 
ciple s. * 77 
Thstt the Generation of Animals is much lefje 



to be accounted the production of Chance. 7 8 
That the Hypothcfes of Philofophy only 



Th e contrivance f>r the Circulation of the 
Bloudin 4Fcetus b'efort the ufe of Refpira* 
tion. 93 
Galen's Sptech, That his Becky De Ufa 
Part ium were as Hrmns to the Creator, ib. 
The Fabrtck^of the Eye confide red* ib." 
Some Exptrtmental Obfervations of the 
Eye,and the ufe of its parts in order to Vifton. 

94- 

Jhe way to prepare the Eyes of Animals for 
the better making Obfervations on them. ib. 

S me particulars wherein the Eyes of 
white Rabbas are better then others for Ob* 
fervation, 95 
That it is difbonourablt for the Soul to be 

unacquainted 



Digitized by Google 



The INDEX. 

Ur.acqUAir.tti with the tx^mfite ftruilure of\ enoxoh to typ Any confidering man from A- 
the Bod) \being its twn Mdnfton.9^ Proved theijm. 104 
ourof Injlanccs in the Pfalmill And Galen-ib. j That the Difficulty of conceiving the E- 
Whj the anterior fart of Fifhes Eyes tcrmtj,Self'Exi(tence, And other Attributes 
ought to be more Spherical thtn ihofe of men. of one God, islejfe then to conceive infinite, 

97 tttrnAl, felf-txislent, And [elf moving A* 
ThAt God made Man not After the Worlds tomes. 1 06. 



lma«e>but his Own. 



98 



ThAt the ImAge of God on us (hould en- 
gage us to tftcem our {elves as belonging to 
God. ib. 

Arguments from Authority \and the Ex- 
perience of all Ages , That the Contempla- 
tion of the World has adajHed Man to the Re- 
verence of God. 98. 

ThAt thofe People who worjhif not. God, 
r stre not Naturalifts but BAtbariArts,And thAt 
their Atheifme doth continue for runt of the 
ContempUtion of the World. 99- 
A companfon of the ImAge of God on t he 
Creature, to thAt of Phidias on Minerva's 
'Shield. 100. 

The noble fi worjkip thAt has been paid to 
God from fuch who have not hah particular 
Revelation of his will, has Arofefrom the fpt* 
cuUtion of God's Wifdome,Vower, And Good- 
neffe in the fabrickjfthe Creature 1 03 . The 
Teftimonits of Galen, Hermes, Paraielfus, 
LBacon. 102. 

That Religion has other Arguments be- 
f$des thofe drawn from the works cf Nature, 



As God is infinitely better then aU his 
Creatures , fo the Knowledg of him is better 
then the Knowledg of his CreAtures. 1 08 
The Imperfection andDifetuiet that thtre 
is in humane Science. 1 08 , 1 09. 

How the Favour of God conduces to pro- 
mote mens Proficiency in the ftttdy cf Naturt 

no. 

The Reafon of the Authors fo long D>/- 
courfe on this Sub jell. 1X2 
BeAfis inhAbit And enjoy the World, 'tit 
MAtfs,d*ty to SpirituAlUe it. 1 1 3 

ThAt it being the prime Duty of Man t$ 
give God the Honour of his CreAtures , it it 
to be preferrd before jecondary Duties, ib.- 
ThAt the different gre At neffe in the Know» t 
ledg make a like difference in the Honour gh 
ven to the CreAtor. 115. 

God\by becoming our Saviour Jh as not laid 
Afide the Relation of a Creator. ib. 

ThAt he who fAcrificeth VrAife. honoureth 
God. ib. 
The Conclufion. 116. 



zed £y Google 



OF THE 

VSEFVLNESSE 

OF 

Natural Philofophyy 



The Second Part. 



Thefirft Section. 
Of its V/efulne/s to THMC^. 



Digitized by Google 



» 



i »* 



Digitized by Google 




(3) 
ESSAY I. 

Containing fome Particulars tending to fan* 
■ the Vfefulnefi of Natural 'Vbilofopbj to 
the Theological part of Thyfick. 

Fter having , in the former part of this Trea- 
tife , Pjropbilus , thus largely endeavoured 
to manifeft to you the advantageoufnefle of 
Naturall Philofophy to the mind of M ad, 
we (hall now proceed to fpeake of its Ufe- 
fulnefle, both to his Body and Fortune. For 
I rauft ingenioufly confefle to you , Ty- 
pbtlus, That I mould not have neer fc» high a value as I now 
cherim for Phyfiology, if I thought it could onely teach a 
Man to difcourfe of Nature, but not at all to matter Her-, 
and fervcd onely, withplealing SpecuL;tionj*to tnteitaine his 
UnderftjnJin^ without at all incrtafingtt Power. And 
though I prefume not to judge of other Mens knowledge: 
yet, for my owne particular, I (hail not dare to thinke my felfe 
a true Naturalift, till my skill can make my Garden yecld bet- 
ter Herbs and Flowers, or my Orchard better Fruit, or my 
Field better Corne,or my Dairy better Cheefe than theirs 
that are ftrangers to Phyfiology. And certainly, Pjrofhiltu, 
if we ferioufly intend to convince the diftruftfuli World of the 
reall ufefulnefle of Natural! Philofophy, we muft take fome 
fach courfe, as that Milt fun Tbalesdid, who was by the An ti- 




The advanagc 
of the know- 
ledge of nature 
towards (He in- 
crcafing the 
power of Man; 
and its ufe a** to 
health of the 
Bodt& Goodi 
of foitune. 



a 2 



ents 



Digitized by Google 



U) 

cms reckoned among the very firft of their Naturalifts , and 
their feven celebrated Wife-men : Of this TkdUs it is reported, 
That beiog upbraidingly demanded what advantage the Pro. 
feflbrs of Aftrology could derive from the knowledge of it 5 he 
Aftrologically forefeeing what a Yeare it would prove for O- 
JivcSjberore any wonted fignes of it did appear to Husbandmen, 
Ingrofled , by giving earncft , the greater part or the Olives, 
which the next Seafon (hould afford to Chios and Miletus^ And 
being thereby enable J^vhen mod Men wanted Oyle,to fell his 
at his owne rates, he made advantage enough of his skill, to let 
his friends fee, That Philofophers may have theacquidtionof 
Wealth more in their power than in their aime. 
That in m % ^ e t ^* n ' tc$ 9 lt mould be a difparagement to a Philofopher, 
knowledge <t when he defcends to confidcr Husbandry, not to be able , with 
the nature of all his Science, to improve the precepts of an Art, refulting 

§PS^S!i ^ rom the lame and unlearncd Obfervations and Pradiceof 
cvctihcm. ' (uch illiterate perfons as Gardeners, Plow- men, and Milk- 
maids. And indeed, Pyrophilus^ though it be but too evi- 
dent, that the barren Philofophy , wont to be taught in the 
Schooles , hath hitherto beene found of very little ufe in hu- 
mane life; yet if the true principles of that fertill Science 
were thoroughly knowne , confider'd and apply'd , 'tis fcarce 
imaginable, hoWgUniverfall and advantageous a change they 
would make irwOfe world For in Mans knowledge ot the na- 
ture of the Creatures, doth principally confift his Empire over 
them , ( his Knowledge and his power having generally the 
fame limits. J And as the Nerves, that move the whole 
Body, and by it, that great variety of Engines imployed by 
Man on his manifold occasions, proceed from the Braine*fo 
all the operations, by which we alter Nature and produce fuch 
changes in the Creatures , flow from our knowledge of them. 
Theological 1 • inquiries excepted , there is no Imploymehc 
Mankind is fo much and fo generally concerned , as 



v. 

(s) 

'tis in the ftady of Naturall Philofophy . And thofc great 
Tranfa&ions which make fuch a noife in the World , and efta- 
blilb Monarchies or mine Empires, reach not to fo many per- 
fons with their influences do the Theories of Phyfiology. 

To manif eft this Truth , we need butconfider, whatchan- That the Mcoi 
ges in the Face of things have beene made by two Difcoveries, JJJ 
trivial) enough * the one being but of the inclination of the to the know- 
Needle, touched by the Load* (lone, to point toward the jj^V* ths 
Pole* the other being but acafual Difcoveryof thefuppofed i^f c/ , onCJpofl 
antipathy between Salt- peter and Brim ft one: For without 
the knowledge of the former , thofe vaft Regions of Ame» 
rica, and all the Treafures of Gold, Silver , and Precious 
Stones, and much more Precious Simples they fend us, would 
have probably continued undetected $ And the latter giving That d* Mar- 
an occafiooall rife to the invention of Gun powder, hath quite J^J^JS 
altered theconditioaof Martiall affaires over the World, both were altered by 
by Sea and Land. And certainly, true Naturall Philofophy $ c th |^ Ict!8C 
is fo far from being a barren fpeculative Knowledge,that Phy- BrimfonHnl 
fick, Husbandry, and very many Trades (as thofe of Tan- Sakptte* 
ners, Dyers, Brewers, Founders, ejre.) are but Corollaries or * 
Applications of fome few Theorems of it. cianbTmff- 

If I had not a great refpe& for the Great Hippocrates, I tike of that" 
fliouid venture to fay. That fome of thofe rigid Lawes of Draco fl** 
(whofe feverity made Men fay, That they were written in mZTto'lLd 
Blood) have, perhaps, coft fewer perfons their lives, then *7 miimif- 
that one Aphonlme of Hippocrates, which teaching, 7 hat if a ^£j h, £ 9 
teeming Woman be let Bloody fhe will mi [carry, has for divers cms.' ^ pai ' 
Ages prevailed with great numbers of Phymians, to fuffcr " Hi fP- A $»> 
multitudes of their Female patients to die under their hands, i'^s '.w* 
who might probably have been refcued by a difcreet Pblebo- °», fAiciV 
tomy, which experience hath allured us ( whatever the clofe of fSS? 
* the Aphorifme fayes to the contrary) to have been fometimes 
notonely fafely, but ufefully employed, even when the Infant 

a 3 is cpt,f ' 



Digitized by Google 



(6) 

is grown pretty bigge. But my refpe& for fo great a Perfon as 
Hippocrates, makes me content it mould be thought.Thac till 
of late, Phyfitians have for the moft part miftaken their Dila- 
tors meaning in this Aphorifme , provjded it be granted me, 
That through this miftake numbers of teeming Women have 
been fuffered to perifli, who might probably, by the feafonable 
iofs of fome of their Blood,have prevented that of their Lives. 

And if an Error, which occafioned onely a fault of omiflt- 
on, hath been fo prejudicial! to Man-kinde, I fuppofe you will 
readily grant that thofe Errors of Phyfitians, that are apt to 
produce faults of commiffion, and rafh attempts, may prove 
much more hurtfull. And fo much I finde to be acknowledged 
by Galen , in that honeft and excellent paflage of his, in his 
jTTtb T Comment upon the Aphorifmes, where having mentioned the 
danger of trying conclufions upon Men, by reafon of the no- 
blenefle of theSubjeft; and having added, That the Phyfi- 
tians Art is not like that of a Potter, a Carpenter , or the like, 
where a Man may freely try what he pleafes to gratifie his cu. 
rioflty, or fatisfte himfelfe about his Notions, beeaufe that if 
he fpoyles(for inftancej the Wood he workes on,no Body is in* 
dangered by his mifcarriage : He thas concludes , Incorpore 
Autcm Hum Ant ca tentire^ud non funt e xperientium comprob at a 
fericulo non vac At $ cum temerarU experientid finis fit totiut 
KsinimAntis internrcio. 
Thcintcrcft of And indeed, fince the Phyfirbn borrows his Principles of 
to th/h?'*- 62 Naturalift, 1 cannot but fomewhat admire to fee diverfe 
neife and Tic P c, *f°n s > wno a re by themfelves and others thought fuch wife 
of Man. Mm, thinke the ftudy ofNaturall Philofophy of fmall con* 
cernment : for when by their Policy or good Fortune they 
have acquired never fo much Wealth or Power, and all other 
tranfetory Goods, and are bleft with Children to inherit them, 
if the Principles of Natural Philofophy be mif-laid , we often- 
times fee the ignorance or the railhke of a Doctor , deprive 

them 



Digitized by Google 



(7) 

• 

them of all at once , and fliew how dangerous it is to be foi- 
licitous of the means of attaining the accommodations of Life, 
with the contempt of that Knowledge which in very many 
cafes is humanely neceffary to the prefervation of Life it felf. 

But, Pyropbilut, though our unintended prolixity in the 
former part of our Difcourfe concerning the Uftfulnefs or 
Phyfiology, oblige us to the greater brevity ia this latter 
part of it? yet to fliew you, That of the two things, which 
you may remember we told you Pytbagor** pronounced moft 
God-like in Man ( The Knowledge of Truth , and the Doing of 
Good) Phyfiology as well qualifies us for thelatter, as itin- 
riches us with the former. It will not be amifs a little more 
particularly ( though as fuccin&ly as fo copious a Subject will 
permit ) to confider the probability there is that no fmall Im- 
provement may be made by Mens proficiency in Experimen- 
tal Knowledge of thofe Arts which are the cbiefeft Inftru- The <nu 
mentsof Mans dominion over the Creatures. Thefe Arts tionofthofe " 
( to divide them not accurately, but popularly) do ferve either Am to which 
to relieve Mans neceffities , as Phyfick and Husbandry * or jJXe iiwos. 
for his accommodation, as the Trades of Shoo- makers, Diers, tabic. * 
Tanners, &o. or for bis delight, as the Trades of Painters, 
Confectioners, Perfumers, rjre. to all which Arts, and many 
others ally 'd to them , Philosophical Experiments and Ob- 
fervattons , may , by a knowing Naturalift , be made to ex- 
tend a meliorating Influence. 

If I mould , fyofhiim , fay this , without offering any 
thing at all by way of Proof that I fay it not inconfiderately, 
You would, I fear, believe, that I deliver it too (lightly for a 
Matter of that Moment .• And if, on the other fide , I mould The method 
in this Difcourfe prefent to you all the particulars that i think ««g j™ cn - 
I could without Impertinency , employ to countenance what fofogAfcoS! 
I have raid, it would fwell this Treatife to a Volumn, and de- 
fraud divers of my other Effays. And therefore I hold it not 

unfit 



Digitized by Google 



unfit to choofe a middle way, and fee down, on this occafion^ 
either only or chiefly thofe things which do the moft readily 
occur to me, and do not fo properly belong to the reft of my 
Phyfiological Papers. And to avoid Contufion, Khali, ac- 
cording to the Divifion newly propofed, employ one Se&ion 
. of this fecond part of the prefent Treatife , in fettmg down 
fuch things as relate to the improvement of Phyfick . And in 
the other Section , deliver fuch particulars as concern thofe 
other ufeful Arts that depend upon Natural Philolophy. But 
in regard that (as I have already intimated) the following Dif- . 
courfe is toconfift chiefly of thofe things that belong not to 
any of my other Effays , Yon will not , I prefume, expect 
that I mould handle any fubjeel fully or Merhodically on this 
occafion: Which warning I efpecially intend for that part of 
the enfuing Difcourfe that relates to Phyfick. For you will 
eafily believe, that I am far from pretending to be a DoSor- 
in that Faculty : And accordingly, in this and the four follow- 
ing Effays, I (hall only throw together divers foch particulars 
as not belonging to my Writings . would, perhaps be loft,i£ 
J did not lay hold on this Opportunity for their prefervation , 
of which they are not altogether judged unworthy by fome 
knowing Men , wbofe encouragements, to mention them to 
you, have diffwaded me from wholly parting by, in this Dif- 
courfe Matters properly Medical , what fcruples foever I had 
to venture at fpeaking of them, Efpecially lince 1 have not 
now the Conveniency to furnifli thefe Effays with divers par- 
ticulars (by fome thought not inconfiderable ) which I may, 
perhaps be invited to. add to them hereafter, if I finde by your 
Reception of thefe that the others are like to be welcome. 
The divifion of To fay fomething then of Phyfick, and to fuppofe the fit- 
K ck in fiYC nc fr °f tDe now received divifion of it into five parts: The 
Phyfiologicall (the Phyfitian taking thatinaftri&er fenfethan 
Pbiiofophers, and then we do every where, fa vc ia this Effay) 

Patholo- 



' Digitized by Google 



(9) 

Pathological, SemeioticaJ, Hygieina!, and Therapeutical let 
us briefly take notice how each of thefe is indebted 10 , or ca- 
pable of being improved by experience Naturalifts. And in- ♦ 
deed, fuch is the affinity between Natural Philofophy and 
Phyfick, orthedependanceof this on that, that we need not am /»* 
wonder at the judicious Obfervation of Ariflctle, where he fi4*& /«. 
thus writes, Natnralhm fere flurimis & Medico am , qui f*** 1 ' 
mdgis tkilofopbtce art cm prcfequuntur , iUi qutdem finiuntad u L M 
ea.qutdeMft-, hivcro u rik qutde Natural incipiunt t?±$' t 
qud deMcdtctna. Brt we muft mftance thefe things more par- <* i 'McE >s 

Phyfician takes much of his Doctrine mtnat part of his Art <*n aruralPh i 
from the Naturalift : And to mention now no other parts of lofo P l, y- 
Phyflology ,in its ftrifcer acception,the experience of our own 
age may fuffice to manifeft,what light the Anatomical do&rine 
ot Mans Body may receive from Experiments made on other That the 
iubjtct. For lince it were too barbarous, and too great a vi- Antwmicti 
olationoftheLaws, not only of Divinity but Humanitv 
to difled humane Bodies alive,as did Hertphilm and ErMrl IZl^ 
tut, who (as I nndein fomeofthe Ancients) obtained of fr < m ex P cri. 
Kings the Bodies of MalefcSors for that purpofe, and fcru- ZZ™L 
pled not to deitroy Man to know him And fince,neverthe- lur «. 
lefle divers things in Anatomy , as particularly the motion of 
ihe Blood and Chyle cannot be difcoveied in a dead difle&cd 
Bodyf where the cold hath fhut up and obliterated many Paf- 
fages) that may be feen in one opened alive $ it muft be very P x k A 
advantageous to a Phyficians Anatomical knowledge, to fee t£ul££ t 
the Difleclions of Dogs, Swine, and other live Creatures asofthc fi~*- 
made by an inquifitive Naturalift : Confonantly whereunt o 2tdi™ 
we may remember, that the difcoveries of the milky Veflels to 
in the Mefentery by of thofe in the Thorax by £ r * 5t bodic " 

Pecquet, and of the Vdfa Lymphatic* by Bartholin™, were fit ft 
made in Brute Bodies , though afterwards found to hold in 

humane 



Digitized by Google 



(TO) 

humane ones. Nor is it a fmall convenience to the Anato^ 
mift, that he may in the Bodies of Braces make divers inftra- 
• ftivc Experiments , that he dares not venture on in thofe of 
Men-, as for inftance, that late noble , and by nuny not yet 
credited Experiment of taking out the Spleen of a Dog with- 
out killing him: For that this Experiment may be very ufeful, 
we may elfewhere have occafion to ihew. And that it is pofifi- 
ble to be fafely made ( though many, I cpnfefs, have but un- 
profperoufly attempted it, and it hath bejalarely pronounced 
impoflible in Print; our felves can witnelfcftnd becaufe I have 
not yet met with any Author that profefles himfeltnot to re- 
late this Experiment (of the exemption of a Dogs Spleen) 
upon the credit of others , but as an eye- witnefs * I am con- 
tent to aflure you , That that dextrous Difleclor , Y><$ olive 
The EwerL ( °* wnom we formerly made mention ) did the Lift Year, at 
ncntoftak^ my requeft, take out the Spleen of a young Setting-dog I 
in K out ihc brought him : And that it might not be pretended, the Expe- 
l^jgs? l ° riment was unfaithfully or favourably made 5 I did part of it my 
felf,and held the Spleen (which was the large ft in proportion 
to his Body that ever I fawj in my Hand, whilft he cut a fun. 
der the Vefl'els, reaching to it, that I might be fure there was 
not the lead part of the Spleen left unextirpated, and yet this 
Puppy, inleflfethena Fortnight, grew not only well, but as 
fportive and as wanton as before : which I need not take pains 
to make you believe , fince you often faw him at your Mo- 
thers Houfe, whence at length he was (loin. And though I 
Tfcc f amc remember the famous Emperick FitrAVdntijn one of his It a* 
th ng done by lun Books, mentions his having been prevailed with by the 
tWootn! m ^tnportUQity of a Lady ( whom he calls lMayhIU Green ) much 
affli&ed with Spienetick diftempers, to rid her of her Spleen; 
and adds, That (he out-lived the lofs of it divers Years. Yet 
he that confiders the (ituation of that part, and the confider- 
ablenefs of the Veffels belonging to it in humane Bodies, will 

probably 



Digitized by Google 



. ( IX >> 

probably be apt to think, that thoogh his relation may be 
credited, his venturoufneiTe ought not to be imitated. The The re^rni. 
Experiment alfo of detaining Frogs under Water for very « <* £j*B» 
many hours ( fometimes amounting to fome dayes; without (o^m^* 9 
fuffocation, may, to him that knows that Frogs have Lungs ^yc*, under 
and Breath as well as other Terreftrial Animals, appear a con- jggg*^ 
# fiderable difcovery, in order to the determining the Nature of atl0 °' 
Refpiration. Befides, the fcrupuloufneflfe of the Parents or 
Friends of the deccafed Perfons, deprives us oftentimes of 
the Opportunities of Anatomizing the Bodies of men, and 
much more thofe of Women, whereas thofe of Beafts are 
almoft a Iwayes and every where to be met with. And 'twas, 
perhaps, upon fome fuch account, that Artjlotle faid that the 
external parts of the Body were beft known in Men, the inter, 
nal ia Beafts, Sunt enim (fayes*he, fpeakingof the inward */ r W- 
parts ) homtnum mfrimis incert*. ttque tncogntt* : quamobrcm ^* 4 
ad caterer urn ammtltum fdrtes if u Arum fimiles funt hum*** re- 
fcrentes ess contemflari debemus. And queftionitfs in many 
of them , the frame of the parts is fo like that of thofe an. 
fwerable in men, that he that is but moderately skili'd in An- 
• dratomy (as fome of the Moderns call the Diflcclioirof Mans 
Body, to diftmguifh it from Zootomy, as they name the Dif- 
fedions of the Bodies of other Animals; may , with due dili- ZT^tcu 
genceandmduftry,notdefpicably , improve his Anatomical m«de of 
knowledge. In confirmation of which truth , give me leave t Ionj 
to obferve to you, That though Galen hath left to us fo ma- 
ny, and by Phy ficians fo 'much magnified Anatomical Trea- 
tifes , yet not only divers of thofe Modern Phy ficians , that 
would edipfe his Glory, denv him to have learn d the skill he 
pretends to, outoftheinfpe<3ionof the Differed Bodies of 
Men or Women, or fo much as to ever have feen a humane 
Anatomy. But I findeeven among his Admirers , Phyfici- 
ans that acknowledge that his Knives were much morecon- 

b 2 verfant 



Digitized by Google 



(12) 

verfant with the Bodies of Apes, and other Brutes, then with 
Anatomy of tho(e of Men, which in his time thofe Authors fay 'twas 
Mm counted thought little lefs then Irreligious, if not Barbarous, to man* 
now in M*f- gj c . wn i c h , s tne l e fTc to be wondred at , becaafe even in this 
"unci And the our Age, that great People of the Mufcovites, though a 
ufe °i sk v s 'i Chriftian and European Nation , hath deny'd Phyficians the 
craft." N u ^ c °* Anatomy and Skeletons •, the former, as an inhumane 
thing; the latter , as fit for little but Witchcraft, as we are* 
informed by the applauded Writer olearius, Secretary to the 
Embafly lately fent by that Learned Prince, the prefent Duke 
&7uU9v?e & °^ H°tf cine > i nco aM$ft§via) and Perfia. And of this , the 
tie Tel™ & me Author gives us the inftance of one ,2»/r/>, an excellent 
us. German Chyrurgion, who, for having been found with a 

Skeleton, had much adoe to fcape with his Life,and was com- 
manded to go out of the Kingdome , leaving behind him his 
Skeleton,wnich was alfo dragged about,and afterwards burnt.* 
Theufe of the To thefe things we may adde, -Fyrapkifus, that the dili- 
comparifon of eence of Zootomies may much contribute to illuftrate the 
h* p n rt Bod E> oC ^ r * ne °f ^"dr atomy, and both inform Phyficians of the 
Jith\"hofc ol true ufe of the parts of a humane Body, and help to decide 
Beaft»j divers Anatomical Controverfies. For as in general 'tis fcarce 
poffiblc to learn the true Nature of any Creature , from the 
confederation of the (ingle Creature it felf:fo particularly of di- 

uiuftratcd by vers P arts °^ a Dumane B°dy verv difficult to learn the true 
U.tcts particus ufe, without confulting the Bodies of other Animals,wtterein 
jar ob^cTvati, lDe p art inquired after is by Nature either wholly left out as 
needlefs.or wherein its differing bignefs,or fituation,or figure, 
or connection with,and relation to other parts, may render its 
nfe moreconfpicuous, or at lead more difcernable. 

This Truth may be fomewhat illuftrated by the following 
Obfervations , which ar prefent offer, themfelves to my 
thoughts upon this occafion. 
The Lungs of Vipers , and other Creatures ( whole Hearts 

and 



Digitized by Google 



and whofc Blood, even whii'ft it circulates, we have al waves 
found, as to fenfe, actually cold; may give us juft occafion to 
inquire a little more warily whether the great ufc of Refpira- 
cion be to cool the Heart. 

The fuddain falling and continuing together, which we may 
obferve inrhat part at leaft of a Dogs Lungs, that is on the 
fame fide with the Wound , upon making a large Wound in 
his Cheft, though the Lungs remain untouched , is a confi- 
• derable Experiment, in order to the difcovery of the principal 
Organ of Refpirationi 

If you dexteroufly take out the Hearts of Vipers, and of 
forae fmallcr Fifties, whofecoldnefs makes them beat much 
more unfrequently and leifurely , then thofe of warm Ani- 
mals , the contraction and relaxation of the Fibres of the 
Heart may be diftin&ly obferved , in order to the deciding or 
reconciling the Controverfie about the caufe and manner of 
the Hearts motion , betwixt thofe Learned modern Anato* 
mifts, that contend,fome of them, for Dr. Harvey's Opinion * 
and others, for that of the CarteGans. 

Towards fatisfying my (elf in which difficulty, I remem- 
ber, I have foraetimes taken the Heart of a Fiownder , and 
having cut it tranfverfly into two parts, and prefs'd out , and 
with a Linnen cloth wip'd off the Flood contained in each of 
them, I obferv'd, thatfora confiderablefpace of time, the 
fever'd and bloodlefs parts held on their former contraction 
and relaxation. And once I remember that I obferved, not 
without .Wonder, That the fever'd portions of a Flownders 
Heart, did not only , after their Blood was drain'd, move as 
before, but the whole Heart, obferv'd for a pretty while, fucrt 
a fuccefllon of motion in its divided and exfanguious pieces, as 
I had taken notice of in them whilft they were coherent , and 
as you may with pleafure both fee and feel in the intirc Heart 
of the feme Fi/h. 

Some 



f 14; 

Some of the other C ontrovei fies agitated among Anato- 
mifts and Phi lofophers, concerning the ufe of the Heart, and 
concerning the principal feat of Life and Senfe , may alfo re- 
ceive light from fome fuch Experiments, that we made m the 
Divers moti Bodies or " Brutes, as we could not of Men. 
or^and Aa'i". And the flrft of tbefe that we {hall mention, fli 3 1 1 be an Ex- 
ens of Frog$; ptrimenr that we remember our (elves formerly to have made 
hearti were u P on F f0 g $ : For having opened one of them al 1 ve, and care- 
cue out. fully cut out his Heart, without doting up the Orifice of the * 
Wound ( which we had made wider then was neccflary ) the 
Frog notwithstanding leaped up and down the Room as be- 
fore , dragging his Entrals ( that hung out ) after him 1 and 
when he reft ed, would upon a puncture leap again , and being 
put into the Water, would fwim, whilft I felt his Heart beat* 
ing betwixt my Fingers. The Hearts of others of them were 
taken out at an Inciiton, no greater then was requifite for that 
purpofe 5 when we had ditched or pin'd up the Wound , we 
pbferved them to leap more frequently and vigoroufly then 
the former : They would, as before they were hurt, clofe and 
open their Eve- lids upon occafion : Being put into a Vcffel 
not full of Water, they would as orderly difplay their fore 
and hinder Legs in the manner requifite to fwimming, as if 
they wanted none of their parts , efpecially not their Hearts ; 
they would reft themfclves fometimes upon the furface of the 
Water, fometimes at the bottom of it, and fometimes alfo 
they would nirobly leap, flrft out of the VelTel , and then 
about the Room, furviving the exfe&ion of their Hearts * 
fome about an hour , and fome longer. And that which was 
further remarkable in this Experiment, wa<, that we could, 
by gently preflfmg their Breft and Belly with our Fingers , 
make them almoft at pleafure make fuch a noife,as to the By- 
ftanders made them feem to croak- but how this Experiment 
will be reconciled to the Do&rine afcribed to M r H*b$, or to 

that 



Digitized by Google 



(15) 

that of the K^trs/titelidtis , who tell us , That their Matter 
taught, the Heart to be the feat of Senfef whence nlfo though 
erroneoufly, he made it the original of the Nerves J let thofe 
that are plcafed to concern themfelves to maintain all his Opi* 
nions, confider. 

And whereas Frogs,thongh they can move thus long with- 2 dSfaSi 
ont the Heart, yet they cannot at all bear the exemption or ofachickcn, 
fpoiling of the Brain j we will adde what we have obferved , J**?'^ lhc 
even in hot Animals, whofc Lite is conceived to be much more pm 
fnddenly diffipable , and the motion of each part much more w«c cutoff; 
dependent upon the infl uence of the Brain: We opened then 
an Egg, wherein the Chick was not only perfectly formed , 
but well furnifoed with Feathers,and having taken him out of 
the Membrane that involved him , and the Liquors he fwam 
in, and laid him on his Back on a flat piece of Glafs, we clip'd 
away, with a pair of ScdfTers , the Head and the Breft- bone? 
whereby the Heart became expofed to view, but remained 
faftned to the Headlcfle Trunk : and the Chick lying in this 
pofture,the Heart continued to beat above a full hour,and the 
Ears feemed to retain their motion a pretty while after the 
Heart it felf had loft his 5 the motion of none of the other 
Parts appearing many moments to furvive the loffe of the 
Head : ancf which is moft confidence, the feemingly dead 
Heart was divers times excited to new , though quickly cea- 
fing motion, upon the puncture of a Pin, or the point of a 
Pen-knife. And toevincethat this was no cafual thing, the 
next Day we dealt with'the Chick of another Egg , taken 
from the fame Hen, after the above recited manner-, and when 
the motion of the Heart and Ears began to ceafe , we excited 
it again, by placing the Glafs over the warm ftearo of a Vcflel 
full of hot Water, bringing ftill new Water from effthe Fire 
to continue the hear, when we perceived the former Water to 
begin to cool * and by this means we kept the Heart beating 

for 



7* 



Digitized by Google 



(16) 

for an hour and an half by meafure. And at another time for 
further fatisf3&ion, we did, by thefe and fome other little tn- 
duftrics, keep the Heart of a fomew hat elder Chick, though 
expofedtotheopcn Air, in motion, after we had carefully 
dipt oft the Head and Neck,for the fpace of ( if our memory 
do not much naif inform us} two hours and an half by mea- 
fure. Upon whar conjectures we expected Co lading a motion 
in the Heart of a Chick , after it had loft the Head , and con- 
fcquently the Brain, would be more tedious and lefs fit to be 
. mentioned in this place, then the ftrange vivacity we have 
tySSaSSS' foretimes, not without wonder, obferved in Vipers : Since 
vipers ; not only their Hearts clearly fever'd from their Bodies may 
be obferv'd to beat for fome hours (for that is common with 
them to divers other cold Animals ) but the Body it felf may 
be (ometimes two or three days after the Skin, Heart, Head, 
and all the Entrals are feparated from it , fcen to move in a 
twining or wrigline manner : Nay(what is much more J may 
appear to be manifeftly fenfible of punctures, being put into 
a frefh and vivid motion, when it lay (rill before, upon the be- 
ing pricked, efpecially on the Spine or Marrow with a Pin or 
Needle. 

And Torcoifcs. And though Tortoifes be in the Indies many of them very 
large Animals , yet that great Traveller Vtncent * Blanc , in 
his French Voy a^es,giving a very particular account of thofe 
Tortoyfes , which the Eaft Indian King of Fegu (who was 
much delighted with them ; did, with great curiofity, chcrifli 
in his Ponds,addes this memorable Paflage as an Eye- witnelTe 
. of what he relates : when the King hath a mind to eat of tbem, 
they cut off tketr heads , and five days after they art frtoard- y 
And jet after thofe five days they are alive, as roe have often ex* 
periene'd. Now although I will not fay , that thefe Experi- 
ments prove, that either 'tis in the Membrane that fenfation 
xefides ( though I have fometimes doubted whether the 

Nerves 



Digitized by Google 



Nerves themfeivesbe not fofenfible, chiefly as they are in- 
vefted with Membranes) or that the Braine may not be con- of the uncea- 
fined to the Head, but may reach into the reft of the Body, af- ^f h ^ r a 5 nco 
ter another manner than is wont to be taught : Yet it may be fenf/and mo- 
fafelyarfiim'd,thatfuch Experiments as thefemay be of great 
concernment, in reference to the common Do&rine of the 
oeceflity of unceafing influence from the Braine , being fo re- 
queue to Senfe and Motion-, Efpecially if to the lately men- 
tioned particulars we adde on this occafion what we have ob- 
ferv'd of the Butter- flies, into which Silk.wormes have been 
Metamorphofcd 5 namely, That they may not onely , like ™£ 
common Flies, and divers other winged Infecls, furvive a fl.eiscapabte 
pretty while the lode of their Heads, but may fomctimesbe 
capable of procreation after having loft them : as I not long eftohcad. C 
fince tryed ( though not perhaps without fucha Relu&ancy 
as Ariftotlc would have blam'd in a Naturalift ) by cutting off 
the Heads of tuch Butter flies of either Sexe. guamvts enim 
Mas cut pritss amputatum e(l caput nequaquam adduci poffet 
{qudcunq-, InfecJi tUtumefl (alactt4S)ut Fdminam comprtmeret: 
DtcolUtA tamen Fsmina mar em alacriter ad m fit . Et licet pojl 
boras aliquot coituin(umpt4S its requierit immota ut mortuam 
fer mult as horns cog/ tar em non (olumquta omnem fenitus mo- 
turn perdtderat sjr in Thorace [at is magnum afParebat foramen % 
quota parte aii qua Corporis pmulcum capite A trumo dtfrupts 
factum vtdebatur verum ettsm quo mam eodem permAnftt ftatu 
idjg fer plures boras, ultra timpus quo pofl coitioncm cum Mam, 
hu)us generis Ammalcula (olent ordtrrprottfeationem. Tandem 
<utr$ poftqaam jam diu de Vtts ejus de/peratum cfiet, Ova fat Are 
tarn confertim cocpit ut vel exigno temporis intervallo torum 
plura in manu mtsdeponcret. \yin vero Prolific* ftnt futurs 
nondum comperL , ; 

Their Opinion that afaibe the rednefle of the Blood to the 
colour of the Liver , through which it paffes, is not difcoun- 

c. tenanctd 



Digitized by Googl 



(!«) . 

teoaoced by the Livers of Men : Bat in Hen : egges,about the 
third or fourth day after incubation ( for we have found the 

That the red- circumftances °f time mucn 10 va, T ) y oa ma y obferve the 
ncfl" of th 2 " funcium f Aliens, or Heart, to be ever and anon full of canfpi- 
b ond is not to cuoufly red Blood, before the naked Eyes can fo much as dif- 
fhViivc^pr" c*™ a Liver,at leaft before they can difcover in it any rednefle* 
ved bythcin- a yellownclTe being all I could obfeivein the Pdrenchyms of 
i f ^«oTchc! the Livers of divers Chickens perfeaiyform'd, andfurnifli'd 
kcwvnhatcht. with Feathers, though not great enough to make their way 
out of the Shell, Andindiverfe great Fifties I have found the 
Veflelsof the Liver full ofvery red Blood,though the Pdren- 
chjmd or fubftanceoHt were white, or at leaft did not at all 
participate, much leffe impart a fanguine colour. 

The Do&rine fo unanimoufly delivered by Phyficians and 
Chirurgions, concerning the irreparable lofle of the Limb of 
an animall,once violently fevet ed from the Body,will appeare 
rfVLSibif anfit to be admitted, without fomereftridion, by what may 
ail animals is be experienced in Lizards , in Lobfters and Craw fifties , and 
not itrcparabic. perhaps in fome other living Creatines. For of Lizards ic 
bath been often obferv'd in hot Countries,andeven in France, 
that their Tailes being (truck eft will grow againe . And the 
like hath been of old obferv'd by Pliny ; and the expericne'd 
Xtntius delivers it upon his owne knowledge in thefe words: 
hoc in domeflicis meis nen (emel ammadvtrti dum filioli mei /*- 
fit dbnndi hscilh Cdudts its decutiebsnt, cjujs tamen poft diem 
unum tut titer urn ad folitnm pMnm revertentes vidi^cdndaf^ 
its fduUtim reaccre/cere. 

That theClawes likewife of Lobfters being torne off,ano- 
therwill fometimes grow in the room of it 3 is not oncly faid 
by Fiflier-men, but hath been affirmed to me by very credible 
perfons , one of which aflured mee, that he himfelfe had 
obferved it very often . And I am the more apt to believe 
it, becaufc the like is to be met with among Craw- fillies, 

which. 



Digitized by Google 



( ip) 



which are fo like Lobfters , that by many they are taken 
( though not confidently enough; to be but a fmaller kinde 
ot them. For 1 remember, that going to look upon a Repofi- 
tory where a multitude of them was kepc,and caufing divers of 
" thefaireft to be drawn up, that I might take the ftonycon- 
cretionSjComroonly called Oc uli Cattcror urn, out of their Heads, 
I obferv'd one large Fifh that had one of his Claws proporti- 
onable to the bulk of his Body , but the other fo fhort and 
little, that the greater feem'd to be four or five times as big as 
if ^whereupon its good fliape and frem colour, feeming to argue 
it to be but young and growing, invited me to ask one of them 
that had the overfight of the Fifh , whether he had formerly 
feen any Claws torn off to grow again s he affirmed to me, 
That in that fort of Fifti it wa$ very ufual. Tfi3t nomUti 

I could alfo teft you how fruitlefly I hive indeavoured to funding t h c 
difcover that ftomachical Acidity, to which many of our Mo- great foiuuon 
dern Phy fitians are pieafed to afcribe the firft digeftion of the a D ? d M tf fnTh 
Nutriment of Animals,irtthe purpofely difTe&ed Stomachs of fUWurf 
ravenous Se3« fifties, in whofe Stomachs though our tafte ? lfl f , f s , ,n ° . 



of them a couple of Fifties, each of them about a Foot long, Acre, 
whereof the one, which feem'd to have been but newly de* 
voured, hath fuffered little or no alteration in the great Fflies 
Stomach i but the other had all its outfnfe, fave the Head, 
uniformly wafted to a pretty depth, beneath the former fur- 
face of the Body, andlook'd as if it had been not boil'd,or 
wrought upon by any considerable heat, but uniformly corro- 
ded,likea piece of Silver Coyn kept a while in Jqna forth ,ac- 
cordingro the criminal tricks of Adulterators of Money. 

Yet I am loth, till I have perfected what I defign in order 
to that enquiry, either to embrace or reject the Opinion I find 
fo general among the Moderns, concerning the Solution of 
Meat in the Stomach by fomething of Acid. And I remcm- 




c 2 



ber, 



Digitized by Google 



E*perimen« bcr \ tbat when I was confidering what might be alledg'd 
*S£fa%** for > as well as againft that Opinion, Idevifedthis Expcri- 
Mcati and their ment, among others, in favour of it: I provided a Liquor, 
km*? d° w * 1 ^ wn ' c k * drench'd a piece of a wing of a roafted Pullet , 
Menftruunw. having firft well cruihed ic between ray Fingers, to make 
fome amends for the omiflionof chewing it* and having a 
little incorporated the Liquor and the rnufculous Fielh, they 
immediately chang'd colour, and in about an hour, grew to 
be a kind of Gelly , in colour and confiftence not unlike 
Quince Marmalade : This mixture, by the next Morning ,did, 
as I expected, turn to a deep Blood red, or fometimes rather 
a lovely purple Liquor, though all this while there had been 
no external heat impbyed to promote the action of the 
cMenftruum. And the like Experiment I tryed alfo with a 
piece of Mutton, with Bread , and a piece of Veal, and 
other edible things , which at that time occurr'd to me , and 
found the operation of the Liquor almoft uniform, though 
it feem'd to ad moft effectually upon Flefh. And to gratifie 
in fome meafure your curiofity, Pyrepbilut , I am content to 
tell you , that the Menflrmm was drawn from Vitriol , and 
that with the bare Oyi of it I have ( though I could not with 
^wj/^/^perform'dnolefs then what I have yet mention*d$ 
butleaft this mould be though' a digreflion , let it fufficeto 
have one this occaMon, mention d thus much uponthe by. 

To what we lately took notice ot concerning the Heart, 
may be added, That on the Sea-coaftof lreland t I obferv'd 
a fort of Fiflies, about the bignefs of Mackrels, whofe Hearts 
were of an inverted Figure, compar'd to thofe of other Ani- 
mals, the bafis or broad end of the Heart being neareft the 
Tail , and the acuminated part or apex being coherent to the 
• great Artery, and refpe&ing the Head. 

To all thefe trifling Obfervations,divers more confiderable 
ones might be added, but they may bemorefeafonably infift- 

ed 



Digitized by 



t ed on el fc where $ and thofe already mentioned, may fuffice to 
let you fee, That the Naturalift by his Zootomy, may be ve- 
ry ferviceable to the Phyfician inhis Anatomical Inquiries. 

Nor is it only by the diflt&ion of various Animals, that 
the Naturalift may promote the Anat o mi fts knowledge, but 
perhaps alfo he may do it by devifing wa ves to make the dead 
Bodies of Men, and other Animals, keep longer then natu- 
rally they would do : For fince experience teaches us , That 
Men finde it very eafie to forget the originations, windings, 
branchings, infertions, and other circumftances of particular 
Veflels, and other parts of the Body , as well as thofe that 
ftudy Botanicks , are wont to complain of then eafie forget- 
ting the llnpes, differences , and alterations of fmaller Plants, 
it cannot but be a great help to the Student of Anatomy, to 
be able to preferve the parts of humane Bodies, and thofe of 
other Animals , efpecially fuch Monfters as are of a very lin- 
gular or inftruftive Fabrick, fo long that he may have recourfe . 
to them at pleafure, and contemplate each of them fo often 
and io confiderately, till he have taken fufficient notice of the 
(bape, fitaation, connection, &c. of the Veflel, Bone, or other 
part, and firmly imprefled an idea of it upon his memo- 
ry. We finde our felyes much help'd to retain in our memo- 
ry, the figures and differences of Vegetables, by thofe Books 
which fome curious Botanifts make, wherein the Plants them- 
felves, artificially dry 'd % are difplay'd upon, andfaftnedto 
Leaves of white Paper * if it were not for one of thofe Books, Wa cj - ArJ 
wherein I have in one vaft Volume 3lmoft all the Plants of tifica" dmng 
oneof the chief Phyfick- gardens in Europe, I lliould every and prefcrvaci- 
Year forget, by the end of Winter, to know again moftof ono Pianu * 
the fmaller Plants I had learn'd to take notice of in the Spring. 
And by the way 'tis obfervable , how long Plants, by being 
carefully indeed, but barely dryed in the ftiade betwixt Sheets 
of Paper, which help to foak up the fuperfluous moifturc, 

c 3 may 



Digitized by Google 



m3y be preferv'd. For I have divers Years bad an Herbal, ( 
wherein feveral of the Flowers, and others P 1 ants , retain their ' 
native yellow and blue, &c. ( but fomewhat faint) though by 
the date it appear 'd to be 22 or 23 Years old. And I am apt 
to think, that it would be very poflible for Anatomifts alio to 
preferve the Bodies they contemplate for a confiderable time: 
For experience hath informed us in good number of fuch Ani- 
mals , that Butter- flies , and divers other Hying In lefts, may 
have their fhape and colours preferv'd, I know not how long, 
by running them through in fome convenient part with Pins, 
and therewith (hiking them to the infide of large Boxes. And 
on this occafion , I remember, that having fometimes refle- 
cted upon the lafting of Spiders, Flyes, and other fmall living 
Creatures,that having been carnally end o fed in Amber whtt'ft 
it was foft,are ever preferv'd entire and uncorrupted,I thought 
And Infcfb. lt oo t am jf s t o try whether fome fubftance, like Amber fat 
leaft as to the newly mentioned ufe of it ) might not eafily be 
prepared by Art: And hereupon I quickly found, that by ta- 
king good clear Venice Turpentine, and gently evaporating 
away about a third part of it ( fometimes more , fometimes 
lefs, according to the exigency of my particular purpofe) I 
could make a redditli Gum, diaphanous and without Bubles, 
which would melt with a very gentle heat, and cafily (being 
fuffercd to coolj become ag3in fo hard as to be brittle. This 
refinous Subftance (hould be melted with as little heat as is 
. poffible (and therefore mould be firft pouder'd) that the tex- 
ture of the Vegetable or Animal Bodies to be cafed over with 
it, might receive the lefs alteration : And when it is brought 
to the requifite degree of fluidity, then the Body to be pre- 
ferv'd (being, if that be needful, ftuck through with a Pin) 
nraftbe gently plung'd into it, and prefently taken out and 
fuffer'd leifurely to cool, being turn'd, from time to time, this 
way or that way, if there be occafion, that the inverting Mat- 
ter 



digitized by Google 



r*3) 

ter may be every where of an equal thkknefs upon it. And 
if ac the fir ft time the Ca(e be not chick enough, it may again, 
when it is cold,beimmerfed into the liquid M itter (as Chand- 
lers are* wont to thicken their Candles, by dipping them fre- 
quently into melted Tallow ) of which fome will every way 
adhere to it. An<4 though thefe cafes be inferior to Amber, 
in regard of their being more apt to be fulli'd by duft,or other, 
wife; yet that inconvenience may be eafily remedied, by 
keeping them (hut up in Glades or Boxes, at thofe times when 
one hath not occafion to confider them .* And their clear nets 
( efpecially if they be thin) and their fmooth furfaces, together 
with their exa&ly keeping out the Air from the Body they 
enclofe, may, perhaps, make fo cheap and eafy an Expert* 
ment.a not unwelcome trifle, efpecially confidcring how eafily 
'tis capable of Improvement. 

But to return to the Prefervation of more bulky Bodies, {JJJ^ 
'tis a known thing , to the Collectors of Rarities, that the 
external Idea of Fifties, Crocodiles , Birds, and even Horfes, 
may be preferv'd for many years, by faking out the more cor. 
ruptible parts, and (luffing their prepared Skins with any con- 
venient Matter. And that the internal membranous parts of 
Bodies may belong and eafily kept from putrefaction, is not 
unknown to many Anatomifts. And not to mention what we 
have tryed of this fort, we have feeri the Veins, Arteries* and . 
Nerves of a humane Body, laid out in their natural fituation Parlicula . h 
upon three Boards, by the pains and skill of an accurate Anato* Schemn Jdi^ 
mift of Padua. And elfewhere, Uterum vidimua at que omnia * CTS p-"* cf 
mult tr is genu ah together with the Bladder, all diiplaid up* uman * boJr ' 
on a Board, prcferved for many Years fo entire, and in a fitu- 
ation fo near the Natural, that this Scheme was far more inftru. 
dive, then the mo ft accurate Printed one could poffibly be. 
We have likewife known the flefh ot Vipers, kept not only 
fweet,but efficacious, for divers Years,by the fmoak of a peciu 

liar 



Digitized by Google 



liar Powder,chiefly cqnfifting of Aromatick Ingredients, and 
of which,you,fjr<>/>&/7itf,may command the Compofition. 

We havealfo leen the Skeleton of a Monky, made, by an 
excellent French Chyrurgion of our acquaintance, whereon 
the Tendons and Fibres of the Mufcles were fo prefer ved,t hat 
it was looked upon as rarity ,very ufefull to (hew their Origi- 
nations and Insertions, and to explaine the motions of the 
Limbs: And perhaps there may be fome way to keep the Arte, 
ries & the veins too^hen they are empty 'd of Blood, plump, 
and un3pt to flirinke over- much,by filling them betimes with 
fome fuch fubftance,as,though fluid enough when it is injected 
to run into the Branches of the VeiTels, w;ll afterwards quick- 
ly grow hard. Such may be the liquid Plaifter of burnt Ala- 
b3fter,formerly mentioned,or Ifing-glaflefteeped two dayes 
in Water , and then boyl'd up,till a drop of it in the cold will 
readily turn into a ft ill Gelly. Or elfe Saccarum Saturn^ which 
if it be difTolved often enough in Spirit of Vinegar, and the 
Liquor be each time drawnejorf againe,we have obier ved to be 
apt to melt with the leaft hear,and afterwards to grow quickly 
into a fome what brittle confidence againe. But I mud not in- 
lift on thele Fancies, but rather adde, That I have knowne an 
Embrio^ wherein the parts have been very perfectly delineated 
and dtftinguillublcprefcrved unputrified tor fe verall Yeares* 
andT ihinke it ftill continues fo^by being fcafonably and arti- 
ficially embalmed with Oyle( if I much mif- remember not) of 
of the prefer- Spikes." And I have elfewhere feen a large Embrio t which af* 
vat.on of an ter having beene preferved many Years, by means of another 
ycvsbytm-* Liquor ( whofe compofition I do as yet but guefle -at ) did, 
baiming it when I faw it > appea e with fuch an admirable Entirentfle, 
spic ° yi cf -FlumpntlTe, and Fte(hneiTe,as if it were but newly dead : And 
that which concurs to make me hope that fome nobler way 
may be yet found out, for the prefervation of dead Bodies, is, 
that I am not convme'd that nothing can powerfully refift Pu- 

trefaclion 



Digitized by Google 



trefa&ion in fuch Bodies , but things that are either faline and 
corrofive, or elfe hot 5 Nor that the Embalming S ubftances 
cannot be effectually apply 'd , without ripping open the Body 
10 be preferv'd by thejn. Far fofeptifu Acoft*, a fober Wri- 
ter, relates, That in certaine Ameritan Mountaines, Men, and induces of 
the Beafts they ride on,fometimes are kill'd with the Winds, men in the d* 
which yet prefer-ve them from putrefaction,without any other ^SfSjS 
help. So infenfible a quantity of Matter , fuch as it may be, afterwards pre- 
may, without Incifion made iqto the Body, both pervade it, f ^^ 0 J}" 
and as it were Embalme it. I know alfo a very experiene'd and by fewu* 
fober Gentleman, who is much talk'd of for curing of Can- 
cers in Worn ens Breafts , by the outward Application of an . 
Injdolent Powder % fome which he alfo gave me, but I have 
not yet had the oportunity to make tryall of it s And I (hall 
anon tell you, that I have feen a Liquor, which without being 
at all either acid or cauftick, is in fome Bodies farre more effe- 
ctual 1 a gain ft Putrefaction, than any of the cor rofi ve Spirits of 
Nitre, Vitriol, Salt, &c« and than any of the other faline Li- 
quors that are yet in ufe. We have alfo try'd a way or pre- 
ferving Flefh with Musk, whofe effects feem'd not defpicable 
tons, but mult not here be infiitcd on. 

Nor were it amhTe that diligent Tryal were made what OfrheQfeof 
ufe might be madeof Spirit of Wine, for the prefervation of strife? 
a humane Body .* For this Liquor being very limpid, and vatioacfBo. 
notgreafie, leaves a cleareprofptctof the Bodies immerf'din. di " £°mpu : 
it i andthough it do not fret them, as Brine, and other (harp ,tefaftl0lu 
things commonly em ploy 'd to preferve FleuS are wont to do, 
yet it hath a notable Balfamick Faculty , and powerfully re- 
fills Putrefaction, not onciy in living Bodies (in which , 
though but outwardly apply cl, it hath been found of late one 
of the potenteft Remedies a ga in it Gangrens ; but alfo in dead 
ones. And 1 remember that I have fometimes preferv'd in it 
fome very fotc parts of a Body for many months ) andper- 

. d haps 



Digitized by Google 



(it) 

haps I might had done it for divers Years,had I had opportu : 
* nity ) without finding that the confiftence or (hape was loft, 
much lefle, that they weje either putrifi'd or dry'd up : We 
have alio, by mixing with it Spirtl of Wine, very long pre- 
ferv'd a good quantity of Blood,fo fweet and fluid, that it was 
wondred at by thofe that faw the Experiment. Nay, we 
. have for curiofity fake, with this Spirit, prefcrved kom fur- 
ther (linking, a portion of Fifli.fo ftale, that it mined very vi- 
vidly in the dark * in which Experiment,we alfo aimed at dif- 
covering whether thisrefplendcnt quality of the decaying Filh 
would be either cheriflied or impaired by the Spirit of Wine 
(whofe operations in this tryall weelfewhere informeyou of) 
and it would be no very difficult matter for us to improve,by 
fome eafie way, this Balfamicali Virtue of Spirit of Wine, in 
cafe you (hall think it worth while: But not to anticipate what 
I may more properly mention to you elfevvhere, 1 fhall at pre- 
fent fay no more touching the Confervation of Bodies, fince 
probably by all thefe, and fome other particulars, we may be 
induced to hope fo well of humane Induftry,as rot to difpair, 
that in time fome fuch way of prefcrving the Bodies of Men, 
Tfia« the E«i- anc j other Animals , will be found out, as may very much 
JSSrfhT Facilitate and advance too, Anotomicall Knowledge. Nei- 



mane body by t her is it onely by advancing This , that the Naturalift may 
promote the Phyfiologicall part or Phyfick: for fince the 
L atctheir Body confifts not onely of hrme and conftant parts, as the 



& Nature. Bones, Mufcles, Heart, Liver, &c. but of fluid ones, as the 
Blood, Serum, Gall, and other Juices $ And fince confe- 
quently to the compleat Knowledge of the ufe of ail the parts 
we mould inveftigate not onely the; Structure of the Solid 
ones , but the Nature of the fluid ones : The Naturalift may 
do much more than hath yet been done, towards the perfect- 
• ing of this Knowledge,not only by better explicating what it 
is in generall makes Bodies either Confident or Fluid,but by 

examining 



Digitized b$ 



(*7) 

examining particularly , and efpecially in a Pyro technical 
way , the Nature of the feveral Juices of the Body , and by 
illuftrating the Alterations th3t thofe Juires,nnd the Aliments 
they are made of, receive in the Stomach, Heart, Liver, Kid- 
neyes , and other Vifcer*. For although a humane Body 
being the moft admirable Corporeal piece of Workmanmip 
of the Omnifcient Architect is fcarce to be hoped, but that 
even among the things that happen ordinarily and regular- 
ly in it , there will be many which we flnll fcarce be able to 
reach with our Undei fhn ding, much lefs to imitate with our 
Hands ; Yet peradventure , if Chymical Experiments , and 
Mechanical Contrivances, were induftriouily, and judicioufly, 
affociated by a Naturalift profoundly skill 'd in both.and who 
would make it his Bufinefleto explain the PbdnomettA ofa 
Humane Body, notflnly many more of them than at fir ft one 
would think, might be made more intelligible than as yet 
they have been but divers of them (efpecially thofe relating 
to the motions of the Limbs and Blood ) might be by artifi- 
cial Engines (confifting as the Pattern not only of Solid but 
Liquid and Spirituous parts J not ill reprefented to our very 
Senfes : ftnee a humane Body it felf feems to be but an En- 
gine, wherein almoft, if not more then almoft, all the Actions That the Afti- 
common to Men with other Animals, arc performed Media- J2 K ^ < t« ,te 
nically. But of the difference of thefe living Engines from M<nwich<xhec . 
others, I may elfewhere have a fitter opportunity to difcourfe A c "^ al . J d b ^ n c R 
to You, For at prefent, Pyn. 1 have employed fo much of ^Siy, the 
the little time my Occafions will allow me to fpend upon the Skill of Mc 
Treatife I am now writing, in making out to you the Uleful- ™ uft 
nefsof Natural Phylofophy, to the Phyfiological Part of phyfoiogy, 
Phyfick, thatl muft not only not prolecute this fubje&, but 
muft both toften to mention, and to mention the more cur- 
forily its ferviceablenefs to the four remaining Parts ol the 
Phy ficians Art, 

d 2 ES- 



Digitized by GoOgll 



ZGZtS^SfSZIS^B S03S983S3 ^OT^SOSi234SSiS5a 

ESSAY II. 

Offering fomeT articular s relating to the 
Pathological Tart of "Vhyfick: . 

AND to fay fomething in the next place of Patbohgy.thit 
Th * th J. Nl * **the Naturalifts knowledge may affift the Phy fician to di(- 

tura lifts Know. . , r c e 1 \ -r^-r r 1 

ledge o»v aftft cover the nature andcaules of ieveral Dueafes, may appear 
»hc Phvfician by the light of this Confi deration, that.though divers Para* 
Nanlre Zid* cel f"» $ (w»ght,as they tell os, by their Matter j do but errone- 
Caufes of aif- oufly fuppofe that Man is To properly a Microcoftn that of 
eafes. a jj the { orts of Creatures whereot the Mtcrocofm or Uni- 
verfe is made up , he really confifts yet certain is it that 
there are many Productions , Operations , and Changes of 
things , which being as well to be met within the great, as in 
the little world , and divers of them difclofing their natures 
more difcernably in the former* than in the latter * the know- 
ledge of the nature of thofe things as they are difcoverable out 
of mans body, may well be fuppofed capable of illuftrating 
many things in man's body , which receiving fome ModiHca* 
tions there from the nature of the Subject they belong to, • 
pafs under the notion of the Caufes or the Sy mptoms of DA- 
eafes. It I were now, Pynphilus, to difcourfe to you at large 
of this Subject, I think I could convince you of the truth of 
what I have propofed. And certainly , unlefs a Phy fician be 
( which yet I fear every one is not) fo much a Naturalift, as to 
know how Heat and Cold^and Fluidity, and Compactnefs, 

and 



Digitized by Googh 



and Fermentation, and Putref action, and Vifcofity, and Coa- provM by & 
gulation,and Diffolution, and fuch like Qualities, are gene- ncral Kca&n. 
rated and deftroyed in the generality of Bodies, he will be of- 
' ten very much to feek, when he is to inveftigate the caufes of 
preternatural Accidents in men's bodies, whereof a great 
many depend upon the Prefence, or Change or Vanifhing of 
fome or other of the enumerated -Qualities , in fome of the 
Fluid or Solid Subfhnces that conftitute the body. And 
that the Explications of a skilful Natural if* mayadde much 
to what has hitherto commonly been taught concerning the 
Nature and Origine of thofe Qualities in Phyficians Schools, 
a little comparing of the vulgar Doclrine, with thofe various 
Phenomena , to be met with among Natural things , that 
ought to be, and yet feem not to be, explicable by ir, will ea- 
fily manifesto you. And qucftionlefs 'tis a great advantage 
to have been taught by variety of Experiments in other bo- 
dies, the differing wayes whereby Nature fometimes produ-* 
ces the lame effects. For fince we know very little k frtori 
the obfervation of many fuch effect*, manifefting, that nature 
doth actually produce them fo and fo , fugged s to us feverai 
wayes of explicating the fame Phar nomenon, fome of which 
• we mould perhaps never elfe have dream'd of. Which ought 
to be efteem'd no fmail Advantage to the Phy fician 5 fince he 
that knows but one or few of Natures wayes of working, and 
confequently , is likely to ignore divers of thofe whereby the 
propos'd Difeafe(or Symptomeofitjmay beprodue'd, muft 
fometimes conclude, that precifely {neb ox fuch a thing is the 
determinate Caufeof it, and apply his Method of relieving 
his Patient accordingly-, which often proves very prejudicial 
to the poor Patient, who dearly payes for his Phyficians not 
knowing , That the Quality that occafions the Diftemper, 
may beas probably, if not more rationally , dedue'd from an 
other Origine, theu from that which is prefum'd. This will 

d i fcarce 



Digitized by Google 



farce be doubted by him that knows how much more likely 
Explications than thofe applauded fome Ages fince, of divers 
things that happen as well within as without the body , have 
been given by later Naturalifts, both Philosophers and Phy 
ficians : and how much the Theory of the Stone • and many 
other difeafes , that has been given us by thofe many Phyfici- 
ans , that would needs deduce all the Pbaenoma of difeafes 
from Heat , Cold, and other Elementary Qualities, is luteri- 
our to the Account given us of them by thofe ingenious Mo- 
derns, that have apply 'd to the Advancement or Pathology, 
- that Circulation of the Blood, the Motion of the Chyle by 
the Milky veflels to the Heart, the confideration of the effects 
deducible from the Pores of greater bodies, and the motion 
and figuration of their minute parts , together with fome of 
the more known Chy ureal Experiments though both of 
thofe * and of the other helps mention'd j u ft before them, 
# I fear men have hitherto been far enough from making the 
By particular bed ufe i which I hope it will dayly more and mote appear 
inaances of lnc y ar:c capable of being put to. He that has not had the cu- 
!hc s?onc in riofites to enquire out, and confider the feveral waieSi where* 
the Kidnycs. by Stones may be generated out of the body , not only muft 
be unable fatis factor ily to explicate how they, come to be« 
produe'd in the Kidnies and in the Bladder, but will, perhaps, 
fcarce keep himftlf from embracing fuch errors, becaufe au- 
thorize by the fuffrage of em int n t Phy ficians , as the know- 
ledge lam recommending would eafily protect them from. 
For we find divers famous , and, other wife, learned Doctors, 
who (probably becaufe they had not taken notice of any o- 
ther way of hardening a matter once foft into a ftonelike con- 
fidence) have believ'd and taught that the Stone of the Kid- 
ney es is produe'd there by flime baked by the heat and dryntfs 
of the Part * as a Portion of foft C lay may, by external heat, 
be turo'd into a Brick or Tile. And accoroingly they have 



Digitized by Google 



for care, thought it fufficient to make ufeofftoreofReme^ 
dies to moiften and Coole the Kidneys * which, though in Tome 
bodies this be very convenient) are yet far infer i our in effica- 
cy tothofe Nobler medicines, that by fpecifick qualities and 
properties are averfe to fuch coagulations as produce the 
Stone • But ( not to mention what a Phyflcian skill'din Ana- 
tomy would objtdagainft this Theory from thenarureof 
the part affected) 'tis not unlike,the embracers otthis Hypo* 
thefts would not have acquiefc'd in it, if they had (eenthofe 
putrefactions out of the Bodies of Men , which we el fe where 
mention'd. For thefe would have inform'd them that a Li* 
quor abounding with petrefcent parts, may notonely turne 
W ood (as 1 have obfer ved in a petrefying Spriog) into a kind 
of Stone, and may^give to Cheefe and MofTe without fpoy- 
ling their priftrine appearance a ftrong hardneffe and weight $ 
but may alfo produce large and finely ftiapd Chryftalline 
bodies ( though thofe I try 'd were fluch leffe hard than t 
Chryftall) in the bofomeot the cold water. Which brings into 
my mind , that I have divers times product a body of an al- 
m oft (tony hardnefle in Ieflc than halfe an houre, even in the 
mi eft of the water, by tying up in a rag, about the quantity 
of a Nutmeg, of well and recently calcined Alablaftre , which 
being thus ty'd op and throwne into the botomeof abaion d^fcifc °fi- 
fuH of water ,did there fpeedily harden into a Lapideous Con- luftutedtytiic 
cretion. And that even in the bodies of Animals themfclves ^^{j" * f 
fuch concretions may be generated much otherwife than the Motfc/waSf* 
Hypothdis we have been fpeakipg ot fuppofes, may appear &c. 
by what happens to Craw. fifhes, which though cold Animals, 
and living in the waters, have generated at certaine feafons in 
their heads Concretions, which for their hard «nd pulvcri- 
zable confidence , divers Authors called Upida C*ncrorum y 
though in the Shops they are often but abnfively ftyled 
oculi Csticrorum . And fuch ftrong concretions areaffirm'd 



Digitized by 



(3*5 

to be generated in thefe Fillies every yeare, which I thelefle 
fcrupled at , becaufe I have not found them ac all times in the 
Head of the Fiih. And be fides, thefe and many more Con- 
cretions, that had they been obferv'd by the Phyficians we 
' have been fpeaking of, might eafily have kept them from ac. 
quiefcing in, and maintaining their improbable explication of 
the manner of the Stones nativity : There is yet another kind 
of Coagulation, which may both be added to the former, 
and perhaps alfo fwe to recommend the u r e of Chymicall 
Experiments , inveftigating the Cautes of Difeafes : This 
is made by the mixture of exquifitly dephlegm'd Spirit of 
fermented humane Urine , with as exactly rectified Spirit of 
Wine * for upon the confuOon of thofe two volatile Liquors 
The Ori *«nc ia a ^ proportion, they will both of them » as after Lnllius 
of Heimms if- Experience hath informed us, fuddenly coagulate into a white 
Woft*w& MafTe, which Hdmont calls off a alb* y and by which, he en- 
ZZulbXmL deavours to declare tlr procreation of theDuclecb: forfup- 
nimite offpi- pofing himfelfe to have found in humane Urine a potential! 

f -.rft of -i\x\nt ^1"* viu 5 or Vl00US spirit , capable of being excited by a ' 
JTloMnpietf putrid ferment , and coagulable by the violatile Salt of the 
the Generation } a me Urine , if there were any volatile Earth lurking in the 
nekmtdt' Liquors, That being apprehended by the uniting Spirits,and 
1Mb. up. j. coagulated with them both , he fuppofeth there may emerge 
& * from the union of thofe three Bodies fuch an anomalous Coxu 
cretion,as he,after PdracelfusjxUs DueUch. 

And that a fubtile Terreftnous Subftance may lurke undif- 
cerned , even in limpid Liauors , may appeare, not only in 
Wine, which rejecls and f jftens to the fides of the containing 
Veflel , a Tartar, abounding in Terreftnous Feculency 5 and 
in common Urine of healthy men, which, though deare at its 
fit ft emitfion into the Urinal], does, after a little reft there, let 
hUmHjpofiafss, or Sediment, which, if diftill'd before fer- 
mentation , leaves in the bottom of the Cucurbitean Earthy 

Sub- 



Digitized by Google 



(33) 

Subitance,and commonly fome Gravel : but even in redified 
Spirit of Urine it felf I have had opportunity to obferve,That 
after very long keeping , there hath fpontaneoufly precipi- 
tated a Feculency , copious enough in proportion to the Li- 
quor that afforded it. Nay, in another parcel of Spirit of 
Urine, that hath been kept rruch longer then that already 
mentioned, we obferved the other-day, that not only there 
was a Terreftrial refidence fallen to the bottom oftheGlafs, 
but to the fides of it as far as the Liquor reached , there ad- That a tet- 
hered a great multitude of fmall Concretions* which, as far as J}^ 5 Jj£; 
appeared by looking on them through the Chryftal Viol, to lurk uodifar- 
whofe infides they are faftened,were no other then little grains ncd n ,im P i<l 
of Gravel, fuch as are often found flicking to the (ides of Uri- quo "* 
nals , employed by calculous perfons. 

To which we might adde an Experiment of ours, whereby 
we ave wont slmoft in a moment, by barely mixing together 
a couple of Liquors , both of them diftilled and tranf parent , 
and yet not both of them faline to thick them very notably 
and permanently, infomuch that they feem not to precipitate 
each other-, yet having once, for curiofity fake.diftilled them 
with a pretty wrong Fire, 1 obtained 3 great qu intity (as I re- 
member, a fourth of the whole mixture) of a black fli Ma fs, 
that was net only coagulated 2nd dry , but even brittle: But 
of the coagulation of diftilled Liquors, fuch as even Chy milts 
themfelves are not wont to look upon 3s at all difpofed to co- 
agulation , I may el fe where have a better opportunity to en- 
tertain you, and therefore I fliall forbear to do it now. 

And by this way, Pfrofhilus^ doth Hclmont, iflunder- 
ftand him aright, attempt to make out the generation of the 
.Stone in humane Bodies: . In which Theory, though fome 
difficulties do yet keep me from acquiefcing, yet, befides that . 
perhaps what you will meet with by and by (about the diftilla- 
tion of ihe Vuclech) may make you the iefle wonder at this 

c ex- 



Digitized by Google 



04) 

explication. Befidcs this, I fay, granting that none of the 
enumerated ways of Pctrcfcency (irlm3y fofpeak ) deferve 
to be look'd opon as fatisfa&orv yet to give fo much as an 
account, not very abfurd^ of a Difeafefo anomalous and ab- 
ftrufe, and hitherco fo unluckily explicated by Phy ficians, is 
perhaps more dimcult,then it were to give (at leaft) a fUmftkU 
account of divers other Distempers. 

And poflibly it may be fafely enough affirmed , That not 
only Phyfiology , in its full extent , but that Hand- maid to 
it, which is call'd Chymiftry , may not a little contribute to 
The urc of clear up the nature of both of the digeftions, and of thofe 
«TaTnfn y the deficiencies or aberrations in them, which produce s great part 
SSwreo?, and of Difeafes* efpecially if we allow what, as well Phy ficians, 
aberrations in 3S Spagyrifts agree in (whether warily enough or not , I (hall 
your Djgcfti- not oow d |f pute j viZt That w h atcvcr i s feparable from Bo- 
dies by the Fire, was,as a Condiment Element ( or Principle) 
pre- ex i ft em in them. 

Perhaps I need not mind you , Pjrofhilui^ that 'tis ufual 
with the meerly Galenical Dodors themfelves, to explicate 
the nature of Catarrhes, by comparing the Stomach to a 
feething Pot 5 and the Head to an Alembick, where the amend- 
ing Vapors , being, by the coldnefs of the Brain, condenfed 
into a Liquor, fometimes diftil upon the Lungs, and fome* 
times fall upon other weakned parts $ in which explication, 
though for divers reafons I cannot acquiefce, yet it may fuffice 
to mew you how little fcruple many Learned men, not like to 
be partial in the Cafe , would make of employing Chymical 
Operations to illuftrate the Doctrine of Difeafes. And in* 
deed, fmce the Liquors contained in the Body abound, divers 
of them, with faline or fulphureous parts , he that hath been 
by Chymiftry taught the nature of the feveral forts of Salts 
and Sulphurs , and both beheld and considered their various 
actions one upon another, and opoo other Bodies, fecmsto 

have 



Digitized by Google 



(35) 

have a confiderable help to difcourfe groundedly of theChan- 
ges and Operations of the humors, and other Juices contain'd 
in the Body, which he hath not that hath never had Vulcan for 
tiis Inftru&er. He that finds that there may be acid Juices 
in the Stomach, and elfewhere fas is frequently evident in the 
flurp Liquors which many Stomachs caft up ) and that there Proved Ha 
are alfo Sulphureous Salts in the Body (as is apparent in Blood SSSbte 
and Urine, which abound with fuch. ) He that knows that the Obfcrvacicnt. 
Scrum that fvvims upon the Blood out of the Body, is by a 
gentle heat immediately coagulable into a thick whitifli Sub- 
dance, not unlike a Cuftard and that Chymically analyz'd 
Blood yields (lore of volatile and fuiphureous , but fas far a? 
our tryals have hitherto inform'd us ) no acid faltnefs: 

He that knows that tbefe Animal Salts and Spirits may be 
fo powerful, that we have been able with Spirit of Urine , or 
ot Harts horn, to make a red Solution of Flowers of Sulphur, 
and that with Spirit of Urine ( though drawn without violence 
of Fire) we have (as we elfewhere more particularly declare^ 
dhTolved both in a very gentle heat, and in a very lhort time, 
the un-open'd Body of crude Copper , fo as to make thereof 
a Solutions of arich,decp, and even opacous Blew ; And that 
we have done almoft the like with unre&ified Spirit of Mans 
Blood.- 

He that hath* as we have done, examined by Fire (efpe- 
cially produced by the help of a Burning- glaflej that limpid 
Liquor that is to be found in the Limp ha tick Vcflels,and hath 
taken notice of that odde confidence, fmell, crackling, and o- 
ther qualities difcernable in it by heat. • 

He that obferves how acid Liquors lofe their acidity , by 
working upon forae Bodies-, as when Spirit of Vineger grows 
almoft infipid upon the coral it bath corroded, **^how thou; 
faline Liquors, by working upon certain Bodies, degenerate 
into Salts of another nature, as we have fome times obferved 

e 2 in 



Digitized by Google 



(3*) 

in Oyl of Vitriol, working upon the fourth part of its weight 

of Quick-filver, and how the contrariety of acid and fulphu- 
reous Salts makes them fometimes difarm, fometimes, after 
fome ebullition, precipitate each other . and fometimes unite 
into a third tubftance,of a differing nature from either of thofe 
from whofe coalition it refults,as we fee in T art arum Vitriol** 
tum\ and, as I have obferved, in a Salt, I fometimes make to 
emerge from a due proportion of Oyl of Vitriol and Spirit of 
Urine, {reed, after conjunction, from their aqueous moiftare: 
And He,in a word,thath3th carefully analyzed and made trials 
on many parts, both of the Macrocofm and Microcoim, and 
heedfully applyed his Experiments made on the former, to 
the iiluftration of the changes obfervable in the latter , fhall 
be likely to explicate divers particulars in Pathology , more 
intelligibly then he that is a ftranger to CJiy miftt y. 

And though I am very unwilling to meddle with'Medical 
Controverfies,and am apt to think,that Chymifts are wont to 
That fait and (peak fomewhat too flightinglv of the humours of the humane 
SllrcTneJcL Bo( ty' and allow them too little a mare in the production of 
inthecaufAl" Difeafes; yet (to skip other reafons ) the Grange (lories re- 
on ofdifcafes Jated by $ktnkius y and other eminent Phvficians, of the cor- 
$S®& a're, rofiveneffc of fome Juices , which, rejected by Urine or Vo- 
bm/Sii&i. raits, have been able to boyl on Brafs, fret Linnen, and 
(lain Silver-, together with fome odde Obfervations of this 
nature our felves rnve had opportunity to make, do very 
much incline us to believe , That the generality of former 
Phyfici3ns tuveafcrib'd too much to the Humours, under the 
notion of their being hot an ! dry , cold and moift, or endow- 
ed with fuch other Elementary Qualities, and have taken a 
great deal too little notice of the faline (if I may fo fpeak ) 
aft d Sulphureous Properties of things. And in this Opinion 
. I am not a little confirmed by the authority of Hippocrates 
himfelf, btthin other palliges, and efpecialiy where he fays. 

Ken 



Digitized by G 



(n) 

Hon calidum, frigUam, bumidum, aut (tecum ejfe quod mag' 
nam agendi vim babet^ verum amarttm & falfum , & dulct 
& aciMum y & infipidum ejr acerbum^ &c. are the things which, 
though inoffenfive to the Body , whilft they duly allay each 
other, prove hurtful to it, and diftempcr it, when any of 
then comes to fever it felf from the reft, and grow predomi- 
nant. And indeed , if the Juices of the Body were more 
Chymically examin'd, efpecially by a Naturalift that knows 
the ways of making fix 'd Bodies volatile, and volatile fix'd, 
and knows the power of the open Air in promoting the for- 
mer of thole Operations $ it is not improbable, that both 
many things relating to the nature of the Humors , and to the 
wayes of fweetning , acuating, andotherwife altering them 
may be detected, and the importance of fuch Difcoveries may 
be difcern'd. . nw 

And perhaps it would adde to the ufefulnefs of fuch an exa- ° a jf u^"' 
mination, if it were extended to the noxious Juices in diftem- the liquor that 
per\i bodies: fuch as the rotten Phlegme fpit up by thofe ^omeV^n 
whofe Lungs are difaffected i the flimy excretions voided in thc^ropiic. 
the Lientery, and the liquor that diftends the abdomen in the 
Dropfieand A fates: concerning which (to tell you that up- 
on the by J r found that it was of a differing nature from ei- 
ther Water or Urine. Fur a paracentesis being made in the Paraccntefii. 
abdomen of one dangeroofly tick of this fort of Dropfie, I 
found that the Liquor would keep a pretty while without pu- 
trefaction, ( nor did the Patients body, when I afterwards faw 
it opened , fmeil almoft at all, though the infide of the abdo- 
men lookt well near as black as if it had been fph3celated; j 
sfnd having (learned away fome^f it, whilft it was pretty frefb, 
over a fomewhat flow fire, it fir ft coagulated into a fubftance 
like Whites of Eggs, and* by a little farther evaporation, 
turned to fuch a glutinous fubftance as tradefmen are wont to 
call Size j and being kept longer on the fire grew to be hard 

e 3 . like 



Digitized by Google 



Obfcrvationi 
on the caIcuIhs 



«8) 

like fifli glew, bat more brittle, and tranfparent enofigb, bat 
with a little tincture of a grcenifti yellow and fome of the 
forementioned liquor being diftilled in a Retort, did towards 
the end of the operation fo darken the veflel with a thick 
black i ill o y 1 , as hundred me from decerning what clfe perhaps 
I might have fcen. And I fuppofe it may prove a nfeful in- 
ftance to the former purpofe , if I fomewhat circuraftantially 
annex here what occurred to me,when I was accidentally con- 
fideriog of the Calculus hum*m*s. 

Having therefore obtained of askilfull Ltthotomift of my 
acquaintance divers Stones, which he had cut oat of mens 
bladders , I chofe a couple of them (which were whitilh al- 
moft, of equal bignefs, and figure, which was near oval, and 
which together weighed abour :\vo ounces and an half; thefe 
with the help of a ftrong knife I carefully opened,to find whe- 
ther or no either of them confided of an entire and uniforme 
matter, Cat moft other (tones, and even fome cAleuUhumani 
do ; and I found that each of them was made up offeveral 
fliells, as it were, fucceffively involving one another, like the 
rinds of an Onion. And fuch fhels.bat more foft, and more of a 
colour we like wife obferved in a great ftone taken a while 
(ince out of an OxesGall, and fent us for a prefent* and 
though all or thefe were of an almoft ftony hardnefs, yet 
that hardnefs was not equal in them all) and in one of the 
ftones we obferved one or the rinds ( to make ufe of that ex- 
preflion J to be of a differing colour both from that which im- 
mediately embraced it, and from that which it immediately 
embraced : fome of thefe rinds equalled in thicknefle the 
length of a barley corne, andothers were fomewhat thinner. 
Though they did clofeiy embrace one another, yet they were 
aftually feparable, as well as vifibly diftingui(hable. And 
proceeding very warily in the breaking one of thefe ft ones, 
we found that in the center of it,thcre lay a fmall and foft oval 

• 1 ftone 



Digitized by Gc 



(39) 

ftone, as it were the kernel ofthofe conglomerated (hells* 
and this kernel lay Co loofe , that with a little induftry and 
patience we picked it out of the (hell, and kept it by us as a ra- 
rity. This done, being defiroos to know whither Chymical 
Tortures would force thefc Concrets to a further conkflion 
of their nature, we caufed them to be finely powdrcd,and put 
intoa fmall but ftiongly coated glafs Retort, whereunto lu- 
ting a much larger Retort for a Receiver, we found that thefc 
two ounces and half of Powder, being difttlled for fome hours 
in a naked fire, afforded us great if ore of volatile Salt (partly 
grey and partly white; which almoft covered theinfide of the 
Receiver, and a pretty quantity of rcddifli fpirit, which in the 
Receiver it felf foon coagulated into Salt, and having fevered 
our vcflels , we found in the neck of the Receiver a very little 
darkiih Oyl , but in the neck of the Retort a greater quantity 
of the fame aduft Oyl, incorporated with a pretty quantity o£ 
volatile Salt, whofe fmell did readily recal to my mind tbac 
peculiar kind of ftink which I had fometimes taken notice of 
in the volatile Salt of unfermented Urine •, nor were the tail cs 
- of thefe two Salts unlike. The caput mortuum confided of 
a fine, light, cole- black Powder , not unlike the fineft fort of 
Soot* and by weighing but of fix Drachmes, it informed us, 
that above two thirds of the diftilled calcult humani had been y 
as being volatile, forced from the Terreftrial Parts , even in a 
clofe Veflel, wherein the c dfut mortuum , though it were left 
infipid enough, yet retained (fink enough to make us think 
it dill contained pretty ft ore of heavy Oyl : as indeed, having 
put it into a Crucible » and kept it a competent while in a 
ft ronger fire , we found it reduced to about two Drachmes of 
a brittle Mafs of infipid white Calx, which did not flack, oc 
fall afunder like Lime when it is cafe into Water. 

• mm • 

To 



Digitized by Google 



(40) 

To this Example of the ufefulnefs of Chymiftry, to dif- 
©t the clunks covcr tne unobferved, and otherwife fcarce difcoverable diffe- 
rhat may r C a- rence of the calculus hum An w from other (tones, we may ven- 
[hol b !u w ture t0 a dde,That though fome Paracdftans do take too much 
Lppenwwr liberty, when they crudely tell us, that there are arfenical, 
•? !imcn " w,th - vitriolate, aluminous, and other mineral fubftances, generated 
m the body, ^ humane bodies, yet if they had more warily propofed their 
Do&rine, it would not perhaps appear foabfurd, as they are 
wont to think it, who confidering only the nature of the Ali- 
ments men ufujlly feed upon,cannot conceive that fuch being 
but either Animals or Vegetables, can by fo gentle a heat as 
that of man's body, f by which chey fuppofeallthe changes of 
the Aliments muft be effected,) be Exalted to ancnergielike 
that of fuch bodies as arecompofed of active Mineral fubftan- 
ces, and have fome of them perchance acquired a violence of 
operation from the fire. But we fee that Concrettons,fo like 
Stones, ( which belong to the Mineral Kingdom,) as to p3(Ie 
generally for fuch, may be produced in the bodies not only of 
men but of fucking children , 'whofe Aliment is fluid Milk: 
and it feemsa miftake to kn3gine (how many foever do fo) 
that Heat muft needs be Efficient of all the changes the mat- 
ter of our Aliments may happen to undergo in a humane 
body: where there are Streiners, and Solvents,and new Mix- 
tions, and perhaps Ferments, and diverfe other powerful 
Agents, which* by fucceflively working upon the aflumed 
matter , may fo faihion and qualified, as, in fome cafes, to 
bring the more difpofed part of it to be not unlike even foffile 
Salts , or other mineral fubftances. A very eminent perfon 
was lately complaining to me, that in the fits of adiftempett 
which almoft as much puzzels her Phyficians as her felf, (he 
fometimes vomits up fomething fo (harp and fretting , that, 
after it bath burnt her throat in its pafl'age,almoft like fcaldtng 
water, it doth not only Sum the Silver vefTels that received 



Digitized by Google 



(40 

it, but alfo worke upon them ss if ic were a Cor ro five Men- 
ftruum. And there dyed a while fince a very intelligent per- 
fon, much employed in publick afhires, who complained to 
me,that in the fits of the ftrange diftemper he laboured under, 
he divers times obferved, that, that part of his pillow which 
his breath palTed along , would by the ftrange fuliginous 
Steams , which that carried off with it, be blackt over, as if ic 
had been held in fome footy fmoak or other. 

We may alfo confider , that the Rain-water, which in its JJ ,uftr *"i b ( £ 
paflage through a Vine,oran Apricock-tree,or the like plants, ^-ccVont^ 
is turned into a fweet fruit in itsp3iTage through thofe plants itebody. 
that bear Lemmons and Barberries,is tranfmuted into a liquor 
{harpe enough to corrode,not only Pearles but Coral, Upides 
cAMrorvm , and other hard Concretes , as Spirit of Vitriol 
would do. And writers ofunfufpe&ed credit, aflfirme, that 
znlndun fru.t, (whole name 1 cannot readily call to mind) 
will fpeedily corrode and wafte the very fteele knives 'tis cut 
with,if its Juice be left long upon them : and wc fee that iome 
forts even of our Apples and Peares, will quickly blackethe 
blades of Knives on which the Juice is fuffered to continue. 
And left what I fremly mention'd about Lemmon trees, 
fhouldbe queftion'd,,! will here adde, that I remember alfo 
that I have made not only fome other hot and ftrongly tafted 
Herbs, but even a Ranunculus it felfe, to grow and increafe 
notably in weight as well as bulke, though I feditbutwith 
faire water : and allowed it nothing elfe to moot its root into. 
Wherefore fince this Plant is reckoned amongft thofe that ei- 
ther are poyfonous, or want but little of being fo* and fince 
its operation is fo vio!ent,that this fort of Vegetables,is taken 
notice of from the experience of Country people, to be able 
by outward application to draw blifters , and fince neverthe- 
lefle that which this Plant,without any heactJifcernable by the 
touch, tranfmutes into fo virulent a fubftance , is but fo una- 

f clive 

* 

Digitized by Go 



(40 

ftivea body as water -,wby may not fuch aliments,as may have 
in them divers parts of a far more operative nature, be in a 
humane body, by an unufual concourfe of Caufes and Cir- 
cumftances, io altered and exalted, as to approach in opera* 
tionsfefpecially upon the more tender pirts)to thofe of foflile 
Sales or other Minerals? So that a Chymift might upon fuch 
an account, without any great abfurdity, teach fome parcels 
of Morbifick matter to be of an ArfenicaJ,or Vitriolate, or 
an Antimonial nature, efpecially fince we fee that fometimes 
Cancers, Ulcers, and (harp Juices generated in the body, do 
by their vitiating and wafting the invaded parts, but too much 
emulate the pernitious operations of Arfcnick, and of fretting 
Salts : and the infufionof Antimony doth fcarce more ftimu- 
late nature to disburthen her feif both upwards and down- 
wards, than doth ■fometimes an humour . fuch as that which 
caufes the Cholera morbus^ and perhaps more violent difeafes. 

And that fuch degenerations of Innocent aliments mould 
fometimes happen in difcompofed bodies, you will perhaps 
think the lefs ftrange, if you duly perpend what I lately men- 
tiotfd of trjfi tranfmutation or Water into hot and veficatory 
fubftances and if thereto I annex , that from a (ingle pound 
of fo common and temperate an Aliment as Bread, I can by 
an eafie way, (and that without addition ) obtain many ounces 
of a mnftruum , which ( as tryal has inform'd ) will work 
more powerfully upon bodies more compact than fome hard 
minerals, or perhaps Glafs it feif , than a wary Chymift 
would expect to fee \jiqufmtu do. Thefe things I have 
mention'd, fyofhtim^ to intimate fome of the Reafons, why 
I think Chymical Experiments may be ufefully apply'd, to it 
lu Urate fome things in Pathologie, either by imitating out of 
the body, the productions of fome forts of morbifick matter, 
or by fuch refolutions as that which is generated in the body, 
as may conduce to the difcovery of its nature. And not that 



Digitized by Google 



(43) 

1 think, 4s Spagyrifts do, fhe experiments or notions of vul- 
gar Chymifts fufficient to explicate the whole doctrine either 
of Digeftionorof Difeafes: for it would be very difficult for 
them to make out the manner of Nutrition,or fo much as how 
they that feed only on Vegetables , fhpuld (to propofe the 
difficulty in their own Terms) have their Blood and Urine co- 
pioufly enrich'd with a Volatile fulphureous5alt , of which 
fort,plants are not wont to yield any in diftillation. And much 
more difficult would it be for them by principles peculiar to 
Chymifts to make out thepropagation of Hereditary difeafes : 
or how madnefs,& Come other diftempers, that do not vifibly 
vitiate the organes of thofe functions that they pervert,(hould 
not only prove hereditary, but lurk very many years in the Diftcrencc bc ; 
inheriting perfons body, before they begin todifclofethem- cween Vui ea c 
felves: and fometimes too, be tranfmjtted from the Grand- * nd m,c ch ^ 
father to the Grand-child, and skip immediately theinterve* m ' ,y ' 
ning Son. And therefore I fay again that I pretend not that 
Vulgar Chymiftry will enable a Phyfician to explicate all or 
mod of the Pathological Phenomena-, but that True Chymi- 
'ftry may aflift him to explicate divers or them , which can 
fcarce be folidly explicated without it. And let mead de, that 
he that throughly under ftands the nature of Ferments, and 
Fermentations, (hall probably bepuch better able then he 
that ignores them, to give a fair account of divers Phenomena The ufc of 
of teveral difeafes (as well Fearers as others; which will per- rf^SS 
haps be never throughly underftood, without an infight into on. 
the doftrine of Fermentation j in order to which, for that and 
other reafons, Idefign'd my Hiftorical notes touching that 

fubjed. Of Per oral 

Yet I am not fure, but there may be effervefcences , ( and e&rcfccces in 
peihaps periodical ones J in the Blood and other Juices of the *■ fcood 
body without Fermentation properly fo call'd. For there * c * eiBKmatl ~ 
may be divas other wayes of begetting a pros ternatuial heat . 

f 3 N in 



Digitized by Google 



144 ) 

in die Blood. Wc often fee that to Coughs, when the flegme 
is rotten (as they fpeak) that is , when its former vifcous tex- 
ture is altered, it does no longer ftick faft to the veflels of the 
Lungs, to which it obftinately adher'd before. And fo at cer- 
tain times other humours in the body,either by growing more 
fluid themfelves, or by fome change in the Blood, whereby it 
becomes fitter so difiolve fuch humours, may fwimme in, and 
be circulated with the mafs ot blood, and thereby occafion 
preternatural heats: either by their indifpofition to be well 
incorporated therewith* §r by altering its texture: or di- 
fturbing the wonted motion of its minute parts . or by oppo- 
fingitsdue Rsrefaclion as it patTeth through the Heart : or by 
obftru&ing the more (lender Veiltls,and fo hindering the free 
Circulation of the Blood through them-, perhaps alio caufing 
fome Extravafation,as we fee that wounds &b; uifes areatter.- 
ded with fome inflammation,more or lefs,or the part affected* 
or by fome other of the way es not now to be declared. And 
tryal hath taught me, that there are Liquors inwhr.hthe 
bare admixture of Milk, Oyl, or other Liquors,nay or of cold * 
water,will prcfently occafion a notable heat: and I fometimes 
employ a menftruum* in which nothing but a little flefli being 
put, though no vifible Ebullition enfue, there will in a few 
minutes, be excited a Hsat intenfe enough to be.troublefome 
to him that holds the Glafs. And yet it feems not neceflary 
that this mould be afcrib'd to « true fermentation,which may 
rather proceed from the perturb'd motion of the Corpu r des 
of the menftruum, which being by the adventitious liquor or 
other body put out of their wonted motion, and into an inor- 
dinate one,there is produe'd in the menftruum a brisk confus'd 
Agitation of the fmall parts that compofeit * and in fuch an 
agitation ( from what caufe foever it proceeds ) the nature 
of Heat feems mainly to confift. But to difpatch, I fcarce 
doubt, but that if in the hiftory of difeafes, there were better 

notice 



Digitized by Google 



f45) 

aotice taken of thofe rhdrtomena, that agree not with the opi- 
nions already in requeft, as well as of thofe that are thought 
confonant to them t and if alfo Cnymical tryals were skilfully 
varied and judicioufly applyed to this illuftrating of Patholo- 
gical Phdnoment, the former might be made conducing to 
the better explication or the lattei : efpecially if the bufinefs 
were manag'd by a Naturalift well verfed both in Chymical 
Experiments, and in Anatomy, and the hiftory of Difeafes, 
without being too much addicted either to the Chymift's no- 
tions, or the received opintons of Phy ficians. 

And as the Naturalift may this illuftrate Pathology as a ofcheiifc of 
Chy mift, fo may he do the like as a Zoologer , for either the jKSJL 
true knowledge of Anatomy muft be much lefs ufeful to of D.fcaf«* 
. Phyficians that they have hitherto believed, or elfe the diCco* 
veries made by recent Anatomifts of the Atdlian, Pecquetian, 
and Bartholmun vetfels, by either overthrowing the receiv'd 
doclrine of Digeftions,(from who fe aberrations many difeafes 
fpringj or at leaft by making divers difcoveries in relation to 
the Occonomy of Digeftions unknown to the Ancients, muft 
probably contribute much to the clearing up of divers Pa- 
thological difficulties in the explication of fome di (eales $ be- 
fides, that the very liberty of making thofe Experiments in 
live Beafts, which are not to be made but in living creatures, 
nor are allowable to be made in living mcn,may enable a Zo- 
ologift, by giving us a clearer account of divers parts of the 
bo'dy, to determine divers Pathological difficulties fpringing 
from either our ignorance or miftakes of the ufe of thofe 
parts, as by the formerly mention d Experiment of iheexfe- 
dion of a live dog's Spleen, and a watchful obfervation of 
ail the difeafes upon that Account, befalling him and other 
clogs fo fen* 'd- ? much light perhaps may be given to the doctrin 
of the ufe of the Spleen, together with the difeafes fuppofed 
to depend on that part, which I fear is hitherto (to the no 

f 3 ' tmali 



Digitized by Google 



(**) 

fmall prejudice of the Sick) by few Phyficians throughly un- 
der fto&d, and by many unhappily enough miftaken. 

And here we may reprefent unto you, Pyr. that not only 
the difleSions of found Beafts may aflift the Phyfician to dil. 
cover the like parts of a humane body, but the difle&ions of 
morbid beafts may fometimes illuftrate the doctrine of the 
caufes and feats of difeafes. For that this part of Pathology 
has been very much improved by the diligence of modern 
Phyficians, by diflefting the bodies of men kili'd by Difeafes , 
we might be juftly accufed of want ofcuriofity, or gratitude, 
if we did not thankfully acknowledge-, For indeed much or 
that improvement of Phyfick, (for which the Antien ts, they 
were not alivej, might envy our new Phyficians) may, in my 
poor opinion, be afcribed to their induftrious fcrutiny of the % 
Seat and Eftefts of the peccant matter of Difeafes in tke bo- 
dies of thofe th3t have been deftroyed by them. 

And that the inftru&ions deduciblefromfuchobfervations 
may be either increafed or illuQrated by the like obfervations 
made in the bodies of Beafts, we have been inclin'd to think, 
partly by the having Chymically analyz d (as they phrafe it) 
the Blood of divers Brutes, as Sheep, Deer,<fr. and found its 
Phlegme, Spirit, Stir, and Oyl, very like that of humane 
blood ; and partly by our having obferv'd in the bodies of fe- 
veral Brutes,(not excepting Fiihes ) Worms, Impofthumes, 
and the like, fome of which feem'd maniteftly to fpring from 
fuch caufes as are wont to produce rcfembling diftenpers in 

Hrft "rfbwi" men ; ^ ncl ^ the acutc Hclmm na( * Deen 3 more diligent difo- 
[hZ the Scone clor of Beafts he would perchance have efcaped the Error he 
haf.fcafu pe- after others run into(and into which his Authority hath temp- 
ci^iar to Man. ted otners t0 run } when heaffirm'd , that the Stone was a 

dtfeafe peculiar to men, for that in the bodies of Beafts, efpeci- 
ally very Old ones, Stones are fbmtimes to be found, not 
only feveral Butchers have allured me , but you may gather 

partly 



Digitized by Google 



(47) 

partly from that taken out of aq Oxes Gall, which I have 
formerly mention'd , which was about the bignefs of a Wall- 
nutj but principally from what I elfewhere deliver'd on par- 
pofe tb difprove that fond alTertion : and greater leifure may, 
upon another occafion, invite us to mention fome Pathologi- 
cal Obfervations made in difeafed Bealls, by which (were we 
not willing tohaften) we raighr now perhapsjmuch confirm 
what we have propofed touching the poilibility of illuftra- 
ting, by fuch Obfervations,the nature of fome of the Difeafes 
incident to humane bodies, 

, And here we may alfo confider that there are divers Ex- 
plications of particular Difeafes, or troubiefome Accidents 
propofed by Phyficians,efpccially fincethe Difcovery of the 
Bloods Circulation, wherein the Compreflion, Obftru&ton, 
or Irritation of fome Nerve, or the Difttnfion of fome Veine 
by too much Blood, or fome Hmderance of the free Paflage 
of the Blood through this or that particular Vcflel, is aflign'd 
for the caufe of this or that Difeafe or Sy mptome, Now in 
diverfe of thefe cafes the Liberty lately mention'd, that a 
skilful DiiTe&or may take in Beafts, to open the Body or 
Limbs, to make Ligatures ftrong or weak on the veiTels, or 
other inward parts, as occafion mall require, to leave them 
there as long as he pleafeth,to prick,or apply fharp liquors to 
any nervous or membranous part, and whenever he thinks 
convenient , to diiTeft the Animal again, to obferve what 
change his Experiment hath produced there : Aiih a Liberty I 
fay, which is not to betaken in humane bodies, may in fome 
cafe either confirm or confute the Theories propofed, and fo 
put an end to divers Pathological Controversies, and per- 
haps too occafion the Difcovery of the true and genuine cau x 
fes of the Ph women a difputed of , or of others really as ab- 
ftrufe. 

To this let me adde, that there is a whole clsfis of difeafes 

to 



us; 

to be met with in Phyficians Bookes, which proceed not ori- 
ginally from any inccrnall diftemper of the Patient , bot are 
produced by fome exterior Poyfon , aod are therefore wont 
to be call'd by Doctors, Morbi a veneno orti^o the m6re ac- 
curate knowledge of divers of which Difeafes , Experiments 
made on Brutes may not a little conduce : For though I deny 
not that fomertiings may bePoyfons to Man, that arenot 
fo to fome Beads •, and on the contrary fas we have more than 
once given to a Dog , without much harming him , fuch a 
quantity of opium , as would probably have fuffie'd to have 
kill'd feverall Men; yet the greater number of Poyfons be- 
ing fuch both to Man and brutes , the liberty of exhibiting 
them , when, and in what manner we pleafe, to thefe ( which 
we dare not do to him )a!lowes us great opportunities of ob- 
fcrving their manner of operation and inveftigating' their Na- 
ture as our felves have tryed , and that lbmetimes with un- 
expected events ( as when lately a Cat ran mad, fo that her 
Keeper was fain to kill her) upon a large dole of Opium which 
wecaufed to be given her* 

And on this occafion I fliall not fcruple to tranferibe an Ob- 
fervation out of a Difcourfe , I fome yeares fince writ to a 
Friend, about the turning Poyfons into Medicines , becaufe 
that Treatife I am like, for certain reafons, to fupprefTe: The 
words 3 as 1 there find thenyre thefe, 
That the Vc- Before I tike leave of Vtpcrs ( or Adders , <u fome wiU'have 
r.om of Vipers thofe that here tn England commonly p*Qefor Vtp£rs)it will not 
ri^chkp/iT be impertinent to tell you, That it may he ]u(lly doubted .whether 
the race and thij be to be reckon'd among ft poyfonous Creatures , in fuch a 
£? vm* 1 f f *f e ** tbofe other venomous Creatures, who have in them a 
nw'-.nSvprt cenftant, and if 1 may fo fpcake, groffe and tangible Poyfon , 
cf (he bodyth.t for it may be fuppofed , that the venom of Vtpcrs conftfts chiefly 
t-mesaV-ortall in the rage and fury wherewnh they bite ^ and not in any part of 
property. the Body , which hath at all times a mortall property. Thus the 



Digitized 



by Go< 



(49) 

madnefs of a Dog makes his teeth f } ojfonous ,which before were not 
fo: And Authors of good repute* faff ply us with in fiances of hurts 
tn themfelves, free from danger, that have been made fatal by a 
V+nom created by the percent ffe of the enraged {thi ugh not other- 
wife poyfonous) Creatures that infiitled them. And Baccius,i/ / 
mi (lake not,in his Treatife De Venenis,f<r& tss a memorable Sto- 
ry ( whereof he affirms himfelfto have been an eyewitneffe) of* 
Man who was killed within three days, by a flight hurt receive din 
his left handjrom an enraged Dung'hiU Cock: And that no parts 
$f the Viper have any con ft ant inherent Pojfon in thcmjhi 
induced to fufpcfi upon this Experiment s That differing f 
Vipers, there came in accidentally a jlrange Dog, to whom I gave 
the Hcad,Tail,and Gall ( whtch are the farts fuppofed to contain 
thePoyfon)ofone of 'them \& the Head and Gall of another ,n rapt 
up in meat s after which J locked* the tit tie Dog up in my ownCham* 
her, and watched him,but found not that he was fuk, or offered to 
vomit at all, but only lapped up greedily fome drink whichheefpycd 
in the Room-, nor was he alone very jocund , for dfvers hours that 
I kept him in, but liked his entertainment fo well,* that he would 
• afterwards, when be met me in the Street, leave thofe that kept 
htm to fawn on and follow me. And having ftnce related this Ex- 
periment to an inqutfitive Friend of mine, he affured me, T hat to 
fat is fie himf elf further in this particular ,he gave to a Dog. a dozen ' 
Heads andGalls of Vipers, without finding them to produce in htm 
any mifchuvow fymptome : To which J fhall adde,That the old 
Manjou know, that makes Viper Wine, does it ( as himfelf tells 
me) by leaving the whole Vipers t tf they be not very great perhaps 
for fome months, without taking out the Galls, or (eparattng any 
' other part from them in the Wm % till it hath dtffolvcd as much 
efthemasitcan. 

^ind though it may feem fomewhat improper^ whil'fl we are 
difouurftng of Poyfons, to inftft on a remedy again fl them-, jet 
she mention of Vipers recalling into my minde a memorable Ex- 

g * periment 



($0) 

toA^Sf t trimm which I uyed again ft the bHbf rfrifers, Ifhallchoofe 
of Vipers! ' S rather to decline the dictates of OW ethod , then thofe of Charity y 
• which forbids me to fuppreffe a remedy that may poflibly refcue 

• from fudden death \ a Per [on or other fit to live, or unpreparedto 
dye; becaufe it does not fir icily b:long to the Theme whereto it is 
referred. The remedy then is this, that as foon as ever a Man is 
bitten (for if the Poyfon have had time enough to dtffufe it fie/fa 
and gain the Mafs of Blood , / doubt the Experiment will fcarce 
fucceed ) a hot Iron* be held as near the place as the Patient can 
pofitbly endure, till it have, as they fpeak, drawn out all the Ve- 
nom : which Eye witnefjes aflure me (for 1 have not yet feen that 
my [elf ) will fometimes adhere itkc a yellowijh foot to the (urfaci 
$f the Iron. But being upon competent grounds fatiified of the 
Experiment, to convince a Phyftcianthat miflrufied it , / laft 
Summer hired a Man(who doubted it as little m J) to [ujferhim* 
f elf to be bitten by a Viper and having in the Phiftctans houfe 
and pre fence, picked out of a good number of them one of the 
blackeft I could finde ( thoje of that colour being fuppofedthe mo ft 
mischievous ) Ind commanded the fellow to provoke and anger it 
( which to my wonder he did, a pretty while before the beajl would * 
faflen on him ) K^d t length, being by his very rude handling tho- 
rowly exafperatedy it bit him with great fury, as it feemed $ for 
immediately his hand began to [well , and the injured part was 
grown tumtd before we could take from the Fire, which was hard 
by, a knife that lay heating there 5 and having appljed it as near 
as he could fuffcr it* for about ten or twelve . minutes , we found 
that the {wettings hough decreafed not, did not fpread\ and the 
• Man glad of his mony \wtthout further Ceremony, went about his 
afairs^andtoldmefince^ That though the tumor continued a 
while^ he had no other inconvenience attending />, and hath di- 
vers times got mony by repeating the Experiment, though otber- 
• wife, by the ca\ual bttin^s of Vipers^ he hath been muchdi/hefi 9 
and his fVifealmofi kill, I 

But, 



id by Google 



.'(5!) • • • 

But, ryrephilut, to return to the Experiments of Poyfons 
made on Beads," we could wifh Phy ficians were more diligent 
to make trials of them , not only by giving Beafts Poyfons 
at the mouth, bat alfo by making external applications of 
them, efpecially in thofe parts where the VelTels that convey of wemai 
Blood more approach the furface of the Body , and alfo by p^J^JJ of 
dexteroufly wounding determinate Veins with Instruments j tt r,nVti'"m 
dipt in Poyfons ( efpecially moift or liquid ones ) that being ir *° thz v ^ 
carried by the circulated Blood to the Heart and Head, it may d Bufti - 
be found whether their ftrength be* that way more uninfring- 
ed', and their operation more fpeedy (or otherwife differing) 
then if they were taken in at the mouth. For I remember fober 
Travellers have mewed mefome indun Poyfons, whofe no- 
xious efficacy they affirmed to be by great intervals of timej 
<fifferingly mortal , according as the flight hurt made by the 
points or Airov\s, infe&ed with them, did open 3 capillary 
or larger Vein, and were inflicted on a part more or lefs cMbnt 
from the Hearty but having not # yet made any try.il of this 
my felf, I dare not build upon it. Yet I finde that the for- 
merly commended olearim t 'm his Travels into diufecvieznd rTfl • 
ferfta^ takes notice of a venomous Infedfc in Perfia, which the «i!-?VV 
Natives call Uncureck , and which he (how*juft!y I know not) 'W^pg jm- 
makes to be a kind of Tardntula^ becaufe it is, as ihn Crea- 
ture, in fhape aimolThke a Spider, and fpeckled, though of 
twice the bignefle of a Thumb : This Inftd ( fays he)inftcad 
of flinging or biting, lets his Venom fall in form of a drop of 
Water, which immediately produces infufferable pains in the 
part to which it faftens, and fuddenly* penetrating, as far as to 
the Stomach, fends up vapors to the Head, which fends again 
(to ufe hisexprcflion) fo profound a fleep to all the Patients 
limbs , that it is impofiible to awaken him , but by one only 
Remedy, which-is to crulh one of thefe Creatures upon the 

g 2. hurt, 



Digitized by Google 



hart, whence he abftra&s all the Poyfon. Some horrid and 
anuiual fy mptomes of thisVenom,which yet agree not fo well 
with thofe that are wont to be produced in Perfons bitten by • • 
Tarantulas, our Author proceeds to mention , and iurniflies 
us with a proof of what we were lately faying, when we told 
"you that fome things were poy fonous to Men,which were not . 
to fome Beads : by adding, as an admirable Angularity, that 
the Sheep of thofe parts do not only eat thefe fatal Infe&s",but 
feek for them. I know alfo, by fad experience in my fclf, 
what an outward application even of Camharidcs can dp- for 
having occafion to have a large blifter drawn on my Neck,the 
Chirurgion I employed, unknown to me,made ufe of Canthr 
r/W«,among other Ingredients of his veil eating Piaifter, w hi ch 
a few hours after I had taken it , waken'd me with exceflive 
torment, to which it put rae about the neck of my Bladder, fo 
that I apprehended it might proceed from fome Stone unable 
to get out-, of which fuddainand fenfible pain, after I hid a 
while in vain conjedured what might be the caufe, I at length 
fufpe<5fced that which was indeed the true one* and having fent 
for the Chirurgion,heconfeiTed to me.upon my demand, that ' 
he had put fome CanUarides in his Piaifter , not thinking it 
would have had fufh an operation: whereupon Jfoonrelicv'd 
my felt , by drinking new Milk very well fweetned with Su- 
gar-candy. 

POSTSCRIPT. 

^TO enable yoa, Pyrofhllus, to gratifie thofe inquifitive 
* Perfons that have heard fome , and yet but an imperfeft 
Report, ofamuch noifed Experiment, that was fome Years 
agoe devifed at Oxford, and fince tryed in other places before 
very Illuftrious Spe&ators-, 1 am content to cake the occaiion 
afforded me, by what was in the foregoing Eflay lately men- 

tion'd 



Digitized by Google 



(S$) . 

tion'd concerning the Application of Poyfons, to inform you* 
That a pretty while after the writing.of that EfTay, I hap- 
pen'd to have fomc Difcourfe about matters of the like Na- 
ture, with thofe excellent Mathematicions, D r ^ Wilkint^ * 
and M r Chrjfltpber Wren s at which the latter of thofe fhUh _ 
cfi told us, That he thought he could eafily contrive a way l^i n ^f 
to convey any liquid Poyfon immediately into the Mafle of quid poyfons 
Blood. Whereupon, our knowledge or his extraordinary j^ ed ^ lc f Iy 
Sagacity , making u>yery deilrous to try what'he propofed, Jj blood.* * 
I provided a large Dog, on which he made his Experiment in 
theprefence, and with the aiTiftanceof fomeEminent Phyfi- 
cians,and other Learned.men : His way (which is much better 
learned by fight then relation ) was briefly this : Firft, to- 
make a imall and opportune Incifion'over that part of the 
hind-leg, where the larger Vtflels that carry the Blood , are 
mod eafie to be taken hold of: Then to make a Ligature up- 
on thofe Vtflels, and to apply a certain fmall Plate of BratYe 
(oi above half an Inch long, and about a quarter of ao Inch 
broad, whofe fides were bending inwards j almoft of the ihape 
and bignefleoftheNailofa Mans Thumb, but fomewhat 
-longer. This Plate had four little holes in the fides, near the 
corners, that by threads pafTed thorow them, it might be well 
f aliened to the Vefiel : And in the fame little Plate there was 
alfo left an Aperture, or fomewhat large Slit , parallel to the ' 
fides of it, and almoft as long as the Plate, that the Vein 
might be there expofed to the Lancet, and kept from ftartii 
afide. This plate being well fattened on, he made a Slit aloi.. 
the Vein, from the Ligature towards the Heart, great enougL 
to put in at it the (lender Pipe of a Syringe : By which I had 
propofed to have injected a warm folution of Opium in Sack * 
that the effect of our Experiment might be the more quick 
and mamfeft. And accordingly our dexterous Experimentev 
havingfurmounted (he difficulties which the tortured Dogs 

g i violent 



Digitized by Google 



. fS4> 

violent, ftruglings interpofed, conveyed a fmall Dofe of the 
Solution or Tinfture into the opened Veflel, whereby, get- 
ting in o the mafs of Blood ( fome quantity or" which , 'tis 
hard to avoid (bedding in the operation) it was quickly, by 
the circular motion of That , carryed to the Brain , and other 
parts of the Body. So that we had fcarce untyed the Dog 
(whofe four feet it had been fequifue to fatten very ftrongly 
to the four Corners of the Table) before the Ofitfin beg3n to 
difclofe its N Jrcotick Quality and almoft 4s foon as he was 
upon his feet, he began to nod with his head, and faulter and 
reel in his pace, and prefently after appeared fo ftupified, that 
there were Wagers offered his Lite could not be laved. But I, 
that was willing to referve him for further obfervation,caufed 
him to be whipped up and down the Neighboring "Garden, 
whereby being kept 3wake and in motion, after fome time 
he began to come to himfelf again * and being led home, and 
carefully tended , he not only recovered, but begsn to grow 
fat fomanifeftly that 'twas.admired: But I could not long ob- 
fer ve how it fared with him. For this Expei iment,and fome 
othoj tryals I made upon him, having made him famous, he 
was Toon after ftoln away from me. Succeeding attempts in- 
formed us th:t the Plate was not nectiTary,if the Finger were 
skilfully employed tofupportthe Vtflel to be opened-, and 
' that a flender Quill, fattened to a Bladder, containing the mat- 
ter to be injected , was fomewhat more convenient then a Sy- 
ringe*, as ai(o that this notwithft nr.ing,unltile the Dog were 
pretty big^and lean, that the Vtflels might be large enough 
and eafily acce'lfibie, the Experiment would not well fucceed.- 
The Inventor of it afterwards pradifed it in the prefence of 
that mod Learned Noble- man, the Marquefs ofDorthtfttr , 
and found that a moderate Dofe of the mfufion of Crccw 
MttAllornm did not much move the Dog to whom it was 
given: but one? that he injected a large Dofe (about two 

Ounces . 



. # Digitized by Google 



• (55) 

Ounces or more) it wrought fo foon, and fo violently npon a 
frefti one,that within a few hours after he vomited up Life and 
all,upon the Straw whereon they had laid him. I afterwards 
wifhed, that not onlv fome vehemently working Drugs, but 
their appropriated Antidotes or elfe powerfull liquid Cordi- 
als ) and alfo fome altering Medicines, might be in a plentifull 
Dofe inje&ed. And in Diureticks a very ingenious Anaco* 
mift and Phy fician told me,he tryed it with very good fuccefs. 
I likewifc propofed, That it it could be done, without either 
too much danger or cruelty , tryal might be made upon fome 
humane Bodies, efpeciaily thofc of Malefa&ors. And fome 
Moneths after, a forreign Ambafiador, a curious Perfon, ac 
that time refiding in London , cid me the honour to vi fix me, 
and inform'd me/That he had caus'd tryal to be made, with in- 
fu/ion of Crocus Met allorum ,upon an inferior Domcftick or his 
that deferv'd to have been hang'di but that the felIow,as foon 
as ever the Injeclion began to be made, did (either really or 
craftily ) fall into'a Swoon 5 whereby being unwilling to pro- 
fecute fo hazardous an Experiment, they defifted.without fee- 
ing any .other Effect of it, fave that it was told the Ambafla- 
dor, that it wrought once downward with him , which yet 
might, perftaps, be occafioned for fear or anguilli: But the 
trials of a vay dexterous Ph) fician of my acquaintance io 
humane Bodies, will perhaps , when I (hall have received a 
more circumftantial account of them, benorpnwelcometo 
you. And in Dogs, you may poiTibl y from Hr own Obfer- 
vations , receive a further Account of an. Experiment , of 
which I now chiefly defigned but to relate to you the Rife and 
firft Attempts. 

■ ' ESSAY 



(i6) 



T 



m m mm itiSiiiil 

ESSAY III 

Containing fome T articular s relating fa fta 
Semeioticat Tart of Thy/icl^ . 

• 

He Semesottcal part of the Phyficians Art,feems capa- 
ble of the leaft improvement by Natural Ptiiloib- 
phy. In which yet, firft the Naturalift may, by ilia- . 
• ftrating the Anatomical and Pathological parts, aifift the Phy- 
fician to make more certain conjectures from thefigns hedif- 
covers of the conftitution and diftempers of his Patienr. For 
you will eaiily believe that uteris paribus, he that better 
knows the natureofthe parts and juices of the Body, jvili be 
better able to conjt&ure at the events of Difeafes , then he 

T r^cmim™* thac is ^ fs skilled in lhem * And ( €Condl 1, The tfaturalift by 
Ef Tkr4*«- improving the Therapeutical , may, at leaft, nmh change and 
tUai would ai- a i ter tne p r os;nofticks of the duration , ferocity and event of 
S h cks P InThc* Difeafc? . f jc, Pjropbilus, it would be confidered, that the 
scmciot.cat Predictions hSerto current in Authors,and commonly made 
parcofphyfick. by Phyficians, fuppofe the ufe of the received Remedies, and 
the dogmatical method of Phyfick-, but if there weredifco- 
vered fuch generous and commanding Medicines, as, by pow- 
erfully aflifting Nature, or nimbly profcribing the Morbifuk 
Matter that doth either produce or ( though prod&Vd by 
them ) cherifli Sicknefles, might enable Naxufeto hinder the 
9 Difeafe from continuing its courfe , and acting almoft all the 

Scenes 



Digitized by Google 



f 57) 

Scenes of its Tragedy in the Body? Phyficians need not in 
acute Difeafes wait fo often for a crifts to inftrud* their Prog- 
nofticks} and the threatning Symptomes of Chronical! Di- 
ftcm pers would often prtve falfe Prophets. 

Toilluftratethisbut with a not ignoble in ftance, give me An iufWto 
leave to tell you, That when that PerwunBxkc, that now S^p™^ 
begins robe'fomewhat taken notice of, under the name of Barke. 
Iht ?ef*its Piwdtr, had fcarce been fo much as heard of in this 
part of Eurcpc , I went to vifit a Virtuoso, who had been for 
fome Months affiided with a Quart3n Ague , fo violent and 
ftubborne, that it had fruftrated the skill, and almoft tyred 
the endeavours of the moft eminent Doctors of this Nation; 
of one of which, who was then accidentally with his Learned 
patienr , I enquired how my Friend did, andwasanfwered, 
That he hoped he would recover when the Seafon would give 
him leave 5 but in the Winter he knew no Quartans cured. 
Yet the Gentleman acquainting me with his having procured 
fome of the Atnerican Barke againft Agues, which we men- 
tioned in arormer Eflay, and I ( after having tafted and confi- 
dercd it) having encouraged him, as I have others, to make 
Tryallofit, as the ftrange Effects I have obftrv'dof it, hath 
divers times invited me to do : The candid and learned Do- 
^or, notonely oppofednot my perfwafions, but added his 
owne to them. And my Friend taking two Dofes of this pow- 
dered Barke though it were at the unhopefull Seafon of the 
Year(the Winter Soifticc)and though he fcarce found any fen- 
fibie operatio^CunlefTe a little by fweat)of the Ytruvun Me- 
dicine, had by the firft Dofe his Fit very much Ieflen'd, and 
by the lecond quite removed. And though through fome irre- 
gularities of Dyet ( to which that keen Appetite , like that of 
recovering per Tons, which I have obferv'd this powder to be 
wont to produce, tempted him ) he did, as I then foretold him 
he would*, after muling eight or ten Fits, relapfe 3 yet by the 

h # repeated 



Digitized by Google 



repeated ufe of the fame Remedy, be againe recovered, and 
bath continued foever fince. Having alfo lately perfwaded 
the ofe of the fame Medicine, in the fame Difeafe, to one of 
the greattft Ladies in this Nation, 4he told me the other day, 
That it immediately, and in unlikely weather, freed her from 
thofe Fits, from whence fhe difpaired to be delivered till the 
Spring- Having likewifefent fomeof ittoa couple of Gen- 
tlemen, fick ot the like Malady , I had word brought me, 
That the one had milled his Fits for a» Month , though in the 
midft of Winter-, and the other was by the firft Dote cured, 
and continues fo. And diver fe eminent Phylicians to whom 
I have commended the Specifick, haveuled it with fuchfuc. 
celTe , that one of the fevereft of them , though he had for- 
merly difpifod it,confefled to me, that in a lliort time he tr\ ed 
it upon eight or nine leverall Peifons, without finding it to fail 
in any , though one of them efpeciallv, were, before he was 
called, judged irrecoverable, the obftinate Quartan being 
complicated with other almoft as dangerous Diftempers. 
And I confefsj fomewhat wonder that Men have not the Cu- 
riofity to try theefjicacie of this powerfull B3rk,in Other Dili 
eafts than Agues; It being highly probable , That a Medi- • 
cine,capable to prevaile fo ftrongly againft fo obftinate a Dif- 
eafe, as a Quartan (wherein moft commonly civers of the 
confiderable parts of the Body are much affefted ) cannot be 
ufeleffe to feverall other Diftempers. I deny not th3t thofe 
that have taken this Powder , have divers of thereafter ha- 
ving miffed fix or feven Fits,relapfed into them ( as it likewife 
happened t o one of the Gentlemen I fent it to) yet ( as I have 
elfewheretoldyou)itismuch, and more than any common 
Remedy does to ftop the Fit fo long . Nor is it a fmall mat- 
ter to be able to give the Patient fo much breathing time, and ' 
allow the Phyfician the opportunity of imploying other Re 
me dies. And the Rtlapfes we ipeake of are commonly cured 



Digitized by ( 



• . fSP) 

by the fame Powder : And we have knowne them prevented, 
when the Medicines hath been adminiftred, not byunskilfull 
Perfons,but by a prudent Phyfician who knowes how to aflift 
it, by opening and gently purging Ph\ fick. Wherefore that 
which Ifhouldbemoft gladly befatisfied of, about this Re- 
ined vr, is, whet her or no it do indeed either profcribe the Mor- 
bifick Matter, or fo alter its Texture as to make it harmlefle; 
orelfe, whether it doth" fccretly leave fuch noxious Impref- 
fions upon the Spleen, Guts , or fome other important Part, gum, and a new 
as may fliorten Life, by producing in procede of time , either ^ rc ^.jj 10 
the Scurvy, 05 the Dropfie , or fome other formidable dif- irgs 
eafc. But becaufe the Refolurion of this Doubt muft be a 
worke oftime, we muft at prefent refer it to future Obferva- 
tion-, And therefore (hall now fubjoyne , that if the famous Kh(rius ^ t 
Rtvtritu have not , in his learned Obfervations , flattered his Jb/twaV* 
owne Fcbrifugum, whatever he jefolved touching this IndUn 
Bark,there will not want a fafe remedy which may allow Phy • 
ficians to make more chearfull Predictions about the lofting- 
nefle and event of Quartans,thanhave hitherto been ufuall. 

How painful and ftubborn a Difeafe the Kings Evil is wont 
to prove, is fcarce more knowne, than that 'tis feldome cured 
without a tedious courfc of Phyfick : And yet , by the Herb 
mention d in one of tlje former Eflayes,the young Gentleman 
there fpoken of, was cored in a fliorttime, and with little or 
00 * paine or trouble. And that thefe are not the only Difeafes " fUt infra 
in which Obfervations, tending to our prefent purpofe, may "MP-* 0 *- 
be made the following part of thisTreaiife will afford you op- 
portunity to obferve- 

I might adde, Pyrofhilus , that I was lately vifited by an 
ancient Chymift, enobleiby divers eminent cures, who pro- 
mifeth tome an Experiment of making very unu(uall,and yec 
rarionall Predidionsin fomeabftrufe Difeafes, by a peculiar 
fining the patients Urine. But becaufe fome 

h 2 Chymifls 




Digitized by Google 



(6o) 

Chymifts have written extravagantly enough opon a like Sub^ 
}e& * and becaufe I have not yet made or feen the Experiment 
or it my felf , 1 dare not yet give this new method of foretel- 
ling/or an inftanreof the Ufefulnefs of Nataral Philofophy 
tothe Semeiotical part of Phyfick. Though I dare not deny 
but by precipitations, and fome other wayes not yet vulgarly 
pradifed or examining the Urine, made by the fame Patient 
atfcveral times, before, in, and after fome notable alteration 
in his Body, divers things (efpecially in Feavers, and other 
acute Difeafes) relating to the ftate of it, may bedifcover'd, 
efpecially if thereto be added a skilful and Seasonable Chy- 
' mical Examen of the other Excremcnts,and vitiated Subftan- 
ces of the Patients Body. 

You will perchance expeel, Pjrofhilus, that on thrsocca- 
iion I fhould handle that controverfie which is fo hotly agita- 
ted, betwixt the Paracelftdrts and their Adversaries, concern* 
ing the curablenefs of all Difeafes : But,for ought I can per- 
That thou h ^ve, the difference betwixt the more fober Men of both par- 
no aiSIfc ties, is more about Words then Things, and might be redu* 
fhouid be in- ced to a much lefs diftance, if man could but calmly confider, 

cv"tdifca y fc i$ That ' ti$ onc lhin § t0 difpote, Wbethtr all Difeafes be curable-, 
bo! curable in and another, Whether all Per fans he recoverable: For a Dif- 
fer? Patient, ^fg ma y be called incurable, either io its own Nature, or by . 
accident j that is , either becaufe fuch a* Difeafe is not to be 
cur'd in any Patient, or that it is fo circumflantiated in this or 
that Patient as not to be naturally curable in him. Now 
tbisdiftinftly, duly confidered, may conduce much.ro recon- 
cile the two Opinions, if not the parties that maintain them: 
For neither would a fober Paracetfiamfaxm (though Par*' 
eel fits himfelf doch fomcwhere feem to do Co) That every 
Difeafe is curable in every Patient * there being fome Palfies, 
Gouts or Blinineffes, or the likes fo obftinate, that efpe- 
cially if they are born with a Man, or inherited from his pa- 
rents 



zed by Google 



(*0 

nott J the tone of Tome necefl'ary or confiderable part of the 
Body, being thereby rather abolifhed, than barely vitiated, 
it were a tolly to promife recovery to fuch a Patient. And on 
the other fide, a moderate Gslemfc that it is not unacquainted 
with the Difcoveries which thefe latter Ages have made of the 
power of Nature and Art, will not be forward to pronounce 
fas others do, add as the Par ace I pans tax the Galemfls too in- 
difcriminately for doing; That the Gout (for inftance) the* 
Dropfie, and the dead Palfie, the Stone, are difeafes univer- 
fally incurable f Since in the Writings of Era/ius, and in the 
Obfervations of Schcnktw, and others, there are Infhnces 
recorded of Come Cures performed of the Dropfie, and one 
or two more ofthofe ftubborn Difeafe^even by G Ahmed 
Remedies. 

But, Pyrefhilut, though we cannot but difapprove the ^ 0 -?f ^ 
vain-glorious Boafts of Pardcelfus himfclf, and fome of his tcr Cures than 
Followers, who, for all that, lived no longer than other Men $ * di " ar ][ l J dl - 
Yet I think Mankind owes fomething to the Chymifts, for SfS^makc" 
having put fome Men in hope in doing greater Cures than- profitable 
have been formerly afpir'dto,or even thought poffible, and Tr * ah - 
thereby engage them to make Tryals and Attempts in otder 
thereunto. For not only before Men were awaken'd and ex- 
cited by the many Promifes and fome great Cures of Ar- 
nold™ it VilU novA, Paracelfua^ RuUndm , St verinm and 
Hclmont $ Many Phylicians were wont to be too forward, to 
pronounce Men, troubled with fuch and fucb Difeafes > incu- 
rable, and rather detract from Nature and Art , than confefs 
that thofe two could do what ordinary Phy lick could not. 
But even now , I fear there are but too many , who though 
they will not openly affirm, that fuch and fuch Difeafes are 
abfolutely incurable 5 yet if z particular | Patient , troubled 
with any of them , be prcfented, they will be very apt to on- 

b £ dervalue 



Digitized by Google 



dervalue (at leaft) if not deride thofe that (hall attempt and 
hope to Cure him. 

And I am apt to think, that many a Patient hath been fuf- 
fcred to dye, whofe Life might have been faved, if Phyilcians 
would have but thought it pollible to fave it. And therefore 
I think it were no ill piece of fervice to Mankind, if a fevere 
Collection were made of the Cures of fucb Perfons as have 
Recovered of having been judged irrecoverable by the Do- 
ctors : That Men might no longer excufe their own Ignorance 
by the impotency of Nature, and bear the World in hand, as 
if the Art of Phyfick, and their skill, were of the fame ex- 
tent. And the Cures that feem performed by Nature her 
felf, need not be left out of fuch a Collection : For (till they 
(hew what is poffiblc to be done by natural means, to evacu- 
ate the Morbiflck matter, or alter its Naturef how dangerous 
foever it is grown) Or how far the tone of a part, or ftrength 
of the Body may be vitiated or impaired, and yet be capable 
les of °f ^ omc re ^^ tu ti°n- And fuch an observation I received from 
rom^nc*^: pur mod experienced Harvy, when, having confulted him a- 
ftcd & Grange b out m y weak Eyes, he told me, among other things (as a 
Cuies. yer y rernar kabj e one ) that he bad once a Patient ( whofe 
Name and Profeflion he told me, but I remember not ) that 
had a confirmed Cataract in bis Eye, and yet upon the ufe of 
Phyfick, to which he could not afcribc fo wonderful an effect, 
that Cataract was perfe&ly diffipated, and the Eyereftored to 
its wonted Function. Which brings into my mind another 
Obfervation, imparted tome a while fince, by that excellent 
and experfene'd Lithotomilt, Mr. Holljer, who told me, that 
among the mnny Patients fent to be ciffed in a great Hofpitai 
• (of which he is one of the Chirurgions; there was a Maid of 
about eighteen years of age, who , without the lofs of mo- 
tioned fo loft the fenfe of feeling in the external parts of 

her 



Digitized by Googlf 



ber Body, that when he had, for tryall fake, pinn'd her Haad- 
kerchiefe to her bare Neck, (lie went up and downe with itfo 
pinn'd, without having any fenfe of what he rud done to 
her. He added, That this Maid having remained a great 
• while in the Hofpitall without being cured, Dr. Harvey t out 
or Curiolity, vitited her fometimes, and fufpe&ing her 
ftrange Diftemper to be chiefly Uterine,and curable onely by 
Hjmeneal Exercifes,headvifed her Parents ( who fent her not 
thither out of poverty ) to take her home , and provide her a 
Husbandry whom, in effect, {he was according to his Prog- 
noftick , and to many Mens wonder, cured of that ftrange 
Difeafe. That in acute Sicknefles, Perfons given over by 
the Phyficians, may recover,the more judicious,even oithofe 
Galcnifis that are ofa dilpondenftemper, will not deny • For 
not onely Celft/s gftes us this fober admonition. Neqne ign*- 
rart opoWet in aams m or bis fallaces magis notasiffe & folutis 
& mortis $ But even Hippocrates himfelle, who was fofktlfull - 
in Prognofticks, conftifes, that M orb or urn acutorumnon in 
totum cert a furtt pra>nunciationcs ncque [alutis neqtte mortis : 
Whence the French have a proverbiall Dying, that livaut 
muux ejire cendamne par les Medicins , qut par le Prevoft des 
CMarefchaux^ as if in Engltfli we fliould fay, // is better to be 
condemned to dye by the Docl l or 3 than by the fudge. And even 
in Chronicall Difeafes, where events are wont much better to 
anfwer Phyficians predictions , there are (omerimes fuch 
Cures performed, as may encourage humane Induftry , and 
keep a tick Mans friends from forfaiting the Cure of him, till 
Life it felfe hath unqueftionably forfaken h m . For not only 
it hath been not unrrtquently feen, that divers perfons, # who 
have been given over by fome Phyficians, have been cured by 
others, perchance rather more lucky than more skilful!.- But 
thofethat have been given over, and that too (fometimes ra» 
ther upon the believ'dincarablenefle of the Difeafe, than the 

perfoaall 



Digitized by Google 



■ 

(6+) 

pcrfonall Condition of the Patient ) even by judicious and 
experienced phyficians, if fuch as are acquainted but with the 
ordinary Remedies, have been recovered by the ufe of extra- 
ordinarily powerfuil, and efpecially, Chymicall phyfick. Of 
fnch Cures I have fometirnes met with a tew, which , becaufe * 
I may elfewhere relate, I fliall now onely mention, on this oc- 
Fumpiei of cation , what I have heard concerning the Cures of Cancers, 
cures cf Can- performed by Dr. Harberfeld, one or the principall phyficians 
ccr,# of Bohemia . And among other relations of this kind, made 

me by credible perfons, I cannot omit one , that was, Of a 
certain Englifti Woman, of fixty and odde yearcs of age, who 
had long lain in an Hoi pi tall in zctUndfxck of a Cancer in the 
Breaft, and by this Doctor was , with one fingle inward Re- 
medy, perfectly cured inthf fpace of three Weekcs* For this 
relation was made me by perfons of veAlrift veracity * the 
one a Do#or of Phyfick, who was aWye-witnWe ofcthe 
Cure*, the other a Childe of C$mtUus Drcbcli's, who not * 
onely faw the Cure, but knew the Woman before , and out 
or Charity brought her to him that healed her . The fame 
perfons likewifc informed mee /That the Chymicall Liquor 
the Doctor conftantly made ufe of,does,in the Dofe, of about 
a fpoonfull or two,work fuddenly and nimbly enough by Vo- 
mit, but hath ver y quickly ended its operation, fo that with- 
in an houre or lefTe, after the patient hath jaken it, he is com- 
monk well againe, and very hungry. And they having pre- 
fented mee fome fpoonfuls of'this Liquor, I find thetafte 
to be oftenfive enough, and not unlike that of Vitriol, 
which, by the tafte and emetick operation , I guefle to be , at 
leaft, its principall Ingredient, however* it be prepared. The 
fame perlons afl'ured mee, that having obtained of Dr. HAber- 
■ feld y a good quantity ot his Specirlck, they had been ( in Eng- 
Ur.d y as well as elfewhere; partly Eye- witnefles, and partly 
Perf ormers of wonderf ull cures by the help of it alone, under 

God, 



Digitized by Google 



• 

God, in the Kings Evil. Infomuch that an eminent Gentle- 
man of this Nation , now alive and healthy, hath been cured 
by it, when the Kings- Evil had brought his Arm'to that pafs, 
that the Chirurgions had appointed a time to cut it off. And 
with the fame Liquor, only take/! inwardly, they profefle 
themfelvoto have feen and done divers Cures of inveterate 
external Ulcers, whofe proud FIcfli, up6n the taking of it, is 
wont to faH off , and then the Ulcer begins to heal at the bot- An «*»i>l« «* 
torn-, but of the recent effeds of this Liquor, we may elfe- J^^fi^ 
where, perhaps, further entertain you* That SufTufions or withaCataraa 
Cataracis, may, by a manual operation , be cured even in a in thc £ y c - 
Patieat that was born with them, I formerly told you, when 
I related the Cure done by my Ingenious Acquaintance, 
Mr, Stepkins, on a Gentlewoman of about eighteen Years of An n other Ex- 
age, that brought a couple of Cataracts with her info the *nvi» °f Ca- 
World. And I remember I was fomewhile fince in thecompany ["J^j* iargc " 
of another Woman, who told me, She was brought to Bed of y • 
five Children (if I much miftake not the number Xucce(fively$ 
of which, (he faw not any in a long while after, by reafon of a 
couple of SufTufions, that bad many. Years blinded her 5 and 
yet now, by the helpofa Dutch Oculift of my Acquaintance, 
(he fees,and reads well,and hath freely enjoyed thereftored ufe 
of her Eyes for fome years already. 

But thefe are rather Chirurgical, then Medicinal Cures, 
and therefore we (hall fubjoyn the Mention of a very memo- 
rable Obfervationof the Learned fetronim^ which being col- 
lated with that a little above recited, from Dr. Hdrvey, they * 
may ferve to keep each other from patting for incredible:^/- Alc«nd.Tra- 
Jam (fays our Author; qui antequam CM orbo Gallic o afftcere- janA'etronius. 
tur altera eculo Cdcus erat, (uffuftone dcnfifiima {vulgtu Catara- rtft^* 6 ^ 4 
clam vocat ) cculum occupante t ti)drargjri inuncfioned Morbt ^d'skeckium 
Gallic*, ejr h fftffufiane, quod maximc mt rum eft y evafit. Neque in Obfav-U. 
a rationc alienum eft inunction* UlaC at draft as pcjjc difiolvijum 

\ hi* 



Digitized by Goc 



{66) 

fr <quem Experlentia deceit fraduros tumores ex fituita crafts 
& c$ncret 4, genitos, illit u Hjdrar^ri fot enter dtfjohL . 

I need not tell you what fad Prognofticks Phyficians arc 
wont to mikeof.Dropfies, efpecially of that fort which they 
call x^i [cites : And indeeS the Event does but too frequently 
juftifie their Predictions , when none but ordinary Remedies 
. are employed. But 1 remember, that being acquainted with 
an Ingenious Perfonthat was very happily cured oPa Dropfie, 
and inquiring who it was that had perform'd the Cure-, I was in- 
form % d,that trm,snd a multitude of the like had been wrought 
by a Germane Phyfician, of whom, and of his Remedy, f 
fh"^ 0 / had heard much Commendation in Holland, where he. liv'd: 
the Dropfie And though on divers occaftons I found him a,modeft Man ; 
and Gout. anc j accordingly , when I asked him concerning his Cures of 
the Drop(ie,he anfwered me, That he neither did,nor would 
undertake to curefo formidable a Difeafci yet he fcrupled noc 
to tell me,That as far as he hid hitherto tryed, he had one Re- 
medy which had not failed him , though he had tryed it upon 
Perfons of differing Ages, Sexes , and Complexions. But 
of this Specifick more hereafter. For, at prefent, I rouft pro- 
ceed to take notice, that as incurable a Difeafeas the radicated 
Gout is thought to be fefpeciilly in Patients not very tem- 
perate ) and as tedious a courfe of Phyfick as one would ex- 
pect to be requifite to the Cure of it, in cafe it can be cured; 
yet I have been feveral times vifited by an honeft Merchant 
of Amflerdam, who was there noted for his Wealth , and his 
skill in Arte tintforia : This M in , ten or twelve Years ago, 
had been for a long time fo tormented with the Gout v both in 
Hands and Feet , that his Fits would fometi mes vex and con- 
tine him for a great part of the Year, and not leave him with- 
* out hard Knots,as unwelcome Pledges of their Return : But 
once, that he was tortured to a degree that made him much pi- 
tycd , one came and informed him of an Empcrick , who had 

received 

... • 

Digitteed by Google 



(54) 

received from a great Chymift who hadlodg'd in his Hoofe, a 
Secret,with which he had already throughly cured many, in a 
fhort time: Whereupon fending for this Perfon,and offering 
him any thing for fome relief* the other refufed to take above 
ten Crowns, which, as it feems, was the ufual rate for the 
Cure*, and would not receive that neither , till the reality of 
it had been evinced by the Patients continuing above fix 
Moneths well : And accordingly, with a very few Dofes of a 
certtin Powder and Tin&ure, the Merchant was quickly 
free'd,not only from his Pains,but from nis Gouty T ofhy: And 
though he indulged himfelf the drinking, of Rhenifti Wine 
very freely, yet he never had a Fitllnce, as himfelf aflured 
me one Morning, wherein, for Exe/ciCe fake, he walked five 
or fix Miles to give me a Vifit 5* adJing, That the Man that 
cured him, dying fuddenly, never could difcoi/er wrrat the 
Secret was, wherewith fo many had been freed from a Difeafe 
that does fo often mock the skill of the greateft Doclo'S. 

I might, perhaps, if I had leifure, relate to you fome other 
ftrange Stories,* which may invite you to think, That as the 
Naturalifts skill in Chymtflry, and other Arts retaining to 
Phyfiologv , may much aflift him to difcover more generorfs 
Remedies then are yet ufual • fo the Knowledge of fuch Re- 
medies rriav , in divers cafes , make a happy Change in the 
Rules of Prognofticating what will prove the Courfe and 
Event of a Sicknefs. But I Ihall not, at prefent* particularly 
confider any more then one Difeafe, namely, The Stone in 
the Bladder. For whereas it is by moft, even of the judici- * 
ous Phyfician$,unanimoufly pronoune'd incurable by Phyfick, 
in what Perfon foever, if it deferve the name of a Stone, and 
be-too big to be voided v*hoie,the Remedilefnefleof this Dif- * 
eafe may be juftly queftioned. I remember the famous M9- 
nsrdes, treating of the Seed of a Peruvian Plant , which they 
call CbaUhoos, tell us, Thjt icis highly efteemed by theln- 

i a habitants 



Digitized by Google 



(69) 

Country Gentleman, whom going to vifitlaft Summer, he 
fawa Load of Pcrficartipt Ar(m*rt, brought to him by forae iheufeof p<r- 
of the Country People * and defiringtoknow what he inten- fa aria for ihac 
ded to do with fovaft a quantity of it, the Gentleman reply- Curc - 
ed , That, he yearly ufed as much, having by the Water of it, 
m3de by bare dfftillation in a common Rofe. water Still, cured 
fo many of the Stoae,even in the Bladder, that he was ufually 
follicited by Patients, numerous enough , to exhauft all the 
Liquor which he yearly prepared. 

What we, Pjrophtlut, have obferved concerning this ex- 
cellent Liqudr, of which we ufe to prefcribe a draught every 
morning for fome Moneths together, we may elfewhere have 
occasion to relate. But now we Hull go on to tell you, t t*t 
being fome years fince in lrtUnd^ I met with an ancient Em- 
perick, who was very famous in thofe parts, for cutting of the 
•Stone of the Bladder, and for curing fore Eyes : This Mao 
having given (in the Parts where! then was, and whilft I was 
there) fome good proof of bis skill , 1 fent for him to me, 
upon the account of a fufpition I long had of the Stone in, 
the Bladder, whicVi, upon fearch, he allured me I was free 
from, and fo (God bepraifed) I have afterwards found it. He 
was more a Traveller then a Scholar, and yet finding him, to 
my wonder, veiy modeft and fober,I inquired of him, Whe- 
ther he had never any where met with a Remedy that could 
diilolve the Stone in the Bladder, offering him much more for 
a Cure of that kinde, then he would require as a Lithotomift; 
He anfwered me, Thaihe could cure no Man of a confirmed 
Stone, but by the help of his Knife** but if the Stone confi- 
ned of a lump of a Gravel not very firmly cemented together, 
he had, by a certain inward Remedy he ufed, and a dexterous 
way of aufhing the Stone from without with his Fingers , fo 
broaken the Stone, partly by crumbling it, and partly by 
didolving the Cement, as to make it voidable by Urine. And • 

i 3 he 



m 



(7°) 

he added , That he had formerly cured a Citizen ofC*i, of 
a good large Scone of the Bladder (for where I then was, he 
gave a proof of his skill , in telling before hand thofe he was 
to cot , the bignefs and flupc of the Stones that troubled 
them) 

inthnfcs in Pafifmg afterwards by cork, 1 fent an intelligent-Ser vant to 
nUicincs'L inquire after this Citizens but he being cafuilly abfent,his 
the fame Di- Wife fent me,*by my Man, a Relation very agreeable to that 
fcafc. which he bacJ mac j e me , The R ece i pc J p Ur cha{ed of him,- and 

though it fcem not very artificial , yet. I fuppofe yeu wijl not 
quarrel with me for annexing fo experienced a one, to the end 
of this Effay. But becaufc this Remedy needed the afliftance 
. ojjp manual operation , We (hall f urther.proceed to rcli you, 
vt uthx.j. That Cardsnjshe is quoted by Helmont (for I havenot now 
*"* M4 * • his Works by me ) relates , That in his time there rambled a 
Man over Lombard] , who did commonly, and in-i few dayes, 
by a cert . in Liquor which headminiftred to his Patients, fafe- 
ly, fpeedily, and certainly,cure thofe that were troubled with 
the Stone in the Bladder : Adding ( faith ticlmont ) his 
Judgement , That- be doubted not of this Mans being in 
Hell, for hjving, when he dyed,envyed Moitals fo excellent 
an Arr. 

I infilt not on the Tcftimony that the hm&Helmont gives 
to raracelfus of his curing the Stone, though he often handle 
him very feverely in other piaces of his Writings,becaufe that 
the Epitaph of ParAcetftu (out of which he labours to prove' 
his having cured the Stone) makes n» exprelfe mention of it. 
Nor fh3ll 1 enumerate thofe Paflages from whence the fame 
Hclmont's Followers colled, That he himfelf was able to cure 
that Difeafe, by the refolution of Pardcdjus his Indus * but 
this experience hath evinced to me, that a much {lighter pre- 
paration of that Stone, then was mentioned by Paraceifa and 
• HelmentfMih been able to do more in that Difeafe then a wary 

Man 



Digitized by Google 



(7«) • t 

Man would readily believe. But to detain you no longeron 
thisfubjed, I (hall only adde , That Wilhelmus LAurember- 
gtm, a learned Phyfician, and ProfefTor at Rofiock , hath told 
the World how he cured himfelf of a confirmed Stone of the 
Bladder, by the ufe of prepared UiiiMe pedes (by fome in Eng- The ufc and 
lifrwralled Woodltce} and other Remedies, which he hath par- £ff ^ 
ticularly recorded in the Hiftory which he hath publifhed, and c 
I have feen of this admirable Cure : which having been cpito- 
mized by Sennertus,2nd other eminent Phyficians, 1 mail not 
need to infill on it. And the Arguments alladged (even by 
, the mod Judicious J againft the cureablenefle of the Stone, 
though vety plaufible, feem not tome unanfwerable ) for 
whereas firft, they appeal to the innumerable fiuitltfle at- 
tempts that have been made to cure great Princes , and rich 
Men, without cutting , that Argument drawn f rup i experi- 
ence, may, by the former* Experiments, be anfwJRj 5 efpe- 
cially (ince Horatius Augentus ( upon whofe account Laurent- 
bcrgius try red ^Millepedes) tells us, not only that he cured a 
youqg Man at Rome , that was going to be cut of the Stone, 
but that the Jefuite that chanced to confefle this Youth , and 
perfwaded him to the ufe of Millepedes^ had experimented 
their efficacy both upon himfelf and others: And indeed, we 
our felves have found them to be highly Diuretick and Ape- 
ritive. 

And whereas it is next objected, That Medicines muft ne- 
cefTarily lofe their efficacy before tbey can reach the Bladder, 
1 confefle, that for the moft part, it is very true: But yet that 
it is po'flible for fome Medicines to retain their Nature, after 
many alterations and digeftions we have el fe where declared. 
And in our prefent Cafe, we not only find that Turpentine 
and Afparagus , do manifeftly affect the Urine (as I have of* . * 
ten obferved in my own, and almoft any Man may obfetve it * 

in 



* » 



ed by Google 



(7 % ) • 

in his; Bat that which is moft to our purpofe, Ruharb tinges 

The Area- » ^ ^ r,ne °^ t ^ ole ^ have taken 3ny quantity of it. And 
mem concern* laftly,whereas it may be yet further alleadged , That not only 
toe the incii. there hath not been yet a Liquor found capable of diiTolving 

[he'swne a°n- f° 3 Bo <ty as a Stone i but ' tnere wcre i il muft neCefla- 

fwetcd. rily be fo corrolive as to deftroy the Patient , by fretting, his 
Stomach, or Guts, or Bladder, which are parts fo much 
more tender. To the firft part of this plaufible Objection it 
may be replyed That even good Vinegar will diflblve, not 
only thofe ftony Concretions , call'd Lsfides Cancnrum, 
which , like the Calculi we treat of, are formed in the Bodies 9 
of Animals * but even the more hard and folid Body of Co- 
ral , which will lofe but liitle or its weight , in* a Fire that 
would wafte a great part of the Dtttltch : And t hat the bare 
Juices oWegetables (fuch as Leromons and Barberies ) wiir 
• readily efflfel ve both Pearl and Coral, -is known even to the 
Apothecaries Boyes. Indeed what Paracelfm and Htlmcnt re- 
late of their with which they prepare their Speci- 
fickagamft the Stone, and with which the later of them, if 
not both, pretend to be able to reduce , not only the 5 tone 
they call Ludus, butallother Stones, Vegetables,.Minerals, 
Animals,^, into bfipid Water, is fo ftrange (not to fay in- 
credible) that their Followers muft pardon me,if I be not for- 
ward to believe fuch unlikely things, till fufficient experience 
hath convinced me of their truth. 

But yet I muft not conceal from you, That a Chymift, 
whom you have often feen , advifed with me feveral times 
about the way of preparing this immortal Liquor(as fftlmmt 
calls it ) and that , when we had agreed that fuch a way was 
the moft promifing , he profecuted it fo long, and fo induftri- 
# oufly ,that at length he obtain'd,& ftfew'd me a Liquor, which 

- (though it feemed to me far fliort of the Alk&htft) I confefle I 

ad- 



Digitized by Google 



(Til 

dmiredi and not I alone, but our Ingenious Friend Dr. c. 
(who had been imployed into feverail parts of Europe, by z 
rich and curious Princes to purchafe Rarities)agreed with this 
Chymift, to give Two handred Crowns for a Pine of this 
Hcnftruum , and confefled to me withall, That he faw him, 
with this Liquor, not only difiblve common Sulphur, and 
bring it over the Helm , but reduce Antimony into fweet 
Chry ftals $ with a few of which it was, that he (I mean Dr. C.) 
to the wonder of many, did, without Purge or Vomit , cure 
our good Friend Sir c. C. of a very radicated and defperate 
Difeafe as the reftored Patient foon alter told me. And to 
the fecond part of this Objection it may be anfwered, That if 
we knew and confidcred well, how many of the operations of 
Natural Bodies depend upon the fuitabienefs and difference of . 
the Figures of their Parts, and the Pores intercepted between 
them, the number of impoiTibilities would not, perhaps, be 
thought fo great, as by many Learned Men it is. 

That it is very poffible for a Body to have an effeel upon an- That there ro3> 
other determinate Body, without being able to operate in ^VSe*"- 
like manner, upon a multitude of other Bodies , which may stonc,that may 
fcem more eafie to be wrought on by it may appear by the not bc con ^ c 
Load ftone , which will draw and work only upon Iron* and p° f * ny 01 lcr 
(which is but refined Iron) Steel,but not upon wood or ftraws 
or any of thofe innumerable Concretsthat are lighter, and 
of a more open texture than the heavy and folid Body which 
it at tracts. And to give you an inftance that comes nearer to 
our cafe, Quick- filver, that will not corrode our skin, nor fo 
much as tafte flurp upon our tongue, will yet readily difiblve 
that moft compact Body of Gold, which even Aqua fort is , 
that can infinuateit felt into all other Metals, and corrode 
them, will not meddle with«, though the fame Q^ick- filver 
will not diflblve Iron, which yet Aqua for tit will very nimbly 

k fret 



Digitized by Google 



(74) 

fret afunder. So that although I dare not confidently believe 
all that I have found averr'd even by eminent & learned Chy- 
mifts, of their having made or fcen Liquors, which, without 
appearing any way fh3rp to the Tongue, would diffblve Gold 
and Silver, and other hard compaft Bodies* becaufelhave 
not yet,myfelf, feenany fevere and fattsfa&ory tryal made 
to evince the efficacy of infipid Diffol vents: yet, byreafon 
of divers things I have read and heard, and of fome things 
tool havefeen,l dare not peremptorily deny the poflibility 
of fuch Mcnjlruums. And who knows, but that in Nature 
there may be found, or by Art there may be prepared, fome 
Liquor , whofe parts may have fuch a fuitabUnefs to the 
Pores of a humane Calculuses thofeof Quick- fi I ver have to 
• the Pores of Gold, and yet may as little work upon the reft 
of the Body, as we have obferved the fame Quick fi I ver to 
do upon Iron (which yet is a much more porous 3nd open Me- 
tal) even when it hath been diftill'd in Iron Veflels ? And as 
to that part of the Objeftion wherein the flreng th of it chief- 
ly lyes, let me tell you, Pjrof>hilus y that I h3ve fometim€s,for 
curiofity fake, taken an Egge, and fteep'd it in ftrong Vineger 
for fome dayes, and by taking it our, and mewing that the 
ihell was fo eaten away, that the Egge could be fqueez'd in- 
to unufuall Forms, but the thin skin that involves the white 
continued * altogether unfretted, I convinced an Ingenious 
Man, that the operation of Diflolvents are fo determin'd by 
the various textures of Bodies on which they are imploy'd, 
that a Liquor, which is capable to corrode a more hard and fo- 
lid Body, may be unable to fret in the lead, another more 
foft and thin, if of a texture indifpofed to admit the fmall 
parts of the Menftr*»m- And I muft confefs to you, Pjr$- 
fhilus, That one thing, among others, which hath made me 
backward to affirm with many Learned Men, that there can be 

no 



Digitized by Google 



(7$) 

no potent Diflblvent that is not corrofive enough to fret in SSSScSnM 
pieces the p3rts of a humane Body, hath been a Story, which metal* 
f divers yeares fince chane'd to meet with in'the Learned Sen- and Glaac ' 
nerttu\ Pdrdlepomend, where, though he relates it to another 
purpofe, yet it is fo pertinent to our prefent defigne, and in it 
ielfe fo Angular, not to fay matchlefte, that I cannot forbear MtJUu 
to mention it here on this occafion. Hctelsus then, That in Mbiks^k 
the end of the Yeare, 1652. fokanncs Nefter us,an eminent 
Phifician , and his great Friend, informed him , That there 
liv'd at that time in the Neighbourhood , and belonging to a 
Noble Man of thofe parts, a certaine Lordlner^ whom he al- 
fo call'd cUuditu, fomewhat low and (lender , and about 5 8. 
Yeares of age Hie (faith he ) nihil fat idtm>nihil in\ucundum 
si? her ret $ Vitra , Lap ides , Lignd, Car fonts , 0(Jd, Leforinos, 
ejraliorum dnimalium pedes cum pilis y l$n€$t% Unecfj. pannosy 
*vivd dnimalid & pifus ddhuc [dlientes, into ttiam Met all*, pa- 
tinas & erbes fttnneos dent tins cenfringere & vordre fdftffime 
vifus eft Vor&t prttered latum Jcvum tfrcandelas fcbdceasjn- 
tegrds t eft 44 code arum , ammaltum Bercora, cum primis bit' 
bulum Cdlidum adbuc, prout e mat re venit : pot at dltorum Uri- 
nas cum Ktno ejr serevttid mixta* $ Vordt foenum, ftrdmcn, fti- 
fulgs (frnuper dues mures vtventes ddhuc dcgluuvit*quiipftut 
njentriculum ad femihordm ufque creberrimts morftbus Uncind* 
runt, ejr utbrevtbus complete ar^nic quid iHt a Nobilibm dev$* 
■randum offcrtur, vilsjjimd me r cede prepofttk^dtftumdc fdftum% , 
ingurgitdt , it a ut intrd paucos dies integrum vitulum crudnm 
ejr incottum cum cor to, ejr p His ft tftdturum promiferit. Teftes • 
inter dim quamplursmcs ipfe ego [um % quippe qui^&c. To this 
and the following part of the Letter , Senertus addes, That 
not having,during fome yeares , heard any thing concerning 
this Claudius ^ .he fent about foure years after to the fame Phy- 
fickiD, Dr. Nefter us, to enquire what was become of him* and 

k 2 that 



m 

that the Do&or fcnthim back a Letter of the Mioifterofthe 
Church of that place, by way of confirmation of all the for- 
merly mention'd particulars,and anfwered himfelfe, That the 
Lor diner whom he had long hop'd to difle<5t , was yet alive, 
and did yet devour all the things mentioned in his former Let. 
ter i but not fo frequently as before, his Teeth being growne 
fomewhat blunter by age,that he was no longer able to break 
Bones and Metals. Some other examples of this nature, 
though none fo Grange, we have alio met with in Writers of 

food credit, and efpeciafty that of the Glafle eater, recorded 
y Columbus in his excellent Anatomicall Obfervations of 
which alfo Sennertus makes mention, as we mall fee by & by, 
and with which we may elfewhere entertaine you to another 
purpofe. And not long ago there was here in EngUnd a private 
Souldierfwho,for ought I know,is yet alive ) very famous for 
digefting of Stones: And a very inquifitive Mm that gave 
me the accurateft account I have met with concerning him, 
alTures me,That he knew him familiarly,and had the curiofity, 
to keep in his company for 24. houres together to watch him, 
and not onely obfei v'd that he eat nothing in that time , fave 
Stones (or Fragments of them; of a pretty bignefle, but that 
his grofie Excrement confided chiefly ot a fandy Subftance, 
as if the devoured Stones had been in his Body difTolved and 
crumbled into Sand . But let us not omit, trm to the fecond 
Epiftle above mentioned, Sennertus addes this Refle<5tion,not 
impertinent to our purpofe: Cauftm ( faies he; bujusvordri- 
. Utlsftlm in Cddaverejnvenire froculdubio crit difficillimum. 
Poffctqmdcm dd i Hud, quod in Cdddvere Ld&dri Vitrivordcis ob* 
fervavit Columbus. qutddm conf ngere % ejr ftdtuere quart am tl- 
Um nervorum conjugdtionem, qutgujiiu grdtid in hominibus i 
ndturu frodufta eft s ne% dd Palatum , nefa dd Lingudm verten- 
dcre. Vcrum hoc modo [dltem gujlns aboliti cdufi rtdderetur^ 

»on» 



Digitized by G( 



(77) 

nondum vero cau[a ddretur y c*r rest Am mira* affumere ftnt 
vertriculi Uftone y imo cwcoquere p$tuent . J2*<e proculdubio 
in Vionytt*"* & peculidri conftituticne ventrieuli & intejli- 
norum qutrtnda etfet : qu* tamen oculk inveftigAri non foti ft, 
fed [alum ex effe&u pttet . Ad J indeed this memorable ftory 
feems to argue, not only what we have already alleaged it to 
prove , but alfo that a Menjiruum not fo corrofive as to fret 
the Body, may diflblve Stones, Metals, and other compact 
Subftances. And fince one Liquor, prepar'd j>y Nature on- 
ly , could in this Mans Storaack diffolve th3t great variety of 
Bodies above enumerated , why mould it be thought that the 
Alluheft, or fome other Menjiruum wherein Nature is skil- 
fully aflifted,and to the utmoft heightned by Art , mould not 
• be able to diflblve Concretes of very difTering Textures. For 
though Cby mifts muft acknowledge that fuch common Men- 
(iruums as will diflbtye one Body, will not oftentimes meddle 
with another * as AqnA fort is will diflolve Silver , and not 
Gold s and if by Sal armoniack you turne it into AquA KegU y 
it will indeed diflblve Gold, but then it will not Silver Yet 
fince that may be fuppofed to proceed rather from our want 
of skill to prepare the mod potent Men/lruum y than from the 
impoflibilitv of one Menjiruum s diflbivin* great variety of 
Bodies $ Why may not Nature and Art afford a Menjiruum^ 
whofe variety of P^rts and Figures, and ( perhaps al(o ) Mo- 
tion, may give it hgrefle into Bodies of very differing Tex- 
tures t as in our former Inftance , though \j4quA Regalis will 
diflblve Gold, not Silver and AquAFortis Silver, but not 
Gold yet Quick- filver will diflblve both, and Copper,Tin, 
and Lead to boot. 

IfTwerenotatprefent under fome reftraint , I might tell 
you fome things that you would , perhaps , thinke no weake 
Confirmations of the paft Difcourfe i And however, fince I 

k 3 have 



* 



Digitized by doogle 



(78) 

haveobferved it to be the maine thing that keeps judicious 
Men from Peeking, or fo much as hoping for nobler Diflbl- 
vents,thar they are fcarce to be perfwaded there can be confi- 
derably piercing tMcnjlruums^ that are not fo proportionably 
corrofive •• I will here acquaint you with a Liquor, that may, 
I prefume,3flift you to undeceive fome of them. We take then 
ordinary houlhold browne Breaddlike that of Rye, but I have 
The difcript'- divers times ufed that of Whcat)and when it is cut into flices, 
Sruum and fomewhatJryed,we almoft fill a glafie Retort with it, and 
red from a placing that in a fand Furnace, by degrees of Fire, we draw 
abkTodrlw 4, offwn3t will be made to come over , without much difficul- 
tinaires fiom ty The Oyle, as ufelefle to our purpofe.being by a Tunnel, 
prccousftoncs, ora Filter, fevered from the reft of the Liquor, wealfo, by 

MjnualSj&c. g gentle fc^ fa the Spirit ff m fomc of jts p n l cgmc f w hj cn , 

yet fomctimes we find no'great neceffity to do. And yet this 
Spirit which you will eafily believe is 00 fuch Corrofive as 
Aqu* forth , or other diftili'd Liquors of minerall Salts , will 
worke upon the hardeft forts of Bodies, and performe things 
chat Chymifts counted of the judicioufeft, would not have us 
expeel from the moft rtiarpe and corrofive Mtnftrnums now in 
ufe.For with this we have,in a (hort time,ond that in the cold, 
drawn Tinctures ( which is done by the folution of the finer 
parts ot the Concrete)not only from crude CoraIs,& fome of 
the more open Minerals, but likewife from very hard Stones, 
fuch as Blood- ftone,and Gran ites (even unpowder'd;Nay,and 
though Rubies feeme to be the hardeft Bodies yet knowne, 
fave Diomonds ( for I have learned from thofe that cut pre- 
cious Stones, that they can grinde other Gems with the pow- 
der of R ubies ,but not thefe with any Powder,fave their owne, 
and that of Diamonds ) yet have,even thefe , afforded me in 
the cold, a nor ignoble Tin&ure. And not to anticipate 
what I may elfewhcre have occafion to tell you concerning 

the 



Digitized by "Google 



(79) 

the efficacy of this Menftruum , which is the fame that I 
have intimated, without naming it, in the laft, and another 
of the former EfTays: I fhall now onely addc , That an ex- 
pert Chymift aflures me , he hath, but tells me not how, 
done greater matters with it, or the like * and that to fatisfie 
my felf that thefe high Tinclures , proceeded not frorp the 
(landing ordigeftionof the Mcnftruttm (as we el few here ob- 
fenre concerning fome other Liquors ) I not onfy tryed, 
that from fome Minerals it will draw a much higher Tinclure 
than from others, and from fomefcarce any at all, but true 
it would , if kept by it felf , for many Months continue 
clear and limpid. What further ufe I have made , or think 
others may make of this odde Mtnftruum, I muft not , as I 
faid at prcfent , exprefs-,. but returning to what I wasdif- 
courfing concerning the cure of the Stone , annex, That be- 
fides what hath been objected againft the poffibility of ma- 
king a Liquor, which , without being highly corrofive, can 
be able to work upon Stone $ It may indeed be alfo alledged 
againft the hopes we feem to countenance , that what hath 
curedthe Stone in one Mans Bladder , may be unable to do 
the like in anothers. But firft ,the truth of that hath not 
been proved-, and next, we highly value thofe Specificks 
*hatcan remove Agues,Fluxes, and the like Dtfeafes,though 
fcarce any of them do alike fucceed in all Patients, efpeci- 
ally fo as to fecure them, during their whoJe lives, from ever 
relapfing into the like Difeafe* and befides all this, it will 
benofmall matter to findethat the Difeafe, in its own na- 
ture, is not incurable* and it would recompence Mens In- 
duftry to be able to free, even a few Patients, from fo pain- 
ful and ftobborn a Difeafe. Which I have rather than any o- 
ther, chofen to infift upon, becaufe it is fo generally believed 
not to be curable by inward Remedies in any Pcrfon what- 
ever. 

But 



f8o) 

Hdifiont 1 * At- But I have entertained yon fo long on this Cub j eft , that I 
SeTw£«ce muft referve > * or f °me other opportunity , what I have to 
ofGodccnfu-. fay to you concerning the Dropfie, and fome other Difeafes 
rcd - commonly put into the Catologue of the incurable ones, and 

therefore lhall now only tell you in general, That as on the 
one fide I think the Arguments which Belmont and others 
draw from the Providence of God, for the curablenefs of all 
Difeafes are not very cogent , and fomewhat irreverent (For 
God being not obliged any more to continue Life or Health 
to finful Man than to Beafts that never offended Him we 
% ought humbly to thank Him, if He hath , among his Crea- 
• tures , difperled Remedies for every Diftafe , but have no 

right to accufe Him if He have not) fo on the other fide, I 
* am not much convinced by the grand Argument alledged 
againft Paracelfus^ and theChymifts, that hold all Difeafes 
to be in their own Nature curable $ namely , That they 
themfelves , many of them (no nor even their very MafterJ 
lived not to the Age attained by many Strangers to Chy- 
miltry. 

t T h« ffi For this That m3ny of them (not deftro H by War, or 
out lived n« outward accidents) dyed young enough, and confequently by 
the 47th. >car Sicknefs ; and that Parace/fus himfef out lived not the 
Wd. AgCan ' 47 th Year of his Age, is a much ftronger Objeftion againft 
the Men , than againft their Opinion 5 for it infers indeed 
plaufibly, that they had not fuch Remedies as they boafted 
of (fince probabiy, had they had any fuch, they would have 
cured themfelves with them) but concludes not that no fuch 
Remedies can be prepared by any other. And this you will 
bethelefsapt to think irrational, if you confider how much 
more learned, fober and experienced it is poffible for many 
a man to be, than Paracclfus appears to have been .* For he 
fcems not by his Writings to have been any great Logician 

or 



Digitized by Google 



• . . (Si) 
or Reafoncr 5 he manifeftly defpifed many parts of Learning; 
ufeful to a Phyfician* he lived not many Years, and fpenc 
divers of thofejcw which he lived, in an unfetlcd and difad- 
vantageouscourfeoflife* and yet this Paracelfm attained to 
fomc fuch Remedies , as both in his own, and after times, 
have made h]m a very confiderable Perfon , in fpight of all 
his indifcretions and deficiencies. * And among his other Re- 
medies , bis famous Laudanum did fuch wonders, thattff** 
rinm himfelf, in that (hort account, which feems to be rather 
a Satyr then a Narrative of his Life, hath this Paflage of itr Thc cffifaf 
Dc Laudano (faith he) fu9 (its wabat f Hulas infkarnuri- 0 (ParJeifL 
urn fiercoris , qua* impart femfer numerc, in txtrtma t ant urn his Laudanum, 
m orb or urn difficult ate tanquam far am me die in am txhibtbat ) 
ttaglortcbatur, ut n$n dub i Par it affirmare tj us 'f alius ufu fe i 
m or tuts vivas redder e foffe^ tdquc aliquoties dum apud if [urn 
/»/, re if (a declaravit. bo fignal a Tcftimony coming from 
one whom the Paracelftans call his fugitive Servant, hired 
by bis Enemies to (lander him , under pretence of writing 
his Life, deferves not to be flighted: and though it ma- 
nifcftly contains an Hyferbole, yet I doe the leffe wonder 
at the Hjfcrbalt, by reafon of thofe ftrange things which your 
Mother , and divers other of yoor Friends , can tell you , 
they have feen .performed in England by Helmonts Lau- 
danum epiatvm ( though much inferiour to that of Para* 
celfus. ) And I remember, that a Fi iend of yonrs and mine, 
that is a great enemy to all kinds of Chymical Remedies , 
and was before alfo to Chymiftry, having begg'd of me a lit- 
tle Bottle of it , which I had obtained from a-Friend of thc 
younger Helmont\ to whom he communicated the Prepara- 
tion. g ave me a while after, an account of fuch Cures that had 
been performed , with that fmall quantity, upon aim oft dy- 
ing Perfons, as I think it not difcreet for me, that was not 

1 an 



Digitized by Google 



(82) 

raEyewitnefleofthem, to relate. And I remember too] 
that the fame Friend of young Helmont's , being, at the per* 
fwafion of one Woman whom he had cared of a dangerous 
Confumption , cali'd to* another that was thought to be dy- 
ing of an A/lhma, came to advife with me whether he fliould 
meddle with fo defperate a Patient telling me, That /lie had 
been many Years fick of tint ftubborn Difeate, which, in 
proceffe of time , pailing into a Orthopnea , had at laft put 
her, by want or fleep ( from which the violence of her fick- 
nefle had very long kept her ) into a Feaver, and fo defperate 
a condition, that it was fcarce expected (lie fliould live till the 
next morning. But I, reprefenting to him that her condi- 
tion being avowedly defperate , he might exercife his Chari- 
ty without danger to his Reputation * and perfwading him to 
try Helmont's LAudsnum^ together with the Spirit of Mans 
Blood ('which we eifewhere teach you to prepare) he gave her 
that Night a Dofe of thofe Remedies , which made her both 

Btffrn grwt fl^p anc j b rcat h p rctt y freely ; and a Week after, he coming 
Kc.md.cs. tQ vifu toW hc ^ cafuallyr mcc his paticnt mU and 

mmnt ;n lhc abroad in the Streets. But thefe are trifles to the Cures 
Trcatifc which which Helmont relates to have been performed by our irtjh 
he entitles s«r. gutter for he tells us, That this Man, by (lightly plunging 
lcr ' a little Stone, he had, into Almond Milk or Oyl, imbued 

thofe Liquors- with fuch a fanative efficacy , that a Spoon-full 
of the former cured ( and that without acquainting him with 
what was given him ) a Franfcifcan Frier ( a very famous 
Preacher ; of a very dangerous EryftpeUt in the Arme, in one 
hour 5 and one drop of the latter being apply 'd in his prefence, 
to the Head of anold Laundrefle, that had been fixteen Years 
• troubled with an intolerable HemkrAtiU , the Woman was 
prefently cured, and remained fo, to his knowledge, for di- 
vers Years. He addes alraoA as flrange a Cure done in one 

Night, 



Digitized by Google 



Night, upon a Maid of his Wife's, by anointing the part affe- 
cted with tour drops of that O y 1 : He further tell us , That 
the Matter of the Giafle- houfe at Ant wer peeing troubled and 
made unweildy with too much fat, begged fome relief of 
Butler % who, having given him a little fragment of his lit- 
tle Stone, with order to lick it nimbly with the tip of his 
Tongue once every Morning, Ifaw f faith Helmont) withio 
3 weeks, thecpmpafsof his wafte leftned by a fpan, without 
any prejudice to his health. And to thefe, Pjr. he addes fome 
other Narratives, which, though I confefle I know not well 
how to believe , yet there are Circumftances which keep me 
from daring to rejeel them : For fir ft , as he well obfer ves , 
that which was moft ftupendous in this Remedy, was but the 
fmalntiTe of the quantity. Next, a Gentleman in France, 
•being not long fi nee reported to have a fragment of this 
S one, and to have cured feveral Perfons ( and efpecially one 
very dignified) of inveterate Difeafes, by letting them lick 
it * my Noble Friend Sir Kenelm £ / £ , then in France , was 
folemnly requefted from hence to ioquire into the truth of 
that Reported anfwered , That he could not, upon exami- 
nation, findfc it other then true. Befides, Helmont not only 
relates thefe Cures as an Eye- wicnefs of them , but tells us> 
how upon an occafion that he mentions, he once fufpe&ed the 
efficacy of the Oyl, and that, without expecting that it fhould 
do any thing , he anointed it on the right arm and the ancles 
of his own Wife, who had for fome Moneths been torment- 
ed with great pains in the former, and very great tumors in 
thelatter of thofe parts ; and that almoft in a trice, motion 
wasreftored to her Arm, and all the (edema of her Legs and 
Feet vanifhed; adding, That at the time of his writing flic 
1 iv'd healthfully, and had done fo fince that recovery , during 
nineteen years : And this Story, (he, long after her Husbands 

I 2 death, 



(*4> 

death, conSrm'd to our ingenious Friend Dr. C. who is ac- 
quainted with her , and much extolls her: Thefe Circum- 
ftances, may be aflifted by two more very confiderable ones 5 
the one is, That Helmont\% the more to be credited in thefe 
Relations, becaufe mentioning Cures not perform'd by him- 
felf, but by another, and that by Remedies unknown to him, 
• he feems by thefe Narrations,out of loyalty to truth,to eciipfe 
his own Reputation : And the other is, that in a memo, 
rable Story which we may elfewhere relate to yon fit being 
not here proper to infertfo long,a onejyoul finde ft eminent 
and ftrange teftimony given to Butler % Secrets , by our fa- 
mous Country man, Dr. Hlggtns, whofe confeflion you will 
not doubt, ifyou confider how rare a Phyfician and Chymift 
he was , how familiarly he lived in the fame Houfe with But- 
lar % andhowftudioufly, at laft, they endeavoured to take, 
away each others Lire. 

But whatever be to be thought, Pjr. of Helmut's Rela- 
tion, we may well enough make this reflexion on the other 
things that hive been delivered concerning formidable Dif- 
eafes, that fmce the power of Nature and Skill may reach 
much farther then many diftruft fullf not to fay lazy J men have 
imagin'd, it will not be charitable to rely too much upon the 
Prognofticks, even of famous Writers, when they tell us, 
That fuch and fuch Difeafes, or Patients in fuch and fuch 
conditions cannot poflibly be cured. But rather to follow 
- UJ! , the fobercounfel of Celfmt Oportet (faith he) ubi ait quid 
iibj.cap.io. non rc\fondtt^ ttontantt put are x^futborem quants dgrum, & 
experin altud atque aliud. And this great Phyficians autho- 
rity I therefore make the mod ufe of in the enfuing Eflfayes, 
becaufe he is accounted very judicious by the Lord Verulam , 
and other Writers that are unqueftioaably fo themfclves. 

ESSAY 



Digitized by Google 



f8jj 





ESSAY IV. 



Trefenting fome things wlating to the 
% . Hygieinal Tart of Thyjick^ 

* • i 

THat the Dietericall part of Phyfick, Pyrofhil/u, may, 
as well as the others, be improved by NaturallPm> 
lofophy, were not uaeafie to manifeft, if my hafte 
would permit it: For 'tis known, that Drinks make a 
very confiderable part ( fometimes f perchance , amounting that rfc 
almoft to the one half of our Aliments j and moft Drinks , k " ovvlca t ^- 0 ° n f 
as Wine, Beer, Ale, Mead, &c. confift of fermented Li- £ c 3i 
quors^ Now as on the one fide the ignorance of the Do- make our 
dtrine of Fermentation, and of the wholefomeway ofcbotb Sj^jfjE 
preferving Liquors and making them pleafant, doth que- ,° r 
ftionleffe occafion more then a few Difeafes , which in divers 
places may be obferved evidently to proceed from the un- 
wholfdme quality of either ill made, or fophifticated Drinksi 
fo on the other fide x the diftindt knowledge of the true nature 
and particular Vbdnomtna of Fermentation, would enable Men 
to prepare a great variety of Drinks,not only as barmlefle,but 
as beneficial as pleafant. 

How much preparation may do to correct and meliorate 
both hard and liquid Aliments, is notably inftanced by the 
account that we receive from both the French and Englilh 
that inhabit the Barfados, St.chrijtophtrs, and other Cardites 

1 3 Mauds, 




Digitized by Google 



(St) 

How much Iilands, who folemnly inform us (what is attefted alfo by 
fim F icsmaybc pjr 0 anc j other Learned Travellers that write of it) that 
pami b ,cxcm- the Plant Mmirn* ( whofc prepar'd Root makes Csffivfi 
piificdbythc and which we hive alfo feen flourifliing herein Europe) to 
lndiansmtKnz wnicn the Indians are fo much bholden, is a rank Poyfon. 
S? poSou! And.though I (hall not too refolutely affirm it to be a Poy, 
punt Maadta* f 0 n properly fo called ; yet in confirmation of its being very 
M * noxious , 1 fhall telLyou, That having purpofely enquired 

of a very intelligent Gentleman, who commanded an Army 
of Europeans in America , what experience he rfft feen 
of the qualities of this Plant , he told me , That between 
thirty and forty of his Souldiers , having on a time ( whil'ft 
they were unacquainted with the Country ) either through 
ignorance o: curiofity, eatef of it unprepared , it coft moft 
of them their Lives. And yet this pernicious Root \ which 
fome Herbarifts call Tucca , by the rude Indians ordering, 
comes to afford them both almoft all their Bread , and no 
fmall part of their Drink : For this Root being grated, and 
Oddc unhand- carefully freed from itsmoifture, by being included in Bigs, 
fomc waye$ of and vsery ftrongly pretfed till all the Juice be fqucezed oat % 
their making j t j s afterwards dryed in the Sun , and lo made into the Meal 
Lm^T of which they make their Bread: And this very Root, 
though ( as we faid ) it be poifonous, they caufe their old, 
and almoft toothleffe Women, for the better breaking and 
Hiaoryofthe macerating it , to chew and fpit out into.Watcr. This Juice 
tamo's pag. j 0 a fe w h ours , work and purge it felf of the poyfonous 
*9fSo,3ij3*. q aa ii t y 5 aflf or di n g them a Drink which they efteem very whol- 
fome,and at the Barbados call Pcrino, and account it to be the 
likeft in tafte to our Englifh Beer,of any of thofe many Drinks 
that are ufed in that Ifland. 

This nafty W3y of preparing Drink , Pjrophilw , may 
feem ftrange to you , as it did to roe when I firft heard of it 5 

but 



Digitized by Google 
_ . . • • 



f*7J 

but befides the confcnting relation* both of French and Eng- 
lish concerning, it , it may be confirmed by the ftrange afler- 
tionof Gulitlmw Pifo } in his new and curious CMedicina Brs- 
filienfts , where, having fpoken of Several of the Srafttian 
Wines, he tells us , That they make Liquors of feveral v w i* j*f 
Plants, beftdestheRootofZ/W/Wj* after the fame nafty crvk&de 
manner, idem fit (faith he) ex CMdndtotd> Patata, Mtlto, l */ e * J8 ' 1 *2 
TureicOyOrjza & dliis^ qud a. vctulis msfltcantitr, maflicataque 
mult a cum f*ltva exffuuntur \ hie liquor mox vdfts rcconditur 
donee fervcat , fdcefquc ejicidt. 

In Afufepvidix felt, notwithftanding the unskilful neffe of 
that rude People, olcdrius informs us, That the Embaflar 
dors, to whom he was Secretary , were prefented at one 
time with two and twenty feverall forts of Drink. And at a • 
Country Houfe here in ZngUnd ( where I was, by a very In- 
genious Gentleman that is Mafterof it, prefented withdn 
vers rare Drinks or' his own making J I was allured that he 
had lately,at one time in his Houfe,at leaft the former mentio- 
ned number of various Drinks ? and might eafily have had a JfjJiSS 
greater , if he had pleafed. fans of coudc 

And on this occafion, lam not willing to pretermit what btcad> 
is pradtifed in fome of our Amcricdn Plantations, as I am in- 
formed by the PracYifers themfelves, where, finding it very 
difficult to make good Mault of Maiz, or Indian Corn (by 
reafon of hinderances not to be difcourfedof in few words ) 
they brew very good Drink of it , by firft brioging the Grain 
to Bread in which operation, the Grain being both reduced 
into 1 mail parts, and already fomewhat fermented, is difpofed 
to communicate eafily its diflbluble and Spirituous,parts to 
the Water it is boyled in ; To which I mall adde , That I 
have to think, that the Art of Malting may be much impro- 
ved by new and skilfully contrived Fttrnaces , and a rational 
management of the Grain. Nor 



Digitized by Google 



( 88) 

Nor are we alone defective in the knowledge of fermenting 
Drink$,bac even in that of the Materials of which Drinks may 
be preparU 

TheDrinki In that vaft Re § ion of Chin a ^ which is enriched with Co 
inufeinc^w. fertile a Soil , and comprizeth fuch variety of Geographical 
parallels, they make not ( as Stmtdo informs us J their Wine 
of Grapes , but of Barley i and in the Northern parts of 
Rice., where they make it alfo of Apples: but in the Sou- 
thern parts , of Rice only: ytt not of ordinary Rice, bat 
of a certain kindc peculiar to them , wh:ch ferves only xo 
make this Liquor, being ufed in divers manners. And of 
Hiftory of lhe Wine tn ere drank, even by the vulgar, our Author 
chin* part. i. gives us this charader: The Wine ufed by the common Peo* 
"P"- . . pie', although it will make them drunk, is not very ftrong 
or lafling * 'tis made at .all times of the Year, but the belt 
only in the Winter It hath a colour very pleaflng to the 
fight , nor is the fmell leffe pleating to the fent , or the favor 
thereof to the tafte^ take altogether, it is a vehement occa- 
fion that there never wants Drunkards, &c. And of the In. 
habitants of the Kfngdome of ?*p*n, I remember alfo, Fj- 
itylfettft's rifbilm , that Lin\chottn , in his defcription of thofe Iflands, 

vmap, Book tells us, That they drink Wine of Rice, where with they drink 
,.chap.*6. themfclvcs drunk ; * "** 

We have here in England, at the Houfe of our experien- 
ced Mint-matter, Dr, Gordon, tafted a Wine, which he nude 
Wine ary °* that *° rt o{ Cnerr ys which are commonly cali'd CMorclhs 
that was, when we drank of it, about a year and a half old, 
but it was fomewhat fower, and needed Sugar i And there- 
fore I (hall father take notice to you of my having fince drunk 
Wine made of the Juice of good, but not of extraordinary 
Kentifh Cherries, which , with the help of a rantillum of 
Sugar added in the Fermentation, kept fo well , that though 

k 



Digitized by Google 



it were above a Year old when I tailed it - , I fband it a ftrong 
and pleafant Wine, not inferiour to many Wines that are of excellent 
brought us from ferein parts. But this is nothing to what Ciders, 
is averred* upon his own experience, by a Learned Divine (to 
Whom you, Pjrofbilus^ and I, am related) who affirms him- 
felf to have made out of fome fort of wilde Apples and 
Pears, by bare Fermentation, fuch Liquors, as though at firft , 
fomewhac harm , will not onely keep divers years 5 but at 
theend of two or three, attajn fuch ftrength, and fo pleafing- 
ly pungent a tafte, that they may compare even with choice 
out-landifli Wines, and excell thofe that are not of the very 
btft forts of them. 

But till we have in another EiTay sn opportunity of pre- 
fenting you fomething out of the Obfervations of oUaritu y 
the newly mentioned Divine, and our own, concerning Fer- 
mented Liquors, we fliall content our felves tomanifeft our 
wan^)f curiofity about the materials of which Di fcks may 
"be"pared,by this, Thatthe Drinks of one whole Coun- 
try are oftentimes unknown to the Inhabitants of another.' 
That the Wine made of Rice, which we lately mentioned to 
be of frequent ufe in the Kingdoms of Chin* and Japan , is 
of little or none in Europe , I need not prove to you. I have 
been in divers places w.here Beer and Ale, which are here the 
common Drinks ? are greater rarities than the medicated Li- 
* quors fold only in Apothecaries Shops. In divers parts of 
Mu[covie, and fomc other Northern Regions, the common nMg . f ,. Mfr 
Dnnk is Hjdromel, made of Water fermented with Honey, 
And indeed, if a due proportion betwixt thofe two be ol>- . 
ferved, and the Fermentation be sjtilfully. ordered, there may 
.be that way, as experience hath allured us, prepared fuch a Li- 
quor, both for clearnefs, ftrength, and whoifomenefs,as few 
that have not rafted fucha one, would readily believe. 

m The 



Digitized by Google 



(90) 

Of s tr The French 2nd Englifti Inhabitants of the Canibal Id and?, 
winc^ make, by Fermentation , a Wine of the dregs colle&ed in 
the boiling of Sugar. A like to which. Pt(o tels us , That 
tib.^uf.u they make in Brafil, an J commonly call Garafd y which 
though made by the mixture of Water, the Inhabitants are 
very greedy of; and when it is old, finditftrong enough to 
* make them Drunk. And how alio in thefe colder Countrys 
3 good Wine may be made of only Sugar and Water, we may 
elfewhere have occallon to teach you. 
iib.4. tdpJ. And in Brtfil they likewife, as the fame Author informs 
us , make a Wine (unknown to moft other Regions of the 
World , of the Fruit of K^fcaju y which yet, upon his experi- 
ence, he much commends * telling us, That it is ftrong 
^ nand Bar" enou §^ t0 in eDriate 3 and may, he douots nor, be kept good 
bi?r Winc$. f many Years % and that though it be aftringent , yet both in 
him felt and others he found it diurttical. 

In tb* BArbadd's they have many Drinks unknown to us $ 
fuch as are Ptrino, the Plantme- drink , Gripfo y PunMwnd 
the rare Wine of Pines, by fome commended more than the 
Poets do their Ve<5hr • tome of which we therefore make 
not, becaufe the Vegetables whereof they are produced, 
grot? not in thefe colder Climates: But others alfo they 
have , which we have, not, though they are made of 
Plants to be met with in our Soil ; as for ipftauce, the drink 
they call Mobbie , made of Potato's fermented with Water,* 
which) being fit to drink in a very few days, and eafie to make 
as ftrong almoft as the maker pleafeth, would be of excellent 
• ufe , if it were but as whole fome as it is accounted plea- 
# fant. 

In the Turkijh Dominions i where Wine,properIy fo called 4 
is forbidden by Mahomet's Law, the Jews and Chriftians 
keep in their Taverns, a Vinous Liquor made of fermen- 
ted 




■ 



Digitized by Google 



(91) • 

ed Raifons , after 9 manner , which (when we ihall elfewhere 
acquaint you with it; you will eafily difcern to be capable of the wav to 
much improvement from the knowledge of Fermentation, make Winctf 
And indeed by the bare fermenting of Raifons and Water Ra,fon5 ' 
in a due proportion, without the helpe of Barme , Leaven, 
Tartar, or other additament to fct them a working, we have 
divers times, in a few dayes, prepared a good Vinous Liquor, 
which having for tryals fake diftilled , it afforded us greater 
ftore than weexpecled, of inflammable Spirit , like that of o- 
ther Wine. 

But I have fometimcj wondred that Men had no more 
ity to try what Drinkes may be made of the Juices ob- 
tainable, by wounding or cutting oft the parts of feverall 
Trees,and fome other Vegitables : For that in the Ea/l in* 
dies, their Sura is madeot the Liquor dropping from their 
wounded Coco Trees, we have not long finceout of Linfcoten weeping of 
informed you. And fober Eye witnelTes have allured us, funded vc 3 
That mthofe Countries they have but too often feen the Sea- K U 
men drunk , by the ufe of Liquors weeping out of the Incili- 
ons of wounded Vegetables; and afterwards fermented. 

And that even in Europe, the AlimemaH Dtquor,drawne by 
Trees from the Earth, may receive great alterations from 
them before ic be quite affimulated by them, may be gather- 
ed ftom the practice of the Caiabr ians and Afu[iani\ who, 
betwixt March November , do by Incifions obtaine from 
the common Am tree, and the Ornus ( which many Botanifts 
would have to be but a" wild Afli ) a fweec Juice, fo like to 
the Manna, adhering in that Seafon to xhe Leaves of thofe 
kind of Trees, that the Native%call it in their Language, 
Manna del corpo, or Trunk manna , and left we mould think 
they draw all this fweetnefs trom the Soil of that particular 
part of July where they grow, you may be fatisfied by the 

m 2 Learned 



Digitized by Google 



• (9>) • 

Learned Chrjfoflomut tMagnenus, in his Treatife De Manna] 
that it is to be met with in (everal other places. And he addes, 
That in the Dukedom of Milane, where he profefleth Phy. 
fick, there is no other Mann3 ufed than that which is ( as he 
fpeaks) Vtl e trunco expnQum ( which he fomewhere calls 

De Mix>u Manna Trumwum) aut tn ramis ftiriat/m c oner et urn •, and that 

up. »8. yct j t j s fgfciy 3m j p ro fperoully ufed. 

I had communicated to me, as a rarity, a fecret of the 
of the wars of King of Tolands , which is faid to do wonders in many Dif- 
the WaUnut- c3 fc S) anc j con fift s only in the ufe or' the Liquor which drops 
about the beginning of the Spring, from the bar 'd and wound- 
ed Roots of the Walnut-tree: but becaufe I hive not yet 
made tryal of it my felf,I mill pifsontoobfervetoyou, 
that in tome Northern Countries,"and even in fome parts 6f 
England bordering upon Scotland, the almoft infipid Liquor 
that weeps in March, or the beginning of April, out of 
the tranfverfly wounded Branches ( not Trunks ) of the 
Birch.tree, is wont to be ufed by Perfons of Quality as a pre- 
r fervative from the Stone -, againft which cruel Difeafe, Htl> 
Jun 2fBhch C highly extols a Drink made of this Liquor and femen 
f-with fomeo- dauci and Btcclbunga »and I think not without caufe. For 

enttHwU?-* noc t0 memion 3,1 thc commendations that have been gi- 
swne.° r 5 ven me of it by fome that ufe it, I have feen fucb ftrange re- 
leief, frequently given among others, to a Kins-man of mine, 
to whom hardl y any other Remedy ( though he tryed a fcarce 
imaginable variety; was able to give eafe (and in whofe dif- 
fered Bladder, after another Difeafe and killed him,aStone 
of many Ounces was found; that I ufually every Spring take 
care to provide a quantit^of this Water, with which alone, 
without the other Ingredients mentioned by Helmwt, my 
Kins-man ufed to be relieved as long as he could keep it, 
which you may do the longer, by pouring upon the top of 

it 



• • Digitized by Google 



(91) 

it a quantity of SalletOyI, to defend it from the Air? and 
perhaps alfo by Diftillation: By which ( laft named) way, I Thcwy«n 
know an Ingenious Min th3t is wont to preferve it for his preferve ihcfc 
own afe, and fayes,he flndes it not thereby impaired in vertue. L,< l uo "- 
But the moft eflfedual way that ever I > et praaifed , Pjrofbh 
/mr, to preferve both this and other Liquors and Juices, is 
dexteroufly a^d (ufficientlf to impregnate them with Fume 
oi Sulphur ^ which muft be at divers and ofttn times as it 
were, incorporated with the Liquor by the due agitation-, the 

' manual Operation belonging to this Experimental may here- * 
after have occalion to difoibt more fully , together with the 
particular Eftefts of it in -feveral Bodies. And therefore it 
may here fuftice to tell you, that if you pra&ife it carefully, 
you will, perhaps , think your felf obliged to thank me for 
thedifcovery of it, though a heedful Reader may flnde it, * 
not obfeurety, hinted in HelmontS Writings. 

I might here annex the great commendation which I have The uf c of 
found given to this Birch-water, by eminent Writers againft 
the hot diftempers of the Liver, and divers other affections 5 diftcmpU 0 7 

'and efpecially how commends it very much to di- th e Liver and 
1 ute Wine with : and addes* H*c eft dulctctd* & gratt faporis , J^S^ 
fitim fed at v'tfeerum & fangmnis fervirem temper ai, ohftrufiit* diimiti in ca- 
ves refer at, calculum pcllit. • tmboc^do m 

But I fuppofe you will think it high time for me to proceed mtlpe * 
to another fubjeft and indeed I mould not have fpent fo 
much time in difcourfing of Drinks, but that I am apt to 
think, that if there were greater variety of them made, and 
if they were more skilfully ordered, they might , by refreuV 
ing the Spirits, and infenfibly altering the mafs of Blood, 
prevent and cure ( without weakning or much troubling the 
Patient )almoft as many Dileafesas the ufe of our common, 
nnwholfome and fophifticated Wines is wont to produce. 

.m 3 For 



Digitized by Google 



(90 

For in Fermentation, the Sulphurous (as Cbymifts call 
them) the A&ive, and the Spirituous" parts of the Vegetables, 
are much better loofened, and more intirely feparated from 
the grofXer and cloging parts, in moft Mixts , than they are 
by the vulgar ways of Diftillation, wherein the Concrete is 
Dot opened by previous Fermentation. And thefe nobler 
parts being incorporated with our Aliments, are with them 
received freely, and without refiftance carryed into the Mafs 
The life cf of ;the Blood , and therewith, by circulation, conveyed to 
^dTo^on the whole Body where their Operation is requifite. And 
of the feed to I remember, that difcourfing on* day with an eminently 
the liquor, learned and experienced Phyfician , of the Antinephritical 
virtue of our common wilde Carret-feed, fermented in fmall 
Ale ; he fmilingly, told me', that he found its efficacy but too 
" great For having prefcrib'd it to fome of his rich Patients, 
who were wont frequently »to haverecourfe to him in their 
Nephritical diftempers, after the ufe of this drink for a pretty 
while , he feldome heard of them any more. And for your 
encouragement , Pyrtpbilm , to make tryals of this nature, 
we will adde, That though the Seed it felf be not over well • 
tafted, yet being fermented in a due proportion with the Li- 
quor (we ufedan Ounce and half of the Seed, to a Gallon of 
• the Ale)the Drink compofedof both tafted pleafantly,almoft 
like Lemmon-becr. 

And that you may thelefs wonder at the efficacy of- fer- 
mented Liquors , it is worth considering, what virtue is afcri. 
bed to the bare decoftion of that Herb, which the French 
of TU or iv. . and we T fc r or T s 9 w hich is much magnified here 5 and 
as far as my little experience in my felf, and others (of which 
more hereafter ) reaches, not altogether without caufe But 
among the Cbinefef and the J-Aponuns , it is the common 
Drink of Per fons of Quality, by whom it fo highly praifed, 

that 




Digitized by»Googl 



that the experienced fulfil, in the new Edition of his Ob : oh j> t ^ ^ 
fcrvarions, tells us, That onepoondof thejaponical T'cbU ttfi&m, 
fas the Natives call it J is not on/rcqucntly fold for one hun- 
dred pounds of Silver $ which is not to be wondered at , if 
tbey juftly^fcribeto it, thit in thofe Countries Men are not 
fubjed to the Stone, or the Gout, and it but one half of 
the Virtues he there attributes to it, be for the moft part to 

be found in it. of An'm&i 

I might, when I told you of the variety of Materials not D»nki. 
ufed among us, have added one ftrange Drink, which a Chy- 
rurgion , that while fince lived at in the E*ft 

lndus % told me, he faw much ufed thereabouts : They make 
it of the raw Flcftiof Goats, Capons, and the like, which 
together with Rice and UUoloffos ( or black courfe Sugar ) : 
they put into a quantity of Water and dtfhll it in an Alim- 
bick till the Liquor be ftronger than' Brandy ( as they call 
common weak Spirit of Wine,or of Lees of Vinous Liquors) 
And this Ruck (as the extravagant Liquor isfclled; is often 
drunk in hot weather , and found very comfortable : thofe 
that ufe it, prizing it much, as fuppofing it draws a nutritive 
snd cherifliing vertue from the FJefh , as indeed , if any ■ 
quanity of the nobler parts of that, do concur totheconfti- 
tuting of the Liquor, it may probably be, at leaft to divers 
Bodies , very wholfome in that Country where they finde 
ftrong Drinks neceflary jo recruit their Spirits, exhaufted by* 
the exceflive heat of the Climate. As I remember, the ex- 
perienced Bontiw in his Midi tin a indomm^ tells us, That the Diut6g0 } 
Merchants travelling through the fcorching Deferrs of Arabia 
Ferfidy or Turkey , finde it beft to quench their third by a 
draught of the Spirit of wine, orelfeof the ftrongeft ttr- 
fan ox Spamfh Wine. ■J hcUfc °£ 
And of the^rcat ufe , if not neceffity of either Brandy, f n ra ^ y w 

' * OT maces. 



Digitized by Googh 



(96) 

or fuch other (h ong and Spirituous Drinks in the hot Climats 
of the Indies , divers intelligent Perfons ot our own Country, 
have, upon their own experience, Sufficiently fatisfied us. 

Nor, Pyrephilw, is Natural Philofophy able only to im- 
prove our Drinks, but the reft of our Aliments alu>: For 
not to mention, that Experience hath aflured us, that by skil- 
fully, contriv'd Ovens (wherein the heat playes every way 
about the Bread, without yet Suffering any of the fmoakor 
The ufc of fleams of the Fire to come at it, and wherein what degree of 
Natural phiio- ne3t y 0U pl e af e m ay be continu'd from firff to laft ) better 
o°ratc Meats! " Bread may be bak'd,than in our common Ovens, where the 
Bread reds upon the Hearth , and the heat is continually de- 
caying. Not to mention this 9 1 fay, Phy fiology can enable us 
to confer a very grateful tafte on very many of the things we 
eat, barely by a skilful and moderate untying and exciting 
the formerly clogg'd Spirits, and other fapid parts contained 
in them. It can teach us to make better Bread than is com- 
monly eaten.- ^nd by discovering to us a better Aft of Cook- 
ry,th3n A\itius and his fucceflors have left us , and by fub- 
ftituting innocently fapid things , inftead of thofe unwhol- 
• fome ones, their delicioufnefs endears to Men \ It can terch 
us to gratifie Mens Palates, without offending their healths : . 
and in preserving x>f freih Meats, Fruits, ch". beyond their 
wonted feafons ot.duration,the Natural ifts skill may perform 
• much more then you will readily beljeve' 

And yet to incline you not to be too diffident in this parti- 
cular, let me inform you, That much hath been already per- 
formed, as to the preservation of Aliments, even by thofe 
that have not troubled thcmfelves to make Philofophical en- 
quiries after the Caufes and Remedies of Putrefaction in Bo- 
dies, but only have been taught by obvious and dayly Obser- 
vations, that the Air doth much contribute to the corruption , 

of 



Digitized by Google 



(97) 



of forae Bodies, and the exclufion of Air to the hindring of preferring 
it. I remember , the inquifitive and Learned Mr. Bcrreel, Bukei from 
allured me fome while Ilnce , That he had in his Country, 
B$Ud*l> eaten Bisket that was yet good, after it had been 
carryed from Amfterddm to the Eaft- Indies ,and brought back 
thence again (io which Voyage, between two and three Years 
are wont to be fpent. J And to confirm my conjecture of the 



curious Merchant whofe it was , ufed no other Art, then the 
flowing his Bisket, well baked, in Casks exaclly calked % and 
befides, carefully lin'd with Tin, for the more perfect exclu- 
fion of the Air. Adding, That to the fame end the Bif- 
kets were fo placed, as to leave as little room as poffibly 
might be in the Cask, which alfo was not opened, but in cafe 
ofabfoluteneceflity, and then prcfently and carefully clofed 
again. 

I may elfewhere tell you of an eminent Naturalift,a Friend of preferring 
of yours and mine , that hath a ftrange way of preferving fruic, « 
Fruits, whereby even Goo(-bcrrits have been kept for many 
Moneths, without the addition of Sugar, Salt, or other tan* 
£ible Bodies, but all that I dare yet tell you,is, That he allures 
me his Secret confifts in a new and artificial way of keeping 
them from the Air. 

But it feems more difficult, as well as more ufcfull, to be 
able to prefer ve Meat long without Salt 5 for 'tis fomciently 
known to Navigators , how frequently, in long Voyages,the 
Scurvy, and other Difeafes, are contracted by the want of 
frefli Meat, and the necefllty of reeding conftantly upon none 
but ftrongly poudrcd Flefh , or faired Fiih - and therefore, 
tie is much to be commended that hath firft devifed the way 
to keep Flefh fweet , without the help of thofe fretting Salts 




He told me, that the 




. Digitized by Google 



(9*) 

Of preferring known to fome ingenious Perfonsia Und$ni One of the 
Mats wafted mo ft notef j 0 f whom , upon my con/e&uring how ic may be 
agci. 008 V ° y " performed, confefled to me, that I had hit upon the W3y in 
general : Bat the moft fatisfa&ory account I could get of it, 
was from an Englifti man , thw lately pra&ifed Phyfick in 
the Eafl> Indies, who, finding I was no ft ranger to what I 
asked him about, told me freely, that he had feen both Goats- 
flefli, and Hens, fo well preferved by this way , that though 
it were put up in the E aft- Indie* a while before he came thence, 
yet he eat of it , and round it good and wholfome , between 
the Iflands oiCdf e Verd (as the Sea-men call them) and Eng- 
land fo that this Meat continued fweet above fix Moneths , 
notwithftanding the heat andclofcoefleoftheShip, the ex- 
ceflive heat they met with in their Paffage under the Line, 
and consequently through the Torrid Zone : and that the way 
was only this, That the Meat being well roafted, and cut in 
pieces , was carefully and conveniently ranged in a very clofe 
Caske, into which, afterwards, there was poured as much 
Butter melted, skimmed, and decanted from the grofler and 
ranker Parts, as would fill up all the intervals left between 
the feveral pieces of Flefh, and fwim about them all , and 
thereby keep out the Air from approaching them $ and then 
the Cask, being exactly clofed, was ftowed up in a conveni- 
ent place in the Ship, and kept unopened till the Meat was to 
be eaten.- And it muft not be omitted, that the Relator, 
and others that had the care of making Provifion for the 
Voyage , were fain, infte3d of Butter made of Cows Milk 
(which could not be had where they took in their Lading; to 
make ufe of that madeof Goats, orEwsMilk, which is not 
fas the indUns make it) fo good , and to whofe ranknefie he 
afcribed that which he had obferved in fome of the Meat bu- 
ried in it j which he thought might have been preferved linger, 



> 



Digitized by Google 



(99) 

and hetter ufttd ( for molfome and tncmnft he faid it was ) in 
oar Euro fun Batter, whofe power to prefer ve Meat bury 'd 
in i t,after due Co&ion, hath been confirmed to me upon their 
own obfervation, by an cxperienc'd Officer of the Engl ifli 
Fleet, that had the over- fight of the Provifions, and by others 
that had opportunity to obferve it. 

But how much the Naturalifts skill may advance tne Die- of prercrving 
tetical part of Phyfick, by enabling Men to make Aliments raw 
much laftinger then naturally they are , I m uft not here la- 
bour to convince you by other inftances, that I may not anti- 
cipate what we have elfewhere to acquaint you with, from 
other Mens Experiments, and our own, about the conferva- 
tton of Bodies. Only I frnll at prefent tell you in general, 
That I hope there will be wayes found out to preferve even- 
raw Flefli it felf ( for of the keeping of roafted , we have juft 
now given you an inftance ) with things that do not fo much 
fret it , nor give it fo corrofive a quality, when eaten, as oar 
common Salt doth. For not to mention what feveral curious 
Perfonshave pra&ifed, of faking Neats Tongues with Salt- siting Nea» 
peter, which though done only to make them look red, s^^e*'* 
(hews that a Body » not corrofive like common Sal t, may pre* 
ferve Flefh : I have, for tryal fake, kept an ( ntire Puppy of 
a pretty bignefle , untainted for many Weeks (and that in the 
midft of Summer) and that without flaying, drying ( by Fire 
or other wife ) or fo much as exenteratmg him , or cleaning 
him, or doing any thing towards the preferving of him, fave 
the keeping him immeried in a well ftopt VtiTel , under Spi- £f paving 
ritof Wine (ftom whofe tafte, I prefume, Meat may beea. J^n".^'^ 
lily treed by Water) and there feemed fmali caufe to doubt, 
that the only thing that hindred me from keeping him much 
longer, was the want of time to purfue the Experiment , and 
take notice of its fucceflc : For I remember, I have the fame 

n 2 way 



Digitized by Google 



ftoo) 

way kept a Toft Subfhnce , taken raw from an Ox or Cow ] 
for many Monechs (if I miftske not , eighteen or twenty) 
and found no putrefaction or ill Cent in the immerfed fub- 
ftance, which, for onght I know, might have been prefer ved 
divers Years together the fame way , or at leaft , by an eaiie 
improvement of this method, of which, as I lately intimated, 
I intend you hereafter an account* 
of confemng Aria* I mall further adde on this occafion, That if we re- 

mkin^ r u R « fle<a °P° n 5u Z 4r > which is ,eaft iD thefc Weftern Regi- 
of other con. ons ) but an al molt recent difco very, and conllder how many 

S?Canfc ° ^ 0( ^* es arc w * tn 11 * by Confectioners and others , not only 
preferved , but rendred exceeding gratefull to the tafte ; that 
(Ingle inftance may fuffice to make us think it probable t that 
expedients yet unthought of, may, by an infight into Na- 
ture, be found out, for the prefervation of Bodies j efpeci- 
ally, if our ingenious Friend, Mr. w, would (hew us , how 
out of divers other Concretes, befides the Sugar Cane, a 
Subfhnce not unlike Sugar ( though of different t&fte, ac- 
cording to the nature of the Vegetable, that affords it ) may, 
by a peculiar induftry? be prepared : which, that you may not 

* ihfo$u*,Vop&h<h*?.<* think unfeazable, let me mention to 

When they defire to have no cocus , or you ( f or perhaps he hath not yet taken 

Fruit thereof (namely of thr Palm-tree*) not icc of It ) what even Imti**s have 

ihcy cut the Bloffoms of the Corns a^a r % , # n. s r n. \ 

and bindca round Pot, with a narrow done Ot thiS natUlC. And hilt , let me 

mouth (b v them called cat™ ) fad to the inform you of what wee are told by 

Tree, and then fto;> the Urn: clofe, round r :~~L...-. 4 .u«* • T 

about with Pot.earth , fo that Withtf ^tncbottn • concern ng that Drink , 

Wind nor Air can enter in, or co:re Which in the Baft- Indus they Call Sura, 

fetch i and in that fort , the Pot, in (hort an( j ma( j e 0 f tne Liquor dropping from 

fpace, is fail of Water, wh.ch thy call i_ », /»• i i_ rr ° r 

sur.i : and is vc.y pic^fant Drink , i.ke ine Bloiloms , that they cut away from 
fwect Whey, and fooicwhat better. the Indian Palm -Tree which bears the 
Coco Nat. For ofthis^M,he tells us, That amongft other 
things, they make Sugar (which is called fagra ) which is 

made 



fioi) 

made by boiling that Liquor, and fetting it in the Sun, where 
it congeals to Sugar. 

And though I muft not conceal from you, thatour Au- 
thor addes, that it is not much eftcemed by reafonofits brown 
colour, and for that ( to ufe his words ) they have fo great 
quantity, and abundance of white Sugar throughout all India, 
yet the latter reafon , of the cheapnefle of fagra, feeras to be 
the principal. For probably, if other Sugar were farce , the 
melioration of this would be attempted \ and 'tis very like- 
ly, That if a skilful Naturalift had the ordering ofthatfwect 
Juice, of which the Indians make their fagra, he might very 
well make of it a Sugar of no fmall ufe* and fuch a Sugar 
would be very convenient in many cafes , and to many Per- 
fons, for its being different from the common Sugar, though 
it (hould not be better. Garcilla/fu* alfo (a much applauded ^pudjMt 
Writer concerning the We ft- Indies ) treating of the Fruits of j^7£ 
a Peruvian Tree, called by forae Mollc y and by others CMulli^ f . 3 . 1 ' 
Ccn fi aunt (faith he) ex eo potum confrieando blande inter ma- 
ms in aqua calidk donee dulcor omnis defnectur : Percelant 
hanc aquam fervantque dies tres quatuorve donee fubftdeat $ 
ptus eft limpidijfimus, Sec, \yiqua eadem cotfa convertitur in 
optimum mei : And of the fame Plant, Fetrus de Cieca hath 
this confirming PaiTage , Ex hujwfruttu cum aqua decotlo, JipiimJm 
frocoftura modo.ft am itnum five potto admodum ben j, ant ace* toim in*, 
turn aut me I. And that there is a great affinity betwixt fuch 
Vegetable Honey 's and Sugar , especially if the Juices be or- 
dered with a defign of turning them rather into Sugar then 
Honey , you may eafily gather from the next and more me- 
morable inftance which we are to mention, and which is af- 
forded us by the diligent Dcfcriber of the Brazilian Plants, 
who treating of the caraguata , or Erva Baboja ( or as fome 
Would have it, Her ha tnnommata cattle portulaca) hath thefe 

n 3 words 



Digitized by Google 



(102) 

words to onr prefent purpofe : Porn ( faith he ) rsdendo no- 
vacula petrifa ftolones, c man at, ex ccncavitate liquor (jut dam 
t*»t a. cofil Ht ex una [olummodo plantd ( Mirabile dicta ) in- 
ter dum 50. aut f lures arobdefluant , e quo Uquare fit vinum^ 
acetum, mel & fACchArum : liquor quiff e per dulcis coquendo 
redditur multofuavhr And fftflior, it a ut tandem in [ace bar um 
congelafcat. 

Since the writing of thefe laft Lines, being vifited by 3n 
ancient Virtuofo, Governour to a confiderable Colony in the 
Northern America, and inquiring of him, among other par- 
ticularities touching his Country , fomethiog in relation to 
the thoughts I had about the making of (email kinds of 
Sugar, heafliiredme, aponbisownexperiencet that there is 
infome parts of Ntw England, a kind of Tree, fo like our 
Wallnut trees , that it is there fo called , whofe Juice that 
weeps out of its Incifion,cJv. if it be permitted flovvly to 
exhale away the fuperfluous moifture, doth congeal into a 
fweet and faccharine Cub ft a nee \ and the like was confirmed 
to me, upon his own knowledge, by the Agent of the great 
and populous Colony of the Mafatbufets. And very lately 
demanding of a very eminent and skilful! Planter, why, li- 
ving in a part of America, too cold to bear Sug3r- Canes , he 
did not try to make Sugar of ihat very fweet Liquor, which 
the Mjlks of Maiz , by many called Indian- Wheat, affords, 
when their Juice is expreffed* he promifed me he would make 
tryal of it : Adding , That he mould do it very hopefully, 
becaufe that though he had never been folicitous to bring this 
Juice into a ficcharine form , yet having feveral times, for 
tryal fake , boild it up to Syrup , and employed it to fweetea 
Tarts, and other things , the Guefts could not perceive that 
they were otheiwiie fweetned than with Sugar. And he 

further 



Digitized by Go 



( 

farther added , That both he and other?, had, in New- En£ 
Und) made foch a Syrup with the Juice of Water- Me- 
lons. 

Nor , Pyrcphilut, is it only by teaching Men to improve That the 
the wholefomnefle and tails of the Aliments, or to keep them gJTflJJ 2? 
long uncorrupted, that the Naturalift may contribute to the wayesto in- 
prefervation or Mans health $ For from the ingenious at, vcftiptcthe 
tempts of Sanftori*,, in his Mcduina Static* , we may be JSSS^ 
invited to hope, that there may be wa)es, as yet unthought of Aliments 
of, to inveftigate the wholefomnefle or infalubrity of Ali- EE^i* 
mentSi as he, by the weight of Bodies, after having fed on snUmn h;« 
fuch and fucb Meats, finds thatSwines Flefh, Melons, and 
fome other things that he names (in the third Sedion) do tatlca * 
much hinder infenfible Perfpiration , and confequently are 
unwholfome; though, as I take it, it were not amifs, that 
before fuch Obfervattons be framed into general and eftabli- 
flied Aphorifmes,they were carefully made in Bodies of differ, 
ing Ages, Sexes and Complexions, and with variety of Cir- 
cumftances : But then again, prefuming thefe Maximes to 
be judicioufly framed, the fame Statics Medicina makes it 
hopeful!, thai there may be un-thought or Methods found, . 
whereby , by wayes different from thofe formerly ufed by 
Phyficians, a Man may be much aflifted in the whole man- 
ner of ordering nimfelf , fo as to preferve health, and to 
forefee and prevent the approach of many Diftempers. And 
perhaps by fuch un-thought of wayes, divers Paradoxes of 
concernment to Mans health may be made out, as the diligent 
Sanfttrius to that Obfefvationpiopofed in thefc words,tom*/ SeR. $. 
aut bis in menfefafto ttctfiu in ctbo & patu, die [etjtsenti, licet 
fenfMiter non cvac»et t minus fo/itc perpendit snnexm (in the . 
followingAphorifme^addeththisimportantCorollaryrK/^w 
uniforms cant benefUi* Uknm qui fcml vcl bu in menfe ex- 

ccdnnt 



Digitized by Google 



(i©4) 

txfdtrix enim a copta irritdta excitdt tsntum perfcX 
™cetman- rMm * q^ntumfme ft**"* nem9 crederet. And indeed , ex- 
fpiratU be- perience hath informed as , that the promoting or fupprefling 
cw.xt ihc 0 f iofenfiblc tranfpiration , by which , in a day , the Body 
ordSJ/dict mav difcharge it felt of four or five pound of excrementiti- 
and after ex- oas Matter, hath a much greater power to advantage or pre. 
SeweSrine fadice health , then is wont to be taken notice of $ fo that we 
of qjiim body, fee that the Staticks,which,though long known,wcre thought 
ufelefle to Phyfick , may afford fcverall important directions 
in reference to the preferv3tion of Mans health; to which 
there are likewifc other wayes whereby the Naturalift may 
contribute. For he may alfo devife means , whereby to 
judge of the qualities of Aliments , efpecially Drinks in their 
refpe&ive kindes 5 and like wife of the temperature of the 
Air in this or that place afligned , we (ball, in one of the fol- 
lowing Eflays, defcribe to you a fmall flight In ft r urn en t, by 
the help of which , one that is acquainted with this or that 
particular fort of Wine, may give a near guefs whether it be 
embafed with Water or not. And whereas in moft hoc 
Countries , where Water being the common Drink, 'tis of 
great concernment to mans health to be able to make a good 
Difference in cftimate of the falubiity of it % And whereas Phyficians are 
the wcght wont to think Water otter is fdribus, the better and purer the 
•f water*. lighter it is, this Inftrument prefently manifefts, without 
any trouble of weighing in Scales, what among any Waters 
propofed is theheavieft , and which the lighted, and what 
difference there is of gravity betwixt them : And this difpa* 
rity may fometimes be fo great , that I remember fome of 
our Engl ■ ih Navigators tell us, That upon bringing home a 
fort of Water out of Africa into EngUnd , they found , by 
the common way of ponderatton, the African Water in the 
Came bulk, to be about four Ounces in the pound lighter then 

the 



y 



(101) 

* the E*gl$lh. And as the thickneflepr leightneffe of Water* 
may be thus prefently difcerned by this HjdrojlAtic&ll way^ fo 
'tis poflible,by fome Chymicall Experiments, eafily enough ThatCtym; 
to difcovcr fome other qualities, wherein Waters, that are 2™ aKcT 8 
thought to be of the fame nature , differ from each other ; as other q»»uia 
we findc that very many Pump waters will not beare Soap, as ' m w «crs. 
Rain- waters, and the generality of Spring waters will do: 
fome water will not well dye Scarlet, or fome other particu- 
lar colour, becaufe they are fecretly imbued with fome kinde 
of faline Subftance, that hath an operation it mould not have 
upon the Ingredients employed by the Dyer • And I have 
fome times difcovered a latent Sea- fait in Water, where others 
fufpe&ed no fuch matter, by pouring into it a folution of good 
Silver, made in Aquafortis : For as common Salt , as well as 
the fpirit of it, will precipitate the Metall out of fuch a folu- 
tion, in the forme of white Calx * fo it feemed rationall to 
conceive, that in cafe the Water I fufpected bad been imbued 
in its paflage through the Earth with a faline quality, though 
not confpicuous enough to be taken notice of by the tafte ; 
thefe faline Corpufcles dirfufed through the Water, would, 
though faintly,a& their parts upon the dillolved Silver • and 
accordingly I found, that upon the mixtures of fuch Waters; 
and the Metalline folution, there would immediately be pro- 
duced a kinde of whitenefle ( from fome parts of the Metall 
precipitated by the Salt : ) to avoid which, I have often been 
faine to ufe, in places where I met with fuch Waters-, either 
Rain-water, or that which is freed from its common Salt , by 
a flow Diftillation. 

And as for the temperature of the Aire , which is acknow- 
ledged to be of exceeding great confequence , both as to 
health, and as to the prolongation of life * and which is pofli- 
bly y et of greater moment to both than moft Men imagine, 

o the 



Digitized by Google 



(10*) 

That the Ni- the skilfull Natnralift's fagacity, if it were employed to that 
wraiift may purpofe, might probably finde clivers waies of difcovering tbc 
«S5£ 1 of qualities, and confeqnently the falubrity and unheal thfulneiTe 
particular Airs, pf the Aire in particular places. For the diligent Stnftorius 
(in the fecond Section of his Median* Stat tea) teacheth us 
how to eft im ate the healtbfulneffc and infal ubrit y of the Air, 
by the weight of thofe to ens Bodies that live in it . And be* 
fides this C nice ) way, we fee, that by the late invention of 
Weather- Glafles, 'tis cafie to difcerne which of two Neigh- 
bouring Houfes,and which of two rooms in the fame houie is 
the colder. And 1 remember, I have fome times bethought 
ftiy felfe of a flight way (to be mentioned in one of the follow- 
ing EfTayes ) by the help of which , it is not hard to deter- 
mine in which of two places propofed, the Aire is, ceteris p4- 
ribusjht dryer or the moyfter* And to give alio fome gueile, 
both how much at the fame time the Aire of one place exceeds 
that of the other, and how the temperature of the Aire chan- 
geth in the fame place at feverall times, either of thofe quali- 
ties. And that the differing operations of feverall Aires,upon 
certaine forts of Ficfh hung in them, upon fome fading co- 
lours, upon Bodies fubjeft to gather r uft , or to be tarniih'ds 
and in a word, upon divers other fubje&s, may be more con- 
fiderablc than Men fcem yet to have taken notice of, I fhall 
thioke it fufficient to have intimated in this place, being deji- 
rous to haftcn to the following ElTay ( wherewith I am to con* 
dude, what I have to offer to you concerning Pbyfick) that 
I may have the more time to employ oa it. 



ESSAY 



Digitized by 



ESSAY. V. 

Tropo/tng fome T articular s wherein 3\(atu* 
turat Tbilofophy may be ufe full to the 
Therapeutical part of Tbjfic{. 

I 

ANd now, Pyrophilm , the method that we formerly 
prefer i bed to uur (elves (a little after the beginning of theincrodu 
the hrft EflTay ) requites, that we coniider a while the &<* 
Therapeutical pzttoi Phyfick, which is indeed that, whole 
improvement would be the mod beneficial to Mankind and 
therefore I cannot here forbear to wilh, That divers Learned 
Fhyftcians were more concerned , than they feem to be, to 
advance the Curative pare or their Protetfion- without 
which, three at lea ft of the four others may prove indeed de- 
lightful and beneficial to the Phyfician , but will be pf very 
little ufe to the Patient, whofe nlief \% yet the principal end 
of Phyflck : whercunto the Phjftologicsl, Pathological, and 
Stmiotical parts of that Art ought to be referred. There 
was a while fince, a witty Doctor , who being asked by an 
Acquaintance of mine (himfelf an eminent Phyfician, and 
who related this unto me) why he would not give fuch a Pa* 
tient more Generous Remedies, feeing he grew fo much worfe 
under the ufe of thofe commt* languid ones , to which be had 
been confin*d,that he could not at the lail but dye with them 

o % in 



Digitized by 



in his Month ? briskly anfwered, Let' him dye if he wll,fr 
he dye [ecundum artem. I hope there are very few of this 
Man's temper , but it were to be wiftied, that there were few- 
er Learned Men that think a Phyfician hath done enough, 
when he hath learnedly difcourfed of the feat and nature of 
the difeafe , foretold the event of it and methodically era- 
ployed a company of fafe, but languid Remedies, which he 
had often before found almoft as unable to cure the Patient, 
as unlikely to kill him. For by fuch an unprofitable way of 
proceeding, to which fome lazy or opinion ited Pra&izers of 
Phyfick (I fay fome , f or I mean not all) have, under pre- 
tence of its being fafe, confined themfelves$ they have ren- 
dred their whole Profefllon to obnoxious to the Cavils of 
fuch Empericks, as he that (as the Lord Verulam reports) was 
wont to fay , Your Eur of e an Phyficians are indeed Learned 
Men, but they know not the particular Cures of Difeafes$ 
and (unreverently enough) to compare our Phyficians to Bt- 
fhops, who had the Keys of binding and tooling and nothing 
elfe: Which brings into my mind, what Monfieur De B*U 
fac relates ( in his witty French Difcourfe*/ the Court ) of a 
Phyfician of Millain % that he knew at Padua , who being con- 
tent with a Pofleflion of his Science, and (as he faid ; The en- 
joyment of the Truth, did not only not particularly enquire 
into the Cure of Difeafes, but boafted , That he had killed a 
Man with the faireft Method in the World : E morto(S*\d he) 
fanontcamante, e con tutti gli ordinl And fuch Scoffs and 
Stories are readily enough entertained by the major part of . 
Men, who fend for Phyficians , not fo mach to know what 
ailcs them, as to be eafed of it * and had not rather been me- 
thodically killed , than Empirically cured. And it doth in- 
deed a little lelfen even my efteem of the great Hiffocrates's 
skill i to find mentioned in his Writings fo many of his Pa- 
tients* 



Digitized by 



(lop) 

dents, of whom he concludes, that they dyed * And I had 
much rather, that the Phy fician of any Friend of mine, mould 
keep his Patient by powerful Medicines from dying, than tell 
me pun&ually when he (hall dye , or (hew me in the opened 
Carkafs why it may be fuppofed he lived no longer. Bur, 
Pjropbiltts, my Concern for Mankind , and for the reputation 
of many excellent Phyficians, whofe Profelfion fufters much 
by the want of either Induftry or Charity, in fuch as we have 
been fpeaking of, hath diverted me longer than I thought , 
from telling you, That I fuppofeit will not be very difficult 
to perfwade you, that this fo ufeful Theraf tutted part of Phy- 
lick is alfo capable of being much improved by a knowing 
Naturahft, efpecially if he be an intelligent and expert Chy- 
m ift, as in this Eflay we will fuppofe him. 



CHAP. I. 

COme Pdracelfidft would, perhaps , fet forth, how much That the nam: 
^more eafie to be taken Chymically. prepared Medicines are ra,ift JJ , 7 
wont to be, than thole loatnlome and clogging Galenical Po- Chymicaiiy. 
rions, Bolus's, drc which are not only odious to the Takers, pj^parcd, more 
but ( which is muchworfe) are to many fo offend ve, that ei- STSSmw" 
ther the Patients cannot get them down, or the incenfed Sto* Giiakti ones, 
mach returns them by Vomit , before thev have flayed long 
enough in the Body to do any more than diftemper it. But 
I (hall not much infill on this , becaufe I think wholfomneft 
to be much more confiderabie in a Remedy than pleafantnefs: 
though, I confefs, 1 could wifh that Phyficians were more 
careful to keep Patients from being almoft as much troubled 
by Phyfick, as by the Difeafe ; and to cure according to the 
old Prefcription , not only cito and tu(o , but jwwde too: 

o 3 Efpecially 



Digitized by Google 



(110) 

Efpecially confidering that, as we were faying, the loathfom- 
nefs of Tome Medicines maketh the Stomach reject chem, be- 
fore they can have performed their O per at ions. And it is, I pre- 
f ume, on this account as much as on any other, that at Oxford 
Learned and Practical Phyficians,of your Acquaintance, make 
very frequent ufe (on Patients not FeveriftiJ oftherr/foof 
$*Up y barely drawn with Spirit of Wine % fince, as we have 
A r of f< tr ? cd 1 ^ X ' e ^ c or tea ^ or more Grains, of this almoft infi. 
/^Mineral Pid Refin, being cleanly prepared , according to Art, and 
Waters and the with a little Gum trdgacAntb^ and half its weight of powdred 
Lume*. riU Cinamon, ox fome fuch thing made op, may be taken in the 
Morning, in form of Pills, inftead of a Potion ; and is wont 
to evacuate plentifully enough , and yet gripe the Patient 
much lefs than common Purges. But, as I laid , I mall not 
infift on this. I might better commend the ufefulnefs of 
Chy miftry to the ThcrsfentUdl part of Phy fick, from hence, 
That it is probable, that even emptying Medicines may, by 
the Spagyri/ls Art, be fo prepared, as not only to be lefs of- 
fenfive than common Purges or Vomits in the taking, but to 
be lefs painful in the working ? As I have often obfcrved,both 
in my felf and others , that upon the taking of the clear, and 
not loathfome Mineral Waters »f Btrntt, though the Medi- 
cine wrought with me ten or twelve times in a Morning, yec 
it did not either pain me, or make me fick, or diforder me for 
the remaining part of the day, any thing nearfo much as a 
common Pill or Potion that had wrought but once or twice 
would have done. And I (hall elfewhere ( God permitting) 
teach you a preparation of Silver, whereof about three or 
four Grains being madenp (with any proper Confct ve)into 
a little Pill, is wont to make a copious evacuation of Serum 
efpecially (in Bodies that abound with it) without making 
che Patient almoft at all fick, or griping him .* Infom uch that 



Digitized by Google 



fill) 

I know foraePerfons,both Phyfirians and othcrs,with whom 
though this Medicine worke frequently in a day , and though 
( which is ft ranger ) once taking of it will with fom e Perfons 
workc fo for two or three, or more dayes (ucceffively, yet 
they fcruple not to goe abroad and follow their bufmefle-, and 
fome that take it , tell mee , That when it workes not with 
them , as for the moft part, when it hath freed the Body 
from fuperflaous Strum, it will ceafe, and m fome Bodies will 
fcarce pnrge at all, it neither puts them to paine, nor makes 
them tick. 

And now I am fpeaking of the painlefle wayes of relieving ™at 
the fick, I (ball adde, That there is another way, whereby out inwa7d mc- 
*tis to be hoped, many Patients may berefcued from a great d cin« able to 
deale of paine, and that is by finding ont Medicaments, ibflt cSShiSSS? 
may in feverall Diftempers, that are thought to belong pe- b y divert In- 
culiarly to the Chyrurgions hand , excufe the need of Burn- ****** 
ing,Cut ting, Trepanning, and other as well painfull as terrible 
rnanuall Operations of Chirorgcry. Belmont tells us, That JSJEJ^L 
he knew a Country Fellow, who cured all frcfti Wounds by sec ttfbthe 
a Dnnke made (as I remember ; of burnt Tilts. I have in fain !. A ^ or 
formed you in another Eflay, of the Cure I obferved to be ^"^J, 
made of the ex ulcerated Tumors of one fickof the Kings Arm*.?*** 
Mvili, by the ufe of Becre , altered by a little Plant, that c ^ t ^ c ^ 
did not at all difturbe the Taker • If we may believe Bel- ' ' l> " 
wont's and Paracelftv's Prdcifitstm Diaphoretic us , taken 
at the Mouth, doth cure, to ufe his owne Words, Caret* 
noma, Lupum, & quodlibtt *y£fihiomenum cacoetbes ulcus, five 
externum five internum . And if there be any truth in what 
hat h been affirmed to mee by feverall Ey e- witnefles, as well 
Phyficians as others , concerning the Weapon -falve, and 
fonder of Sympathy , we may well conclude, That Nature 
nay pertorme divers Coxes 3 for which the help of Chirur- 

gery 



Digitized by Google 



{119) 

gery is wont to be implored, with much lefie paine to the Pa" 
tienc , than the Chirurgion is wont to put him to. I know a 
very ingenious Man , that is Famous as well for his Writings 
as for a Remedy, wherewith he undertaketh to cure conftant- 
ly the exulcerated Cancers of Womens Breads, without any 
confiderable paine : But having not yet had opportunity to 
make tryall of that which I have lying by mee, I (hall onely 
tell you, he allures mee, That his Medicine is indolent, and 
mortifies the ulcerous part as far as they are corrupted, . with* 
out difordering the party troubled with them * which I the 
lefle doubt, becaufe, that (to adde thus much on this occa- 
fion) partly by the colour, of his Powder, and partly 
by his owne Conrefllon to mee, it feems to be a dulcification 
of Ar[enickfitd fixt with Nitrejnd then carefully freed from 
itscorrofivenefle, by very frequent Diftillations of frefti Spi* 
rit of Wine. I fliall ere long haveoccafion to teach you a 
Drinke, whereby exulcerated ( but not Cancerous) Breads 
have been very happily cured- The Learned Bartholin (in 
his late Obfervations) mentions the cure of fome hurts in the 
Head , done without Trepanning , in cafes where that for- 
midable and tedious Operation is wont to be thought necef- 
fary. As for the terrible way of (topping the violent Bleed- 
ing in great Wounds, byfeeringthe Orifices of the Veflels 
- with hot Irons , it would be litcle needed , if we knew fuch 
Remedies as that which the Ioquifitive Petrus de ofma, in nis 
curious Letter to (Mondrdes from Pern , mentions in this 
•jfmd ^/w.tr</. pallage, which I finde among his other O bfer vat ions : Anno 
it ftmpiic.fiu- (faiih he) 1 5 5 8- in nrbe D. facobi qud eft in Previncia Chyle* 
4c.pf.84. quidam Indtcaftivt furas [tbi amfutirunt, &eas aflas frd fd* 
me ederunt.ejr 1 quod mirdbile dtfin)e»j»fddm PUnttfoiU vul- 
nertbu* imfonentes, illico fangnintm fiftebanu I knew a rich 
Man, extreamly corpulent > who having long had a ft range 



Digitized by Google 



(Ill) 

kmde of FtfluU in his Bread , and having travelled from ooe 
Country to another, toconfulc with the ableftChirurgions, 
was at length brought to that pa fie, that at a Confult they re- 
folved, by opening his Bread , to try if they could track the 
winding FijlnU, and fave his Life : And as the Inftt uments, 
for thts fad operation, lay upon the Table , another famous 
Chirurgioncafually coming into the Houfe, told the Patient 
that he had an arc of curing FtftuU's without cutting them . 
open, and without anv confidcrable paine or trouble : where- 
upon the rich Man offering him what he pleafedfor the Cure, 
theChirurgion quickly perf ormed his promife, as the pati- 
ent himfeIfe,who fhewed mee his Breaft,confeffed to mee,and 
that by the ufe of an almoft indolent Remedy, which he pur- 
chafed of the Chirurgion,and which by bis favour came to my 
bands: And that even very ill -condition^ Fz/M/s maybe 
cured without Chirurgicall Operations, by Medicines taken 
at the Mouth, I (hall ere long have occafion to mew you by a 
notable Example. 

In the meanc time I (hall adde,That a Man,whom I (up. f'.f'J^', 
pofeyou have often feen, having a while fince received fuch a ^ ,a 
kick of a Horfe, as made the Dodot and Chirurgton that 
tended him , to conclude the part gangrenated, and the pa- 
tientscondition,by theacceflionof a Violent Feaver,fodefpe- 
ratcthat they defired to meddle with him no longer $ a large 
Dolls of Sir Walter R&wleigh's Cordiall,fent him by an excel- 
lent Lady you are nearly related to , not only freed him from 
his Feaver, and the Delirium that attended it , but, to the 
wonder of all that obfervcd it, reftored the Limb that was 
concluded gangrenated, to its former foundnefle. 

And to bring credit to all thefe Relations, I mail crowne 
them with that memorable paflage of GuUelmm Pifr> of as 
great things that he faw done by the illiterate Indians them- 

p felves: 



Digitized by Google 



what great u!c ves ! iMemini (faith hce) in c a fir is membra militnm globu - 
the Indians lis fclopetorum i&a,dr \dm\dm ab Enropdis Chirurgis^ tsm Ln~ 
nuke of the fitanis quam Bdtavts, dmputdndd ,bdrbdros recentibus vummi 

Juice ot To- J .7 . , ' ... t fr- . £ j . . £ 

bacco. • /far* ^ BdlfdmtfA ferro ey tgne ltberd{je i ey'fe/tater re/ttturfje. 

Oculdtus itidem t eft if [urn in Noftcomtis re lift a ulcer a ejrgdn~ 
grenns ab tilts vel folo (ucco T dbdd curdtd. 

But, Pjrcfhilus, That the making of divers Helps to Re- 
covery lefle diftaftfull, or leife painfull to the Patients, is not 
the**/?, nor pernios thegreotefl fervicethat Chymiftry may 
do him that attempts the Cureof Difcafes,I fliali now indea- 
vour to manifeft in fome particulars. 



CHAP. II. 



That the 
of Nature 



hefcarch A ND(fr^ The skilrall Naturalift, efpeciallyif a good 
imrc by **Chymift, may much aflift the Phyfician to difcover the 
p a H/r y a!f- Qaalities of Medicines; whether Simple or Compound ^ That 
cotcti the q ua- the Experiments of the Spagyrifts may much contribute to 
litiesofMcdi- tne examining thofe many things themfelvcs prepare, you 
will, I pftfume, cafily grant : That alfo divers Mineral! Wa- 
ters are of the nobler fort of Medicines, is fofficiently con- 
fefled on all hands-, and 'tis knowne too, that the induftry of 
Cbymiftsbath produced fome good directions towards the 
difcoveryoftheMineralh predominant in divers MedicinaWe 
Springs ! But I am much miftaken.if they have not left much 
for others to do,which may be eafiiy done. And I fcarce doubt, 
but that by the various wayes that might be propofed,of try- 
ing what fuch Waters hold, and what faline or other Quali- 
ties are predominant in them , notonelythc nature of thofe 
Medicinall Waters that are already ufed, might be more 
throughly undcrftood 5 but undetected properties might in 
many others that are now not taken notice of, be difco vercd? 

of 



Digitized by 



(US) 

of fome of which wayes of examining Mineral Waters, I may 
clfewhere give you an intimation. And I have made feveral 
Try ah thaf have, I confefs , much inclined me to chink, that 
the fault i» father in us, than either in Nature or Chytniftry, 
that Men do not, by the help of Chy mical Experiments, dif- 
cover more of the nature of divers Medicaments, than hi- 
therto they feem to have fo much as aimed at : For though 
the abftrule endowments of Spccificks will not, I fear, be 
learned in hafte, other wife than by particular Tryals and Ob- 
fervations* yet many Simples have other Qualities, which 
feem chiefly to re fide , though not in an Elementary Salt or 
Sulphur , yet in a part of the Matter that feems of kin to a 
Salt or Sulphur.' fuch as fowernefs, falcnefs, a cauftick or a 
healing faculty, abfterfivencfs, and the like, upon whofc ac- 
count fuch remedies feem chiefly to work in a multitude of 
cafes. And towards the Invert igat ion of fuch Qualities, a 
Cbymift may oftentimes do much, without making all his 
tryals in humans Bodies. But though , to illuftrate this 
matter, I have fometimes nude feveral Experiments, yet not 
having now my Notes and obfervations at hand, I (hall on- 
ly mention a few things as they offer themfelves to my memo, 
ry, reserving the more diftinft handling of this fubjec^ to 
another opportunity : And the rather, becaufe that till fuch 
Fhdnomtna have been more diligently obierv'd, and reduced 
to their diftro<a forts, I would have them looked upon but as 
hints to further Enquiries, not as fufficient Authority to 
ground general Rules on. 

There are fome Plants, whofc Juices, efpccially when the 
fuperfluous moiftore is exhaled or abftra&ed, will, fome by 
theaffiftanceofa gentle Heat and Fiitr3tion, and fome, even 
of themfelves, in time which I remember hath in fomcfuo 
cuicnt Plants amounted but to a very few hours; coagulate 

pa in 



• 

Digitized by Google 



(lit) 

in part into a kindcof Salt , which, if you pleafe, you may 
of if* yitr: call EiTential: And by this Nstre-Tdrtarectts Salt (as it Teems 
Tan* to* Salt to be ) thofe Vegetables, whofe Juice affords it ( fuch as are, 
ttbtoT V<£C ' miftakcnot their names, Pane* aria, Bon age, Bugl»[s % 
&c.) may be discriminated from thofe many others, from 
whence it is not fat lead by the fame way ) to be obtained. 
And poffibly alfo thefe Salts may, to a heedful Surveyor of 
them, appear to differ enough from each other in fbape, tafte, 
or other obvious Qualities, to deferve to be farted into dif- 
fering kinds. 

Iflikewife we compare the EfTential Salts and Spirits of 
thefe Plants , which thofe of Scurvy grsfs , Br$*klime 9 and 
other Vegetables that are counted Antt[corbmical , and a- 
bound in Volatile and Saline parts : And if we alio examine 
other Plants, by divers Chymical Operations , and obferve 
not onely their difpofednefs or indifpo/ition to yield Spirits or 
Oyles by Fermentation, or without ic •, but thofe other Parti- 
culars wherein they will appear to agree with, or differ from 
each other: there is little doubt but fuch Tryals will make 
them difcover, to a confidering Naturalift, much of their Na- 
ture and Properties, and efpecially ot fuch as depend chiefly 
upon the plenty or paucity of the faline, un&uous, fowre,fpi- 
rituous, lazy, tenacious or volatile Parts. 

It may be alfo obferved, that the Infufion or Deco&ion of 
o£ri££ fome Plants, as of 3r*zil,Se**M,&c. will be heightned in- 
tween .cid and t0 a reddifh colour,by putting Alkal$z*te Salts, as of Tartar 9 
aicauxaicsaui. or 0 f P ot-a{hes , in the Water that extracts their Tinaures: 
Whereas acid Spirits, at lead fome of them, will much im- 
pair, if not deftroy their colour $ as a little Aqua fort is will 
immediately turn a red Tincture of Brazil , made in fair Wa- 
ter, into a pale yellow : Whereas on the other fide, I have 
obferved, that a fmall quantity of a ftrong Solution of Pot- 
atoes 



Digitized by Google 



f«7) 

a/hes , drop'd into an Infufion of red- Rofc leaves , hath pre- 
fcntly tamed it into a muddy colour, that teemed to partake 
of green and blew , bat was dark and dirty * whereas a little 
jiquAfortispx good Spirit of Salt poured into the famefimple 
Solution, did immediately turn it into a fine red, and fo it 
would do to the muddy Mixture lately mentioned, if it were 
put to it in a far greater quantity. I obferved alfo, that with 
a very ftrong (though dear and well filtrated Uxivium of 
Pot-afties, f could precipitate fome part of the Inrufionor 
Deco&ion of red-Rofes, which grofler parts, when the Mix- 
cure was filtrated through Cap paper, remained like a dirty 
coloured (though fomewhat grcenifb) Mud in the Filtre $ the 
fluid and finer part of the Mixture patting through in the 
form of a Liquor high coloured, alraoft like Mufcadine. 

And on this occafion , I remember, that as Galls, a very of Ink made 
ftiptick Vegetable excrefcence, will yield a Deco&ion, with *r 
which, and coffer is , the common Ink is made , (o divers o- Z$™ m ** 
ther Plants, or notably aft ringent parts, may be employed Plant*, with* 
to the like ufe : For, by caftine Vttriol into a Decoclion ei- lt « Ic V«noL 
ther of Oaken Bark, or red Roles, or even a bare Infufion of 
cither Log wood, or Sunuicb, to name now no other Plants 
of the like nature , I have prefently made a Mixture tint 
might make a (hift to ferve for Writing- Ink $ but whether all 
fiiptick Plants or they only, will with Vitriol make an Ink, 
1 refer to further Enquiry: And as a Solution of Vitriol^ and 0 ff 0 mcMe- 
the Decoction of the above- mention'd Plants, do precipitate taiiine precipe 
C3ch other to make Ink \ fo I remember I have tryed, that by tationi * 
diflolving the Chryftalsof pure Silver(madc the common way 
with Aq** fortv, or Spirit of Nitre) in a good quantity of 
fair Water, that the Liquor having no colour of its own, the 
colourrit produceth in other Bodies may be the better ob- 
ferved, I found that I could with this Liquor precipitate out 

p 3 of 



I 



fn8) 

of the Inf ufions alone of feveral Vegetable, S ubftanccs dif- 
feringly colour'd, according to their refpe&ive difpofitions: 
And to I have found, with lefs coft, that Sstciarmm Saturni, 
which feems to be a kinde of VitrUi of Lead , whilft it lyes 
difiolved in the fame Spirit of Vmeger which extracted it from 
the Metal, being put to the bare Infufion of Log- wood, Lig- 
num ^^f#V/V»m } red-Rofe$(to name thofe I now remember I 
madetryalof) they will precipitate each other. 

I might further adde, That I have tryed that fulphureous 
Salts , fuch as Oyle of Ttrtar, made fer Dtliquium , being 
That fulphu. drop - d i nt0 the expreffed Juices of divers Vegetables, will, 

rous Salts turn ■ * , . <* . . „ i » • «r ' 

the wprcflW in a moment , tarn them into a lovely Green, though the Ve- 
juiccsof vegc. getables were of colours differing from that, and from 



g'cen cow ° ther ( as I remember one of thofe Vegetables, in which I 
cxpe&ed , and found thatch3nge, wasof a fine Carnation) 
And I could tell you, that though it bedifputed whether 
Quick- lime have any Salt difloluble in Water, and of what 
fort it is , the Exdmett of that Queftion may be much fur- 
thered, by trying, as I have done, that the Water of Quick- 
Lime, well made, will preripiratea Solution of fublimate 
made in fair Water, and will prefenriy turn Syrup of Violets 
(which is Blew; if well mixed with it, into a fair Green, Ex- 
periments I fay of this nature I might eafily annex \ but ha- 
ving already fet down divers of them in what I have written 
concerning colours, I (hall refer you thither s And now only 
adde this Obfervation , that the Inveftigation of divers Me- 

of hed.ftiia. ^ ca ' Q U3 ^ CS * cven or " Animal SuMtances,may be much 
roncftheci! auifted by che Naturalift, efpecially a Chymift $ as we 
cj;u (MMwwr, clfe where have by the Diftillation of the CsUulm humane 

SSJJsST a*wo, how much k dififers from thc Stone$ that a ; e foond io 

arc called Lipi- the Earth. And if you take thofe hard Concretions , found 

*>C"w*». at certain times in the Heads of Craw- Fifties, that arc wont 

to 



Digitized by Google 



(U9) 

to be called Ldfides Cdncr$mm and commit fomeoftbem 
to Difttllation, and infufefomeia Vineger, and others in old 
Rheniflvwine , or ftrong White- wine, you will probably 
difcover fome thing of peculiar in the nature of this Con- 
crete, of which I may potfibly e!fe where make further men* 
tionno you: And not onely fo, but in Tome Animal Sub- 
fhnces , you may, by fit Experiments, difcover notable 
Changes to be made, and their Qualities to be much heigh- Jh c Change* 
tened, when the Eyefcarceperceiveth any Change at all, as I feM?u!fe 
have purpot'ely obfervcd, in keeping Urine in clofe Glafles, by Fermemau- 
and a moderate heat for many Weekes: For at the end of that ? h ffi , ffF? < ' 
time, the Virtues that depend upon its volatile Salt will be r ia* " 
io heightened, that whereas upon putting Spirit of Salt to of the miIture 
frem Urine,thet\^jp Liquors readily and quietly mixed, drop- if spirit of Salt 
ing the fame Spirit upon digefted Urine,there would prefent- with iited 
lyenfue a Hifling and Ebullition, and the volatile and acid u " ne ' 
Salts would, after a- while, concoagulate into a third Sub- 
(rance, fomewh3t of the nature of Sal Armonitck. And 
whereas the Syrup of Violets , formerly mentioned , being 
diflblved in a little frem Urine,feem'd to be but diluted there- 
by, a few drops oT the fermented Urine tempered with it, 
did prefently turne into a deep Green : And the fame dige- 
fted Urine being dropped upon a Solution of Sublimate made 
in faire Water, prefently turned it white , by precipitating 
the diflblved Mercury . With what (various) fucceile we 
' hive likewife made upon fome other parts of a humane Bo- 
dy,as well confiflcnt as fluid, fome Tryals, analogous to what 
we have recited of Urine, I may elfewhere perchance take no- 
tice toyou: Butoffuch kindeof Obfervations I muftgive 
you but this Hint at frefenu 

* • . 

CHAP. 



Digitized by Googl 




(120) 

CHAP. III. 

T!utthere*rch QEconMy : By thefc and other wayes of inveftigating the 
of namrc add« *>Mcdicall Qualities of Bodies , the Naturalift may been- 
abledtoadderauchtothc^r#4^/V4: And that tw« fe- 
diu. verall wayes. 

For he may by his feverall wayes of tryall,and by his Chy. 
roicall preparations difcover, that divers Bodies,clpecially of 
*v empiovine a Mioerall nature,that are as yet not at all imployed by Phy- 
bodics hitherto ficians, at leaft internally, may be brought into ufe by them $ 
not imployed. and that others that are naturally fo dangerous , as to be ufed 
but in very few, and for the mod part extreame cafes , may 
«el"d with fafety be more freely employed. Some Moderne Chy- 
o« of zi»ck. mifts fas particularly Qlauberm) have of latT prepared Reme- 
dies not unufefull out of Zinck or Spelter. And I have alrea- 
dy mentioned unto you an excellent Medicall ufe of Silver, 
of which, prepared fas is there intimated J I have now this 

D? 0 U pfieby t0 adde > That fince 1 bc S an t0 mitc of *° y° a » I met with 
•h s Pill Dt-i aconiiderableperfon^whoairuicsmeCjThatfheherfclfewas 
nards. by tnc u f c 0 f it in a fliort time, cured of tfie Dropfie, though, 
by reaton of her having a Body very corpulent, and full of 
humours , flie have been thought more than ordinarily in 
danger of that ftubborne Difeafe. I have fometimes won- 
dered, that there hath been fo little care taken by Phyficians, 
and even by Chymifts, to inveftigate the Qualities of Mine, 
rail Earths,and thofe other refembling Bodies , that are , or 
may be, plentifully enough digged up in moft Countries, 
though not the felfefaroe in alitor however menarepleafed 
to pafle them flighcly over , as if they were but Elementary 
Earth, a little flamed , or otherwife lightly altered : I have 
feen great variety of them , that have been digged fometimes 

within 



Digitized by GoogI< 



• (111) 

Within the conipaffeof a little fpot of Ground : and the dif- 
fcrencesofdivetsof them» both as to colour, tafte, confi* unhu 
ftence, and other Qualities > have been too great, not to 
make me fufpeft they were of very differing natures. And 
the true Bolus Armenus, and the Ten a Lemn/A, which is now 
brought us from the Ifland that gives it that name (mark'd 
with a Seal, which makes many call it Terra ftgiHdta, though 
that name be for the fame reafon applyed to the Terr a Silcfi- 
aca y and other Medical Earths ) have been Co efteetned, both 
by Antient and Modern Phyficians , as well againft Malig- 
nant Difeafes, and the Flague it felf, as againft divers other 
Diftempers ; that it is the more ftrange, that ( fince the great- 
eft part or" thofe two Earths , that are now bi ought into our 
Countries, have not, as the more skilful complain, the true 
marks of the genuine Earths, whofe name they bear) Phy- 
ficians have not been more careful to try whether their own 
Countries could not furnilh them with the like, or as good, 
cfpe dally in regard fome of the few attempts of that nature, 
that have of late times been made, may give them much in- 
couragement. For, not to believe the boafts of the Sileftan 
$ oh Anne s CMtntanm ( who pafleth for the Inventor of the 
Terr a StgtllatA Silcfuca Strigonienfis) in the Writing he pub- 
liftied of the vertues of it, That it is Gold prepared and tranC- 
muted, by provident Nature, into an admirable Medicine; 
I find that Learned Phyficians prefer it before the LemnUn 
Earth , that is now brought from Turkj: And theexperi- Ephmt Sc ?«- 
enced Sennertus gives it this commendation , Experiment* fi * n ' tltral "* 
( faith he ) mult is }Am fnbAtum efl^ e\m infignes ejfe vires c$n- 1 MF ' 1 ' 
trA feftem^febres mdl/gnas, venenAtorum dnimAltum morfus, 
dtArrhofAn^ [enter t Am : What he addes,that the Chy mitts 
name it Axungia [olti , brings into my mind fwhatlfhall 
hereafter have occafion to mention more particularly to you) 
• q that 



Digitized by Googl 



(122) ' 

that I had once brought me a certain E;rth, by a Gentleman 
that digged it up in this, or fame neighbouring Country, 
which though it fcemed but a Mineral Earth , did really 
afford, to a very expert tryer of Metals of my acquaintance^ 
a not defpicable prop orrion of Gold. They have aHb found 
in HmtgAfj , an Earr!i, which they call Bolus Teckdvnnfis, 
which is affirmed by Crdto ( in Stnntrtm ) to melt in the 
inflate of Mouth like Butter, and to have all the other proofs of the 
vm no n bt d " truc *° lM ^rmenustvtd therefore is,by that Judicious Phy- 
Mvfmm friar;, preferred before the Modern Bolcarmonj, even that 
IT "* ° r * hlcb was brought out of turk} to the Emperour himfeU % 
and he relates , not only its having fuccceded very well 
againft Cdtdrrhs^ but his having experimentally found it of 
great efficacy in the Plague, that reigned in his time at vicnnd. 
To which I mail adde , That a very Learned and Succefsfull 
Englifli Do&or , now dead , did fome years fincc, during a 
great Plague that then raged in the City where he lived , find 
a vein of red Earth, not very far from that Town, and pre- 
fcribed it with very good fuccelTe in Peftilential Feavers, as I 
was informed by an Ingenious Friend of his, that ufed to ad- 
minifter it, and (hewed me the place where he dig ged it. 

I remember alfo , the experienced Chymift Johannes A- 
grictls , in his Notes upon what Poffim delivers of Terra, 
SigiSdtdt after having much commended the Terrd Silefidcs 
in divers Difeafes, and equalled it to the beft oiTurky, where 
he had travelled , relates one Grange thing of it , with many 
Circum fiances , and in a way as if he fpoke upon his own 
tryal,naraely, That the Spirit of Terrd SigilUtd , by which 
1 think he means the Strigonien^^ dotb, though flowly, dif- 
foive Gold as well as an C^f. Regis, and that into a red S ol u- 
cion 5 whence in two or three dayes the Gold will fall of ic 
(elf into a very fine and fubtile Powder. And the fame Au- 

* tnor 



• Digitized by Google 



thor tells os ? That he hath fecn another Earth digged at the 
Jibeinfiran^ not far from Wefterwaldt , which was more in- 
clinable to white then to yellow, which is preferrable to the 
Silefian , and gives more Salt then it , and diflblves Silver 
better then other Mcnftrn%ms\ fince, as he faith , the Silver 
may thereby be eafily made potable , and be prepared into a 
very ufefiiL Medicine for the Difeafes of the Head. And 
for my part, I do not much wonder at the efficacy of thefe 
Earths, when I confider, that divers of them are probably 
imbued % as well as dyed , with Mineral Fumes 5 or tinned 
with Mineral Juices , wherein Metals or Minerals may lie, as 
the Chymifts fpcak, in [olutis frinciftu\ in which form, 
having never endured the Fire, many of their ufefulleft parts 
Are more loofe and Volatile, and divers of their vertucs lefs 
locked up, and more difpofed to be communicative of them- 
felves, then they are wont to be , in a more fixed or coagu- 
lated ftatcor when they have loft many of their finer parts by 
the violence of thtfFire. 

• 

Bcfides, there are feveral Mineral Bodies, which though of Medicines 
perhaps they may not be of themfelves fit for the Phyficians Arfc - 
cfc, may, by addition of fome other convenient Body, or 'by 
fequeftration of the more noxious pares , or by fome fuch 
other Chymical Preparation , as#may alter the Texture of 
fuch Minerals, berendred fit to encreafe the Materia mdica. 
As I h3ve known, that by a preparation of Arfenie^ with 
Salt- Peter, whereby fome of the more volatile and noxious 
parts are driven away , and the remaining Body fomewhac * 
fixed and corre&ed by the Altai* of the Nttrt , it hath , by 
a farther d unification with Spirit of Wine , or Vinegar, been 
prepared into a kind of Balfamnm fuliginis^ which wonder- 
fully cured a Phyfician of my acquaintance, as he nimfelf 

q 2 # con- 



Digitized by Google 



And out of 
tifmtum. 



*Apkd SbrO' 
tttrum in 
Tharmuop. 
lib. |. cap. 1 8. 
Dr. J.C. 



Ofthecorrcfti* 
cn of Poifonous 



confefled to me , of dangerous Venereal Ulcers' (divers of 
which penetrated even to the OAeatrnVr'tnartw) which had 
reduced him to great extremity. 

And though Bifmuium have not, that I know, till very 
lately been ufed, unlefe outwardly, and efpecially for a Gof- 
metick (hereafter to be taught you^yet the Induftrious Chy- 
mift, Samuel Clofcu*, bv calcination and addition of Spirit 
of Vinegar, and Cremor Tartar;, makes two Medicines of 
it, which he highly extols in the Dropfie and (toreferve 
for another place, what I have tryed upon Tin- glade) a very 
expert Chymift of my acquaintance, doth by preparing it 
with common Sublimate (carry ed up by which, I remember 
it hath afforded a very prettily figured Body ) make it into a 
white Powder ( like CMercunm vita) which heafluresmc 
befind% in the D of e of a few Grains , to purge very gently, 
without being *t all (as Mercmim vitd is wont to prove, 
violently enough) emetick. 

2. But the Naturalift may adde t&thetMateria CMedica, 
not only by inveftigating the Qualities of unheeded Bodies , 
but alfo by gaining admittance for divers, that, though well 
enough known, are foreborne to be ufed upon the account of 
their being of a Poifonous nature •, for by digeftion with 
powerful Menflmums , and fome other skilfull wayes of Pre- 
paration , the Philofophical Spagyrift may fo correct divers 
noxious, nay poyfonous Concretes, unfit in their erode {im- 
plicit y for the Phyficians ufe', at leaft in any confiderable 
quantity , as to make them ufeful and effectual Remedies. 
Belmont , who, though frequently extravagant in his Theory 
of Phyfick, doth often make no bad eftimate of the power of 
Remediest after having told us , That he adored and admired 
the Clemency and Wifdomeof God, for creating Poyfons, 
gives this account of his fo doing : Nam www (faith he; 

noluit 



Digitized by Googl 



nclult nobis effevenenaautnocua. Xec enim'tMortem fech,nec n22£d? 
Medtcamentum exterminii in terra : fed potius ut parvo no fir i difpe*I.M»dtm; 
fludio, mutarentnr in grandia amor is fui ptgnora, in u fur am *«m*' 
mortal turn , centra futnrorum morborum [aviticm. In illis 
nemft latitat fubfidtum, quod bentgniora ejr familiaria Simpli- 
cia r tcufant alia* . Ad majores & heroic es medentum ufut ve- 
nenatam horrida fervantur. And though I would not for- 
bid you, Pyropbilus, to think there is iomt Hyperbole in the 
Encomiums he here and elfewhere gives PoyfonousSimples ; 
yet when I coniider, what great things arc oftentimes per- 
formed by K^ntimonjy Mercury, and opium, even in thofe 
not over.skilfull wayes of preparing them , that are divers of 
them vulgarly ufed by Chy milts, especially when the prepa- 
rations are (which doth feldome happen; rightly and faithful- 
ly made : I can fcarce think it very unlikely, that thofe active 
Simples may, by a more skilfull way of ordering and correct- 
ing them,be brought to afford us very noble Remedies And 
the fame Examples m3y in part prevent the main 6 bje&ion 
that I can forefee m this cafe, which is, That whatever cor- 
rects Poyfons, muft, with their virulency, deftroy their acti- 
vity * for the above-named Simples, though fo prepared as 
to be Medicines fafe enough, have yet activity enough left 
them to let them be very operative , their energy being , by 
preparation, not only in part moderated, but in part fo 
over ruled, as to work after a more innocent mannei; : as in* 
Bezoardicum Miner ale , Skilfully prepared (for it very fel- 
dom is fo; the laxative and emetick virulency of the Anti- 
mony is changed into a diaphoretick, refolving and deoppi- 
lative power 5 which probably made the experienced Rtvcritt* 
f though counted a Galenift) fo particularly recommend this 
Medicine to Phyficians., which if I be not miftaken, may 
well be praifed without being flattered v And Hclmnt (up* 

<1 1 phes 



Digitized by G 



Hd<M\t . 

Tfjttjt.JtlpTA 

alttgafo. 
Nutn.4^47. 



The prepared 
on of AfMum 
turm it from 
being cmctsck 
to be notably 
tliurctical. 



Eclmm. 
pag.465. 



ttelmmt. it 

Litblaft. 

lib.7.cap.ji. 



Inftances in 
foroc of the 
fecrct Mr*> 

£t T f4l$J9&S 9 



(1*6) 

plies me with an eafie Experiment to our prefent purpofc, by 
telling us , That Afarum, which when crude, doth, as is 
well known, provoke Vomits, by a flight preparation (pre* 
fently to be mentioned) is fo altered, that its virulencyis 
changed, to nfehis ex predion, in deoppiUns, diwttUum Ur- 
darumfchriumremedinm^ which I the rather take notice of, 
becaufe I find , upon enquiry purpofely made of fome Io* 
genious Phy ficians of my acquaintance, th3t upon tryal, they 
commend this preparation of Htlmm\ and confefle, that by 
it the Afarum lofeth its emetick, and acquires- a diureticall 
Quality. 

^Now that all other Animal and Vegetable Poyfons may 
be corrected, without lofing their force with their virulen- 
cy, is the affirmation of Belmont concerning Psracetfus's and 
his Sdl circuUtum (ma\us.) And asfor Vegetables, he elfe- 
where tells us,Thatthe Lifts Cancrornm refolved \n for mam 3 
as he fpeaks, friftimd U8is y h*btt remedium contra incie- 
mcntiai mult or urn vegetMiumvi Uxsntt inftmium. And 
I remember that I knew two Phyficians, the one of which 
affirmed to me, his having feen tryal made (by the help of a 
noble Menjlrunm ) of what Helmont here teacheth,and found 
it true * the other a perfon fevcre, and apt enough to diflcnt 
from Htlmont, aflured me , That with the volatile Salt of 
Tartar % he had feen Vegetable Poyfons, and particularly 
*N*fcll*Sy fo corrected by a lightdigeftion withit, that it loft 
all its Poy fonous Qualities* for proof of which he freely offer- 
ed me, to take himfelf as much of that fatal Herb as would 
kill three or four Men ( but at that time, and in that place, I 
could not get any of the Plant to make the Experiment 
with J And though 1 ill ill fay nothing now concerning Hcl* 
moras Sal circalatum • yet as to the volatilization of the Salt 
vtTarto) what I have feen , fcarce permits me to doubt that 

it 



Digitized by Google 



0*7) 

tc is poflGble. And if I could new clearly acquaint you with 
my reafoos, you would perchance , not wonder to find me 
inclinable to think, that Come fuch Methods ( perhaps a Mcn- 
firuum) may be found to correct poifonous Simptes , without 
rendring them ineffectual : And though it mud be Tome very 
powerfull Corrective, whether Salt ori-iquor , that (hall be 
able to correct any ftore of differing Poyfons * yet it is not h> 
rational to t hink,tbat divers particular Concretes may be 
prepared without any fuch a bft rule or general Cor receive jfome Thac thc 
by one way of handling it. and fome by another : And in proportion 
focb cafes> skill, in the natures of particular Bodies to be^^f*** 
roannaged, or lucky hits, may fapply the place of a meliora- £Iy^ i£ - a 



ting DhTolvent , of which Htlmont affords me a confiderable 
Inftance, where he teacheth (in the place lately quoted J That ^SSm m 
the emetick property of A[*rum may be taken away, and n*m*Q, t 
the Plant turned into a noble diuretick, only by boylingit 
a while in common Water. And whereas a wary Man would y * 
be apt to fufpeft, that this change is made but by the avolati* Th« ihe { 
on of fome fbbtile parts, driven away by the heat of the boil- 
ing Water, I find that our Author affirms, that though it noc its vio- ' 
be boyled with the like degree of Fire in Wine , inftead of ]f" cc - 
Water, it will not fo lofe its violence. I have known white Jt££ e and 
Htilebor y opium, and fome other noxious Bodies, fo pre- Carfwr&fc 
pared, as to be given not only harmlefly, but fuccefsfully 53g? rf 
in fu h quantities, as were they not skilfully corrected, would arc deflroj 'd 
make them pernicious. We daily fee, that the violent erne- 
tick and cathartick properties of Antimony may fingly, by 
calcination with Sdlt-pettr, be deftroyed. And ( which is *fm*rj(vb~ 
thongh a known,yet a notable Experiment am on* Chymifts) 4™"^ 
tjiercurj fublimate may be deprived of its deadly corrofive- us corrofivC" 
nefs, and prepared into a Medicine inoflenfive even to Chil- ncfl e b y bare 
drcn, by bare refutations with ftctfa Mtrcmj. And to 

give htqttn* 



Digitized by Googl 



A Grange 

. covrcftion of 
the flo*c«s of 

^4 iXttff^S ^ Jl^ 



That the Na- 
turalift may 
affift the 
rhyfician to 
ma! : his 
r -.rcs leflc 
chargeable. 



feive yon one inftance more of what the knowledge of the ef- 
fects of Chymical Operations, and of the difpofition of a 
particular Body , may enable a Man to do , in changing the 
pernicious nature of it 5 I fliall adde, that the violently vo- 
mitive Flowers of Antimony , which oar wonted , though 
fumptuous and fpecious Cordials are fo unable to tame, I can 
fliew you ( which perhaps you will think ftrangej fo correct- 
ed 1 without the addition of any thing befides he At and skill, . 
that in a treble Dofe , to that wherein they are wont to be fu- 
rioufly emetick , we have not found them to work otherwife 
then gently by fweat : But fome more Particulars applicable 
to our prefent purpofe,you will meet with by and by. 



y ffirdlj, And now, Fyrcpbilut, that I am-fpeaktngofthe 



A fervice that the Naturalift may do Phyfick, I muft not 
pretermit that he may aflift the Phyfician to make his Cures 
lefle chargeable: For though to cure cheaply,benat proper- 
ly , and in ftriftnefs any part of the end of the Art of Phy- 
fick, which confiders mens Health, and not their Purfei yet 
it ought in Charity, ifnotalfo in Equity, to be the endea- 
vour of the Phyfician,efpecially when he dealeth with Patients 
that are not rich. For not now to fay any thing of the Fees 
of Phyficians, which in fome places are not very moderate, 
it is certain that the Bills of Apothecaries, efpecially in Chro. 
nical Difeafes, do often prove fo chargeable , that even when 
the Remedies fucceed, by that time a poor Patient is recove- 
red^ is undone, and pay es for the prolongation of his Life, 
that which thoul i have been his Lively- hood : Whence it 
comes to pafle, that the more neceffitous fort of People are 
•cither fain to languilh unrelieved, for want of being able to 




purchafe 



Digitized by Google 



(1*9) 

pilrchafe health at the Apothecary's rates *, or are deterred 
from applying themfelves to the Phyfician, nil their Difeafes 
have taken too deep roote to be eafily, if at all , eradicated : 
And this oftentimes, not more through the fault of the Apo- 
thecary,than of the Doctor, who in his Prefcriptions might, 
for the molt part , eafily diredt things that would be much 
more cheap, without being much led c efficacious. 

Now there are fcverall particulars , wherin it may be hop'd, 
that the Naturaiift may a (lilt the charitable Phyfician to iefl'en 
the charge of his Patients. 

And fir ft , He may per (wade the Phyfician to "decline that 
more frequent than commendable cuftome, of fluffing each 
Recife with a multitude of Ingredients: TisnotthatI ap- inconvenience* 
prove the practice of fome Chymifts, who too fi eely cenfure of fluffing r c . 
the compounding of Simples % for I know, at fome times, "^" tu 7 c th 0 * 
a complicated Diftemper requires in its Remedy more Quali< ingredient, 
ties, than are , perhaps, to be met with in any of the knowne 
Simples that the Phyfician hath at command ( though one and 
the fame Simples may fometimes anfwer divers Indications* , 
as a Plant that is hot and dry, may ferve for a Diftemper that 
is cold and moift : ) And 1 know too , that in fome cafes to 
that Ingredient,thatis as it were the Bafis of the Medicine, o- 
t her things muft be added either to correct its noxious Quali- 
ties, or to allay its vehemence, or to ferve for a Vehicle to 
convey it to the part affe&4d, or to make it eaiier to be taken 
by the patient, or to preferve it from corruption, or for fome 
fuch like reafon. But yet I thinke Phy ficians may well be 
more fparing, as to the number of the things prcfcribed,than 
inoft of them ufe to be, both to fave charges to their Patients 
(upon whichaccount it is that I here mention it ) and for o- 
tber confiderations. For the addition of needlefle Ingredi- 
ents adding to the bulke of the Medicine, makes it but the 

r more 



Biore troublefome to be taken, and the more apt to dog the 
Stomach : And oftentimes the Effi cacy of the more ufeful In- 
gredients, as well as their Quantity in each Dofe,is mocha- 
bated, by their being yoked with thofe that are lets appropri- 
ated, or lefs operative. Betides, it Teems a great impediment 
to the further difcovery of the Virtues of Simples, to con- 
found fo many of them in Compofitions : For, in a mixture 
of a great number of Ingredients, 'tis fo hard to know what 
is the operation of each, or any of them > that I fear there 
will fcarce in a long time be any great progrefs made in the 
difcovery of the virtue of Ample Drugs , till they either be 
oftener employed fingly,or be but few of them employed in 
one Remedy, And befides all this , whereas when one of 
thefe Mixtures is adminiftred, the Phy fician expects but fuch 
operations as are fuitable to the Quality which he conceives 
will be predominant in the whole Compound 5 ftveral of the 
Ingredients may have particular Qualities that he dreams not 
of, which working upon a Body , that the Phyficianconfi- . " 
ders as fubje& only to the Sicknefs he endeavours to cure, 
may therein excite divers latent Seeds or other Diftempcrs, 
and make new and unexpected commotions in the Body* On 
which occafion I remember, that whereas Parfley is a very 
ufual Ingredient of aperitive and dieuretick Decoctions and 
Apozems, a famous and learned Oculift tells me, he hath very 
often obferved , That when he hath unawares, or for tryal- r 
fake employed Parfley, either inwardly, or even outwardly 
to thofe that were troubled with great Diftempers inihcir 
Eyes, he found the Medicines wherein that Herb was but one 
Ingredient among many , tocaufe either great pain or inflam- 
mation in the Eyes. In confirmation of which, I fhall adde, 
that a while after bavins a flight Diftemper in my Eyes, I one 
day found it upon a fudden ftrangely encreafed> whithout be- 
ing 



Digitized by Google 



(1J«> 

ing able to imagine whence thefe new Symptoms proceeded * 
nil at length, recalling to mind all I had done that day * I 
remembred, that at Dinner I had eaten Sawce wherein there 
was a pretty deal of Pat (ley raixt with other things. And 
whereas in divers of thefe Compofi t ions fome noxio us Ingre- 
dients are allowed, upon a fuppoficion that their ill Qualities 
will be loft, by their being, as it were, tempered with the 
reft ; though this may fometimc happen , yet it would be 
con ft dered, chat in Treacle (efpecially at one age of it J the 
opium doth not , confidering the fmall proportion of it to 
the reft of the Ingredients , loofe much , if any of its power, 
by being mingled with fixty odde other Drugs, which Com - 
pofition poflibl v owes much of its virtue to that little Opium, 
And perhaps, one reafon why thofe that accuftom themfelves 
to be ever and anon taking Phy (ick, though they often e f cape 
dangerous Difeafes ( by preventing the accumulation of hu- 
mors, and taking their Sicknefles at the beginning ) are yet 
almolt ever troubled with one Diftemper or other , may be, 
That by the multiplicity of Medicines they take into their 
Bodies divers things are excited to diforder them , which o- 
therwife would have lain quiet* I am not ignorant that it may 
be alledged, That in compounded Medicines as Treacle and 
Mtthrtdatc, how many foever the Ingredients be, they do fo 
dog and temper one anothers activity in the composition, thac 
there rem Irs from them all, one or more Qualities fit for the 
Phy tans turn,and which is the thing heconfidersand makes 
ofe of. And I confefs, that in fome cafes t his Allegation doth 
not want its weight : For I contider,thac a dtco&ion of Galls* 
and a folution of extras y though neither of them apart be 
blackifh , will , upon their mixture, turn to Ink/ And thac , 
When Brimftone, Salt Peter , and Coals are well mingled 
together in a due proportion , they make Gun- Powder, a 

r 2 mixture 



Digitized by Google 



f*3*) 

mixture that hath Qualities much more a&ive than any of 
the fevered Ingredients. But I fear , that when a multitude of 
Simples are heaped together into one compound Medicine, 
though there may refult a new crafts^ yet 'tis very hard for 
the Phy ficians to know before- hand what that will be ; and ic 
may fometimes prove rather hurtful than good, or at lead by 
the coallition the virtues of the chief Ingredients may be 
rather impaired than improved: As wee fee that crude Mtr* 
' cury , crude Nttre y and crude Suit , may be either of them 
fafely enough taken into the Body in a good quantity 5 where- 
as or fubhmate, confiding of thole three Ingredients, a few 
Grains may be rank Poyfon. As for thofe fanTd Competi- 
tions of Mitbridate^ Trad:, and the like, though I cinnoc 
well, for the mentioned Reafons, commend the skill of thofe 
that firftdevi fed them, and though I think that when one or 
two Simples may anfwer the fame Indications, they may for 
the fame Reafons be more fafely employed-, Yet I would by 
bo means difcommend the ufe of thofe Mixtures , becaufe 
long experience hath manifefted them to be good Medicines 
in feveral cafes. But 'tis one thing to employ one of thefe 
Compofition c , when tryal hath evinced it to be a lucky one, 
and another thing to think it fit to rely on a huddle of Ingre- 
dients, before any tryal hath manifefted what kinde of Com- 
pound they will conftitute. And, in a word , though I had 
not the refped I have for Msttbhlus, and other famous Do- 
ctors that devifedthe Compofitions, whereinto Ingredients 
3re thrown by fcores , if not by hundreds , yet however I 
(hould not rejeS an effectual Remedy, becaufe I thought that 
it proved fo rather by chance, than any skill in the Contri- 
ver * and I think a wife Man may ufe a Remedy, that fcarcc 
any but a Fool would have deviled. 
• 

Another 



Another'thing, upon whofe account the Naturalift ( whom 
wehercfuppofe an expert Chymrft) may affifta Phyfici3n to 
IciTcn the expenfivenefs of his prescriptions , is by (hewing, 
fhat in very many Coupofitions, fcveral of the Ingredients, 
md oftentimes the mod chargeable, whether they be proper 
>r no for che Difeafe , are unfit for the way of management 
irefcribed , and confequently ought to be left out. I need 
lot tell you, that ilnce Ghymiftry began to flourifli amongft 
is, very many or the Medicines prepared in Apothecaries 
hops, and commonly the moft chargcjble, are diftilled Wa- 
?rs, Spirits, and other Liquors: And he that mail furvey 
le Books and Bills of Phyficians, (hall finde that (very few 
erhaps excepted) the mod ufiwl Prescription is to take mch> 
idfuch Ingredients ( for the mod part numerous enough; 
id pouring on them either Water or Wine, if any Liquor at 
!, to dill ill them in Balneo, rarely in Allies or Sand. But I 
nfefs I have not without wonder , and fometbing of indig- 
tion, (een in the Prefcriptions of Phyficians, otherwife emi- 
ntly Learned Men, and even in the publlck Difpenfatories, 
mow not how many things ordered to be diftilled with 
iers in Bdl/fet, which in that degree of heat will yield either 
thing at all, as the fragments of Precious Stones, Leaves 
Gold, prepared Pearl, &c. Or if they do yield any thing 
r that hath not been yet, that I know of, evinced; do pro- 
>ly yield but a little naufeous Phlegm, or at leaft forae 
' loofe parts , far lets efficacious than thofe that require a 
>nger heat to drive them up : Such as Sugar , Raifins, and 
erfweet Fruit, Bread, Harts horn, Flefti prepared by 
ftion, &f. which though wont to be thrown away with 
Caput Mtrtuum , oftentimes there tetain their priftine 
:ture and Nature, or at leaft are almoft as much more 
fiderable,than that which they yielded in Diftillation : as a 
_ • r 3 boiled 



boy led Capon is , than the Liquor that flicks to the cover of 
the Pot. And though as to fome of the fc Ingredients it may 
be thought that they may yield even in B ainco tome of their 
oferul pares, yet this can, with any probability, be fuppofell 
bat of fome of fuch Ingredients : And even as to them it is 
bat tuppoi'd chat they may yield fomething in (o mild a beat; 
and how that fomething will be qualified, is bat prefnmed: 
at leaft, by the Analogy of the Experiments vulgarly made, 
there feems fo fmall caufe to expert, that thefe more fixed 
Ingredients will adde half fo much to the virtue of the Me- , 
dicines, as they will tothecoft* efpecially fince though it 
could be proved, or were probable, that fixed Sabftances may 
communicate their virtues to Wine or Water, yet it would 
not follow that thofe impregnated Liquors,diftilled in 
will carry thofe virtues with them over the Helm. Ail which 
I have more largely proved in another Difcoarfe,where I (hew 
both that the nobler parts of many Ingredients wont to be 
diftilledin Bdlnet, do commonly remain in the Ctfut Mw~ 
uum s and that 'tis very unfafe to conclude alwayes the Vir- 
tues of diftilied Liquors from thofe of the Concretes that a£ 
forded them. 

But there is another way of putting unfit Ingredients in« 
to Medicioes , by confounding thofe in one Compofi- 
tion, which, though perhaps they might apart be properly 
enough employed, do, when mixed, deftroy or lock up 
the Virtues of one another , and of this fault, even famous 
Chymifts rhemfelves are but too often guilty. I know not 
how many Procefles I have met with, wherein (aline Sub- 
ftances , of contrary natures, are preferred to be mingled, as 
if becaufe they were all of them faline, they muft be fit to 
be aflociatcd-, whereas 'tis evident to any Man, that confi- 
<krsas well as employs the Operations of Chymiftry , that 

there 



• 



I 



(1351 

there are fcarce any Bodies in the World betwixt which there 
is a greater contrariety, th3n betwixt acid Salts * and as well 
thole that the Chymiftscall volatile, as the Spirits and Salts * 
of Harts horn, Blood, Flefli, and the like, as thofe others J^JTsSi 
which arc made of Incineration , as S al t ot Tartar, and of all bcin K mixed 
burnt Vegetables. So that oftentimes it happens, that by an J^g^'^ 
unskilful Mixture,two good Ingredients are fpoiled $ as when y ;dd in Li** 
Vinegar, Juice or 'Lemmons, Juice of Barberries, and the wit a Phlegm, 
like, are prefcribedto be diftilied with other Ingredients , 
whereof the Salt of Wormwooch>r fome other Plant makes 
one s for then the scid and alcaltzatc Salts working upon one jh-hme j l0 b-' 
another, grow more fixed, and yield in B alnro but a Flegm : ferved of the 
andfo Spirit of Urine, which is highly volatile, and Spirit jS?2utuZ 
of Salt, which isalfb a diftilied Liquor, being mingled toge- J^" fcif h.r£ 
ther, will, by their mutual Operation, conftitute a new thing, iy voiat»ic)and 
which in fucha heat as that of a Bath, will yield a Flegm, 
leaving bebinde the nobler and active Parts concoagulated 
into a far more fixed Subftance , much of the nature of S*l 
Armoniack. And indeed wher e Salts, efpecially act i ve ones, 
are made Ingredients of Mixtures, onlefs they be skilfully and 
judicioufly compounded, it often happens that they fpoil one 
another, and degenerate into a new thing* if they do not alio 
fpoil the whole Compofition, and of divers ufeful Ingredients 
compofc one bad Medicine. 

CHAP. V. 

• * 

A Nother way by which the Naturalift (skilled in Chymi- ^ 
*^ftry ) may help to leflen the chargeablenefs of Cures, is the mif appli- 
by (hewing, that as to divers coftly Ingredients , wont to be g^ff™, 
employed in Phyfick, there hath not yet been fufficient proof ven other coftl 
given of their having any Medical Virtues at all, or^that at*>y ingredient 

leaft 



igitized by Google 



030 

leaft as they are wont to be exhibited, either crude , or but 
(lightly prepared in fttUps, Elcttudrtcs. &s. there is not any 
fufficient evidence to perftvade us, that their efficacy is as 
much greater, than that of many cheap Ingredients, as their 
price is. I am not altogether or' their mind , that abfolute- 
ly rejedfc the internal ufe of Leaf- Gold , Rabies , Saphyrs, 
Emeralds, and other Gems, as things that are unconquerable 
by the heat of the Scomach : For as there are rich Patients 
that may, without much inconvenience , go to the price of 
the deareft Medicines \ fo 1 think the Stomack a&s not on 
Medicines barely upon the account of its heat, but is endowed 
with a fubtlcduTolvent (Whence foever it hath it) by which it 
may perform divers things not to be done by fo languid a 
heat. And I have, with Liquors of differing forts, eafily 
drawn from Vegetable Subftances, and perhaps unre&ified , 
fometimes diflolved, and fometimes drawn Tin&ures from 
Gems, and that in the cold. But though for thefe and other 
Confiderations, I do not yet acquiefs in their Reafons,that 
laugh at the adminiftration of crude Gems, &c. as ridiculous 
a difference be yet neither am I altogether of their Adverfaries mind. For 
cwccnthejjxcd- though I deny not the Glafs of Antimenj\ which looketh 
IndofGbfctf llkca ki nd or Gem or Ruby, will eafily enoughimpart to 
Antimtnf. Liquors an emetick Quality ) et I know too, there is great 
odds betwixt Rubies and other Gems ( which will endure vio- 
lent Fires, and remain undiflblved in divers ftrongly corro- 
five Liquors ) and the Glafs of \^fntimonj y which is a body 
fo far lefs compact and fixed, that Spirit of Vinegar it felf will 
work upon it, and a ftrong Fire will, in no long time, difli- 
pate it into fmoak. But that which I chiefly coniider on this 
occafion,i% Thit 'tis one thing to make it probably that 'tis 
Gold, Rubies, Saphyrs,^. may be wrought upon 
, by a humane Stomach j and another thing to fliew both that 

they 



Digitized by v^oogle 



(i 37) 

they jrt*M'eobefo, and that they *re a<5lually endowed 
with thofe particular and fpecifick Vertues that areafcribed 
to them : Nay,and (over and abovej that thefe Vertues are 
fuch and fo eminent , that they confiderably furpalTc thofe of 
cheaper Simples. And I think, that in Prefcnptions made 
for the poorer fort of Patients, a Phyfician may well fubiU 
tute cheaper Ingredients in the place of thefe precious ones, 
whofc Vertues are not half fo unqueftionable as their Dear- 
' nets. 

What ftrange Excellency there may be in the Aurum Pota- 
ble, made bv a true Adeftm, or by a PofTeflor of the Li- 
quor Alchsheft , I (hall not now difpute, not knowing what Concernin _ 
power full and radicall Diflbl vents, the profound skill of fuch Awm t#u- 
Mcn (if any fuch there be) may fur nifh them with , to open Wt. 
the Body of Gold. But as for the attempts and practices of 
the generality of Chymicall Phyfician? fo make Gold pota- 
ble , befides that, their attempts to make their Solutions vo- 
latile, fucceed fo feldom , that even Learned Phylkians, and 
Chy inifts, have pronounced the thing it fell unfeafiblc* I con- 
fefl'e, I mould much doubt whether fuch a potable Gold 
would have the prodigious Vertues its Encomiafts afcribe 
to it , and expect from it : Eor I find not that thofe 1 have 
yet met with , deliver thefe ftrange things upon particular 
Experiments duly made , but partly upon the Authority of 
Chymicall Books , many of which were ntver writen by 
thofe whofe Names they bear. And others,I fear,commend 
%^furum Potabilt, prepared after another gueiTe manner than 
that we are now fpeaking of, partly upon a preemption that 
if it be made volatile, itmuft be ftrangely unlocked, and ex- 
alted to a meer Spiritual Nature-, and partly upon rational 
Conje&ares (as they think them J drawn from the nobleneflfe 
and precioufnefle of Gold. But for my part, though I have 

i long 



Digitized by Google 



long fmce bethought my felf ofa way , whereby I can ] in a 
fhorttime, and a moderate Fire, make my Mtnftrnnm bring 
over crude Gold , in quantity fufficient to make the Liquor 
look at the fit ft or fecond Diftiilation , of a high golden co- 
lour; yet finding that I could, by an eafic Art, quickly re. 
cover out ot this volatile Liquor , a corporal and malleable 
Gold, I dare not brag that my Tinfture (as em Alchymift 
would call it) mu ft needs do ft range feats, becaufe there is fo 
noble a Metal brought over in it. And if this or other pre* 
parationsofyf#r*« PotMe prove good Medicines, it would 
be further enquired , whether the Vertues may not in great 
part be rather attributed to the mnftrnum , than the Gold 
( that requiring a very fubtile Liquor to volatilize it) or to 
the allocation of the Corpufcles of the Gold, with the fa- 
line Particles of the Menftruum , into a new Concrete, dif- 
fering enough from Gold, though never fo well opened. And 
as for the noblenefle and precioufnefle of this Metal, That de- 
pends upon the Eftimation of Men $ whence in AntricA the 
Indians that abound with it, had not fiich a great value for 
it. And in divers Countries,at this day , it is poftponed to Iron 
or to Copper, and hath rather a Politicall (if I may fo fpeak j 
then a Natural Vertue. Nor will it follow, th3t becaufe it is 
the fixed'ft and pretioufeft of Metals.that therefore it muft be 
an admirable Medicine : For we fee that Diam onds, though 
they be the hardeft of Bodies, and very fixed ones* and in 
touch greater efteem, ctterufarihw, then Gold* are yet fo 
far from being accounted highly Medicinal,that they are com- 
monly (though,perhaps, not fo defervedly ) reckoned among 
Poyfons. But : I fee Ibavedigrefled. That which I chiefly 
aimed at, being to inculcate, that, whether Gold and Gems, 
and the like precious Ingredients, may be good Medicines or 
too.it were a good workto fubftituK cheap ones for die poorer 

fort 

■ 



1 

Digitized by 




(139) 

fort of Patients % and that Phyficians are much to blame 
who prize Simples, as Drugfters do, according as they are 
brought from remorc Countries, and are hard to be come by 
and cannot imagine that what doth not coft much Money in 
the Shops, can do much good in the Body ; as if God had 
made Proviftononly for the Rich, or thofe People that have 
Commerce with Chi** or the IrJU's : whereas indeed it may 
oftentimes happen , that what the Chymifts call their Cdfut Eumpie* of 



Mortuum , and perhaps throw away as an ufelefs 7 err a Da*- S^from uT 
may have as great Vertues as thofe nobler Parts, as promifing Be-' 
they call them , which they have extracted from it and a dlcs - 
defpifed Simple, nay even an Excrement or anlnfed, may 
in fome cafe< prove nobler Remedies , then thofe. that Men 
call and think very noble Bodies, not to fay, than I know not 
how many Extracts and Quintefcences. 

I /hill not trouble you with many Inftaoces to prove this 
Doctrine, having more fully difcourfed of it , in one part of 
another * Trcatifc : Bat yet fome Inftances 1 fuppofe you * or thc tffi * 
will here expect, and therefore I fliallpreCent you With a few of «cj of unpro*. 
thofe that at prefent come into my mind. ^"g tedi- 



Di- 



cincs. 



Thc D. of 



When the DiMlationoft^«4/#r//Vt 
Mrtuum , as defcrving that name, is wont, by common T 
(tillers, to be thrown away s and I have feen whole heaps of mftans 
it thrown by, as ufelefle, by thofe that make Aquafortis in 
quantity to fell it : And yet this defpifed Subftance doth, in JfJ^ ™ |. e 
common Water it felf, yield a Sale, which being only de- K««y 
purated by frequent Solutions and Filtration* , is that fa* 

ITIOUS VtndCda DuftUAta^ or Arcanum Dupl'CAtum, which 

that great virtnjf* and knowing Chymift , The Duke of 
Hot flan , whofe name it alfo beareth, thought worth pur cha- 
fing at the rate of Five hundred Dollars and of which thc 
Princes experienced Pbyficianthus writes to the Indubious 

f 2 Schroder^ 



Digitized by Go 



Tblmuip: Sehroaer > iMiBt experiment is falls hujus Efficaciam ufnts 
libj.cap.tj. noftra comprobavit in melancholic u dffeelibus^ febribus quibuf- 
cunque continuU & fntermittemtbfis^alcttlo.fcorbuto^c. gutn 
ejr (omnum conciliate prdfertim in Melancholic is non femelm* 
tdvimtes. Dofts a fcrup. 1 . ad fcrup. 1 . Libras aliquot quotannis 
dbfumimtts. And another very skilfoll Phy fician that trequcn- 
ted that Excellent Princes Court , confirmed to me the fame 
Medicines diuretickand deoppilative Vertue: (But upon my 
own Experience I can fay little of it, having cafually loft a 
great quantity I caufed to be prepared to make tryal witb,be- 
fore I had opportunity to imploy it. 

But whereas in the Cdput LMortuum of Aqna fort is there 
remains pretty (lore of eafily- foluble Salt; In the Caput Mor- 
TimiCoieriA. tuum 0 f fTftrioL when not only alltheOyle is forced away 

SfTZS b y the Fire > but al1 the fixcd Salt is cxadl y fcparared by 
Mortmm of Water,There feems to remain nothing but a worthlefle7*/T4 
vuwi. Damn at a : And yet it is of this, that, as I mall teach you ere 
long, I make thofe Colcotharine Flowers, which are pouVoly a 
nobler Medicine then either the Oyle,the Spirit, or the Salt of 
Vitriol. 

• As for the Bezodr-fione , which is fo often prefcribed by 
Phyficians, and fo dearly paid for by Patients , the experi- 
enced Bom 1 us > a very competent Witnefle in this cafe (and 
whofe account of the manner of its generation, agrees the 
beftofany I have feen with that I received from an Intelli- 
***** gent Perfon, that was employed into Per fid by the late King) 
Gxrcu ab oru. hath in one place a Paffage concerning it-, and elfewhere writes 
a compari- fuch things of the Stone cut out of a Mans Bladder (though 
the th ", whileft <™ dc , be d efpifed as a thing vile and ufelefle in 
sine , and the Phy fick ) as may be juftly applicable to our prefent purpofe: 
S fNfa CU B°bd CdUrum ^ aitb nc > freaking of the Bezear-ftone) quantum 
dcr» w 4(ibjperb9liea^ bu\mldpidisvirmes^ 

non 



mmtMmfo e$ml8e experientiis edotlm invenlx And elfe- 
where fpeaking of thofe contemptible and cxcrcmemitious 
Stones that are found in humane Bladders : Nil vorro (faith umctp'^g: 
he) it bis idpidtbus addo,ne vidcdr eos elevdre , ty litbotomos gnjf# <* 
monerc ut vel cum pericnlo f lures mortdles fecetit. Hoe certe 9n§% . 
confer turn babe 9^ Up idem in veftca hominis repertum, urimm 

judores probe eiere quod tempore ingentis iUius prftis qud 
Anno 162^ & 1 52 5 . Leyiam pdtridm me Am tjr rcliquas Hol m 
Undid Civitdtes mtferdndum tn modum wftabat* in penurid 
UpidU Btzodrtici nos exbibutffe memini^ & fudoripcum (auftm 
dicer e) melius ejr excellent im inveniffe, &c. 

Soot is generally looked upon as fo vile a thing, that we Medicines out 
are fain to hire Men to carry it away ; and yet, as I elfewhere of Sooc * 
(hew that it is a Body of no ignoble Nature , io I mud here 
tell yon, that it is no unufefull one in Phy Hck. And not to 
mention that River im commends it crude, to the quantity of 
a Drachme, in Plurilles : I have tryed, with the Spirit of it 
well drawn, fome things, that make me look upon it as a 
considerable Liquor. And 1 know by their own confeffions, 
that fome Medicines, even of eminent Phyficians, that paffe 
under other Names, have the Spirit of Soot for their prin- 
cipall Ingredient. I knew, a not unlearned Emperick, who 
was exceedingly cryedup for the Cures he did , efpecially in 
difficult Diftempcrs of the Brain , by a certain Remedy , 
which he called fometimes his Kyi urum fotabile^ and fome- 
times his FdndCdd^ and having obtained from this Man, in ex* 
change of a Chy mical Secret of mine he was greedy of, the 
way of making this fo celebrated Medicine , 1 found that the 
main thing in it was the Spirit of Soot* drawn after a fome- 
what unufual, but not excellent manner* in which Spirit* 
Flowers of Sulphur were, by a certain way, brought to be 

diflbl ved, and fwim io little drops that looked of a golden co - 

• ------ m •» _ . 

lour* 1 z Yott 



Digitized by Google 



You will eafily grant, Pynfkil*s, that there are not any 
Medicines to be taken into the Body , more cheap and con- 
temptible than the Excrements of Men and Horfes , and chan 
Infects : And yet that even thefe want not confiderable Me- 
dical Vertues, we elfewhere fliew. And (not to meddle with 
foch nad y things as che groffer fort of humane Excrements , 
though they, outwardly applyed, cither in Powder or other- 
Th- ufc of wi ^ c * ^° ^ omctimc$ P*** 01 ™ Grange things ) the Juice of 
Horfc U dung. Horfe-dung, efpecially of Stone-borfes , being ftrongly ex- 
prefled fatter the Dung bath been a while fteeped in Ale, or 
ibme other convenient Liquor , to facilitate the obtaining 
the Juice, and to afford it a re hide ) doth oftentimes fo pow- 
erfully relieve thofe that are troubled with the ft oppage of 
Urine, with Wind, Stitches , and even with Obstructions 
of the Spleen and Liver, that You, Fyr$fbil*s y and I know 
a great Lady, who though very neat, and very curious of her 
Health, and wont to have the attendance of the skilfulleft 
Phyficians, fcruples not, upon occafion, to ufc as I have 
known her do , in Silver Vcflels, this homely Remedy, and 
prefer it to divers rich Cordials, and even to what Come 
Chy mifts are pleafed to call Efletccs or Elixirs : And with 
the fame Remedy very many poor people were cured of the 
Plague it feif , when it lately fweptaway fo many thoufands 
in IrtUnd (and the Doctors with the Patients, as I was af. 
fured by a Perfon who cured Co many ) as to invite men to fe- 
cure themfelves that affiftance, by refuting the Party the li- 
berty to leave the Town. But ( to adde that upon the By ) 
this Perfon , in exchange of a Secret of mine, confefled to 
An Arcanm tac 9 That the Arc4num % which had cured fuch numbers, and 
of ivy berries, to which the Juice of Horfe dung was a Sncccdaneum , was 
only a good Dofe of the Powder of fully ripe Ivy- berries, 
Which did ufually, as alfo the Horfe-dung, wgik plentifully 

? by 




Digitized by Google 



by Sweat , and which I prefently remembred to be one of 
thofe few things that Htlmont commencs againft the 
Plague. 

TbeMcdicai Vertues of Man's Urine , both inwardly gi- 
ven, and outwardly applyed , would require rather a whole 
Book , then a part of an Eflay to enumerate and infift on: 
But referring you to what an induftrious Chymift hath alrea- 
dy collected touching that fubjeft , I (hall now only adde, 
That I knew an ancient Gentlewoman, who being almoft 
bopeleiTe to recover of divers Chronical Diftempers ( and 
Come too of thefe abftrufe enough ) was at length advifed , 
inftead of more coftly Phyfick , to make her Morning- 
draughts of her own Water; by che ufe of which (he ftrangely Medicine* 
recovered, and is /or ought I know, ftill well. And the feme out of nu» 
Remedy is not difdained by a Perfon of great Quality and Udac * 
Beauty, that You know; and that too,after (he had travelled , 
as far as the S paw for Her healths fake. A nd I remember on 
this occafion , that parting once through one of the remoter 
Parts of England, I was vitited by an Emperick, a well* 
wifher to Chymiftry, but a Novice in it, who prefllng me 
to communicate to him fomeeaficand cheap Preparation, that 
he might make ufe of among the Countrey People • I dire- 
cted him to Diftil , with a gentle heat, a Spirit out of Urine, 
putrifiedforiixorfeven Weeks on a Dung- hill , or fome 
analogous heat, but in well clof'd Glades, or other glazed 
Veflels 5 and having rectified this Spirit once or twice , that 
it might be rich in volatile Salt, to give ten, twenty . or 
thirty drops of it in any convenient Liquor for the Plurifie » 
for mod kind of Coughs , and diveis other Diftempers , as 
a Succedaneum to the Efience of Harts- horn : And a while 
after this Emperick returned me great thanks for what I had 
caught bim : and I found by him and others , that he had 

cured 



Digitized by 



cured fo many with ic , efpecially of Plurifies (a Difeafe fre- 
quent and dangerous enough in that Country) that this flight 
ahd feemingly defpicable Remedy had already made him be 
cryed up for a Do&or , and was like to help him to a comfort- 
able Subfiltcnce. 

Great It ore of healthy Mens Blood is wont to be thrown 
away , as altogether uTelefle, by Chirurgions and Barbers, 
that let Men Blood ( as is ufoal in the Spring and Fall) for 
prevention of Difeafes? and yet from a Mans Blood skil- 
fully prepared , though without addition of any thing, fave 
Spirit of Wine to keep it at firft from putrifying, may be 
cafily obtained a Spirit, and volatile Salt, that have much the 
fame Vertucs, with thofe of the newly mentioned Spirit of 
Urine , but more noble fas far as I can guefle ) then either 
that, or even Spirit of Harts- horn, as having performed in 
Mcdic>nc$ out Consumptions, Afthma's, and other obftmate cafes , fuch 
of Blood. things as I, as well as others, could not but admire. But in 
this place , mentioning humane Blood only in trtnfitu , I 
(hall pretermit what I have obferved about the preparation of 
it 5 yet leaving you a liberty to call for my Obfervations up- 
on a Medicine, which is perhaps nobler, than the mod coftly 
and elaborate Chymical Remedies that are wont to be fold 
in Shops, and which hath been almoft alone excepted out of 
the Cenfure made by a Learned Modern Writer , of the Me- 
dicines found out by Chymiftry. 
Thereat i (hall adde but one Inftance more, of the efficacy that 
SuMcj in n> a y De found in the raoft obvious and abject Creatures 5 
<hc stone. and this Inftance is afforded me , by thofe vile Infects com- 
monly called in Enghfli , Wood*lice, or Sows, and in La« 
tine Mill> fides , which I have often both recommended to 
others, and taken my felf What their Vertue is againft the 
Stone, the World hath been informed by LAurmbtrgtus^ 

who 



Digitized by Google 



who hath pobliflicd a narrative, how by the ufe of them he 
was cured, even of the Stone in the Bladder * and he was in- 
vited to ufe them by credible information > that others had 
1>een cured. of that Difeafe, by the fame Remedy. And of 
late Years in EngUnd^ an Emperick being much reforted 
to, for the relief he gave in that tormenting Sicknefs, a Phy- 
fician, famous for his Learned Writings, wondring at what 
was done, was very curious (as himfelf afterwards told me) 
to find out the Emperick's Secret, and at length was fo indu- 
bious as to difcover, That 'twas a (light preparation of Mil' 
Upedcs. But my having found them in my felf very diure- 
tical and apertive, is not that which chiefly recommends them 
to me * For I knew, and lived in the fame Houle with a pious 
Gentlewoman, much better skill'd in Pbyfick, than her Sex Infuffufiotu of 
promifed, who having loft the ufe of one Eye by a Cataract, thc Eyc$ * 
and being threatned by the Ocalifts with the fpeedy lofs of 
the other , efpecially in regard of her being very aged and 
corpulent, (he neverthelefTe did, for fome fears, to my won- 
der, employ her Eye to read and work with, without rinding, 
as (he told me, any decay in it, or any encreafing danger of a 
Suffufion : And (he aflured me , that her Medicine was to 
bruife firft five MtlUftdes , then ten , then fifteen , then 
twenty, drc. ('daily encreafing the number by five, till it had * 
reachM, it I miftake not fifty or (ixty)in White- Wine (or 
Small- Ale,) and to drink upon an empty Stomach, the ft rong* 
ly exprefl'd Liquor * and when I defired to know how fiie 
came by this Specifick, (he anfwered me, That having made 
enquiries among all thofe, both Oculifts and others, that (he 
thought might a Hi ft her againft io fad a Diftemper, (he was 
advifed to the ufe of Milltfedts y by a Woman, that not 
only much magnified their virtue in fuch cafes as hers, but 
aflured her (if I much mif- remember not) that (lie her felf 

c had 



Digitized by Google 



And^reall Ca- 



■ 

In fore Breads 
aim Fiftula's. 



had been cared by tbem,of no lefle than an incipient fiifMori 
in one or both of her Eyes. 

[Since the writing of the former part of this Page,rcbtin2 
what I newly told you ro a very Ingenious Phyfician , heal-* 
fures mee, That being fome Yeares fince in Holland. he there 
met with a Woman who was cured , as her felfe confefled to 
him, of a reall Cataract, by the Juice of CMillefedes, begin- 
ning with that of three at a time, and fo encreanng to nine at 
once, and then gradually leflening the Dofe by one Infe& 
each day, till flir were comeback to three at a time after 
which, (he gradually encreafed the Dofe as before: And 
he addes, That this Woman was advifed to this Medicine by 
an Emperick, that was faid to have performed divers Cores 
with the fame Medicine. ] 

[ What ftrange things thefe fame Millepedes ruve done in 
the fore, and even exulcerated, Breads of Women (provi- 
ded they be not cancrous ) though they be given without pre- 
paration onely to the number of three at fir ft , and fo on to 
nine at once ( which number may perhaps by ufefully encrea- 
fed) ftamp'd with a little White-wine or Beer , that the Li- 
quor ft rain'd out may be drunk in a draught of Beer, Morni ng 
and Evening ; during with time, Linnen cloathes dipped in 
White- Wine ? and applyed warme, are to be kept upon the 
Breaft, I m3y elfewhere have a fitter opportunity to relate. 
1 {hall now onely fubjoyne, as a further proofe of the great 
Virtue that may be even in vile and coft lefle In feels, and that 
without any elaborate or Chymicall preparation, this memo- 
rable Story, That after all the tryals I had made about thefe 
Millepedes, I met with a young Lady,whoby divers ftrange. 
ly winding and obftinate FtffaU's, that had made them I el ves 
Orifices in many places of her Body,* was not onely Iam*d, 
bat fo confum'd and weakned>that ihe was fear ce able to turne 

her 



Digitized by Google 



rl47; 

her felf in her bed % and this, notwithstanding the utmoft en* 
deavonrs oh he eminence ft Chirurgions, both Englifh and 
Foreiners , that could be procured : But when both the 
' hopes of her Friends, and thofe that endeavour'd to cure her, 
were loft, (he was in a fhort time not only freed from her Fi- 
ftuU'S) but recovered to a thriving condition of Body, by the 
frequent ufe of an internal Medicine , which as both her Pa- 
rents and the Per Ton that taught it them informed me, was on- 
ly a Drink ( to be taken twice or thrice a day) made of a 
fmall proportion of a couple of Herbs (very common,and not 
much more likely to, do Wonders in this cafe, than Worm- 
wood and Mint) and of Three hundred of thefe Millepedes 
well beaten (when their Heads are pull'd oft ) in a Mortar, and 
tunn'dup with the Herbs, and fufpended in four Gallons of 
Small- Ale, during its fermentation* The wonder ful efficacy 
of this Medicine in this and many other cafes, which by oc- 
cafion of this Cure were related to me, being almoft wholly 
afcrib'd to the iMtllepedes^ by the Illuftrious Impartcr of it, 
whofe leave I have not yet, by naming him, to difclofc, that 
this is the Secret He makes ufe ofV 

CHAP. VI. 

ANother way there is whereby the Naturaliftmay affift TKatthcNjtu* 
thePhyfician to make the Therapeutic*! part of Phyfick «WI difcoven 
Ie& chargeable, and that is , by (hewing thofc that are wont t hT«Swdu.' 
to employ mod Chymical Remedies, that much of the coft bo«r in making 
and labour in many cafes might be fpared. I am not altogether ™f^^ 19 
of their mind, that indifcriminately cry down Chymical Pre- „ ay befcifS, 
paratioas as exceffively dear : For of many of thofe that feem 
very dear, when bought by the Pound or the Ounce, a Dofe 
maybe cheap enough 5 as if for inftance,anOunce of preci- 

t i pitate 



Digitized by Google 



pitate of Cold, and Mercury coft ten times its weigh of Sil- 

f'cEcI? 1 - vcr ' under whichrate 1 havc bought it of honeft Men, that 
Regain wiih make it themfelves, yet that Ounce containing 480 Grains, 
g dcnicai one* ( 0 { which three or four may be a Dofe ) a taking of this dear 
BSfc Powder, may coft far lefs than a Dofe of many Gdknicdl 
Medicines, where the quantity that is taken at once, makes 
up what is wanting in the coftlinefleof the Ingredients. But 
though this be the cafe of (ome Chymical Remedies, yet we 
muft not deny, that many others are chargeable, and though 
perhaps not more fo than many GdUnicdl ones employ 'd tor 
the fame purpofes : Yet if thole be dearer than they need be, 
that grievance ought to be redrefled in Chymical Medicines , 
how juftly foever the fame thing may be imputed to Gsitm* 
cdloneu 

Now there are two particulars , wherein the Chymifts, 
and thofe Phy ficians that intimate ehem.are wont to beblame- 
able in reference to this matter-, The one, their employing 
Chymical Preparations on all occafions, even where Simples 
or flight Compofitions might ferve the turn: and the other 
is, Their making many of their Preparations more laborious, 
and confequently more chargeable than needs. 
Of the ufc ana As for the firft of thefe : 'Tis known there are divers Chy- 
comoicndation mrfts , and others that pradtife Phyfick , who fo dote upon 
bySmottT Produ&ions of their Furnaces , that they will fcarcego 
He Chymifts. about to cure a cut Finger , with lefle than fome Sfdgjriedl 
Oylof Balfam: And in flight Diftempers haverecourfeto 
Chymical, and perhaps to Mineral Remedies, which being» 
for the moft part, fuch as vehemently alter the Body , efpe- 
ciallyby heating and drying it, they do often more harm than 
good, when employed in cafes that need not fnch a&ive Me- 
dicines. And methinks thofe that praftife , as if Nature 
I prefeated us nothing worth the accepting, unlcfs it be cook'd 

and 



£ Digitized' by Google 



(*49) 

And perfe&ed by Vulcan , might conflder , IhttPdrdcelfus 
himfelf oftentimes cmploycth Simples for the cure even of 
formidable Difeafes. And though for particular Reafons I be 
inclinable enough to think, that fuch fearching and command- 
ing Remedies , as may be fo much or kin to the Univerfal 
Medicine, as to cure great numbers of differing Difeafes, will 
be hardly obtained without the help of Chymical Prepara- 
tions, and chofe perhaps of Minerals : Yet as to mod parti- 
cular Difeafes, efpecially when not yet arriv'd to a deplora- 
ble height, I am apt to think > tfiat either Simples, or cheap 
or unelaborate Galenical Mixtures, may f urnifti us with Spe- 
cihcks, that may perform much more than Chymifts are 
wont to think , and poffibly be preferrable to many of their 
coftiy iMtgijlericS) £htint cfjencts ^ and Elixirs. Htimont jjj*"^ ^JJ? 
himfelf, a Perlon more knowing and experienced in his Art, f#, Simm^ 
than almoft any of the Chymifts, fcruples not to make this 
ingenious Confeflion : Credo ( faith he) /implicit in fua (im- 
plicitate e/fe [ufficientia pro fanatione omnium morborum : And 
clfewhere he truly affirms, That there may be fometimes 
greater Virtue in a Simple, fuch as Nature affords it us, than 
in any thing that the Fire can fe parate from it. And certain- 
ly the Specifick Properties of divers , if not moft Simples; 
are confounded and loft by thofe Preparations, wherein that 
Texture, which is the Foundation of thofe Properties, is ei- 
ther deftroyed by the Fire, or changed by the taking away of 
fome of the Parts 5 or the adding of iome other Subftance 
to it, with which compounded, it may conftitute a new thing. 
The more Judicious of the CtfymiQs themfelves do ieverai Powder ofPcari 
of them now acknowledge, that the bare reducing of Pearls ™ c operative 
to fine Powder, affords a Medicine much richer in the Vir- than 
rues of the Pearles, than the CM agi ftcrj , prepared by diflbl- 
viog them in acid Spirits, and precipitating them with Oyle 

of 



Digitized by GoogI 



of Tdrur , and afterwards fcrupuloufly edulcorating them. 
SocrudcHam- And one may eafily obfeive,that by making the Mdgiftery 
horn, then of Harts-horn the fame way , the Virtues feem to be more 
waggery. j oc k ec j U p tnan tne y were ia tnc crude Horn, which may eafi- 
ly enough impart its Virtue in the Body , fince fair Water 
will reduce a good part of it into a Jelly % whereas the Ma- 
giftery remains a fixed Pdwdcr not eafily difloluble , even in 
acid MenftrBums % and, which thrown upon hot Iron, will 
fcarce fend forth that (linking Smoak , which argues the avo- 
lation ofthefaline and fulphureous Parts, I never knew any 
of the vulgar Chymifts Eyenccs or Elixirs half fo powerful a 
An excellent Remedy to ftanch Blood,as a flight Mixture of two Drachms 
finvic medicine of ffjofciamum , or Henbane- feed , and the like weight of 
toftanchbl<Mx1, white Poppey- feeds, beaten up with an Ounce of Conlerve 
ofRed-Rofes, into afttffe Electuary; with which, given, in 
the quantity of a Nutmeg, or Wall-nut, I have matched 
fome, as it were, out of the Jaws of Death 5 and with which 
an eminent Phy fician, now dead, affirm'd , That he , and the 
Inventor of the Remedy, had very frequently cured profufe 
bleedings at the Nofe $ and , in Women> at other Parts be- 
fides. Nor did I ever fee, to give an inftance in a refembling 
Difeafe, fuch wonderful Effects agaiotl fpitting and vomiting 
of Blood , of the moft elaborate Chymical Preparations, as 

Anoth-r'iike * ^ avc °^ a ^*§ nt Sy rr0 P> madeonely ot a convenient quan- 
Mdicine for tity of fine Sugar, and the ftrongly exprefled Juice of twelve 
fpiu.ngandvo- handfuls of Pbntine leaves, and fix Ounces of frefh Cum- 
Biting of blood, frcy. roots ^ wc u beaten together j with which Syrr up, be- 
fides what I have tiyed my fen , two eminent Phyhcians per- 
formed in that Dileafe unufual Cures, though (forreafons 
elfewhere mentioned) I forbear to name them, otherwife than 
by telling you, That one of them is that ingenious an Friend- 
ly D r . T. C. to whofe skill both you and l,owefojnuch. 

But 



i - 



Digitized by Google 



On) 

Bat I confider further , that as oftentimes thofe I am rea- 
foning with make ufe of Chymical Remedies , when mach 
more eafily parable ones may (utfice $ fo in divers cafes » 
where Spagyncal Medicines are proper enough, their Pre- 
parations of them are more tedious and ex pen live than is ne- 
ceflary. There are more than a few who feldome prefenbe, 
and feldoraer efteera a Chymical Proccfs, that is to be per- 
fected in lefs than many Weeks j as if a Chymical Medicine 
like an Emhrfi^ muft needs be an Abortive, if it be pro- 
duct in lefs than fo many Moneths. And, as if in Prepara» 
tions , the Virtue depended lefs on theskilfulnefs, than the 
elaboratenefs , they feem to cftimatethe efficacy *>f Reme- 
dies by the time and pains requifi te to prepare them, and dare 
not think , that a Medicine can quickly cure , that was not 
long a making ; as indeed thejrs ( efpecially thofe where Co- 
hobations and Digeftions, till they have fuch and fuch eftecls 
upon the Matter to be wrought on by them , are prefcrib'd) 
are many of them far more toilfome and tedious , than thofe 
that have but read fuch Procefles, without working them, 
are apt to fufpefl. And this is the* humour of divers , not on- 
ly as to thofe ft able Medicines, that ought al way es to be found 
ready in Apothecaries Shops , but even as to thofe that are 
defign'd for particular cafes, and perhips acute Difcafes* in 
which Emengencies , it a Phyfician had no other Remedies 
tlian thofe he muft make according to fuch Procefles , it 
would, I fear, too often happen, that before the Medicine 
could be ready, the Patient would either be paft the need of 
it, or paft the help of it. And that which oftentimes encrea- 
feth the tediouinefs of Chymical Procefles, is the unskilful 
Prcfcriptions of thofe that devife them. *Tis not unufuai in 
Chymifts Writings to meet with Procefles , wherein the 
Matter to be prepared, is expofed to I know not how many 

feveral 



feverall fucceflive Operations : Bat if y on fliould aske , Why 
fuch a thing fliould be, for inftance, rather precipitated , than 
exhal'd ad ficcitatem 5 or why fuch or fach an Operation is 
to be ufed after fuch another, rather than before it; nay, per- 
haps, if one fliould demand why fome ofthofe Operations 
fliould be ufed at all , the Devifcrs of thofe unskilfull Pro- 
ceffes would poffibly aflbone be able to finifli their operati- 
ons, as to give a fatisfaftory anfwer . Nay, fometimes they 
lengthen their Procefles by Operations, fo injadicioufly pre- 
um«chyra!n« faiVd, that they crofle one another $ And the Chymift vex- 
by their tedious eth himfelfe , and the matter he workes upon, to leave it ac 
& injudicious j a ft no belter, if not a worfe, Medicine than he found it $ of 
alter the Mcrli* this we haye already given an inftance in the _ common Mdgi- 

cine and make JlettCS* 

it worfc. g Qt j j ate jy me£ w j tn anot h er E X a m ple of it, in the Wri- 

tings of a Famous, Moderne Chymift $ where , to purifie the 
fixed Salt of Vegetables, to the height, after I know not how 
many Solutions, Filiations and Coagulations ( which alone 
would abundantly ferve the # turnejhe prefcribes the diffblving 
them in Aquafortis ; after which, he faith, they will become 
very pure and chryftaliine, and not fo eafily refolubleinthe 
h d ffoi ^ re * ^ r wmc ^ ' ma ^ e 00 doubt, for divers Yeares before I 
vi°npthc 53°it"s met with his ProceiTe, I have, with the fix'd Salts of more 
of Vc&ctab:es than one kinde of Vegetable, by joyning them with Aqus 
torn?ke!h-m f 0rt ^^ an J after awhile exhaling the fuperflaous moyfture, 
pare «nd Cry- made good infljmmable Salt Peter •, by wh-ch you may eafily 
daiiine, alters gti e fi'e,how judicioufly the folution in Aquafortis iyprefcrib'd 
andmakwtncin one Iy as a further depuration . and how fit fuch Authors are 
inftan'inabkas to becredited, when they afcribe to thefe Chryftaliine Salts 
suu-rtttr. tne feverall Virtuesfand thofe improved too)of the refpetfive 
Vegetables , from which the ^Alcalics were obtained . And 
indeed, astothofeexaft Depurations, which fomt Chy mills 

fo 



Digitized by Google 



(153) 

fo Grimly require in all their Preparations , though their Pro- 
cefles be oftentimes hereby made incredibly tedious, I will 
willingly allow, nayaflerc, that in fome cafes , and efpeci- 
ally in the making of powerfull <Jicn(lruums, which by their 
adtivenefs and penetrancy , are to unlock other Bodies, Chy- 
mifts do rather erre in making their Depurations lefleexqui- 
fite then they mould, then on the other hand: Yet in many 
other cafes, fuch exact refining and fubtiliation of a Remc- 
die, is not fo neceffary as they imagine •, and fometimes too, 
may do more harm then good , by fequeftring thofe parts of 
a Simple, as fnett , which concurred with the finer parts to 
that determinate Texture , whereon the Specifick Virtues of 
it did principally depend i but of this more, elfewhere. And 
therefore I (hall here prefentyou with two or three Inftances, 
to (hew you, That Remedies , at leaft as noble as fuch vul- 
gar Chymical ones as are more tedious and coftly , maybe 
pieparedinafliortertime, arid cheap enough to be fit for the 
ufe of the Poor. 

And to comply , Pyrophilus, with your curiofity, to know 
the preparations of thofe Chymical Medicines, that I do the 
moft familiarly employ, the three following inftances (ball 
be of fuch , namely , The Flores Cokhotvis , The Balfa- 
m»m [nlphuris craflum , and The Efientia Cornu cervini, that 
you may fee what flight and eafie preparations afford the Re- 
medies, whofe Effects you have fo often heard of, if not alfo 
fecn. 

The firft of thefe, is the fame Powder , which pafleth un- 
der the name of Ens Veneris , which appellation we gave it 
not out of a belief , that it equals the Virtues afcribed by 
Belmont , to what he calls the true Ignis Veneris , but partly 
todifguifeit a little, and partly upon the account of the oc- 
cafion whereon it was firft found out, which was, That an 

u In- 



(154) 

Jnduftrious Chymifts (whom you know) and I, chancing to 
look together upon that Tra& of Belmont s , which be calls 
Butler , and to compare it fomewbat attentively with other 
palTages of the fame Author, we both refolved to try, Whe- 
ther a Medicine , fomewbat approaching to that he made in 
imitation of Butler's Stone , might not beeaftly made out of 
calcined Vitriol * And , though upon tryals we found this 
Medicine far fhort of what Helmont afcribes to his , yet find- 
ing it no ordinary one, we did, for (be Minerals fake it is made 
of, call it Ens frimum Veneris. 
The Preparati- Tbc Preparation , in (hort, is this : Tafce good mntzick 
on and virtues Vitriol (ifyoucannot get Hunger t&n otGc/ldrian) aodcal- 
«f Ens vmm. C j ne lt ^\\ tne Cd/x n3ve attained a dark red , or purplifli co- 
lour * then , by the frequent aflufion of boyling , or at leaft 
warm Water, dulcifie it exactly \ and having freed it as well 
as you can from the faline parts, dry it throughly, and after 
mixitexquifitely, by grinding, or other wife, with an equal 
weight of pore Sdl ArmonsAck, very finely powdered, Put this 
Mixture into a glad Retort, that may be but a third part 
filled with it, and fubliming it in a fand Furnace , by degrees 
of Fire, for ten or twelve hours, towards the latter end en. 
creating the Fire, till the bottom of the Retort (if you can) 
be brought to be red hot : That which is fu blim'd muft be 
taken out, and if it be not of a good yellow, but pale ( which 
ufually happens for want of an exa& commiftion of the In- 
gredients ) it may be returned to the refidae, mingled better 
with it again, and fublimed once more : The yellow, or red- 
dim Sublimate may be fu blim'd a fecond time, not from the 
Cjput Mtrtuum , but by it felf % but if you re-fublimeit oft- 
ner, you may , though you will think that ftrange, impair the 
Colour and the Sublimate, inftead of improving them. The , 
Dofe is from two or three Grains, to tenor twdve ( in fomc 

Bodies 



Digitized by Google 



055) 

Bodies it may be encreafed to twenty or thirty , without dan : 
gcr) in diftill'd Water , or fmall Beer , or other convenient 
Vehicles: It may be given at any time upon an empty Sto- 
mach, but I marl commonly give at Bed- time. It works, 
when it works fenfi bly, by Sweat and fo me what by Urine. 
That it is a potent Spec rick for the Rickets , I think I fcarce 
need tell 7*», Pjrppb. whofe excellent Mother and Aunt , to*, 
gether with Tome Phifidans , to whom I alfo gave it ready 
prepared , nave cored perhaps a hundred , or more C bildren, 
of that difeafe , divers of whom were looked upon as in a 
defparate condition. I eive it al fo in Feavers , and other Di- 
(tempers, to procure fleep , which it ufually doth where it is 
wanting: In the Head-ache likovife , in which, iftheDif- 
eafe be inveterate, the Remedy muft be long continued; • 
with the like admonition icharh done Wonders, in f*tfrefi. 
one Men [turn c-bfitnAU: In the Worms it hath fometimes 
doncftrange things; and for provoking of A petite, I re# 
member not that I have either taken or given it withont fuc- 
ceffe : And though I fcldome take ( for I often give more) 
above two or three Grains of it at a time , yet in that fmall 
Dofe it ufually proves Diaphorctical to me the next Morn- 
ing. 

But the Experiments we have had of the feveral Virtues 
and Efficacy of this Medicine, would be here too tedious to 
recite: and therefore I (hall now pafsthem by, though, if 
you require it , I flull not be backward to fet you down , by 
way of Obfer vat ions, mo ft of the cafes wherein I or my 
Friends have given it, and of the principal Cures that have 
been performed by it .* In the mean time , becaufe this exal- 
ted Cohtthiry being given in fo fmall a Dofe , may prove, if 
U be rightly and dextercufly prepared, what Helmut* faith of 
bis imitation of b tiers Drif , s Medium fer ihe Poor , and 

u a yet 



Digitized by Google 



yet requires more care, not to fay skill , to prepare it well,' 
th3n the bare reading of the Procefle you will imagine ? I 
fliall,to gratifie your Chai ity,annex to the end of this Eflay, 
(for to infer t them here would make too prolix a DigreiTionJ 
as many of the pirticulars relating to the preparation of it, as 
I can readily meet with among my loofc Notes . At leaft 
you fliould thinke meea Mountebankefor want of knowing 
in what fenfe it is that 1 commend this and the other parti- 
cular Medicines: 1 mall likewifetothofe Obfervations fub- 
joyne a Declaration of my meaning infuch particulars, and 
of the fenfe, whertjnl defire you ihould understand what 
you meet with in the Praifeof Remedies either in this Eflay 
or any other of my Writings , which I hope it will be fuffi- 
% cient to give you thi> Advertisement of once for all. 

The next Medicine I am to mention to you is the Balfj- 
mum Sulphur is, which being made but with grofTc Oyles drawn 
by Expreffion may be called Craftum, to diftinguifh it from 
the common and thinner Bilfome of Sulphur , that is made 
with the Diftilled Oyleor Spirit of Turpentine. 
The Prcparati. This Balfome is made in an houre or ltfle , without a Fur- 
on and Virtues nace, onely by taking to one part of good Flower of Brim- 

mmsJu&i ftonc > foure or five times as mach t in we 'ghO of good 
crtfm. exprefled Oyle, either of Olives, or Nuts , or Poppey- feeds, 

and boylingthe former in the latter in a Pipkin halte filled 

with both, till it be perfe&iy Diflolved into a Blood red 

Balfome . But as cafie as this Preparation fcems ( and indeed 

is) to them that have often m3deit, it will not atfirftbe 

fo eafie to make it right % For the Fire, which ought to be of 

well kindled Cbales,muft be kept pretty quick , and yet not 

over-quick, left the Oyle boyleover, or do not well Dif- 

folve the Flowers of Sulphur, but turne them with its felfe 

into a Clotted and almoit Liver-coloured Maffc.- And to 

avoid 



Digitized by Google 



fi57) 

avoid thefe inconveniencies , and the aduftion of the Matter, 
fpecialcare muft be hud to keep it conftantly ftirring$ not 
only whil'ft the Pot is over the Fire , but after it is taken off, 
till it be quite Cold.' You may, if you think fit, DifTolve 
this fimple Balfom in Chymical Oyle of Anny- feeds, or 
any other Eflential Oyle, like to advance its Efficacy in this 
or that particular Diftemper: But thofe O vies being gene- 
rally very hot , I moft commonly prefcribe the Balfom with- 
out thofe Additions, efpecially it long Digeftion have forne- 
what leiTened the Offenfivencfle of the fmell , which though 
no peculiar fault of this Preparation being common to Sul- 
phureous Medicines , is yet the chief inconvenience of it, I 
will not too refolutcly affirm that this is the very Balfamum 
Sulphur is RuUndi , of which that Author relates fuch won-* 
deiful things in his Centuries* but if it be not the fame, 
it is fo like it , and fo good , that I doubt not but by perufing 
thofe Centuries , you may find divers ufes of it , that I have 
not madetryal of: And in Comhs , old Strains, Eruifes, 
Aches , ( md (bmetimes the Wip:ent fits of the Go-it it 
felfe ) and efpecially Tumors , fome otyour Friends can in- 
form you , that it doth much greater things than moft Men 
would expect from fo flight and eafie a Preparation And 
indeed greater than I have feerfdone by very coftly and com- 
mended Balfoms and Oyntments , fold in Apothecaries 
Shops 5 And in thofe Obfervations, I larely told you, you 
might command , you will find that this Balfom outwardly 
applyed, hath cured (uch obftinate Tumours, as Men either 
knew not what to make of, or what to do with them , of 
which skilful Phyficians, to whom I gave it to make tryal 
of in difficult cafes , can bear me witnefle 5 Though it ought 
fufficiently to endear this Balfara tons both, that it W3s the 
Means of refcuing your Fair and Virtuous Sifter J\ from 

M a 



a dangerous Confamption . In outward Application it is 
to be well warmed , and to be chafed into the part afrc&ed, 
which fhould be afterwards kept very warrae % or elfe Lint 
dipped in it may be kept upon the place . Inwardly fome 
drops of it may be given at any time, when the Stomach is 
not full | either rolled up with Sugar, or mingled with any 
convenient Vehicle , But as for the Particulars that concerne 
the Preparation of this Balfome, you will finde , thole I can 
readily meet with among my loofe papers , annexed, with 
the Notes concerning Ens Veneris , to the end of this 
Eflay. 

And therefore I (hall now proceed to mention the third 
The Prepay.-. Medicine, which you have often heard of, under the name 
* 3s!I'3*<>f E B e »" •fHms^rnti but which is indeed onely the 
VrnZml Simple, but well Purified and Dephlegmed Spirit of it. 
And though Men are pleafed to imagine, by the EffcOs this 
Remedy often produces, that I have fome Myfterious or ela- 
borate way of preparing i^yet to dcale ingenuoufly with 
you, the chiere thing 1 h^fcjone to bring it into credit , is 
the teaching fome Phyficians and Apothecaries a fare and ea- 
ile way of making it : For whereas before , thofe that went 
about to Diftiil it, commonly ufed, as the Apothecaries are 
wont to do in what they mJfce of the fame Matter, Sha- 
vings or Rafpings of Harts-horne , and diftilled it with a 
ftrong and naked Fire, the fugitive and iubtile Spirits were 
wont to come over in that plenty , and with that impetuoli- 
ty , as to breake the Glafl'es to pieces,whereby Apothecaries, 
and even Chymifts were difcouraged from drawing the Spi- 
rit , and they not having it in their Shops , Its Virtues re- 
mained unknowne. Whereupon, confidering that if it were 
onely broken on an Anvill into pieces of about the bignefle 
of ones little fioger 5 Betides that this way of comminution 

would 



Digitized by Google 



would be far lefs chargeable than Rafping , the fames would 
Dot be driven oat Co faft : and confi dering too, that a violent 
Firewasrequifire^nottodiftillthefubtle Spirit, bnt to drive 
over thegrofleand heavy Oyle$ I thought it was needlefle 
to take pains to force that over, which not being, (that I 
obferved ) afed in Phyfick , would coft me fartW pains 
to feparate it again: And therefore , trying to Diftill Harts- 
Horn i in naked Retorts, placed but in Sand , I found I could 
Diftill two or three pound at a time , and obtain from each of 
them , almoft , if not quite , air the Spirits and volatile Sale, 
which I afterwards feparated from the reddifti and lighter 
Oyl i and freed them from Phlegm and Feculencies by i 
couple of Rectifications , made in tall Glades, §nd with ve- 
ry gentle heats : ( commonly of a Lamp Furnace ) The 
Dof: may be from eight , or ten Drops of the Spirit, or 
Grains of the Salt , to fi x times the quantity of either , in 
warm Beer , or any Vehicle that is not acid , except Milk. 
Finding it to be a Medicine of an attenuating, refolving, and 
Diaphoretical Nature, and one that much refifts Malignity, 
Putrefaction , and acid Humors ( whence being mingled 
with Spirit of Vinegar , and the like four Juices , it de- 
ftroyes their acidity. ) I direct it ( Prdmfjis U/iivtrfAlsbHs) 
in Feavers , Coughs , Plurifies , Obftructions of the 
Spleep , Liver, or Womb, and principally in Affections of 
the Brain , as Stoppages of the Head Feaverifc Deliriums > 
and even in Phrcmtide- And , fince I wrote a good part of 
this Eflay , I had an Experiment of it in a C hild , who being, 
by many violent Convulfion-rits , reduced to a defparate 
condition , was recovered by one Dofe of five or fix Drops 
of this Spirit, that I fentit. It is true that I have another 
Medicine , that is more elaborate and coft ly , and more pro- 
perly bears the name of M$mU corn* cervi , which I 

more 



more value than this : Bat I caonoe communicate that J 
without prejudicing a third Per (on , and an excellent Chy- 
miftwho makes a great advantage of it. But this I can tell 
you, that moftof the Cures-, tor which my Preparation of 
Harts- horn hath had the good fortune to be efteemed, have 
been performed with the above defcribed Simple Spirit and 
Salt , with which fome skilful Phyficians and other inge- 
nious Perfons , who had it from me, have within thefe few 
Years faved fo many Lives, that lam enclined to think , I 
have done no ufelefs piece of Service , in bringing fo happy 
a Medicine into Requeft, especially with thofe that have 
skill and opportunity to make better ufe of it than f. But, 
Fyropbilw , I find I have detained you fo long with fo pro- 
lixa Menticfn, of the three above- defcribed Remedies, that I 
fhould think it requiilte, to make you a folemn Apology : 
but that I hope your Cluiity will as well invite you to Par- 
don the fault, as mine induced me to commit it. 



CHAP. VII. 

That Mcchas A F °rj rt n way of leflening the Charges of Cures , may 
nicks and other be this 5 That whereas the de#nelle of very many Me- 
Experimental <jicines proceeds from the Chargeableneffeof thofe Chymi- 

Lcarntng may 1 ■ i_ 1 1 1 ■ * • « 

cal Operations, whereby they are wont to be prepared , it is 



i*V to 



jdicnthfcharac to be hoped that a greater meafure of skill in Phyfiology, 
ttng^con- and other Experimental Learning, will fuggeft cheaper and 
vcnTcm fuma. better wayes of doing many things in Chymtftry , than are, 

tea* ?n m d"w"fe & vc ^ "^ty P"^^. 

paoicfllarfc And thofe thrifty Exped:ents,I conceive,may be of feveral 
kinds, of which I (hall at prefent mention, and that but tran- 
siently, three or four. 

And 



Digitized by Google 



?«<0 

And fiift, I doubt not but Chymifts may be taught to 
make better Furnaces, lor ftveral purpofes , then thofe that 
have been hitherto mod ufed among them s Forprofcfled 
Chymifts , having been for the mod part unacquainted 
enough with many other parts of Learning , and particularly 
with the Mechanicks their contrivances of Furnaces and 
Veflels, have been far enough from being as good , as know- 
ledge in Mechanicks and dexterity in contrivances might, 
and, I doubt not, hereafter will, fupply them with : whether 
as to the faving. of Fuel , or to the making the utmoft ufe 
of the Heat afforded by the Fuel they do employ, or as to 
the intending heat to the neighbor as to the regulating of heat 
atpleafure. 

It is fomewhat wonderfull, as well as pieafant,to fee how 
many Veflels may be duly heated by one Fire (perhaps no 
greater then' common diftillers employ to heat one Veflel ) 
if the Furnace be fo conifived,as that the Flame may be forced 
to pafTe in very crooked and winding Channels , towards the 
Vent or Vents, and the heat may -be skilfully conveyed to 
the fever ai parts of the Furnace, according to the Exigency 
ot the work it is to do : And as for the intention of heat, I 
remember 1 have had odde effects of it , by the contrivance 
of a certain Furnace, that held but very few Coales , and to 
which I ufed no Bellows. But though by this way I could 
vitrifie fometimes the very Crucibles , and thought poflibly 
1 could, with a flight alteration, melt down the fides of the 
Furnace themfelves* yet aDHdplc of Corncl/sa Drebell, and 
a very credible PerfoaafTuredme , That he knew a way of 
Furnaces that was yet fitter to bring heat to the fuferlativc 
Degree * and that he himfelf, the Relator, could by the 
meer foise of Fire in his Furnace, bring Vtnenan Calk to 
flow which is more , 1 coafefle then ever I have been able 

x to 



(1*2) 

to do cither in mine, or thofe of the Glafs- houfe. Bat Ex- 
perience hath aflured me , it is caficto make a Furnace give 
that heat as expeditioufly enough, and in other refpe&s very 
conveniently to Cupel both Gold and Silver, without the 
lcaft help of Beliowes: That alfo Furnaces may be fo ordered, 
as that the heat may be better regulated, then That in our or- 
dinary ones,I may elfewhcre lhew you caufe to believe : And 
in the mean time I fliall only tell you, that I look upon the 
skill of intending and remitting heat at pleafure, and efpeci- 
ally the being able to keep a gentle heat long and equal as a 
thing ohnuch greater moment, both as to Phyfick and Phi- 
Iofophy, then Chymifts are wont to think "(the powerfull 
effects of conftant and temperate heats , being as yet known 
to few fave thofe that have made tryal of them ) And with 
Lamp-Furnaces, well ordered, divers things may be done in 
imitation of nature 5 fome friends of mine having, as feveral 
of them allure me, in fuch Furnace^brought Hens egges to 
manifeft Animation. That alfo Furnaces may be fo built, as 
to fave much of. the Laborants wonted attendance on thera , 
may appear by the obvious invention of At barters or Fur- 
naces with Towers, wherein the Fire is for many Hours, 
(perhaps for twenty-four , or forty fight ) fupphed with a 
competent proportion of j3oales , without being able to 
burn much fader then it mould : And that in many cafes 
the labour of Blowing may be well [pared , and the annoy- 
ance of Mineral fumes in great part avoided , by an eafie con- 
trivance 5 is evident by thofe Furnaces which are blown by 
the help of a Pipe , drawing the Air„ as they commonly 
fpeak, cither at the top, as in Glauber's fourth Furnace , or at 
the bottom, or for want of room upwards, I have fometimcs 
tryed : To which may be added, that the carting of the Mat- 
ters to be prepared upon quick Coales, as GUnbcr prcfcribes 

m • 



Digitized by Googl 



In that which he calls his fii ft Furnace , is in fome cafes a 
cheap and expeditious way of preparing fome Minerals , 
though his method of making Spiriyrf Salt in that Furnace 
would not fucceed, according to his promife with me, and 
Come of my acquaintance. And there are other more com- 
modious Contrivances , by cafting fome things upon the na- 
ked Fire, which invites me to expect, That there will be fe- 
veral good Expedients ofemployingtheFireto Chymicall 
operations, that are not yet made ufe of, nor, perhaps, fo 
' muchasdream'd of. 

And as Furnaces, fo the VefTels that more immediately 
contain the Thing to be prepared, are queftionleffe capable of 
being made more durable, and of being better contrived, 
then commonly they are. Good ufe may be made of thofe 
Earthen Retorts , that are commonly called GUubtr'% fecond 
Furnaces, in cafe they be Made of Earth that will well en- 
cure ^rong Fires 5 arid inffe there be a better way to keep 
in theHnimes, then that hepropofes of melted Lead , which 
I have therefore often declined for another , as having found 
it lyable to fuch inconveniences as I erfewhere declare. 

But for Materials that arecheap,and to be diftilled inquan- 
tity, as Woods, Harts horn,cfr\ the way is not to bede- 
fpifed, and is, as we may elfewhere have occafion to fhew , 
capable of improvement* though in many cafes this kind of 
Vefiel is inferiour to thofe tubulated Retorts , that were of 
old in ufe, and mentioned by Bafiliut Vdtmintu , and from 
which GUuber probably defam'd tha; which we have been 
fpeaking of. The utility of the way of fealing Glafles her- 
metically , and of the Inventionthat now begins to be in re- 
queft of (topping the Bottles, that contain corrcfive and 
fubtile Liquors with Glafie- flop pies , ground fit to their 
Necks, inflead of Corks, together with fome other things, j^ e £g£ 

. X 2 not live Licjuon. 



Digitized by Google 



not now to be mentioned, keep me that I fcarce doubt bu?^ 
that if we could prevail with the GlalTe-raen, and the Potters, 
to make Veflcls of Qafle and Earth exactly, according to 
directions , many things in Chymiftry might be done better 
and cheaper than they now are 5 and fome things may be then 
done , that with the forms of Vefl'els now in ufe cannot be 
done at all. And if that be trae which we find related in 
Plittf, and with fome other Circum fiances in tiion Caflius 
of a more ingenious than fortunate Man , who, about his 
time, was put to death for having made malleable Glafle: As 
the truth of that Story, if granted, would mew the retriving 
that Invention , a thing not to be defpaired of: So he that 
could, now Chymiftry is fo cultivated , find again the way 
of making Glafle malleable, would be, in my Opinion, a 
very great Benefactor to Mankind , and would enable the 
Virtuoft^ as well as the Chymifts, to make fevtrall Experi- 
ments, which at prefent are fcarce practicable; and fome Chy- 
mifts would perhaps think the attempt more hopeffltl, if I 
tell them firft, that I remember Rajmund Lully exprefly 
reckons it among three or four of the principal Virtues he 
afcribes to the Philofophers Stone, that it makes Glafle mal- 
leable; and then, that an expert Chymift.ferioufly affirmed 
to me, that he met with an Adeptus^ who, among other 
ftrange things, (hewed him a piece of GlafTe , which the Re- 
lator found , would endure and yield to the Hammer: But 
what my own Opinion is concerning this matter, and what 
are the (uncommon) .Inducements I have to be* of it i I muft 
net here declare. 

And on this occasion , I remember I have feen an Intern- 
ment of Tin, or Pewter , for the drawing of Spirit of Wine 
(which you know is one of the char geableft things that be- 
long to Chymiftry ) fo contrived, that whereas in the ordi- 
nary 



Digitized by Google 



nary way miich time , and many rectifications are requifire 
to dephlegm Spirit of Wine; one diftillation in this ' 
Veflel will bring it over from Wine it felt , fo pure and • 
flegrrrietfe, as to burn all away. And I remember, rtnt 
the ancient French Chymift , in whofe Laboratory I fiift 
faw one of thefe Inftruments, told me „ That it was in- 
vented, not by any great Alchymift or Mathematician, 
but. by a needy Parijian Chirurgion. And now I fpeak 
of Spirit of Wine, I /hall adde, That as the charges of Tfminflam- 
Chymiftry would be very much leflened, if fuch ardent ™ b h^ n $ c J 
Spirits could be had in plenty , and cheap : fo I think it not sp^'maybe 
improbable, that in divers places there may be found, by dravrn JjJ 
Perfons well skill'd in the Nature of Fermentation, other ^; h s ^' 1 ' 
Vegetable Subftances farre cheaper then Wine , from which then w.ne. 
an inflammable, and faline Sulphureous Spirit, of the like 
virtue , for diflblving refinous Bodies P drawing Tin- 
ctures , &c* may be copioufly obtained : For not only , 
it is known, that Sydar, Perry, and other Juyces of Fruits 
will aflord fuch a Spirit : and thai moil Grains, not very 
unduous, as Barley, Wheat, &c, will do the like* but 
other Berries that grow wild, as thofe of Elder, will yield 
a Vinous Liquor. And in the Barbados they make a kind of 
Wine, even of Roots, ( I mean their MMy, which they 
make of Potato's •, as I have alio, for curiofuy fake, made . 
Bread of the fame Roots: J nay, even from fome forts of 
Leaves , fuch a Liquor may be obtained .* For I have obfer- 
ved Rofes,well fermented,to yield a good Spirit very ftrong- 
ly-tafted , as well as inflammable. And as to the Preparing . 
of pure Spirit of Wine it felf , 1 know wayes(and one of them 
cheap ) that may exceedingly fhortcn the time, and 
pains of dephlegmingit; but', that being to be done other- * 
wife, then by any peculiar contrivance of Furnaces or 
• • x 3 GialTes,. 



Digitized by GoogI 



; (166) ♦ 

Glaffes, I referve it for a fitter place , in one of the following 

• Eflays. 

in(hnc« \n d». And as more expedient and thrifty wayes, then the vulgar 
vers particulars ones, of malyng Chymical Furnaces and Veffels, may be 

laiift may" nd devife<1 ; fo ic is t0 bc no P Cii tnac 2 skilftl1 Naturalift may 
chraper.wayci find cheaper wayes^of heating the Chymifts Furnaces, or Di- 
ch^Sr* billing in his Veffels ( cither by finding combuftible Materi- 
waa* i " r ^ s > not formerly m ufe in the places yhere we work , or by 
making tbofe allready imployed fitter for ufe ) by bringing 
them by fome cheap alterations, either to give a greater, or 
a more durable heat $ or to be IciTe ofTenfive by their fmoak 
or fmells 5 or eife by difcovering fome cheap way of doing , 
' in fome cafes, without Fire , what was wont to be done 
by it. 

We fee that in fome places, efpccially herein England \ 
where Char-coal was only burnt in Furnaces , Pit coal is 
fubftituted in its roome-: and at this Day there are fevcral of 
thofe that make Aquafortis, in great quantities, that Di- 
ftiliit with fuch Coals , which colt nothing neer fo much as 
thofe made of Wood. And experience hath informed me, 
that even in other forts of Furnaces, the fame Fuel may bc 
imployed, provided the Barrts of the Grates be fet wider 
afunder, and a little Char-coale be mingled with it for the 
better kindling; and linceoflate Years Pit-coal have been 
found in ftveral places among us , where they were not for- 
merly known to be , it feems not improbable , that many 
other Countries may afford Chymifts , and the reft of their 

. Inhabitants, the like advantage; iffearch were duelv made, 
by boring of the groun J, by theobfervations of the Waters, 
and the Si earns of places fufpe&cd, and by other wayes of 

1 inquiry that a skilrull man might direft* But becaufe the 
abundant Smoak of Pit- coal , ufes to be very ofrenfive, 3nd 

the 



Digitized by 



the fmaller Coales cafily ran thorough the Grates J and S^fildS 
t>ecaufe or other inconveniences, there hath been a way found while it charrs 
out of charring thefe Coales, and thereby reducing them in- 
to coherent Mafl'es, of a convenient bignefle and fhape, and comeicv cai- 
rn ore dry and apt to kindle 5 And thefe, though quantity cincMmcrah. 
for quantity , their price be little infer iour to that of Char, 
coale s Yet thofe that confume great proportions of Coales, 
cell me they rind them almoft as cheap again , in regard they 
will not only laft much longer , but give ( efpecially ne3r ac 
hand ) a farre more mtenfe heat s And therefore it mud be a 
very ufeful thing to Chymifts, to fliew a way of charring 
Sea. coales , without the help of thofe Pots , which make 
them of the price they now bear. And that it is not only 
poflible, but very eafie, I could quickly (hew you, if it would 
not prejudice an induftridus Laborant, whole profeffion 
being to make Chymical Medicines in quantity, obliges 
him to keep great and conftant Fires, and did put him upon 
finding away of charring Sea-coale, wherein it is, in about 
three hours or lefle, without Pots or Vefels, brought to 
Char-coalej of which having , for cur iofi ty fake, made bimv 
take out fome pieces, and cool them in my prefence. I found 
them upon breaking to appear well charr'd, and much 
thereof in mew not unlike a Marchafite. And that which was 
very convenient *in this Contrivance was , that whileft the 
Pic.coal was charring, it afforded him a very intenfe heat to 
melt or calcine the Minerals , he had occafion to expofe to 
it : And he confeft to me , that by tjiis Method , he faved 
three parts in four of the Charges the keeping fuch great and 
conftant Fires, with common Char- coal, would coft him. 
In Holldni , likewife , they have a way of charring Peat f 
(which is a combuftible Turfe , that they dig under Ground; £^ chair,n £ 
and a skilful Diftiller, that much employed it, commends it 

to 



Digitized by Google 



tome ; as a very good Fuel,even for Chy micall Fires, which 
I therefore mention, becaufe the way of charring Peat, is not* 
yet brought into feveral Countries , where Peat is digged up: 
And probabty, it would be bund in divers Regions , where 
it is yet unknown , if due fearch were made for it. To which 
I may adde , that it is not unHke, that fome Countries may 
afford fuch combultible Materials fit for Chymical Furna- 
ces, as have not, as yet, been fo much as named by Mine- 
raiifts : as I remember I have feen, and had, a fort of 
Coales, fome of which looked like Marcbafites , that burned 
clear with a good Flame, and had this convenient quality, 
lor the Chy mills ufe, that they were not apt , like the com- 
mon Pit- coals, to ftop the Grates with their Sinders, but 
burnt to whitirti Arties almoft like Cbar-coale made of 
Wood; and yet gave fo great a* hear, that anlnduftrious 
Chymifh of my acquaintance , who kept many things con- 
ftantly at work , found it worth while to have them brought 
him,aboveadayes joarney,on Horfes backs. 

But it is not infpoflible , that when men grow better Na- 
turalifts, they may finde waves ,. of exciting heat , enough 
for many Chymicall operations , without the help of Fire, 
and confequently, without the confumption of Fuel. We 
find that by the attrition of hard Bodies, confiderable de- 
grees of heat mav be produced, not only, in eombuftible Ma- 
terials, as Wood, and the like, (which would therefore be 
improper, to be here infifted on 5 ) but in others alfo , and 
particularly in Iron ana) Steel , one may by attrition foon 
produce a fmart heat, as you may quickly try, by nimbly 
Filing a piece of Iron, with a rough File , or fwjftly rubbing, 
though but for a few minutes , a thin piece of Steel againfl 
a Board. And whether fome contrivance may not be found, 
by the help of cheap Engines moved by Water,or otherwife, 

• , to 

« 



Digitized by 



to produce a durable heat in Iron Veflels, fit to digeft in, we of Daemon 
may elfewhere have farther occafion to confider \ But this is and delwiati- 
known, that from fome fucculent Plants, a Liquor may be °™ c *' ,lhout 
drawn, only by expofing them in Glafligs, purpofely contri- 
ved to the Beams of the Sun. And there is nothing 
more common , than for Chymifts to make their Digeftions 
by the warmth of Horfe-dung , whereby they might alfo ( as 
fome Analogous tryals incline me to think ) conveniently 
enough, Diftill fome fermented Liquors * efpecially, if the 
way were improved by the skilfull addition of Quick-lime, 
andfeafonableafperfions of Water. And I doubt not but 
many cheap Materials might, by a few tryals , be found , 
whereby portable digefting Furnaces, without Fire, (if I 
may fo call them ) might be made, without the ill fmcll and 
naftine{Te,wbich difcommends the ufe of Horfe dung. For 
not only we fee, by wh3t happens in the Spontaneous hea- 
ting of Malt , and fome other familiar fubftances , that pro- 
bably moft fort of Grains, and Berries, fit for Fermentation, 
may be brought to yield, for a good while, a heat great 
enough to putrifie, or digeft with : But I have,feverall Years 
agoe, by many tryals found ; that I could, by invironing 
Glaffes with reffufe- Hay; well pre fled down and eqaally wet- • 
ted throughout , produce for divers dayes fuch a heat, as 
made me decline the employing of Horfe dung; and yet 
( which is the chief thing for which I mention this ) the 
quantity of Hay was fo f mall, that in all my tryals I found 
not, that the Hay did of it felf, though kept clofe enough, 
take Fire; as elfe is ufuall in Ricks of Hay not fufh'ciently 
dried , where the quantity , and confequently the weight , 
that pre(Tes the lowermoft parts dole together, is conside- 
rable. 

But further, in divers operations, where an aftu# Fire is 

y requifite, 



Digitized by 



(no) * 

requifite, it may be hoped that knowing Men , may difcover 
wayes of faving much of the Fire , and making Skill perform 
a great part of the wonted office of Heat. To obtain the 
Spirit of frefli Urinj, you muft Diftill away near nine parts 
of ten, which will be but Flegm , before the Spirit or Vo- 
latile Salt will (and that fcarce, without a pretty ftrong heat ) 
Waye* of diftii- regularly rife. And there are feveral Cbymifts that, to this 
inspirit of jay, mate u f e 0 f no better way of Diftillmg Urine: But he 
that knows, how Putrefaction opens many Bodies , may ea. 
fily fave himfelfe the expence of fo much Fire : For if you 
let Urine ftand well flopped, for eight or ten Weeks,the Sa- 
line and Spirituous parts will fo extricate tbemfelves,that the 
Spirits that before flayed behind the Flegme, will now, even 
with the gentleft heat, rife up firft, and leave the Flegme be- 
hind. And on this occafion I fhall teach you, what 1 doe 
not know to have been mentioned by any Writer * namely, 
Of Milling That even of frefh Urine, without Digeftionor Putrefa&ion, 
^fa£». I can, by a very cheap and cafie way, make a fnbdc and pe- 
ation. netrant Spirit , afcend, fifft, even in a gentle heat; And I 
am wont to do it only by pouring Urine, how frefh foever, 
upon Quick-lime, till it fwim fome Fingers breadth above 
. n it,and then diftilling it afloon as I pleafe. But I did not find, 
iiSww! U P0" many tryals , that this Spirit, though even without 
palate spirit of Rectification very ftrong and fubtle, would Coagulate Spi- 

Kallfcl- rit of Winc > likc lhat of P utrified and fomented Urine? 
i«i 0 n. a ' though, perhaps, for divers other purpofes it may be more 

powerfull. 

And here I (hall advertife You , that whereas I juft now 
took notice , that there was a pretty ftrong Fire requifite to 
force up the Salt of unfermented Urine , out of that part , 
which, after the abftra&ion of the Flegme, remains of the 
confiMKce of Honey 5 tryai hath informed me, That the vo- 
latile 



pigitieed by 



(170 

latileSalt may out of the thick Liquor be obtained , better 
and more pure, with eafe, and with a fcarce credibly- fmall 
heat* barely , by tempering the Urinous Extract with a con- 
venient quantity of good Wood Allies, whereby (for areafon 
clfewheretobeconfidered; the volatile part of the Salt of 
Urine, is fo freed from the groffer Subftance , that with 
ftrange facility it will afcend, fine and white, to the top of 
very tall Glaffes. But of the differing Preparation of Urine, ^ fth ^"£ 
more perhaps elfewhere. I now proceed to tell you, that I p r ^, j/fae;- 
think it not unlikely , that even Bodies , which are more l wing dm- 
groffcandfluggim, may by theaffufionof fuch Menjtruums^ lafion * 
as humane Induftry may find out, be farre more eafily, either, 
volatiliz'd or unlockt, then common Chy mitts are wont to 
think* For I know a Liquor, not very rare among Chy- 
mifts, by whofe help I have, often enough , diftili'd Spirit of 
Nitre, ( whofe diftillacioh requires much about the famevi. 
olenceof Fire, with that of xsfqud-Fortu ) even in a mode- 
rate heat of Sand, and without a naked Fire. This Spirit may 
eafily enough be brought over, even in a Head and Body : 
and, for a Wager, I could obtain a little of it without any 
Fire or outward heat at all. And I remember alfo, That have- 
ing once digefted a certain Menftruum, for a very ftiort time, 
upon crude Antimony^ and abftra&ed it, inavery gentle heat, 
of Sand * the Liquor, not only , brought over fome of the 
jtittimanjlnihefoimof red Flowers, fwimming in it, and 
united other parts of the Mineral, with it felf, in the tranf- 
parent Liquor, but the gentle heatraifed to the top of the 
Retort , divers little Mattes of a fubftance, that were very 
tranfparent, like Amber , which were inflammable, and 
fmelt, and burnt blew, juft like common Sulphur - t And yec 
the CMenftruum , which was eafily again recoverable 
from the \jtwtimwf % was no ftrong Corrofive, tailing , 

y 2 before 



Digitized by GoogI 



07*) 

before it was poured on, not ranch unlike good Vinegar; 

But befides all the wayes above mentioned of Caving the 
Chymift, either, Time, or Fire , or Labour : I defpair noc 
that divers others, yet unthought on , will be in time found 
out by the Induftry of skilfull Men, taking notice of the 
That the caki- nature of things , and applying them to Chymicall ufes: as 
il 3 fac?iiutcd 0ld we tnat k v Amalgamations wither c»ry y the calcination 
by Amat^ma, of Gold, and Silver, may be much eafier performed , than by 
t»on$ with Mtr. a long violence of Fire. And, fir it be true, what Hclmont, 
and Paracdfut , tell us of their immortall Liquor Alkabcft) 
Medicines farre nobler, and other wife more difficult to make, 
than thofe hitherto in ufe among the Chymifts , may be 
Prepared with greater eafe, and expedition, and with far lefle 
expence of Fire , than the nature of the Mettals , and other 
Concretes to be opened by it , would let a vulgar Chymift 
fufped. However , I fee no great caufe to doubt that there 
k may be Mcnftruums found that will much facilitate difficult 
Operations , fince not to mention again the Liquor I late- 
ly told you would work fuch a change on Nitre (and, I 
might have added, on fomeother compact Bodies ) it is ve- 
ry like, there may be Menflruums found, that will noc 
be fo fpoyled by a (Ingle Operation, made with them, as our 
The power 0 f vulgar faline Spirits are wont to be. For I have tryed that 
^\\t&\ntxt*. *iMtn$ruum t made by the bare diftillation of good Ver- 
ingtinftures of digreafe, will not only draw, as I have formerly told you, 
Giaiicof Ami- aTin&ureof Glafleof K^intimon^ or performefome other 
»«C >irc. like Operation for once , but being drawn off from the diflol- 
ved body,or the Extraction, will again ferve, more than once, 
for the like Operation upon frefb Materials. 

The fifth, and laft way , Pjrophilut^ that I intend to men- 
tion, of leffening Chymicall expences, is, That the Natu- 
raiifts may probably find out wayes of preferving fome Chy- 
micall 



Digitized by 



Medicines, either longer or better than thofe waves 
that are ufual. But of this prcfervation of Bodies, being 
like, as I formerly intimated, to have el fe where further oc- That the Nam; 
cafion to Treat; I mail now only fay , That the purified S*^^ 
Juyces , liquid Extracts, Robs^ and other foft Medicaments, prefcrve Mc<n; 
made of Plants, may be Conferv'd far cheaper, as well as bet- jjJJlS??, 
ter, than with Sugar ( which clogs mod Mens Stomacks, i$ ufuaj? 1 
and otherwife difagrees with many Conftirucions ( in cafe 
Hclmont fay true, where he tells us, That for a fmall piece of 
Money , he can , for I know not how long , preferve whole 
Barrels or Liquor. And a way he intimates, of fuming li- 
quors with Sulphur , I have already told you , is a very of fuming ti- 
good way of keeping them uncorrupted provided, that SJJ'**'* 5 ** 
(though he prefcribes it not ) they be fix or feven fevcrall 1 
times* ( feldomer or oftner , according to the quantity or 
nature of the Liquor ) well impregnated with that imbal- 
ming Smoak-, to which purpofc, it is convenient to have two 
Veflcls, to pour from one to the other , that whil'ft the Li. 
quor is making in the one, the other may be well filled with 
Smoak 5 whereto I fhali only fubjoyn this fecrer, which a 
friend of mine pra&ifes, in preferving the fumigated Juyces white c§a&i*m 
of Herbs (as, 1 elfewhere informe you, I do to preferve other madc «* thc 
things ) with a fucceffe that 1 have fomewhat wondred at 5 win^and tfc- 
which confifts , in adding to the thick Liquor to be prefer- r»nc. 
ved, a due, but fmall proportion of the white Co&gulum t 
C which I often elfewhere mention) made of the pure Spirits 
of Wine and Urine. 

But I have made this excurfion too prolix , and therefore I 
mall only adde as a general admonition, That we are not, by 
the common practice of Vulgar Chymifts to eftimate what 
Knowing Naturalifts, skilled in Mechanical contrivances^ 
may be able ia time to do, towards the making of Chyrai- 

y S call 



Digitized by Google 



d74) 

call Remedies, as well more cheap as more effctttul: and, 
indeed, to make them more effectual, is the be ft way to make 
them more cheap. 

For, Pjrophtlm, after all the waves, that I have mentio- 
ned, whereby the charges, of the t her /peptic a U part of Phy- 
fick, may be leffened : I rouft advertife you , both , That 
I make no doubt but there may be divers others found, which 
either through want of skill or leafure I have pretermitted, 
and that I have not yet named the principal of all $ which is, 
That the deep infight into Naturall Philofophy may quali- 
SSiJSS? fie him that hath it, by feverall wayes, and efpecially by 
cf icffcningthc difcovering the true Caufes and Seats of Difeafes, to find out 
charge or f ucn generous and eftedtual Remedies , (whether Specificks, 
be U thc findlnfr or more Univerfall Arcana ) as by quickly freeing the Pati- 
out New and ent from his Difeafe, may exempt him from needing , either 
worceffcauaii mucn phyfak from the Apothecary, or many chargeable 
vifits from the Dodor, or Chirurgeon. Thus the rich 
Merchant I mentioned, in one of the former Eflayes , to have 
been freed, by aSpecifick, from the Gout: and the young 
Lady,* cured of her Fiftula s , by the infufion of Millepedes ; 
might well, in the ordinary way, have (pent, even fuppofing 
them thrifty , an hundred times more upon Phyficians and 
Phyftck,than the potent and nimble Remedies, whereby they 
were fo happily recovered, coft them. 

[To which I mall adde, by way of Confirmation , both of 
this and or what I lately told you ; concerning the Efficacy 
that may be, even in (lightly Prepared Simples: what I 
*ame to learn , fince the writing ot the former part of this 
Effay, namely, that a young Lady, who< though of great 
Birth , is yet of tar greater Beauty and vertue , whom 1 pre- 
fume I need not name to you ) having been long troubled 
with an alraoft hereditary EpilepticaU Diftemperj and after 

having 



Digitized b\ 



(175) 

having been wearied by coarfes of Phyfick prefer ibed her J 

by thefamoufeft Do&ors that could be procured, without 

at ail mending, bat rather growing worfe, (o that fome- AnHiftoryof 

times She would have, in one day, eight or ten of fuch dif- a radicate/ e. 

mal Fits • as You and I have feen her in \ was cured only ffjffi t *« 

by the Powder of true LMiflcltu of the Oake: given as the powder? 

much as would lie upon a S ix- pence, earl y in the morning, in g''iT<*« of the 

black Cherry Water, or even in Beer, for fome dayes near ' 

the full Moon. And I am allured, partly, by the Patient 

her lelf, and partly by thofe that gave her the Medicine, 

That though it had fcarce any other fenfible Operation upon 

her, and did not make her fickifli, efpecially, when (he flept 

upon it: Yet, after the firft day fhe took it , (he never had 

but one Fitt. And this Remedy , an ancient Gentleman, 

who, being cafually prefent when (he fuddenly tell down as 

dead, gave it her, profefled himfelf to have con Handy 

cured that Difeafe with it, when he could procure the right 

Simple, which is here exceeding fcarce. And what further 

Experiment fome Friends of Yours have fuccefsfully made, 

of its Virtue , I may el fe where have occafion to relate.] 

To which 1 fliall only adde , That one of the Skilfullefc 
Methodifh I ever knew , having had much adoe to pre» 
ferve a young Coufin of Yours from a very dangerous 
Cough, by a long courfe of Phyfick $ the party, at the be- 
ginning of the next Winter , falling into a Relapfe more 
thrcatning then the firft Difeafe, was refcued from it in two 
or three dayes, by not many more taking of a Specifick fenc 
her , made of nothing elfe but Harts- horn prepared as I late- 
ly taught You. And if fuch flight Medicines, confining, 
each of them, but of a (ingle Simple > not elaborately prepa- 
red, may fometimes ( for I fay not alwayes ) per forme fuch 
fpeedy cures even in C bronical Difcmpers} What may not 



Digitized by Google 



Ul6) 

be hoped from the Atcma majors ( fuch as Pdraeelfw's Lau- 
danum , fo praifed by operinm himfelf* and Battler's Dr iff, 
fo extold by Helmont ) when the skilfullcft Preparations of 
the nobleft Simples , fluil come to be known by Learned 
and Judicious Men, intelligent in the Theory of Phyfick, 
andefpecially verfed in the Hiftory of Difeafes f And though 
Mtveriuswere none of the greateft Naturalifts , or , at leaft, 
Chymifts* Yet if in his Obfervation, and el fc where, he flat- 
ter not his own Febrifugum 5 how many Patients did that 
one Specifi ck, refcue from Quart anes , that would elfe proba- 
bly have proved as Chargeable as Tedious f 

Bur, pyropbjluty having fayd fo much , that I feare you 
have thought it tedious , to (hew that a Naturalift , skill d 
in Chymiftry and the Mechanicks, may aifift the Phyfici- 
an to make his cures lefle Chargeable 5 it is high time, that 
after fo long an excurfion , I proceed to confider in what 
other particulars he may be a benefactor to the Phyfici- 
ans Art. 



CHAP. 



Digitized by Gc 



n?7) 



CHAP. VIII. 



fifthly, then , that the Naturahfts skill may improve Other pro«« 
^the PharmdCiutical preparations of Simples , by fe- J m?y 
verall wayes partly touched already , and partly to be, ei- im^ovc the 
thcr , added or farther treated* of 5 the great variety of JJjJJgJ^ 
new Remedies j wherewith the Laboratorie; of Chymifts sSJS!° ° 
have furniftied the Shops of Apothecaries, may convincingly 
inform you . To which I muft yke the liberty to adde 
( and that upon ferious Confideration ) That the Chymi- • 
tall Preparations , hitherto common in Difpcnfatories , are, as 
to the Genarality of them, far enough from being the mo ft Dex* 
t reus, or Noble, that can be Acvifed: For our Vulgar Chymi- 
ftry 1 to which our Shops owe their venall Spagyricall Re- 
medies ) is as yet very incompleat , affording us rather a 
Collection , of loofe and fcattered (ani many of them 
but cafujll ) Experiments , than an Art duely fuperftructed 
upon Principles and Notions, emergent from fevere and 
competent Inductions , as we have el fe where endeavoured 
more particularly , to manifeft. And therefore till the Prin- 
ciples of Chyraiftry be better known , and more lolid- 
ly eftablifh'd , we muft expect no other , than that , very 
few vulgar Chymicall Remedies fliould be of the Nobleft 
fort 5 and that in the preparation of many others con- 
fiderable errours fliould be wont to pafle unheeded And 
faults grbfs enough , be apt to be miftakenly committed. • 
But of this Subject , we may elfewhere have divers occafions 
to entertain You * and our fingle EiTay , of the chymicall 
Diftinftions of Salts, will perhaps difcover to You no fmali 

z miftakes 



Digitized by Google 



07«). 

miftakes,inthe preparation of divers applauded Vulgar Me- 
dicines. For it is not the ElaborateneiTe , bat the Skilt 
fulnefle of preparations, that prodaceth the Noble Reme- 
dies, and a tew Teeming Principles well knowne and apply- 
ed , will enable a Man with eafe to make better Reme- 
dies; than a great many Furnaces and GlafTes, though ne- 
ver fo well contriv'd, and though very ufefull in their kind. 
To make this out in fome meafure , I ihall name fome 
fuch Inftances, as may withall confirme what I formerly de- 
livered in this EflTay , touching the portability and ulefui- 
nefle of Correcting either poifonous , or otherwife very 
of the beft noxious Simples. I new knew opium fo much Corrected 
£ a ^ tocorreft by Saffron, Cinnamom, and other Aromaticall and Cor- 
pmm * , diail Drugs ( wherewith it is wont to be made up into Lau* 
ddnum ) nor by the moft tedious tortures of VulcAn , as I 
have knowne.it by being a while Digefted in Wine, impreg- 
nated with nothing but the weight of the Opium of «pure 
Salt of r art at , as weeelfewhere more fully declare* ( A 
much nobler Laudanum may be made by adding to the 
ovium ,inftead of the Salt,twoor three appropriated Sim- 
ples , and by due Fermentations and Digeftions of them 
with it.) And for that violent Vomiting- Medicine, by Chy- 
Ofthebcftway mifts flatteringly enough, called LMercurius fit*-, a whole 
•f correttiftg of Pound of Cordiali Conferves, or Liquors , will not fo well 
MtttmmVk*. moderate its evacuating force , as the keeping it continu- 
ally ftirring in a flattifh and- well glaz'd earthen Veflell , 
placed over a ChaHng-difh of Coales till it emit no more 
fumes, but grow of a grayifli Colour .* which I am very 
• credibly informed to be the Preparation of UHcrcVit* pur- 
gam , oftentimes mentioned and commended by the fa- 
mous Practitioner River t us , in 'his Obfer vat ions. A not 
inlike, bus far more fudden, Correction of that active Pow- 
der, 

. 0 



• Digitized by 



"(179) 

der , I elfewhere teach, £nd as for thofe Operative Mi- 
nerals,. g*ick filver^ and Antimoni, though long Experience An excellent 
of their churlifh and untraceable Nature have made many, Medicine nude 
of the waryer Phyficians and Chymifts, my to meddle with J?^^; 
cither of them (ingle : Yet thefe Concretes , which gmck-pher 
feem fo Incorrigible, may , by being barely fin the gra- ^Antimony. 
dqall Diftdlation , of Butter of Antimony ) fublim'd up to- 
gether in a Clnnabtr , and then that Cinnaber , fix or fe- 
veo times refublim'd per fe t be united into a Medicine, 
that not onely is not wont to worke , either upwards or 
downwards , but of which I have knowne fafely taken, 
even in fubftance , to the Dtft of many Grains s and a few 
Drachmes of which, infus'd in a Pound or two of Wine, 
hath made it of that inofrenfive Efficacy ( taken , in the 
quantiry of a Spoonfull or two, dayly upon 3n empty fto- 
rnack; That, if it ftill fucceed as well* as we have obfer- 
ved it two or three times to do , .we may think that our . 
having thus acquainted You with the Virtue of this un- 
likely Remedy , (though we havealfo metwith it, even, 
in Printed Books ) may make you amends for all the reft 
of this tedious Difcourfe. I once knew a flight ( but al- 
together new and tedious , as well as Phiiofophicall ) Pre- 
paration of Salt of Tartar , Correct and Tame fuch Poy- 
fons , as ten times the quantity of the higheft Vulgar An- 
tidotes , or Cordialls , would ( I was confident; fcarcc 
have fo much as weakened : And I have known by the fame 
prepared Sale , dextroufly Specificated by Simples, the 
Virtues Of fome Vegetables fo exalted , That , without any 
Cathartique or Emttique Operation, they have ( if many 
Patients, of whom I hadcafual opportunities to enquire of 
the Effe&s of thofe Remedies upon them, do not mif- in- 
form me ; proved more effectual! in Taming divers ftub- 

z a born 



* Digitized by Google 



born Difeafes , then Crocus MetalUrum , Mercarius Vlu \ 
(as it is abufively called) and thofc other dangerous Re- 
medies s which make the Vulgar wont to fay of Chy- 
mifts, that they quickly either core their Patients or kill 
them. And to let you fee , Pyrophilm , by one plaine, and 
yet noble infhnce , That the knowledge of the Specifick 
Qualities of Things i skilfully applyed to preparations , 
may performe , with eafe , what neither coftly Materials, nor 
elaborate Proceflcs ate able to effetf $ Give me leave to 
inform You : That , whereas , Cay milts and Phyficians have 
not been able by infufing the true Glafl'e of Antimony f made 
perfc) in Spirit of Wine, or the richeft Cordial 1 Liquors ; 
nor yet by torturing it after feverall tedious and artifiriall 
manners , todepiiveit of its Emetique quality ; That Vo- 
tvavcstotakc mitive faculty , of Antimonull Glafle, may be Corrected by 
ffitofaTtf fo fl « ht 3 wa V , ^-^hat of Digefting it with pure Spirit of 
Artemm .Vinegar, till the Menftraum be highly ting'd. For if you 
ciatic. gently abftracl all the Liquor, and on the remaining yel- 
low or red Powder, you Diceft well dephlegauted Spi- 
rit of Winet You may after a while, obtaine a Noble and 
not£wf//^**Tin&ure : Of which though Bafilius Valcntt- 
ntts prefaibes but five or fix Drops- for a. yet a Do- 
mefiiquc of mine having, out of curiofity , taken to the 
his curm quantity of thirty Drops at a Time , he found it not at 
Slr^f ail Vomitive. And this Tm&ure we the rather men- 
• tion , Becaufe , not only Bafilius Valintinw , but 
other skilful! Ferfons , highly excoll it for feverall Di- 
feufes. * 

And let me adde , ?)nfh't\m , ( and be pleafed to raarke 
well what I tell you) That, by bare reiterated Digefti- 
ons , and,! Fermentations , there may be prepared , out 
of many Vegetables 9 Saline and Sulphureous EiTenca* 

(whofe 



Digitized by GooqI 



(lit) 

(whofe Bulk is exceeding fmall , in proportion to the 
Concretes whence they ate Extracted ) which will keep 
many Years as I can fhew you fome above three Years 
old 7 and contain more of the Crafts ( if I may fo call 
it ) of the Simple , than the Vulgar Vegetable Wa- 
ters, Spirits i Extracts, or Salts, hitherto extant in La* 
boratories and Shops. But there is fo great a length of 
Time required , to the preparation of thefe Efficacious 
Juices , That my ambulatory condition of Life, 
hath not allowed me to turnilh my feife with many.of 
them. 

And, Pyrophiltu, if You will not disbelieve a Perfon for 
whom You have fo juft an efteem , as You have for that 
Ingenious, and Experienced, Monftcur L.P- who was the 
French Kings Chymift , when You knew him at Pari^ 
I can prefenc You with a yet Nobler inftance t , to per-i 
fwade You* That , if skill be not wanting, 3 fingle 
. Herbe, without any violence of Fire, may, by other wayes 
than are in ufe among Chymifts, beeafily enough brought 
to afford Medicine , endowed with fome Nobler Vir- 
tues than any of the moft compounded r coftly , and 
elaborate Medicines, whefher Minerals or others, that 
are to be met with among Vulgar Chymiih. Th s Efficaci- 
ous part of the Plant, whence i^is obtained, Pvacclfa 
calls the Primum Ens of the Plant that yelds k 5 But. 
though*, indeed, I have found the way of preparing it 
much plainer , and better delivered , than is uiuall in his 
Writings, at the end of his Booke Dc Rcnovathnt & Re- 
ftaurathne : Yet I freely, acknowledge , That I mould 
fcarce have thought it worth the Tryall, if it had not been 
for what the Expe'rienc'd Chymift above-mentioned, affir- 
med to me , upon his own Obfervations , concerning it 9 

■ 



partly , becaufe I am not wont to be forward, fo much as 
to try long Procefles upon Paracetfus's credit, and partly, 
becjufe what he calls Sal Solutum Teemed to me fome- 
what ambiguoas $ (ince in the fame Page teaching to draw 
the Ens frtmnm of Gold and K^fnttmcnj , he makes not ufe 
of Sea* Salt but of ( a Salt of an incomparably higher Na- 
ture,) his Sal circnlatum 5 and in theProcefle immediate- 
ly preceding ours , to make the Em primum of Emeralds , 
«ucmia d ro"k e prefcribes the Calcining them in Sale Soluto^ which 
g«theP*L*w agfees far better with his . Sal Clrculatnm \ then with any 
Ens, or eflence, Solution of Sea- Salt , which feems very unlikely to be able 
ubieT VCgC5 10 Calcine, and , as he fayes it muft , diflblve Emeralds. 

But the way , that our French Chymift toH me he ufed , 
• . was in Subftance this : Gather , in a convenient fealbn 
and time of Day, Baulm for inftance , or Tome other fit 
Herb , ( for experience hath taught, both him and me, 
that all Herbs are norfit/by this way, to be reduced 
into Liquors; and haying beaten it well , in a Marble- 
Mortcr , to a foft mafti , placed in a Bolt-head Hermeti- 
cally fealed , to Digeft forty dayes in a Dunghill or fome 
analogous heat$ then, opening the Veflell, take out the 
Matter, which will be far more Liquid than before, from 
which, having feparated the grofler pprs, You muft Digeft 
it in a gentle Bath, thtf the yet remaining grofler parts 
ipayfubfide* to which .being filtrated, You muft, accor- 
ding to htm, ( for I find not that Paraceljw requires it ) 
joynthe fixed Salt; of the grofler parts above mentioned, 
dry'd and calcin'd. To this prepared Liquor , fou moft 
adde equall parts of the Liquor of good Sea Salt well pu- 
rified, and then melted, and fufFered to run Per Deli- 
djuium : This Liquor, being alfo fealed up in a conveni- 
ent Glafle, muft be expofed to the Sunne for about fix 

Weeks 5 



08?) 

Weeks •, at the end of which time there will fwtm at the 
top df it, the Frimum Ens of the Plant in a Liquid form, 
tranfparent, and either green or red, or, perhaps, of fome 
other Colour according to the Nature of the Plant. And 
though fdrsc'elfm prefcribes but Celandine , and Baulm , to 
be uted, Yet having enquired of our Chy mills , he told 
me, he had made fuch PrtmA EntiaoiScrofhuUrU , and, as 
I remember , of one or two other Herbes. But that which 
makes me thus, particularly, take notice of thefe kind 
of Medicines, is, That not only Paractlfms afcribes- to 
the Frimum Ens of Baulm , ( or Celandine ; the power JhSSSJ 8 
of renovating them that ufe fo much of it in good Wine e*»I to caufc 
as will give it a Tincture , early every Morning $ ciil , R -°°rflV^!L • 
fir A of all the Nails of their Fingers, then thofe of their rc J ur " 
Toes ,• afterwards their Hair, and Teeth, fall off, and 
laftly , the Skin be dryed *nd exchanged for a new one : 
But Your ingenious acquaintance allured me feverall times, 
and once , in the pre fence of a famous Phy fician , and 
another Virtuo^ % to whom he appealed, as knowing the 
truth of what he faid ; That an intimate Friend of his, 
whom he named to me , having % after the above men* 
tioned manner , prepared the frimum Ens of Baulm , to 
fatisfie himfelfe the better of its effects , made the Tryal 
upon himfelfe , and took of it, according to the Pre- 
fcription, for about a Fortnight : Long before which his 
Nailes, both or Hands and Feet, began to loofen them- 
felves from the Skin , ( but without any pain) which ac 
length falling off, of their own accord , this Gentleman 
keeps yet by him in a Box for a rarity 5 but would not pur- 
fue the Tryall any further , being fatisfied with what he 
had found , and being in no need of fuch Phyfick* But 
having given of the feme Medicated Wine, for ten or 

twelve 



Digitized by Googl< 



(.93) '* ■■» ]l \ 
he faies out of commiferation to the fick) delivers , where i" mte 
he teaches that which he calls the Via Media of making the nifamn- 
Elixir Proprietatis,o£which he gives us this commendation: f*r £«* 

medic amine tarn guartanamtfuam continuant ftatim ab- ImftT ' 
fohi. Ada) nt qui ttoBn fufecperat JicrefanQum viaticum* ' " . 
& old txtremam nnSionem , me in prandio convivam circa 
ledum hibuerit. And though many think,that he has rather 
fraudulently, than righly fet the procefs down j yet experi- 
ence has invited me to abfolve him in this particular* 
(Though I muft tell You , that becaufe a Languid heat is 
not fufficient to make a Spirituous liquor afcend, and circu- 
kte as he requires} 'tis not every Chymift,tbat will,elpeci- offSclm 
ally in his firft triah,avoid the breaking of the Gla(fes,or at v« media 
leafl: the Burning of the meterials, to which accidents this*/ El '*j r 
preparation is very obnoxious^if it be not as well watchful* t ? s ropncta " 
ly as skilfully made. ) And though for my part.I have (carcc 
us'd this Elixir but as a Cordial? yet I know fome very ex- 
pert Phyfitians,that have given it with great fucceflein di- 
vers difficult cafes^nd particularly a Friend of the younger 
Helmonls gives it fofuccesfully^that partly his Patient s^nd 
partly others that have try 'd it, have fometimes taken of 
him, at a great rate, whole Pounds in a Year or too? and 
yet I know by his own confeffion, that, befides the skill he 
imploiesin making it dexteroufly>be adds nothing but one 
Ingredient 5 to which I eonfefs, I am not apt to afcribe anyj^/*^ 
confiderablepart of the efficacj of the Medicine? which with M 
when made, he fometimes perfumes by cohobations with «M**r- 
Musk 3 and Amber. 

And ryropfclits % that you may not wonder, that I, who 
think much ofHclmonts Theory fcarce intelligible, 8c take 
great exceptions at many things in his writings, (hould yet 
now and then commend Medicines upon his Authority , I 

A a muft 



Digitized by Google 



at fi94) 
a cm***' muft here confefs to you once for all,that (always excepting 
Bclmom's k ,s extravagant piece , De msgntfica vulnerum curatime^) 
Atedicintf. 1 have not feen caufe to difregard many things*he delivers, 
as matters of fact, provided they be rightly under flood sha- 
ving not found him forward to praife Remedies without 
caufe.,though be feem to do it fometimes without meafure, 
and having more then once 3 either known,or e>en had con* 
fderable effects of Medicines he commends , which one of 
the happielt Practitioners 1 have met with,and one not la- 
vim in extolling Ghymicall Remedies has folemnly aflur'd 
me, he has generally, though not alwaies,found more then 
ordinarily effectual. And upon occadon of this odde prepa- 
ration of the Elixir Troprietatis^l (hall adde that, Since Ex- 
perience (hews u*,by what is dayly done inChymical Labo- 
ratories, that upon the operation of the fire upon feverall 
Concretes^fubftances of Nature oftentimes very differing 
both from the body that afforded them 9 and from one ano- 
ther, may be obtained as the Oyles, and fixt Salts even of 
cold Plants or Hot: Since alio, by the mixture of active 
Bodies new Concrete s,endow'd with new qua!itics,may be 
produced? as we fee that Succharum Saturni emergeth from 
the conjunction of Lead, with the Acid Salt,diftill'd Vine- 
gar* Si fince to the famt Concrete, according to the differ- 
ing manncrs 3 aftcr which 'tis h"andlcd,may acquire differing 
< equalities, as is clear in the various Medicines , afforded us 
* ' by Quickfilver,& by Antimony 9 according as each of them 
is'order 'd 5 I cannot but think , that if Chymiftry did no 
more then affift us,by the refolution of bodies, to extricate 
their more active parts, and partly by fuch refolution s, 
and partly by affociating bodies together, to alter the 
former texture of Natures Productions , or prefent us 
with new Concretes of new Textures £ by this very 

means, 



Digitized by Google 



Ci9$) 

me^ns, if men want not Curiofity, andlnduffry to vary > fl »- 
and profecute experiraents,theremuftneceffarily arife fucn ? '^f^ 
a ftore of new and a&ive Medicines, t ha r in all probability, 
many of them will be found endow'd with fuch Vcrtues,as 
have not been, at leaft in that degree,met with in the ufual 
Medicines, whet her fan pie or compound , to be bought in 
Apothecaryes (hogs? and confequently, even without any 
notable, difcovery,or improvement ofPrinciplcs,Chymifts, 
("even as matters now ftand with them) may considerably 
adde to the Pharmaceutical part df Phyfick. But if the O- 
perations of Chymiftry were (erioufly enquir'd into, and 
throughly underftood,I make little doubt,but by a skilfull 
application ofthem,and efpecially by a fcricsoi them,in a 
rationall and orderly way, fucceeding one another , there 
may be found out a great many preparations of Remedies, 
both very differing from the common ones , and far more 
noble than they. And to make this fecm probable, I need 
but repeat fome of the examples formerly mention 'd; To 
which I (hall adde now , that experience has inform d me 
there is a w ay, whereby firmer confiftcntfubft a nces,b el ong- 
ing to the bodies of Animals , may without the addition of 
any extraneous matter , and without any* violence of hear, 
be reduced almoft totally into liquor,and if /much mifrc- 
member not,thefe Liquors without any violence of hear, 
afford their Spirituous & Saline parts,in a very gentle hear, 
and that before their Flegme. And I muft peculiarly incul- 
cate this,That if we had but a few potent Menfhuums, to 
diffolve and unlock bodies with,! (carce know what might 
not be done in Chymiftry. But when I fpeak of noble Men-^^^ 
ftruums, I mean not fuch as work like the generality ofCor- er of MJfa 
rofives,and the like Acid or Saline Liquors, which work but JJjjJJJJ, 
upon few kinds of bodies,and foon coagulate,or exantlate C ^/>T ' 

A a 2 themfch 



Digitized by Google 



felvcs by working,Sc thereby become unfit for future ope- 
rations^ but I mean fuch as either are feparable with all 
their efficacy from the dillolv'd Body, as isfaid ofthe^/A.^- 
hefi^ox fuch Saline or other piercing Liquors, as not being 
prccifely either Acid 5 Urinous, or Alcalizate can dHTolve a 
great variety of Concteres.without haveing their Vertue,! 
lay not impair'djbut deftroyed thercbyiJk unlock Minerall 
bodies,far more then vulgar Menftruums, (as for;nfhmce 
by volatilizing them,or elfc making them irreducible 9 or 
working the like grano v changes in them:) and if it be not 
quite feperated from the diflblv'd Body,is yet fo friendly to 
Humane Nature,asto be free from either fretting,or other 
fuch dangerous and offenfive Qualities>& rather to be of it 
•felf a powerful! Medicine. I mould therefore exhort both 
You,8c fuch other ingenious perfons 5 as with the advance.* 
ment qf Chymiftry, & Phyfick, ( I might poffibly addc Na- 
tural Philofophy too) to apply their Chymicall attempts 3 
cheifly to the finding out of Noble Menfrruums , for by be 
ing pofTcflbr but of one of theGe, a man may be able to doe 
a great number of things^that othcrwife are nor to be pcr- 
formed. As one of our ordinary Goidfmiths , by the know- 
ledghe hath of Aquafortis^m make many uferul Experi- 
ments,about Silver and Gold, that before that Menftruum 
was found out,all ofhis Profeflion in th©world 3 were never 
able in many ages to com pa ft. Nor do I much wonder at 
that advife, which Htlmont gives thofc that aim at the Im- 
SSii*. provement of Phyfick,in thefe words: guod fi ad iftnd ignis 
Bum. :5. arcanHmnonptrtitigdtisQizvrte fpeakingof a prodigious,not 
* to fay incredible Liquor) dijcite [a\te % Jalcm Tartari reddere 
volatile j*t hujus medio veftros folutiones pirficiatk. gui etfl 
fua [oluta^anatice homogenea defer at ^dige flu s in rob it : tlloru 
tdtuen aliquot vires mntnatus eft 9 quos intra defert. pturwontm 

vjcrbomm 



Digitized by Google 



097) 

moth o rum domitrices .For concerning this Sale 3 he not only ^ ca* 
elfcwhere faies: Dicamfalte pr# ingenuity quodsptritus Salts ^,^1* 
Tartar i,ft unicornu 9 argentum s hydrargyrum 9 lapides cancroru , fincm- 
vel al j quod eftmplicibus diffolverit^nedum febrim 9 fed& pin- 
ret affatim morbos fanet, &>c. But in another place he gives 
us,together with fome account of its way of working , this 
great and comprehenfive commendation of it. Mtrumfan^ HtXm 6c 
laies httfuantumfal 1artari,velunicum 9 vo\atilefa8um 5 non fchoUr. 
prtftiterit: Nam omnem I vents amurcam detergit & obftrn- 
tntium contumaciam 9 dtffergitque <apoflematum Jufcept* con- JJ£l7m£ 
ciliabula. Dehocfalis (& nonoki)\phttu^ verum eft illudm<r°*9- 
Paracelfi^^ quocunque non dt tiger it vix alms potent tor per- 
veniet. Thefe paffages I (hould not think worth tranferib- 
ing and laying together , but 1 find that befides the concur. 
TentTeftimonies of Helmont>Paracelfur 9 and Baft Hut in praife jtepwn 
of this Salt » the generality of the moreinquifitive Chy- */Sai Tar. 
mifo 9 without excepting the more fober and judicious,do 3 1^ 1 / 0 '** 
by the various and painful) 3 though fruitleflc, attcmpsthey 
have made toVolatilize Salt of Tartar,confpire in acknow- 
ledging^ a thing highly worth labouring for •> nor doe I 
for my part fee (whatever fome fay to the contrary, and 
however I have indeed found ic more difficult,then perhaps 
a Novice inChimiftry would think^it (hould be impofiibIe 3 of the pof t - 
for 1 have mere then once with cafe enough, made Gold it Y*' 
(elf volatile, though it be confefled to be the fixed body in 4 " vni ' ' 
the World 3 and consequently more fixt then Salt of Tartar, 
which in an open velTel, may be in time made to flic away 
by a vehement fire 5 And I have likewife by an unufuall 
Method 4 that I have elfcwhere deliverV^noore then once ob 
tauTd from a mixture of crude Tartar , and two or three 
Mineral bodies good (tore of true Volatile Salt 3 which I 
could fee no juft caufe not to think afforded by theTartar. 
PkV' But 



• 

Digitized by Google 



0*3 J) 

But I muft confefs this may be rather a volatile Salt of Tar- 
tarean Salt (that is AlcaliJ of Tartar made volatile , and 
t here fore the principal thing I mention it fur Js to (hew you 
that Tartar it fclf,by an unufuall way of management, may 
be brought to afford an unufuall kind of Salt. But this I 
can tell You 3 that an ingenious acquaintance of inine,whom 
notwithftanding my wounted dimrufts of ChymiftsJ durft 
credit, affirm 'd to me, that he had himfelf feen a true and 
real Sal Tarteri Volatile made of Alcali of Tartar,and had 
feen (trange things done with it, infomuch that he believ'd 
moft of the things' , that Belmont delivers of it. For my 
part lam inclined to think that Salt of Tartar may be made 
volatile, (whether in the form of a fublimateor a Liquor) 
by more ways then one,though not all of them neer equal- 
ly good:8c whereas one of the beft (if not the very beft ) of 
the wayes of volatilizing it,feems to do it principally with 
Spirit of Wine, and the great difficulty of that way confifts 
in bringingthis Spirit to aflbciatc with the Salt: I ha ve feen 
Salt of Tartar of my own,brought to that pafle which great 
Virtuofi have long in vain attempted to bring it unto^namc* 
Jy,to flow readily upon a red hot Iron,& alfoto take fire, 
8c burn with a confpicuous flame 5 befides that when it had 
been dry 'd by a fmart fire>to drive away any parts that did 
not firmly adhere toit,it would yet readily difiblve in high 
rccViry'd Spirit of Wine, which you know Salt of Tartar 
will not otherwife doc* not to mention the change of its 
Alcalizate tafte,and other leffer altera tions,but what lean 
further fay of this matter , I muft not declare in this place, 
Aud Pro.That You may not be as many other Virtuofi, 
difcourng'd from labouring for noble Menftruums, by the 
confident perfwafion of many, who believe AngelusSaU & 
Cunthcrux Bi/Jjcbm (whom I deny not to have been Learn- 
ed 



\ 

Digitized by Googl 



( 199 ) 

ed Men, do not take to have been great Matters ofGhy- 
micall Atcan<i*jti\ to determine with auihority,what can,8c 
what cannot be done by Chymiftry, leaft I fay You mould 
be, by fuch mens inconfidcratc feveritie , brought to de- 
{pair of ever feeing any noble Menftruum,that is not (harp m^^mhr 
tothetafte,nor of any of the three peculiar kinds of Saline ^flrwwi 
Liquor. (Acid as/^AM/<7r/i'Urinous,as the Spirits of Blood, 
Urine,and other Animal fubftances, nor Alcalizate, as Oyl vmonsw 
of Tartar Per dihquium) I (hall aflure you, that to my own 
knowledge there is in the world a kind of Menftruum, 
that confifts of a pure Chry ftalline fubftance , that is made 
by the fire, andastruely Saline as Salt of Tartar it felf, 
which ftrang Salt, though well purified , and readily dilb- 
luble, as well in dephlcgmed Spirits of Wine, as common 
Water,and though it be totally volatile (whence you may 
gueffe of how Saline a nature it is) and alfo be either way 
reducible to a noble Menfrruum, does really taft fweet h I 
mean not in theChymicall fenfe, by want of fowernefs fas 
when they fay that the Calces of corroded and precipitated 
things are dulcify 'd by frequent ablutions) but by a poii- 
tive?weetnefs.And whereas the vulgar Saline Menftruums, fc^ffifcr 
(which alone fcem to have been known to Sala StBillycbins) «m *aJde. 
are fo fpecificated,if I may fo exprefs it, that what an Acid £j 
Menltruuni dtffolves, an AIcalizate,or an Urinous will pre- wb*tl* a- 
cipitate^v rofrverfcAnd whichlocver you choofe of thefe c ''¥2J ftr<M 
three forts of Menftruums,one of the other two willdifarm *™v!in"l 
and deftroy it. I have found by trial , not only that a Red or Aictit. 
T ir.crure of Glafs of Antimony, being drawn with a Men- f t ' b 
ftruum that was but a degree to this Liquor, I could not ' * ! 
precipitate it like our common Tindtures,either with Spirit 
of Urine,or an Alcalizate Solution. But that (which is farre of t Men- 
more confidei able) though it would readily mix with Acid «J* 

Spirits thtfe. 




Digitized by Google 



( 300 ) 

Spirits,as Oyl of Vitriol, with Volatile and UrinousSpirits, 
as Spirits of Urin it felf, and withAlcalizatcSolutions^ yet 
would neither of thefc three make any Ebullition at all 
with it, or feem to work at all upon it. But of fuch Mat- 
ters no more at prefent.] 



CHAP.. IX. 



Y: 



i will perhaps expca 5 r;r^i/^ } that, Treating of the 
advantages that may accrew to the Therapeutical part 
ot Phyfick , from a more accurate knowledge of Natural 
to? t5' P ^ lofo P h y' 1 h™ 1 * < eli you with the Chymift, that Chv- 
(nwh mm miftry " fc, S a °d much more Phyfiologi in its full extent, 
fW*flM not only capable of improving the Pharmaceutical Part 
"t'Tngl 0T Preparations for Remedies*(for,that we confefled al'rea- 
»<» *nd dy) but alfo of affording us a new & much better Mcthodus 
ifrrfu^ skill of ufine the helps that Nature or Art hath 

dcudi, provided againft Difeales. And indeed the Phyfitians Art 
is fo difficult , and a man muft know fo many things to be, 
though not tolerably, yet perfectly skill 'd in it, that it may 
without difparagement to Phyfitians,be thought yet capa- 
ble of being improved,lfnot of being reformed. Hippocra* 
tes begins his Aphorifmes with a complaint, that Life is 
lhort,Dut Art long. And Prfr*^(/iw himfelf 3 though he fey 
after his boafting manner , Arscft lomga, vita brerois % ubi 
ant em donum finish he (peaks) eft, H4 an eft brevis, vita 
verum l&tga fi arti conferatmr : Yet expounding the fame 
words a little above, he faith, Itaqnc Hippocrates merito de 
co cenqucritur : nam & ajjeclts ipjins idem accidtt : Ars malt- 
ed con ft flit in rhilifophia^Aflronomia , Alchymia & Vbyfica, 
merito igitur diet poteft Artem ejjt Ungam. Mult urn enim 
rtquiritwr tern p oris, ad quatuov has Column as Medicine dif> 

cendas 



Digitized by Google 



f ecu das & perfcrutandas. Ctlfus 9 who hatb been ffiled Hip" 
pocrates Ldtinorum doth more then once call Phyfick a Con>~ ^ ^ tf 
je&ural Art y as particularly in that place where he faith, 
£/? enim h<tc ars conjeUuralk 5 neque refpondet ei plerumque 
tionfnlum conjeQura fed etiam exper sent 7*. And well might 
thefc great men acknowledg their Art to be difficult, fince 
the twolnftruments fas Galen calls them) of finding Arts, ll |£ r * ftli# 
being Judgment and Experience* Hippocrates gives this 1 ^ 
Character of them h i «N -r«e*c?*\tf>a, »,<N x^f™ And 
that Experience may be uncertain without the Theory of 
Phyfick, he that fo much build's upon Experiments, Vara- 
celfitf, himfelf fcems to confef* , where expounding the 
words of Wppocrates^kc faith, Hoc modo fe babuit Medicina, 
in Vrincipio^ ut nuUam ibeoriam habuerit , fed folum Expert" 
entiam boclaxare^boc conflipare^quomodo autem & enrjdig- 
worattifuit :ideo unus falvatus e^alterperditus^nunc autejke. 
And concerning the Critical part of Phyfick (to allude to 
Hippocrates his expreffion) Galen who exercifed his reafon 
fo much about it,tells us, that Per rationem judicium baud hcom* 
quaquamfdcrle exiftit, f *d y fi quid aliud, max imam babet di- memar. 
fficultatem. And to affirm the difficulty of finding t^bett^ 0 ^ 2 ' 
way of imploying reafon to the cure of Oifeafes, not only* 
by the Authority of Gale# 9 but hit Arguments s Let me in- 
form you, that after having told us how difficult a thing, 
and how rarely to be found is that rcafon,which confiders, 
and determines what on every occafion is to be done, Ne- 
que enim ( addeshe) p Veritas ejfet inventufacilis 9 tet actanti 
viri in ea qu£renda occupati, in tarn contrarias je&asfuijfent 
unquitn difpertiti. And Paracelfus, whatever he often else- 
where boaftingly affirmeth ofbimfelf, yet handfomcly e- 
nough both exprefleth 8c confefleth the difficulty of being 
a good Phyfitian,in one of his Prefaces to the Students of 

B b Phyfick 



Digitized by Google 



C 202) 



f"'" 1 *' Phy(5ck a where3shefaics, Non Titular, nontloqucntia^non 
fcce'to ^JAu&i&faititJKC'tmdtmum Librorum hclio (Crfihtc non 
Bvtbtons, parum exornant)in Medn 0 confidtranda, fed fumma return a c 
or chhurtu ji/jfer iorum cognitio, qua vna facile aliorum omnium vices 



judxcemin fuam fententiam trahtre. Medici autem effc&u- 
um genera, caufas ac cvuvnuAi* novijfe, & ih infuperfaga*- 
citate ac indttftria Tharmaca applicare, Mtque pro cujufltbet in- 
gtnio ac ration* vel cunUk mederi ; But though, ?yrophylus % 
after the acknowledgments made by fuch great men of the 
almoft infuperable difficulty of their Art , you would per- 
haps think it no great prefumption,if a man fhould attempt 
to innovate in any part of it, & confequently even in the 
Methodus medtndii Yet, PyrophilufJ am much too young , 
too unlearned, and too unexperienced, to dare to be dog- 
matical in a matter of fo great moment. Aqd the Phyfltians 
•re a fort of men. to whofe learned writings on almoft ail 
fubje&s,the Commonwealth of Learning is fo much be- 
holden,that I would not willingly dilTcnt fromthem,about 
thofe notions in their own proftfilon, wherein they feem 
generally to agree} AjxI do very much difaprove the inde* 
icreet pra&ife of our common Chymifts 8c Hclmontians, 
that bitterly and indiscriminately rail at rheMethodiftsin- 
ftead of candidly acquiefcing in thofe manifeftTruths 3 their 
Obfervations haveenricht us with,and civilly 5 & modcftly 
fhewing them their Errors where they have been iniffo!«en. 
And ycr, Pirephilur, Since divers of the eminent? ft Metho- 
tlifbthemfelves have more then once ingenioufly acknow- 
ledged to me^and feriouflv deplored with me 5 in the coin- 
plcatnefs of their Art/which per hips made ("that Learned 
Prince) the late King tell them, that they were at btfl but 
good gueflcrs>nd lirce about divers particular cifeafeswe 




have 



Digitized by Google 



have obferved , the Method of fome of the mod reputed 
Do&ors of England (which yet,l think,is at this day as well 
ftorcd with Learned Men of that profeffion , as any part of 
Europe) not only differing , but repugnant to each others 
I fuppofe we may without difrefpeft to their profeffion^dif* 
fent from themoft of them about thofe cafes,about which 
they arc reduced to difagree fo much among themfclves. 
And it would be worth an impartiall difquifition , whether, 
fincc the Methodur mtdendi ought to be Grounded on , and 
accomodated ro,th^Do&rine of Difeafes , the new Ana- 
tomical difcoveries formerly mentioned ,and others not yet 
publifh'd do not by innovating divers things in fatbalig* % 
require fome alterations Sc amendments in ihcMethodus 
medtndi > But in this particular, I dare yet affirme nothing, u$mt§ u 
and therefore (hall proceed to obferve to you, that the un- prove tb« 
ufual efficacies of naw remedies, may probably make the 
method of curing more compendious, becaufe (as I lately 
alfo intimated) one Medicine may be (o richly qualified 3 as itet 
to anfwer fcveral intentions, which in the common way 5 J£ £EJf 
require diverfity of Helps and r\emedies.Thus,for inftance of curing 
in the Cure of the Kings- Evil, by the received method,the TSSu 
Phyfitian muftpropoieto hi infclf fcveral fcopes (Tuitcd to imikeKkg* 
feveral indications) 8c profecute them fucceffi vely with di- 
ftinft & appropriated Remedies* But I have* (as I formerly 
alfo told you to another purpofc*) known a fingle Speci- 
fique Simple Namely ( YdronycbU foiio Rutaceo ) given 
xmlyinfmallBeer, in not very manydaies, without any 
fenfible Evacuation, waft the peccant humour, appeafe 
the pains (which before were very great) and difcune the 
unbroken Tumours, and heal the broken ones. Thus, ac- • 
cording to the known Method, the great Remedy in Plu- 
rifiesis copious Blood letting , which is ftri&ly prefcribed 
even to aged pcrfons and teeming Women,by the famoufr 

eft 



f 

eft of our praftitionefs^BcJcoDfcrs^notirrationally^bcre 
n unfa, t ^ e pj, y (j t j an j s fomifbt but with vulgar Remedies: and yet 

by ComeHetmofttiatf Medicines, we have known PluriGcs 
cured even in young men , wirhout Phlebotomy , and our 
feIves 3 fome while hnce made a fuccesful trial of that Na- 
ture in a young Gentleman not unknown to you. which 1 
mention not,with Hdmont^o reje&or fo much as to difpa- ■ 
rage Vbltbotomj in this defeafeCfor fo it be moderate 8c lea* 
fonable, Experience (hews it frequently proves ufeful; nor 
as if we had obferv'd all Hdmonts boafted Remedies 
f though for the mod part good ones; to be conftantly 
fuccesfulH but to give you an inftance of the truth, of what 
T was faying before.That new 8c more generous Remedies 
in the Ai+ may (b far alter the received Mtthodus Mcdcndi % zs to make 
h& divers of its prefcriptions unneceftary.Of this truth, Tyro- 
philus, another inftance might be afforded by the Rickets^ 
a new 8c abftruce difeafe,at leaft as is fuppofed , 8c fome- 
time f© ftubborn,thar one of thefamoufeft Phyiicians in 
Europe .(whom 1 think I need not name) hath not been able 
of late to cure it in feveral of his own Children. And yet I 
fuppofe you may have heard that Excellent Perfon your 
Mother, feveral times mention her havjng perfoxmed di- 
vers cures (fome of them impjoble enough) of this Difeafe, 
barely by that flight preparation ofcolchothar,hte\y taught 
you,and prefented Her by us i And by which (we having 
made 8c diftributcd at Her defire,a confiderable quantity 
of it) feveral other Perfonshave freed Childien from . that, 
disfiguring Sicknefs: Of which,but few Moneths f?nce,your 
little Coulin D.being fick almoft paft hope,was a while fincc 
* brought out of danger^by Gods blefling uoon fome of the 
fame Remedy, wherewith we prefented her Mother, toge- 
ther with our perfwafions to try it in her own Child, as fhe 

had 



Digitized by Google 



had fuccesfully done on the children of divers others.And 
yet this Renieaie Cto adde that upon the By , in favour of 
fbraething to be (aid anon) works almofr infenfibly , fave 
that in many bodies it is,efpecially at firft, Diaphoretique. 
And this property of that Remedie minds me to adde,that 
it would not be amifs for Phyfitians^to confider whether or 
no lhowever,Bleeding, Purging, Vomiting, Iflues, Glitters, 
. Scarifications. and thofe other painful wayes of Evacuation, 
be not ( however Chimifh are too bitterly & undefervedl/ 
wont to reject them) to be altogether condemned and laid 
afide, yet) there may not in fome particular difeafes & bo- 
dies be found more gentle,& yet effe&ual waies of difchar- 
ging Nature of chat which offends her, then tho(e painfull 
and debilitating ones, which we hive mention'd (without 
theufe ofoneofthe chief of wh:ch,namely Phlebotomy^vrc 
fee that almofr. all kind of difeafes are cured in Children. ) 
The contributing to render the waies of Cure lefs painfull 
& wcakning, would gratifie fo great a part of thofe who may 
need Phyf?ck,that I hope you will ealily pardon my fpertd- 
ing fome pages to that purpofa I confider then,that often* 
times the peccant matter , though very ofFenfive by its 
qualities,is # much letter then is fuppofed, in quantity, and 
might,if we were but Matters of Specifique Remedies ^ ei- 
ther be breithed out by infenfible tranfpiration, or carried 
off by Sweat orlirine, without tormenting,or weakning the 
Patient 4 by thofe other copious Evacuations of grofler 
matter, which are alwaies troublefome & painful enough, 
though not alwaies eflential.Nay that even in Chirurgery 
it Ielf,if thofe that pra&ife it were as knowing as Nature 
has been bountiful,there would not be fo often a neceflity 
as Vis commonly fuppofed there is of mutilating or tor- 
menting the Patient to recover him,You cannot doubt,un« 

left 



Digitized by Google 



lefs You will deny what Gulielmus fifo affirmes , upon his 
own obfervation, of the Cures done by the illiterate Indian 
Kmperic kj.Thc paffage You have feen already i But to it 
he adds fo notable and ingenious an acknowledgmcnt,that 
f cannot but honour him for ir,and be willing to make way 
. for the Credibility of a good part of what we are hereafter 
to deliver, in this difcourfe, by premifing it. Jmmo ("con* 
tinueshe.)ejc venen atorum fmngorum alioruwque toxicorum 
efih fih p*!tt wfuji recentis radiiis Jaborandi in inftanli a /i* 
iho vindicatos^ me aliifque GaUtii Nepotibus baud part/Mpu- 
dvre fuffufis, potf tot alexiphjrmacorun* & tkeriacalium Aw 
tidolalium irritos conatnr. It a nt poftea ejujtnodi coDegas bar- 
baros fubinde mibi adjungi pajfus fm t mon adco qui don no- 
Siratiumvaktudtnem adtaQum arteriarum woderari quam 
di&is ntodk confilii copiam prtbere folitof Thus farre he : 
Which premird 5 let us proceed to confider,more particu- 
larly , lome of the lefs painfull waies of freeing men from 
Dikafes. 



*->rd Applict- 

tcnJ - . T^Hat great Cures may be done by bare outward Appli- 
BcroSli cations, You willfcarce deny, if you disbelieve not the 



7hi\ gregt 

r*,esma,be CHAP X. 

d oe ly out* . 
yrxd Afflict- 
i mir. 
Y 

Y* . 

uo^cUinusRelauons which are made us,by Learned men,conceming 
i'>ncftu*Bur- t \ ]C Efficacy of the Lapis Nepbr/ti(ttf i only, bound upon the 
YZVni I Pulfe»ofthe Wrift's (chiefly that of the left Hand; againft 
»p9* ibeirorrn that ftubom and anomalous Difeafe the Stone : And that 
cxpttituee, be- gj vcs rne rnorc credit to thefe Relations is, That not 
rj ibAt com- only the Judicious Anjumnt Totttus etc boot teems to prize 
v,ni in gene- jt 3 butthe FamoxisAfonardcs profcfTeth himfelf not to write 
*t* lipid;* by Hear fay of the great Vertues of this ludtan Stone, but 
(Kmm.t/ f .*., to ha\c made tryal of it Himfelf upon perfons of very high 

Quality : 



Digitized by Google 



Quality: And that which is related by * Mcnardes is much * 
lefsftraflg^henthofe aJmofl incredible things which are %" iTi " 
with many circumftances delivered of that Stone, by xht intm^ 
Learned Chymift * Vntzerus.Atid although it muft be ac-;''""'- 20 *" 
knowledged, That fome Stones,that go under the name, *^ 
have been ineffectually applied in Nephritic^ Difrempers 5 «.24.wh«ri 
Yet the accurate Job*»*er dt Laet Himfelf, furnifheth us Jf hath 
with an Anfwcr to that Objection, informing us that many Sj&ZZ 
ofthoteNephrituiStones (which differ much in OoJour 
though the beft are wont to be grecniOi) although not at£?*i£ 
allCounterfeited,orSophifticatcd,are of little or no Vcrtue. ffSto. 
But that yet there are fome others of them which can farce ff f ,be f 
be diftinguifhed from the former,but by tryal upon Nepbri- pTsNcp kit 
tick perfons,which are of wonderful Efficacy , as he Him- ticus ***** 
felf hath more then once tryed in his own Wife. Garcias appen " 
ab Orta (Lib. i.Cap. 53.) mentions a Stone, found in Bala- D* Gcm.-fc 
gat, call'd Alaqueca * of which he tells us, That though it be ]£ pi J bQi! 
cheap, Hujus tamen virtus (to ufe his own words J re//- ' '" C n 
quarum Gemm^rum facultatcs exuperat^quippe qui fan gutter** 
undiquaque fluent cm iUicofiftat. Monardes ( cap. 35^) re- 
lates the great Venues of a Stone agajnft Hyfrericall Suffb* 
cations* and concludes. Cum uteri Suffocationcm immintn- 
tern prsfentinnl , adhibit 0 lapidt fubi to levant ur , & ft cum . 
perpetuo geftant ( Hyftcrici ) nunquam ftmili morbo corripi* 
untur % exempla hujnfmodifaciunt ut his rebus [idem adhibe- 
4m, The fame Author in the next Chapter, treating of 
th^ Lapis Savgttinark&x Blood Stone, found in new Spam, 
("having told us, that the lndiats do moft confidently be- 
lieve, that if the flefb of any Bleeding part be touched with 
this Ston e,the Bleeding u ill thereby be (ranched) adds this 
mcn.orable Obfcrvaticn of his own, Vidimus nonr.ullos ha: 
menhoidnm fluUu .'ffixos re medium fenfi ft , amnios ex hoc 

lap/cie 



Digilized by Google 




(ao8J 



flrMum jinx urn fifii. And of the formerly mentioned Lapis 
Vorcinus, the Experienced Bontius fhaving mentioned how 
the Indians give the Wine wherein it hath been fteepcd,a* 
gainft the Difeafe called Cholera 5 which has much, and as 
juftly feared 3 by the Iflandcrs of Java , as the Plague is in 
Holland) adds this memorable paflage, Vregnantibm tamtn 
hie lapis non bene datura nam sbortu prowcare adeo certn eft 9 . 
ut fx mine Malaice mi hi retulerint ut ft qttando Menftrua eo- 
rum purgatio non bene procedat^Jifaltem hunc lapidem manu 
gejlent juvamenfftm fe inde Jenttre. And the relations, 
Pjropbrlus, that I may in another place prcfent You with, 
concening the wounderful Stoncformerly mentioned , with 
which your Grandfather performed fuch eminent Cures, 
(particularly of the Stone in the Lord of Falkland , then 
Deputy of Ireland, and others, towhofc Backs it was ap- • 
plyed; will , I fuppofe , make you the more readily give 
credit to the relations of the Authors we have newly men- 
Helm, dc tion'd. What Manardes mentions of the Vertue of the L*- ■ 
febr. c> pj S Sangninark^ to C\ixe Hemorrhoidal Fluxes , puts me in 
jnind of a yet much ftrangcr thing,wh ich Belmont affirmes, 
namely, That he could make a Mettal,of which , if a Ring 
# were worn^ne pain of the Hemorrhoids would betaken a- 
" way,in the little time reguifite to recite the Lords Prayer S 
and within twenty four hours the Hemorrhoids themfclves, 
as well internal as external,how protuberant focver, would 
vani{h,and the reftagnant Blood would (as he fpeaks^ be 




that 



Digitized by Google 



(209) 

that hefpeaks upon his own experience;That he had aRing 
mad? of a Metalline fubftance * by him called Ele&rum, 
(which,by his defer. prion, feetm to be a mixture of all the 
Metrals joyn d together under certainConftclIations^which 
was of far greater vertue then this of Helmonth For, hoc loco ^ 
( fates he) nonpofjummn indtcjre adtnirandas quajdamvi- A a r r t J£f O » 0 
res virtutefqut eUUri noftri , anas fieri his noflrk oculk vide- Migic./ifc 
mu* 9 adedque cum bona verttatjs conjetentia profcrre ttttflarfc 
que pojfuntus. Vidimus enim hit u< generis tnnulot, quot qui 
induit y hunc^ nec fpsjmm convulfit 9 nec Taralyps corripuit % 
nec dolor ullus torjit^ ft ml iter nc apophxis, nrfcptlepfia im~ 
vafit. Et fi annufus hujufmodi Fp Itpttci dtgito annular i , e- 
tiam in paroxjfmo ftv/Jfimo ,inc*rtus fuit, remittent e illicp 
paroxjfmo ager a lapfu tllico refurrexu. &c. But to take*°^*. ; 
notice of fome other outward Remedies. To our prelent t4f . I5 . 



Theme belongs that noble Cure , performed by the fa- 
mous and experienced fahritius ah Aquapendenle, who 
tells us,That he Cured a man of a Scirrhut Lien* , and a 
Dropfv, by the long ufe of Sponges, moiftned with com- 
mon Lime Water, and then cxprefled and worn upon the ^Vchmhos 
Spleen^ notwithstanding the Mufclesof the Abdomen^ and Lfcmsijf the 
all the other parts that lye betwixt theapplyed Spong ittdfy^ g* 8 * 
the part affc&ed. Andro this we may adde, the ft range gttMftvt 
Cures mention 'd by Kmhttus h and confirmed to me,by a ****** 
Learned eye- witnefs, to be frequently performed of vcty 
dangerous Difeafes , in that Cave, nere Rem? , where the 
Patient being expofed ftark naked , and tyed Hand and 
Foot, upon Beds of Straw, and being by the Sulphurous va- cLa reform* 
pour of the place, and fomtimes their own fear , caft into «J um R$me 
a fweat,are lick'd well by a great number of peculiar k m d,^cr£^ 8 * 
of Serpents that inhabit that Grotta. Moreover , We oijj " ' 

tentimcsfee Agues Cured by Amulets and Applications 

C c to 



Digitized by Google 



( 2IO) 

to the Wrifts. And I my felf was, about two Years fincc, 
ftrangely Cured of a violent $luotidian,vihkh all the won- 
ted Method of Phyfick had not fo much as abated , by ap- 
plying to my Wrifts a mixture of two handfuls of Bay Salt, 
two handfuls of the frefheft Englifh Hops,and a quarter of - 
aPound of blew Currans,very diligently beaten into a brit- 
tle Mafs, without the addition of any thing moift , and fo 
fpread upon Linncn Cloath & tyed about the Wrifts, And 
with the fame Remedies ( which yet we have obferved 
fometimcs to fail) have divers others been cured , both of 
guBtidian and Tertian Agues: Nay an Eminent Phyfitian 
gave me, lately, thanks for the great ErTe&s he had found 
of it, even in continual Fcavoim. 
cf the ope- And here, Tjrofhilus , I (hall not fcrupleto acquaint 
m )T 9 * You, with my having fomctimes wilhed ,.that Phyfitians 
3^ frfi had been a little more curious to make Obfervatious and 
4M>ftwrTryals of the diftinft Operations of various Eodiesout- 
nfan!ff ta WSLt ^y a PP , >' c ^' F° r 1 confidcr that , in fome of them, 
jUfrJ } tbe ^ ubtlc Corpufcics, (which feem to mfinuatc themfclves 
into the Pores of the Body, and into the Mafs of Blood , 
with littleor no alteration) hare much the like Operations 
with the Body whence they axhalr, taken in at the Mouth. 
As we fee in fome Preparations of Sulphur, which have like 
Vcrtues,inwardly given,and outwardly applycd5and more 
manifeftJy in Canthtridts , which 1 have found , by exter- 
nal application, to work ftrangly upon the Bladder, as that 
they excoriated it when taken into the bed* •> & yet more 
manifeftly in gui$\*filvtr , which by inunction may be 
made as well toSalivate,asif it wcrefwallow'd down. And 
en eminent Phyfitian lately complain'dto me, That warn- 
irjga Childs fcabby head with a Dcccc"Hon of Tcbacco , to 
kill *nd dry up the Scabs, the Eoy wa* made thcitby both 

fick 

* 



Digitized by Google 



Can) 

fick and drunk: And Learned Men aflure us,That,by fome 
Catbarticks outwardly applyed, thofemaybe purg'd that 
will not fwallow Phyfick. But other Medicines there are, 
which 5 before they get into the Mafs of Blood, are much al- 
ter'dj cither in (training through the Flefti and Membranes 
of the Body, or in the Digcftions they pafs through in the 
Stomack,and elfwhere: And thefe may have very differing 
Effects, inwardly given, and outwardly apply'd } as, in the 
formerly mention'd inftanceof Hops . Currans and Salt* 
neither any of the Ingredients inwardly given, nor the mix- 
ture hath been (that I know of ) noted for any Febrifugal 
Vermes. So likewife Turpentine and Soot that inwardly r jl£™ e jJ* 
taken are good for quite other Difeaies, (as Plurilies , and d wnes 
Obfhu&ions of the Kidneys ) outwardly applyed are the yM** 
main Ingredients of Pericdrpmmr t extoll'd againft Agues, tg^lf!^ 
And Millefolium or Tarrorv , befides the Vertues , it hath wudiy th* 
inwardly againft Difeafes of quite other Natures , being en g " d 9Hl ' 
worn in a little Bag upon the rip of the Sromack , was flsJJJSt '** 
Himfelf confefs'd to me) the Secret , againft Agues , of a 
great Lord, who was very curious of Receipts and would 
fometimes purchafe them at very high rates 5 And a very 
famous Phyfirian,of my acquaintance. did fince inform me, 
Thit he had 11 fed it with ftrange fuccefs. I know alfb a ve- 
ry happy PhyfirianjWho allures me,That he hath very often 
cured, both in himfelf and others , the Chilblains when 
they come to be broken , by barely ftrowingon the fore 
parts the fine powder of Quinces thinly flie'd and dryed. 
And who knows what unexpected Operations divers o her 
Bodies may ha ve,when outwardly applyed M various Tri- 
als of that Nature were skilfully madei efpeciallyjmcc we 
fee that (for reafons el fe where rc be confidered)' fome Bo- 
dies feem to have quite contrary Operations, when out- 

C c 2 t wardly 



Digitized by 



(212) 

wardlyapplyed and inwardly taken. For we fee that Spi» 
lit of Wine does, in fcveral cafes, allay the inflammation of 
the external parts, which given inwardly , would quickly 
inflame the body. And our often commended fi/^fpeaking 
of a choice Remedy for thofe diftempers of the Eyes a that 
ufed to trouble Men in £r<*///,addes , Idem qnoque prtjiut 
mantpubtra, ex radice Aidndihoca^ quf licet pots venettofa hu- 
beamr (as we formerly noted out of his and other Tcftimxr 
nies^ oculis tamem prodcftf)ifutnq\ emtndat. And if the Sim- 
7btt yrp„+, pk«, tobe ©utwardly applycd,be skilfully prepar'd, That 

SSrnTlf Tm ma ^ ,nuc ^ varv ^ improve their operations. As we fee that 
pu*wbi<b 4 c Vitriol, which is made of Copper,or Iron corroded by, and 
••twtratj 4^ Coagulated with Acid 5a Its, hath outwardly diversVertues 
*' ,e * which crudeCopper has not 3 cither outwardly or inwardly. 

And Gold diflblved in Aqm Regis, and precipitated with 
J*ft**<e*i* Oyle of Tartar^ is inwardty,as far as I can difcover, gently 

r!utoLojG*u^ ur ^ tlvc ^ vct tnc ^ amc A * r * m ftdminans being ;cafcin'd 
with twice ore hrice it's weight of Flowers of Brimffone, 
till the tloret be burnt away ,is known to be much com- 
mended by Ghy mitts, and others,for a riaphoretick. But 
though, as to any outward Vertues of the fame Powder, 
Fhyfirians and Chymifts are wont to be filcnt , yet pro- 
bably it may have very great ones, as well as quite differing 
An ointment f rom thofeit has,being taken at the Month. For I know a 
»^o/Au» pcrfon.that being grievoufly tormented with exulcerated 
niashnbe w ' morroidct a very expert Chymilr of my acquaintance, 
ffdmwbHJej not knowing what el fe to do, applied to the part afft&ed, 
andVent,fit an Oyntment confining * nly of Awum \u\mlhans prepa- 
red and fixed by a flight and familiar way ( which you may 
command )& made up with a little Oyl of fweet Almond?, 
into a rcquifite conusance 5 and though prefenrly upon the 
application of the Remedy, the pain for a quarter of an 

Houre 



Houre hugely incrca fed, yet foon after it abated, and the 
Hemorroidcs the next day were clofed, and the day after 
went away h Nor has the Patient ever fince f that is, for 
fome Years) been troubled wih any thing of Relaps. And 
the fame Phyfitian aflures mc, that with the like Remedy 
he has found a frrang tried in Venereal Ulcers. And per- 
haps to this may be referred what has been found by fome 
friends of tnroe,that Phlegm of Vitriol, & Saccamm Saturni % 
which not only inwardly given are faid much to cool the 
Blood, but outwardly applyed are good for Burns & hat 
Humoursjdoc yet potently difcuflccoldTumours. But lead: 
you (hould fay,that this diverfity may proceed (at leaft in 
part) from iheCorpufcles of differing Natures.that may be * 
imagined in theforementioned Medicines* I fhall return to 
what I was-difcourfing of before , and take notice of the 
Efficacy of fome other external Remedyes. 

QSince the beginning of this E S S A Y, I few a lufty and rbt Cm •/* 
very fprighiAil Boy, Child to a Famous Chymical writer, 
who, as his Father aflur'd roe and others,being by fome E- 
nemies of this Phyfitians, when he was yet an Infant-, fo be* Mmt%u 
wircht that he conftantly lay in a m tfcrable torment,& Rill 
refuting the Ereaft, wa* redue'd by pain & want of food to 
a defperate condition,the expc rieuc*d Relater of the Story, 
remembring that ttdmont attibuted to the Elt&mm Mine* 
rale immaturum Tardcelji the Vertue of relieving thofe 
whofe diftc ropers come from Wi'chcrafr, did according to 
Hdmonu prescription, hane a piece of this Noble. Mineral 
ab^ut the Infants Neck , fothat ir might touch the tip o£ 
theStomack, whereupon prtfcntly the Child, that could 
not reft in I know not how many Daies and Nights before, 
fell for a while a fleep, and waking well,cry 'd for the Teat, 
which he greedily fuck'd,from thenceforth haftily recover- 

ring 



> 



Digitized by Google 



("4 J 

ring, to the great wonder, both of his Parents, and feveral 
others that were aftoniuYd at Co great and quick a change. 
And though I am not forward to impute all thofe Difeafes 
to Witchcraft, which even Learned Men Father upon it* 
yet its confiderable in our prefent cafe , that whatfoever 
werethecaufcofthe Difeafe^the Diftemper was very great 
and almoft hopelefs, 8c the cure fuddenly perform 'd by an 
outward application, andrhat of a Minejal } in which com- 
pacted fott of Bodies, the finer parts are thought to be 
more lock'd up.] 

Among the proofs of the efficacy of apprehended Re- 
mcdies, we muft not pretermit the memorable Examples, 



Tt!'t"£tb that are deliver 'd by the Judicious Boetius dt Bwf 5 concern- 
Afurf, Sng.the Vcrtues of that fort of Jafptr , which is blood-red 
throughout the whole body ofthe Stone, not being min- 
Lapid. gled with any Colour: tcfiari v Taics he) m^qui alias U- 
J G e c ™J- pidibus &gemmk t ant as virer pantos vnlgus folet % non tribuo, 
' P crtdibilt vix.de Jajpid* viribus, obfetvajje it fin cum amiUa 
fiuxu men fir uor u it a labor ajfetptr aliquot dies s ut nnUo mo do 
ffii p*Jfet 9 Jajpidcm rubram flnpilitang & rudem femori alii" 
gari jup.Aliur(iH e a dent Domo)cuvt in TeJe vulneratus ejfet, 
nec Janguints fluxus cohtberi ptjfet , admoto laprde 9 extemph 
jmpeditus fuit^ licet vulnus non tegeretur. To thefe he ad- 
joyncs a much more memorable Example , of a Maid he 
cur'd at Prague, who had been for fix years fick of an He- 
morrhagy fo vehement , that there fcarcc ever pafs'd a 
Weck,ia which (he did not feveral times Bleed, neither 
could (lie be reliet'd by any Remedie$,t hough (he had long 
us'dthem,till (he was quite tired with t hems wherefore our 
Author fetting them all afide,lent her a jf a/per, of whofe Ver- 
tue in fuch cafes he had made good tml,to hang about her 
Neck, which when (he did, the Flux of blood prefent ly 

ccas'd. 



Digitized by Google 



(315.) 

ceas 'd, 8c ftie afterwards for curiofity fake, oftentimes lay- 
ing afide the Stone,and as often as (he needed it, applying 
it again , obferv'd, that whereas the flux of Blood did not 
prefently return upon the abfenceof the Jafper , but after 
divers Weeks, yet upon the hanging it on again it would 
prefently be ftopt,fo that (he could not afcribe the relief to 
any thing but the Stone,by which ourAuthour tells us, that 
at length the was quite cur d : And fpeakingof the praifes 
given by others to Green J*fp*r fpeckled with red , he 
concludes^ Sed tge, quod multeities expert m fum , rt 'fero. 
But amongft the Operations of outwardly 'appended 
Medicines , I havefcarce met with a ftranger then that 
which the Expericnc'd hlenricus de Beer ^ mentions in In ob'ar. 
the fourteenth of thofe Obfervations which he truly Giles !!£ d,c ;°P r * 
Rare t namely , That a Woman , who had by an unskilful p*i> 1 9 4. 
MibVwife the Bladder Lacerated, and thereby been fub je& '/VJ 0 ^ 
to a perpetual Incontinentia Vrina , and had been reduced "w^evred* 
conftantly to wear a Silver Pipe, was perfectly help'd , by fyib> pw* 
w caring, as a Gypfie had Mughr her,a little Bag hung about J^/Lrnr 
her Neck, containing the powder made of a live Toad, */iv<4n<i 
burnt in a new Pot: V\ hich relation I the rather mention, ?JJ*5"| 
not only becaufethe Author having rry'd the Remedy up- 1 fn "** 
a Merchant, to whom an unskilful Lythotomift had left 
the like Defcafe, found it prefently to fuccecdj But becaufe 
having been very defirous to have further trial made of fo 
odd a Remedy, by a curious Phyfitian , he lately gave me 
this Account of it, that though in one or two it had fail'd 
yet having given ibme of the Powder to an exquifite Per- 
fon,known to us both, he affiir'd him it had fucceeded in 
two or three. (And the Difeafe is too unfrcquent, to give 
occafion to have the Remedy often tried) And the Phyfi- 
tian addt,that one of thofe Patients tels him, (the Phyfiti- 
an) That though her infirmity were occafion'd by a Laccrd* 

tio 



Digitized by Google 



Eftfli*fcrib-thVeJic£ 9 yet the Remedy helps her as long a? (hewearsit 
about her > in ca ^ c * c rent w thePowder, when ihcVertuc of 
penppenb. it be gins to decay : bat that (which is remarkable to our 
prcfent purpofej if (he leaves it off a while,(he finds the Di«. 
fcafe return- The fame Htttricut *b H*er , among his frefhlj 
comended obfcrvattons,has anothet of a little Lady, whom 
he concludes to have been caft into the ftrang and terrible 
Diftempe^wh'Chhe there particularly Records by Witch- 
craft. Upon fo fevere an examination of the Symptoms 
made by himfelf,in his own Houfe^hatifjnotwitnftanding 
his folcmn Profcflions of vtracicy ,he mifrclatc them not, 
] cannct but wonder he (houid confidently impute fo pro- 
digious a difeafc tofome fupernatural caufe. But though 
tht-Ob{frvation,with its various circumftanccs^be vety wel 
worth your perufing* yet that,£ »r which I here take notice 
of it 3 is,what he adds about the end or it .concerning his ha- 
ving cured her,afterhehadin defpair of her Recovery fent 
her back to her Parents,by an outward Medicine, namely, 
a nOint mcnt which he found extoll'd agjinft pains prod uc d 
by Witchcrafr,tn a Dutch Book of Carrtrbtty*: : where alfo 
I remember I met with it , fct down a Imle differing from 
what he delivers) Of which wonderful OintmenMhe Ingie- 
dient that he found (bextrea^nly difficult to procure,name* 
ly, the Mifleltoc of Hazel, being in Bmgl **d not fo rare,bue 
that J have more then once got it , and found, as he inti- 
mates, very green, and (what hetnenttons not) ext reamly 
bitter, 1 could wi(n , that thofe that have the opportunity 
would maketryal. For b t fides what Carrhbter delivers & 
our Author relates of it, a Learned Phyf«tian d d highly 
commend it to thejudicious Crtgorim Horp*s. And though, 
if we allow it to cure bewitchdPaticnts,the vermethat may 
be in external Remedies , will be made fo much the more 

COn- 



Digitized by Googlei 



confpicuous h yet fuppofing the difeafesto be, though 
ft range , yet but .na tu ral, we cannot but allow that the. re HtJmnt . 
may be a wonder/ul efficacy in an outward remed \yfinCe it reic^JtIa% 
was able, only by anointing the Joints , and thofe pained h*ru$<T. 
parts with it» to cure a radicated Difeafe , attended with 
luch wonderful & horrid Symptoms. And after this it may 
feem but little , what elfe would appear a ftrange thing , 
which Hdntont affirms of a Plaifter he had, wherewith he^ 1 "^'* , 
tels us , That he fafcly curd hundreds of guMans , even wrj. turn? 
Autumnal , without relaps : elfewherehe faith, That he 
m ade his Plaifter , for by the Circu mftances I prefume he 
means no other, of * few reColvimg and abjlcrfive tbings^nd 
adds 5 That it never faiFd him , but only that in fat Per- 17. 
fons it fucceeded more flowly. And yet in thefc, and the 
like ways of curing difeafes , though approv'd, if not alfo 
commended,by eminent Phyfitians both Ancient and Mo- 
dern, there is no fcnfible evacuation made of peccant Hu* 
mors, which perhaps materially remain in the Body , and 
may , by the Effluvia of thefc Remedies , be deprived of 
their formerQualities,8c made fo far obfequious to nature, 
that (he is able , if need be, to eafc her fcJfc of them by 
Sweat, Urine, or undifcerncd tranfpiration. 
And that the peccant humors remaining for awhile mate- . 
rially in the Body,the difeafe may fometimes be removed, 
may appear by the Cures which we fee now 8c then perfor- 
med of Agues by fuddain frights} by which no difcernablc 
evacuations is made of humors,tnough probably fome co- 
fiderable chang be thereby produced in the temper of the 
mafsofBlood,or in the Texture of the Morbifick Matter: 
( as Phyfitians call it) As feems probable both from divers 
other things mention'd here and there in this Eflay,8c par- 
ticularly from the lately recited Paffage of Hdmont^ where 

dd he 



Digitized by Googl 



he takes notice of the redttfy ing of the peccant,and,by Na- 
tiMa cured ture,rejc&ed Blpod,without any fenfibl^ evacuation,upon 
hfri > t jj C W caring of His Ring. I knew a Gentleman , a ftrong 
and a refolute Man,who had been long a Souldicr, and at- 
tained the higheft fort of Military imploy mentis notwith* 
Handing which,he was ftrangely fearful ofRats,and could 
not endure the fight of them .-This Geotleman,having been 
long troubled with anobftinate gMarUn,fk travelled with 
it into feveral Countries , without being able to rind any 
Cure for incoming at length accidentally and fuddenly in- 
to a place where a great Rat was in a corner, whence he 
could not flie,from theGentleman,he furioufly leap'd upon 
him fyet without biting him ) and thereby put him into a 

Tolf' Ce *l ^ r, 8 nt * ^ nicri free< i nim the Ague that had long im- 
' 'portuned him. And the experienced Silmutb tell us a plea- 
fant obfervation, of one who was cured even of the Gout 
by a fright. For this man having his Feet 8c Hands covered 
with a Pouhisjitiadeof Turneps,Flower and Milk,and be* 
ing left in his Chair in a low Room, was whil'ft his Servants 
were all gone into the Garden , aflaulted by a Sow , who 
finding the door open,& invited by the fmell of the Cata- 
p!afm,came to devoure it$ and ftriving to do fo, flung the 
. fick Man and the Chair to the Ground, and put him into 
fuch afrighr, that our Author tels us, That very Day his 
Paine* decreaftd, and continued Itfleningby degrees, till 
atlengh they wholly left him, without ever returning to 
trouble him ngain.There are divers InDancetthat dilcover 
what great charges may be produced in the Body.wuhout 
taking in any thing vifibly at the Mouth. And on ihe o«her 
fide a good Air alone doth often, in Confumptions & o- • 
therr'ifeafes, perform what hath in vain been cxptftedfrom 
the ufe of emptying Phy fick. It were to be willed that we 

had, 



Digitized by Google 



had/ among our European Phyfitians, the Phyfick Books jJ^JJj* 
of thofc of China? for though our Dodors are much more * n § ^Hdawm 
Learned Men than theirs,yet probably their Writings and gjw *"* 
their Pradife may teach us fomething (hat is new,& fome- 5Jii«i o7/r. 
thing making for our prcfent purpofe. For the famous Je- /««.Hifto.y 
ixxxte-Semedo informs us, That the Books of our Phyfitians \^ n \^ t ' 
having not yet been brought to China, they are inftruded 
in their Art by abundance of their own Writers? and that C B] 
though in their pradife they do not let BIood(as the Lear- 
ned/ anniut telsus,That neither do the Japonian Dodors) 
or fet Cupping glafies, though they ufe no Syrrups 5 nor * 
Potions, nor any Iffues, but are Herbarifts, ufing nothing ZtZ'fc- 
but Herbs, Roots, Fruits, Seeds, &c. yet Phyfick ( tO UlC crem hibent 
our Authors Words ) kin a very good condition in China. JJjJtj 
( as Almeida alfo tels us , That the Phyfitians are much i£ 
efteemed in Japan ) And ofthe skill of fomeof the Chi- vw>*™jy 
nefes in that Art , he gives us in the fame Chapter fome 
confiderable Inftances. And though, as we faid it is very ttylfc nam 
likely that their Dodors are much inferior, in point of RjfiJ 1 
Learning to ours,yet it is confiderable,that in fo vaft,fo ci* [ n.b. 1 s\n* 
viliz'd,and fo populous a Country , Phyfick can be pradi- *" in<m 
fed with reputation, without the ufe of thofe Evacuations, 5ZJ£ 2£ 
which are here fo frequently made in Phlebotomy, Potions Jfeafc 
and Iffues. Nor (hould wconly cxped fome improvement % m ^£ 
to theT/&(?rrfpf*//c/i/partofPhyfick,from the writings of fo Almeida 
ingenious People as the Chimfes\ bat probably the know- " w t 
ledge of Phyfitians might be not inconfiderably increafed, vmtSSfr ; 
if Men were a little more curious to take notice ofthe Ob- Dcfcripr.' 
fervations & Experiments,fuggefted partly by the pradife qJ^JJ 
of Mid wives, .Barbars, old Women.Empricksjand the reft 
of that illiterate crue,that prefumc to meddle with Phyfick 
among our fclvesj & partly by the Indians & other barba- 

dd2 ro us 



Digitized by Google 



rous Nations, without excepting the People of fuch part of 
Where Ph. E *™/> e " ^ c ^» where the generality of Men is fo illiterate 8c 
tanners If poor, as to live without Phy fitians. For where Phyfickw 
^M^tf-pra&ifcd by Perfons that never ftudied the Art of it in 
SHcfftkf* Schools or Books,many things are wont to be ra(hly done, 
my be befl which though perhaps prejudicial , or even fatal tothofe 
maviib. on w j, om tjjcy are trycd,may afford very good Hints to a 
Learned and Judicious Obfcrver : Befides, where the Pra- 
ftition ers of Phyfick are altogether illiterate , there often- 
times Specificks may be beft met with. For fuch Perfons, 
being wont, for want of skil in Phyfick, & particularly the 
Art of mixing Simples, and in that of varying their Reme- 
dies according to Circumftances , • do almoft wholly rely 
upon Specificksjwhofe Virtues,from their prac"Hfe,may be 
fometimes better gathered, than from that of skilful rhylT- 
tiansjift regard that thofeempricks(berjde$^hat they aflift 
not with any skil in the Methodus mtdtmdi the TCitues of 
theirr\cmedies)are wont,for"thiReafons newly mention d> 
to try obftinately, and to the uttermoft,the cfTedrs of their 
few fpecificks. And the natureof their Medicines may be 
the better known , in regard they are not wont to blend 
them 3 as Learned Men but too often do,with many other 
ingredicnts,whofemixture,as we formerly notcd,either al- 
ters their nature,or makes it difficult to determines Galen 
himfelfe in a like cafe confeffeth, Na ut vcru fatetmur k£c 
6<£ 'm Apbtr. defRcilis quoq\ res eft & rara invent* cum foft mult a remedia 
mar*"** * grot ant i quod ex Us in caufafwjje dicitur ut melius 

7hevief»u pejufue whet her the effect beafcribed to whath gi- 

KnwieTe vcn *° r fyectficky or to fome other of the Ingredients, 
*/"L Hedi' or to the whole Compound as fuch.- The experienced 
tines #/B«r. tiusjn his excellent little Trad De Aitdicina lndorum>doth 
tim! S * more oncc confefs, That k is very undefervedly that 

the 



Digitized by Google 



(an) 

the Europeans look upon the Eaft Indians 2s Barbarians. 
And even of thofe among them 5 that are ignorant of other 
things,he hath this P aflage,H;>ftf etia fi t quod homines c£teris 
rebus idiot* ta exaOa htrbarum & ftirpium nancifcantur fci- 
tntiam ut Js vel DoSijfimus Tardus 9 noftri aroi Botanicorum * 
frinceps % e mortuis rejurgens hue veniret % miraretur ft ab hifce 
homtnibus barb arts doteri pojje. And Lincbojten in his Voy- 
ages, fpeaking of that Famous Mart of the Eajl indies, the Vo W h »P i » 
City of Goa, where the Vice- roy and the Arch-BiQioprcfi- 34 * 
ded,8c hehimfclfe lived:Thcfeheatheni(b Phyfitiansffaith 
he 3 mentioning thofe of Coo) do not only cure their own 
Nation and Country- men, but even the Portngals alfoj for 
even the Vice-roy himfelfc , the Arch*Bi(bop, and all the 
monks 8t fryers,do put more truft in them than in their own 
Country- men, whereby they get great (lore of Money,and 
are much honored 8c efteemed. I have not now the leifure 
to acquaint you with what I might alledge^toconfirme this 
truth out of the pradifes of the illiterate Natives offome 
not yet fufficiently civiliz'd parts of Ireland* and the Inha- 
bitants of fome other places where Phyfitians have not yet 
fctlcd : But I {hall mind you of the Confeflion of Celfus 9 
where fpeaking of Phy fick 9 H^ nufquam (faith he ) non eft: 
Jsquide etui imperitijpma gentes herbas aliaqh prompt a far 4*. ^ eflcC l1b * 
xilium vulnemm morborumqs noverunt. And I wifli that o- 
therLcarned men would imitate the commendable exam- 
ple not only of Profper Alp'wutjNho writ a Treatife De Me- 
dicinh lEgyptionm } and of Jacobus Bontius , in his Medici* 
nalndorum, but of Culielmus Pifo , who hath lately pre- 
fented the World with the rude way of curing,ufed by the 
Braftliatts themfelves 3 in his new aod curious Books De Me- 
dicina Brajslienf, in the beginning of the fecond of which , 
he much confirms what we have been delivering , in the 

enfuing 



Digitized by Google 



nr»deM f dic:™£ Paffage * g&emddmodum mult* in Urn crajfa TSdrbarh 
B «fi Lib.a. cruda vel corrupt a arteqs Wppocrdticb ind/gna reperiuntht^fic 
C*P« *• etia m non pauca utilijfima antiquitatem redolent i a : qus vel 
iruditifpmos medicos ad urn as medicine fubj iciunt \obj\rv an- 
da occurrunt.guippe cum mult arum Artium rudiment a vel ab 
ipfit AnimantibusbrMtis ( quibus bittigna mater Natura arte 
in jit a inprimis curandis morbis deftitui noluit ) ad nos re dun* 
dare fat endii fits guis dnbitet ab his mortaltbusjiicetremeujfi- 
mis a dogmatica & rational/ medendi *rte> nor fur in a nobi- 
liffima at fecreta remedia atqs antidota^medendi morbos vettr 
ribus incognitos quotidii ad pofteros dtrivaritauibus paulatim 
ad manu traditis & tandem qu tji in fuceum & fanguine a ra- 
tionalibus converts do&orum fchoU & Itbri fuperbium? And 
to this agrees very well that grave faying of our expe- 
. ri ene'd Harvey to the very Learned Do&or Ent : Nmlld gens 
%%.f"% n : Um B *rbara eft qu£ non autfortuito, aut incvitabtli qua dam 
Exeni't mi. necejptate coa&a^aliquid in ufum communem adinvenerit quod 
ftt deGen: Vationes A \ ias hnmaniores latuit. Nor fhould we difdain the 
Remedies of fuch illiterate People, only becaufe of their 
being unacquainted with our Theory of Phyfick . For 
though f will not fay, as the old Empricks wittily enough 
did in that PalTage of CelfujyRcquirere etiam^ ratio idem do* 
c cat quod expericntia^an aliudt Si idem fttpervar Hum rjfe 9 fi 
aliud*etiam contrariu. Bat leaft we {hould,by *oo great re- 
liance on the Galenical, or other ancient Opinions negieft 
ufeful Remedies 3 becaufe prefent by Perfons that ignore 
them, & perhaps too, hold Opinions contrary to them, I 
lhal leave you to confider what is in thePerfon of the fame 
cmperical feci, reprefen ted by CV//*/ 5 where having fpoken 
ofthedarknefs of the oaufes of Things, & the uncertainty 
of the Theorems of phy lick. Acm htl iftas cogitationestfauh 
he ) 9 *4 Medecinam pertinere> co quoqs difci 9 quod qui diver fa 

de 



( 323) 



if 



de his fenferint ad eandem tamen fanititem fornixes perduxe- 
tint* id enimfecijfe 9 quia non ab obfcuris caufs neq\a natura- ne '* ub ' 
libut aQiombus 9 qua apud eos diver] s erant^ fed ab Expert- 
mentis «f rout iuiq 9 refpondeant 9 medendi vias traxerint 9 ne in- 
ter mitjaquidcm ab jjiis qutftiomibus dedu&am ejfe median a 
Jed ab Experiment is 9 &c,For though this Sentence a fcribes 
too little to reafon , yet there is ibmething in it that de- 
ferves to be confidered : Efpecially fmce we obferve not A €m ^> m 
that the late Anatomical Difcoveries of the motion of the F,n> 
Chyle and Limphatik Liquor,by formerly unknown ways, p>+Kp«i •[ 
in newly dete&cd Veflels,hath yet made Men cure Difca- P t ^umU 
fes much better than before.Not that I think that Anoto- 
mical and pathological Difcoveries will not , in procefs of 
time(when the Hifioria fa8i (hall be fully and indifputably 
made out, and the Theories thereby fuggefted, clearly e- 
ftablim 'd) highly conduce to the improvement of the ihe- 
raptutical part of phyfick h but yet this Obfervation may 
make it the more reatonable to beware of relying Co much 
upon the yet difputable opinions.of phyfitians,as to defpife 
all pra&iies,though ufually fiiccefsful, that agree not with 
thcm:For of fuch our Author fpeaks well, in omnibus ejuf- 
modi cogitationibut in utramq\partem d/ffcri pojfe 9 it/iq ; inge- 
wu & facundiim vincere: morhos ante non eloquent ii fed re-* 
ntediif curari^qua fi quis eltnguis ufu di fir eta benlnontjhunc 
aliquanto msjore medicum futurum quTi fi^finc ufujingua fuH 
ixcolucrit. And Paraceljut fpoke well too* if he fpoke tru- 
ly ,when in one of his prefaces, (peaking to thofe whom he 
invited to hear him expound his Books of phyfick 8c Crry- 
rurgery at Bafiljllos tamcrf faith he of his formerly men- 
tioned Books ) non aliorum more ex Hypocrate aut Galeno 9 
aut quibujltbet emendicatus 9 fed quos fumma rerum dotlrin* y 
expericntia atq^labore affequuiusfum 9 proindc ft quid probatu- 

rui 



Digitized by Google 



(324) 

rut experiment a , ac ratio, anQorum loco mibi fuffragantur> 
. It wouldyPyropbylus^l fear,be tedious to trouble you here 
with all that I have met with in good Authon applica- 
ble to my prefent fubjed 5 & the Defign I hare been profe* 
curing in favour of external remedies; But yet one Paffage 
there is, which doth fo notably confirm what we have de- 
livered as well touching the Efficacy of fimple Medicines , 
as the great cures that may,in divers cafes , be perform *d 
by outward Applications, that 1 muft not here omit the 
mentioning of it, as I find the Epiftle written out of Pern 
totheinquifitiveAif»Wtr/ 5 in thefe words : Innrbe Pofto, 
nbi aliquot annh vixi , omnis generis morbos Indus qui dam 
tana de of. curabat Jolo cujujdam Plants fucco artubns & parti affeQ* 
aiSSSi '#**- deindiftragulis egregie Ugtbat ad/udorem pro- 

qmexftgt. i*vocand*m: Sudor e partibus illitis emanans^mem$j anguis e- 

ctmentit ex bat 9 donec fatss fudafie putaret^ opttmts mterea ctbis eos alens. 
occidental! Eo Rcmedio multi morbi deplorati curabanttir , imo tgrijuni- 
tadk *kt*. mf & robu ft iorcs a b e j HSJt f H fieri videbanturjed neq-pretio, 

neqyrecibusjtefrminis unquam efficerepotnimHspt earn plan- 

tarn nobis de/nonftraret, 

CHAP. XL 

of other ex> TfcUt^PjwpJ&y*/, befides fuch external Medicines as work 
trtofdinarj -Dafter the manner of thofc I have heretofore mention 'd, 
Med ] ti w 0 t k wc ma ^ P°^'y without abfurdity , provided we do it 
tjmgw- without credulity , enquire 9 Whether there may yet be a 
tsfme, runf- f 0 rt of others that operate 9 in a more wonderful & txtra- 
K4nf 4 iiofl, or dinary way? And it would not perhaps be altogether 
unworthy the Experiment, to try whether or no, there 
may not fometimes be performed^ fuch cures as are wont 

to 



Digitized by Google 



(«5) 

to pafs,cither for Fabulous or MagicaHfome of thpm being 
to be done without exhibiting, or implying any thing im- 
mediately to the Patient, 8c others by fome fuch unknown; 
wayes as thofe which Chymifts call , either Magnetifm, or 
Tranfplantation: fuch as are the cures reported to be per- 
fcrm'd by the weapon-falve 5 & Sympathetic!* powder, and 
fuch as is that cure of the Yellow Jaundice (mention d with 
fome varification byPartce (/*/)wherein feven or nine cakes 
(for it mu(t,forfooth,be an odd number) are made up with 
the newly emitted and warm Urine of the Patient, and the 
Afhes of A(hwood,8c buried for fome daies in Dunghfl.For 
it is not only by the ca fie & fuperftitious vulgar , that the 
poffibiliy of performing fuch cures, by .tranfplantation, or 
fome other Magnetical way (as they pleas'd to call it jhath 
been bclcived. For within the compafie of my own (lender 
reading, I find that divers Eminent Phyfitians , have both 
made ufeof,and commended Magnetical Remedies. . * 

What is to be thought of the Sy mpathetick Powder > 
I confefle I am as yet in doubt,but however I (hal take this . 
occafion to inform you, That a very honed Gentleman, 
whom his Pen has made known to a great part of the Lear- the cmt •/«* 
ned Men, and VirtqoG in Europe, complaining often to me, JjJSjJ" '** 
that though he were much troubled with,that fad difeafe, Sfmpa&'X 
the Stone in the Bladder, yet he was more inceflantly tor.* P*»>*frr. 
mented with an Ulcer he had in the fame part (all the fear • 
ching Medicines that hetook to diflblve, as he hop'd , the 
Stone, exafperating the Ulcer 0 I one day adris'd him to 
make trial of the Powder of Sympathy,upon fome of the 
Ulcerous Matter he voided with his Urine 5 the Remedy 
being fuch, as if it had a Magnetick Virtue, might do him 
good, and if it had none, could not prejudice him$ a while 
after, I recciv'd both from him in a Letter, and from his 

E e PhyGtian 



Digitized by Google 



Phyfitian very great thanks for the advice* the Patient hav- 
ing lince the ufc of the Powder, been eas'd of the diftintt 
pain he was put toby the Ulcers, and this relief laftcd , if 
1 mifremcmbcr not, above a Year , and how much longer 
I know not. But 1 (hall not infift either upon ibis,or upon 
the Teftimonies, and Relations of Paracelfus, Hetwont 9 Co* 
dtmuSyBurgtavim^aQX even the modern Roman doctor Ser* 
w«s,norany of the other Authors,that do profefledly take 
upon them the defence of the Weapon- Salve,by reafen of 
what we havcelfcwhere to write to you,by way of Exami- 
nation of that Salve,& the Sympathetick Powder, though 
T deny not in fome Trials,! have found them available} Yet 
tot efeit, •/beGdcswhat 1 have newly related, I have feen fometimes 
V egp T s fl v ' fomethiflg follow upon the ufe of Sympathetick Powder, 
ttnuM Kc- that did incline me to think,that fometimes it might work 
Cures. But I {hall alledge fomething of more unexpected 
•tredit, and firft Dominions Panirolo now pofeffor of Phifick 
at Rome in his newly divulged F<ifciculns Arc&norum pre- 
fents us two inftances to our prefent purpofe, in thefe 
VTaJ.x words. Mira(bmhc)i*otidie reperiuntm in Medicinaad 
* 1 confirmation* operis tpodDoaiffimns fhyficus , Petrus Ser* 

vjhs (the fame we lately mentioned ) eomplevit de unguent o 
armario/ciendttm ejly quod peti a f anguine imbuta jub cintri* 
bus cajtd* pofita menfes fifiit experiment o pluries comprobato : 
quin eti& AUgifter meus Petrus CafteBusiwhofe name his late 
Anotomv of the Civet Cat, and other Writings have made 
etmur^.Obf. Famous) atebat fe expertum juiffe Hemorrhoides ,Jt tangan- 
M 34* tut tuberofa radice Chondritis ficc&ri^fi Chondrillafucetur $ 
corrumpi vero jl corrumpatur: qudpropter Cub Camino exficcan- 
da ponitur, pofi hujujmodi taVum chondrilla tuberofa. The 
Learned Salmuth'm his Obfervations furniflies us whit an 
Exampleof a inoft violent pain of the Armc , xenioved by 

Tranf- 



Digitized by Google 



Tranfplanration:They did beat up Red Corals with Oaken 
leaves^ having kept them on the part affeftcd,till fuppu* 
tation^they did in the Morning put this mixture into an 
Hole bored with an Auger in the Root of an Oak , refpe- 
cVmg the Eaft , and ftopt up this Hole with a Peg, made of 
the fame Tree, from thencefore the pain did altogether 
ceafc , 8c when they took out the Amulet, immcdiatly the 
torments returned {harper then before. A great and excel- 
lent Lady (a near Kinfman, ryrophilus^ yours & mine) 8c 
very far from credulous,confe(Td to me 3 as did her fervants 
alfo, that with the above mcntion'd Remedieof Aftes 
and Urine,(he was not only once cured of theYellow Taun- 
dice,by a friend of hers that had obfervcd,that (he had been 
f ruitltfly vexed by a Tedious courfe of Phyfick, prefcribed 
by the famoufeft Doctor then in England \ but that after • 
wards,relap(ing into that fame difeafe,fbc had cur 'd her felf 
by the fame Remedy. I remember, that being (ome year9 
fince brought almort to the brink of the Grave by a fudden 
effufion of Blood within my Body, from which, without a 
fignal mercy of God , I (hould not have recovered* among 
other men skilled in f hyfick that came to affift me, in that 
danger, I was vifited by a Galenift of much repute, whofe 
pale looks inviting me to enquire what it was that ailed 
him, he anfwered me , That he had not long before been 
defperatcly fick of an obftinatc Marafmns, which not wit h- 
(landing all the Remedies he could ufe , did daily fo con - 
fume him,that he appeared but a Skeleton , whereupon 
having found the unefifecrualnefs of ordinary R emedies, 8c 
being hopelefs of being releived by them.he refol ved to try 
a Sympathetick Medicine , which T remember my felf to 
have met with in HartmanMe took then an Egge,and hav> 
ing boiled it hard in his own warm Urine, he with a Bod- 

E c 2 km 



Digitized by Google 



kin perforated the (hell in many places, and then buried it 
in an Ant- hill, where it was left to be devoured by the t«- 
mt<> and as they wafted the Egge, he found his diftemper 
tolcffen, andhisftrength toencreafe, infomuch that he 
now conceived his Difeafe to have quite left him. 

The Experienc'd Rivtrius in his Lift Obfervations fnew- 
fhntation»f ]y publiihed fincc his death) has two notable Examples to 
KtvefCeiit 4 our prcfent purpofe. For firft, he tells us , that the eldeft 
ot>l<rv.6 3 '. Daughter of a great Officer in France , was fo tormented 
with a Paronychia for four daies togcther,that the pain made 
her pafs the night flecplefs} whereupon having by Riverins 
his order,put her Finger into a Cats Ea re, within two hours 
(he was delivered from her pain ,and her whole ha nd, which 
before wasTumid,unfweird again^except the finger, which 
it felf was out of Pain.The other cafe was of a Cou n fellors 
AfmJCmtA* v\ife,who by the fame Remedy was cured of a Panaritium 
Ob/™. i 9 . ^ w j jic j 1 fad f or f our ^aies vex'd her) in a much fliorter time 

then the other, namely within a quarter of an Hour. But 
that which chiefly makes thefe ftories pertinent to our pre- 
fent occafion> is this notable Circumftance, that in both 
the cafes,the Cat was fo manifeftly put to pain that Riveri- 
w thought it bad attracted to it felf the morbifick matter 
fro which it freed the PatiennFor in the former of thefe in 
two cafes,the Cat loudly complain 'd of the pain he felt, 8c 
the other, was 5 in that (hort rime the cure was performing, 
put to fo much pain in his Eare, that two men were hard 
lyable to hold him faft, he ftrupgl cl fo forcibly. And thefe 
too relations oftliwrms, may, though there be fome dif- 
i. Mfcrfe Parity in the cafes, give fome countenance to what might 
I efavL otherv ifebe diftrufted in the Obfervations of the Induftn- 
MdmMu ous petrus Borcl/uf 9 where he faies , Podagra mtri levator, 
fZ%°' ficanUinmtodairicorecnmbtHh morbum enim contnhunt 



adeo ut vix inctdttt que Ant \ JE^er verb leva men fufcipit. * ****jun 
Which perhaps he may have been induced to write by the ^IT essay 
ftory that goes of, that odd Chy mift, Robert ¥lndd\ having was written. l 
transplanted the Gout of one of his Patients, by a making % 
him often flcep with a Dog that was fond of him, who the indubious 
thereby became afterwards fubject to fuch periodical fits Ba I fholiBU * 
of the Qout, as the Mafter had been troubled with. 

f_ And fince T begug this Chapter, and met with tfcdftjj^jgg 
Ob jedions,difcojiriing of this matter with a judicious per- pi*cct t mnc 
fon, well sktlt'd in Phyfick,and whom his learned Writings i f in "\ t j 
have made Eminent, He told me,that he had not very ma* [/nJ'no/oil 
ny Months fincc,fcen a CurcbyTranfplantation,pcrform'd 
on the Son of one that was wont to make Chymicall Vef- f^fhffe 
feh for me : and becaufe the Obfervation is confiderable, Examples it* 
that there might be no miftake in it,he has plea fed to fet it l ^f 0 b / he ^ 9 
me down in writing (attefted with his annexed name) fa Zblbi* 
which enables me to prefent it you in his own words: N.N. «*■ » a "t 
of TV. fot Ur, had a Son , who was long fick of the Kings \t? gl 7^ 
Evil, which fwell'd much,and broke into (ores at lafr,which '» the ufl 
he could by no ordinary means heal. The old Man had j{/££ 0 ^ 
then a Dog, which tookanufeof licking the foares, which iiv<ri H \mi 
the Dog continued fo long, till he wafted the very kernels J* iw * " 
of Ulcers that were knit in with the veins , and perfectly u'^wjES* 
cur'd the fore, but had the fwelling tranfplanted to him- be<io " in 
felf,fo that he had thereupon a great fwelling s that arofc %^£l 
and continued on his Throat.The Lad was thereby freed, much corfirms 
fo continued to be till 1660, & for ought I know,is fo this nhit wt f avt 
day. This I faw being there ar that time to vciw the TJi^udd. 
Clayes,and befpeak Retorts of the old man *1 ^ n ** m 

J ncx if in hit 

C B' i XV r (is I n 

Carello MiVfio A?i ncflri miterni, qoem 'ram alir in adihoi foil Avunculus mf us fufptciendus 
At. Jttobm Hn. k;** r hf' P- F * Acadcm'fcnoftrafcnior^iridcnriui ha* paruirrrahrndi tacul- 
ras. Colico dolore rorquebamr Avunculus , Canis vencri impofuus quum incaloiflet, urgebac 
exituna, wniu t nhementer 8c Tormina colica Avtinculi reoufcrunr.AncUlacjufdcm in dolcrc 
dn tium d ndero canem genii ipporuic, fenfirque lc*amen, fed canis uoloruro imparicntia hoc 
indc curfitire 8c Uturc, Idem expertus eft fcr iba in Colli Tumore. And 



Digitized by Google 



(230) 

And to confirm the credibility * as well as increafc the 
number,of our magnetical waies of cures I (hall adde,That 
S t Francis Bacon hi mfclf Records, with great folemnity, his 
am*, x. OW n having been freed , not only from very many new 
E *P- 997* wa rts, but from one almoftas old as he,by a piece of Lard 
with the skin on it, which after having rub'd upon them, 
wasexpofed out a of Southern Window to putrefie . And 
therefore though the vanity and fufjgrfrition of the Au- 
thors that fpeakof MagnetickRemedies,&the impertinent 
circumftances,that are ufually prefcribed j as ncceflary to 
their efTe<ftualnefs,do generally,& juftly enough, make fo- 
ber men defyife , or at leaft fufpeft fuch unlikely waies of 
cures yet in consideration of inftancei lately produced (to 
which we may perhaps elfewhere adde fome others) and 
becaufe divers men,as well Phyfitians as others, have feri- 
oufly allured me of their having been (bme of them eye- 
witneffes, and others performers of fuch cures} I am apt to 
think it fit,that, a fevere indeed , but yet further trial be 
made of Phyfical Experiments of this kind. And T cannot 
but commend the curiofity of D 'Harvey, who, as rigid a Na- 
turalift as he is , fcrupled not often to try the Experiment 
mention'd by Hclmont % ofc curing fome Tumors or Excref- 
cencies, by holding on them for a pretty while (that the 
cold might throughly penetrate) the hand of a man dead of 
a lingring difeafci which Experiment, the Doctor was not 
fmce pleafed to tell me, he had fometimes try'd fruitlcfly, 
but often with good fuccefs- Nor doth the grand Objecti- 
on againft fuch Experiments, namely, that fuch or fuch a 
perfon , having once made trial of them, found them not 
fuccced,fecm at all to me,alone,of weight enough to make 
fuch Ex peri men ts,or thofe other improbable ones Former- 
ly mentioned, totally rejected. Becaufe, that if they really 



Digitized by Google 



(330 

do (bmctimes fuccecd , though fometimes they chance to f«*tme§ 
fail , yet that poffibility of their fucceeding may fuffici- ffifffffl 
ently e vince,that there are really in Nature Medicines that mediana »« 
work after that extraordinary manner. And I fee no reafon, SfiSIT* 
why it mould be more required of thofc Medicines, that tbetrtft. 
work at diftance from the Patient (or at leaft are not ta- 
ken at Mouth,or injc&cd otherwhere.) only by fubtle E/- 
fluvia t that they mould alwaies cure, then it is exaded of 
vulgar Remedies, from which we might rcafonably expect 
moreconftant cfFe&s,becaufe of their being eirher inward- 
ly given , or more immediately') or at leaft, more durably 
applied to the Patient. And if Rubarb be 'juftly affirmed to 
be an excellent medicine in LoofeneiTes, though we daily 
in Ireland fee many fwept away or thofe difeafes, in fpight 
of the ufe of Rubarb & Mirabolan?, with other aftringent 
Remedies to boot : Andifquickfilver be, not unreafon- 
ably,by moft of our PhyGtians, efteemed and employed as 
an effectual Remedy againft Venereal Difeafes , becaufe it 
fometimes removes them , though ferntlius^ Montanui&n& 
many other Learned Authors tell us, as they fay upon their 
own expericnce,that(though it often palliate thofe diftem* 
pers)it very feldome cures them : Nay , and if Diaphore- 
ticksare ftill efteemed fuch by the generality ofPhyfitians, 
though few Sudorificks will caufe fweat in all bodies, and 
fcarce any in fome bodies, I fee not, why thefe Remedies, 
that work, as it were, by Fm a nation, may not deferve the 
nameof Medicines.if they fometimes unqueftiouably fuc- 
eeed,t hough they mould not alwaies prove fuccesful ones 3 
Nor why they (hould,notwithftanding their fometimes not 
fucceeding,bc laid afide, efpecially fince thefe fympathetU 
cal wayes of cure are moft of them fu fafe 8c innocent,thar r 
though, if they be real, they may doc much good, if they. 

provo. 



Digitized by Google; 



prove fi&ions they can do no harm, (unlefs by accidenf , as 
in cafe the Patient ftiould fofingly rely on them, as to nc- 
gle& (which he need not all) other helps to recover. ) 

GHAP. XII. 

BUt you will now perhaps demand , Pjropbilt/j y how the 
Naturalift, as fuch,can contribute to the Credit or Ad- 
vancement of the mentioned ways of curing difcafes, 
without the wonted weakning ana painful Evacuations ? 
In anfwer to this Queftion, I mutt put you in mind, That 
it would be no new thing for Natural ids , not prof c fled ly 
hfiincftof Phyfitians, to treat of this fub jeft, and that the NaturaJift 
divers cues mav afford good Hints to the pra&itioner of Phyfick,both 
Mdbmlbefe upon divers other accounts already touched upon, and by 
*re •niytbu trying upon Bruits variety of hitherto untryed Medica- 
re Men. mcnts or Remedies, and by fuggefting to him both the E- 
vents of fuch Tryals, and alfo what hath been already ob- 
served about the cures of Difcafes incident to Beafts. For 
though ( as we formerly told you ) there are fome things 
that are not equally Poyfonous,as others not equally Safe, 
to Man and to femi Bruits} yet there are other Beads , e- 
fpecially Dogs and Monkey es, whofe Bodies a re,by many 
Poyfons, affefted almoft like thofe of Men: And fmce ac- 
cording to the Ku\c 9 rerkulum facie ndum eft in vili animb , 
many things may be very well tryed on fuch Creatures , 
that we dare not at firft venture to try cn Men. We may 
give Dogs Poyfons , only to try the Vertue of our Anti- 
dotes h and we may give them Wounds, to make tryal of 
the efficacy of the Weapon-falve and Sympathetick 
Powder: Since divers of my Friends ( as I have intimated 
above ) allure me, That they have fome of them fcen , 
and others performed cures of Horfes, lam'd by pricking, 

> by 




• 



f*33) 

by flicking the Nails that hurt them into Weapon- falve* 
which for that very ufe , among others, fome of them are 
wont to carry about them in Silver Boxes. When Oxen, 
and fuch like Cattle, are troubled with that Difeafe which 
makes them continually turnabout in one place (and is 
therefore called the turning Evil , or Sturdy) a common 
Remedy here in England, as Grafiers that make ufe of it 
inform me, is to caft down and tye faft thefick Bcaft, and 
then to open bis Skull a good way (or, if need be, take off 
a round peice of it over the place fuppofed to be affected ) 
andat theopen place to takeout a little Bag or Bladder, 
which is ufually found to lye near the Membrances of the 
Brain, and to be full of Water and Blood, and then leifure- 
ly to heal up the hurt .• And this cure is much commended, 
as both common and eafie, by our experience^ Aiarkham* 
In Goates likewife, that are much fubjed to the DropGe, 
the Husband man ventures to flit, and let out the Water 
under the Shoulder. And divers hazardous Operations in 
Chirurgcry, fuch as are Arteriotomy , the Exfe&ion of the 
Spleen and other parts, were, or fliould have been firfl at- 
tempted upon Bruits, 8c then praftifed on humane Bodies* 
And in imitation of thefe/tis likely that divers other Ex- 
periments, of good ufe in Chirurgery , may be difcovercd 
for the relief of Man,without endangering him in profecu- 
ting fuch Difcoverics. And to fay nothing of the known 
practice of fpaying fwine & bitches^In the neighbourhood* 
of a Country houfe of mine, in the Weft of England pro- 
bably in divers other parts, fome experienced Shepheards 
have an odd way of caff rating male Sheep,clpecia My Lambs 
when they are grown fo old that 'tis thought dangerous to 
geld them the common way. A Servant of mine that deals 
much in Cattle, and had lately divers Sheep fwigg'd (as 
they call it)after this manner,tels me that us thus done; the 
Beaft,onwhonathe Operation is to be performed 3 being 



Digitized by Google 



held bv a ftrong Man with his Belly upwards , another 
Man draws a ftring , as firmly as he can (tying it with 
a knot or two, to prevent its yielding or flipping off ; a- 
bouttheTefticle$,asifhe meant,bv drawing that ftriog,to 
cut them offhand then anointing the part with a little trefli * 
Butter 9 or (bme fuch like thing , . he lets the Ram goe to 
feed; which for the moft pan (not with (landing the anguifh 
of this Ligature ) he will begin to do in a ftiort time: And 
within two or three days, the Tcfticlcs, being, by the ftricl: 
Ligature , denied the Nutriment and Spirits that were 
wont to be conveyed to them,will grow fo rotten as ei- 
ther, together with the ftring, to fall off, or be very eaGly 
pul'd off, fometimes (linking very rankly like Carrion. 
And even among thofe things that are already pra&ifcd 
by Farriers, Shepherds and Graziers, there are many fuch 
things as we have newly mentioned , which may ferve ei- 
ther to enrich or illuftrate the way of curing humane Bo- 
dies : Their ignorance and creduloufncfs , together with 
the liberty and meanefs of thofe Creatures t bey phyfick, 
gives them leave to venture on any thing , having made 
them try upon Hotfes and Cattle, many fuch thingsas 
Phyfitians dare not try upon Men and Women. And a- 
mong thofe many extravagant things, fome 5 as it often 
happens, have fucceeded fo profperoufly, as to deferve to 
be confidered by the skilfulleft Phyfitians; Some of whom 
might, without difparagement to their profc(Iion,do it an 
ufefull piece offervicc,ifthey would be pleafed to collect 
and digeft all the approved Experiments and Practices of 
the Farriers, Graziers, Butchers, and the like , which the 
Ancients did not defpife^ut honoured with the Titles of 
hippiatrica and VeUrinarin : And among which , if I had 
leifuie, divers things may be taken notice of,which might 
ferve to illuftrate the Mctbodus medendi. As to give you 
but one Inftance which lately occurred to me, The life- 

fulnefs 



Digitized by Google 



fulnefs of letting Blood in fome cafes, Which is fofererely 
condemned by many Chy mills, and the efficacy of a final!, 
if feafonable , Evacuation, which can fcarce be conceiv'd 
to do more thai alter the courfe of the Blood , may be iU 
luftrated by trie Staggers in H or fes-, and the Cure of it. 
For I have ieen a Coach- horfe, ready to drop down de ad 
of his Difeafeupon the High- way , by having his Gums 
rubb'd with the Coach-whip till the Blood appeared , re- 
lieved almoft in a moment fo much^ that though he were 
ndt well able to ftand before, yet he was immediately able 
to go on, and draw the Coach with his fellows. 

CHAP. XIII- 

■ 

T He next thing we are to obferve to you,P^r*/>V*j$and !?" r *# 
on which its nature and importance^ will engage us nf^Vm^ 
fomewhat long to infif^is thissThat the Handling of Pby- •« mi 
fical matters was Anciently thought to belong to the Na- JjJ'J^ be - 
turalMU as we are clearly informed by the judicious Celfus^io^tothe 
in that memorable PafTage, where fpeakingof theOr/^/^Af^iff. 

of Phyfick, Pnmo (faieshe) medendi fnentU Sipttmid^Jy^ 
pars hdbebatur ut morborum curat it 6* rcrum nature con* 
templatiofub iifdem Jutboribus naU Jst '.Scilicet his htnc ma- 
xi me tequirenUbus^ qui corpora fnorum robora % inquieta c<r 
gitationtnoUurnaq^vigilt^mifiuerant. He adds, that ma- 
ny of the Profeflors of philofophy , efpccially Pjthagoraf^ > 
Empedocles^ and Oemocritur, and that Hippocrates ( whom 
fome think to bethe difcipleof thelaftnam'd.) was the 
firftthat fever'd phyfick from philofophy, and made it 
a diftinA difcipline. And this Apologie for the enfuing dif- 
courfe being thus prctrwfed to it , 1 fball farther Anlwer , 
that I (hould perhaps be obliged to exceed the limits of an 
•ESS AY, if I fhould in this Difcourfe infift on every 
thing , upon whofe account the Naturalift may aflift the 

F f 2 Phyfitian 



Digitized by Google 



C*i6) 

Phy fit ian, if he be barely a Medicus to cure Difeafes which 
that you may the more readily believe,! (hall feleft 8c pro- 
fccute fome of thefe things in the remaining part of this 
ESSAY. 

flit th( ff;> And firft I (hall reprefent to you on this fubjed , That 
W H sped- the account upon which Phyfitians arc wont to rcjccY , if 
titoZS* not » ^ cr ^ c tn eufe offuch Specificks, as feern to work 

a Secret and unknown manner, and not by vifibly p- 
tummhir- vacuating peccant humours ( or by other fuppofedly ma- 
nmuU - nifeft qualities ) being generally this. 7 hat they ice not 
how the promised Effects can well be produced by Bo- 
dies t that muft work after fo peculiar and undifcerned a 
manners This being , I fay, the great thing that hnders 
Phyfitians from endeavouring to find, or, fo much as, be- 
ing willing to intake ufe of Remedies of this fort,tRe Natu- 
raltftsmay do much towards the removal of this Impe- 
diment, by (hewing out of fuch things as may be met with 
or performed within the Macrocofme , That fuch , or at 
leaftas ftraoge operations as are afcrib'd to thefe Speci- 
ficks , are not without Example in Nature h and confe* 
quently ought not to be rejected , barely as being impof* 
Cble. And indeed the Phyfiologie, wherewith Phyfitians 
as well as others are wont to be tmbu'd in the Schools, has 
done many of them no fmall DhTcrvice , by accuftomir.g 
them to groflc apprehenfions of Natures ways of work- 
ing. Whence it comes to paffe,. that not a few ev'n 
Learned Doctors will never eypeft a that any great mat- 
ter (hould be performed in Difeafes, by fuch Remedies as 
are neither obviolis to the fence, nor Evacuate any groflc* 
or at leaft (enfible matter. Whereas , very great altera- 
tions may be wrought in a Body, efpccially if Liquid * as 
b the Blood and peccant Humour, without the Ingreflc ' 
or Egreffc of any vifible roattcr p by the inteftinc commo- 
tion 



Dl 



gitized by Google 



tioo of the parts of the fame body acYirjg upon another, 
md thereby acquiring a differing Motion , Location ( if 
I may fo fneak ) or Figure , which , wich'the other Qpa% 
li ties and Effects refal ting thence, may alter the motion 
and Texture of the Liquor, and thereby produce great 
changes in ihe Bodv that Harbours it. How much an un- 
perceiv'd recede of a few fibtile Parts of a Liquor may al- 
ter the Nature of it, may be gnefs d at, by the obvious j£ 
change of Wine into Vineger * wherein upon the A vol a- mtf>i«t* 
tion (or perhaps but the mifplacing} of fu little of the Spk CSUffl! 
Titucus and Sulphureous part, that it s Pretence, Abfencc , offbeat. 
or new Combination with the other Parts is not difcerna- 
ble to the Eye,the fcarce decreafed Liquor, becomes of a 
q tite differing Nature from what it was And though in 
England this Degeneration be not wont to be fo fuddenly 
performed by reafon of the coidnefs of the Climare, yet in 
hotter Countries the change is much more fpeedily made* 
As in Brafl , the above mentioned* Tifo informes us, 
that the cxpreffed Tuice of the Sugar Canes, which by 10 * 
Cocrion , and farther ordering , would be certainly 
brought to Sugar , will of it felfe keep fweet bur about 
four and twenry Houres, and then begin to fowre^ and 
be altogether unfit to make Sugar of, though very rhtm*h;nt*l 
fit to turn into good Vinegcr. And this 1 find con- Vnt&tisi* 
firm'd by a Modern and applauded French Writer in his 
Dcfcription,offome parts of the Weft /^ie/^nhabited by tfj*™t,i u 
his Nation: And relations of the fame fort, concerning the * ^fas* 
hafty fowring of fome other Liquors in America^ I have 
had from our f-ngijb Travellers and Planters, And in 
the Eaft- Indies , Linfcboten tels u$ of a change much 
morcfuddain : For fpeaking of the formerly mention 'd 
S*r* or Liquor, afforded by the wounded Coco tree. The 
lame water ( fays he ) ftanding but one Hourein the ctop.$#j 

•Sunnc 



Digitized by Google 



Sunne is very good V ineger , and in India they ha ve none 
other. And thareven very hurtful Licjuors C and why not 
then fome peccant matter in thcbodyV )may after the like 
s<e rift.lt. manner change their Nature,may appear by what we have 
formerly mentioned 5 and is unanimoufly affirm 'd by cre- 
dible Writers of fevcral Nations, concerning the juice of 
Mandioca , which,bcing poyfon, when it is firft exprefs'dj 
does in a few hours by Fermentation, purge it felfe and 
loofe its pernicious Nature. That alfo by the bare In- 
grefle of fome Subtile and not vifible Matter , fuch intc- 
g£mrf ftinc Commotions may be excited in Liquors, may appear 
Tbunjer *ndby the fowring which has been often obferved upon great 
Urtbfukp* Thunders to happen, not only to wines , but to other Vi- 
nous Liquors alfo , as I lately received from a great Ma- 
tter of variety of Liquors,a complaint that by fome Thun« 
der, which happen d here a few weeks fince , almoftall 
the Beer and Ale in the neighbourhood was fpoyl'd. And 
I remember, that when I return 'd out of Italy thorow Ge- 
neva 9 there happen'd in that place an Earthquake , upon 
which , the Citizens complained, that much of their wine 
was fowr'd, though I that lodg'd in the higheft part of the 
Town, faw nothing to make mebclieve,that the bare Suc- 
cetlion of the Earth was capable to produce fo great and 
fuddain an alteration in the Wine, 

Divtri t*Bi» That ^ uc ^ i nv ^ D ^ c Corpufclcs may pafs from Amulets , 
cts to prove or other external Remedies into the Blood and Humors , 
tto JytfM' and there produce great changes, will fcarcefeem impro- 
myl*fi bable to him that confidershow perfpirable according to 
from Amuttts H/ppocratet a living body is, and that a Vegetable and A- 
grutdter*. nimal Body's, whofc Texture is more loofe and open,may 
noni in ibe well be fuppofed to fend forth Expirations, fince even di- 
7* tc "°f* vers Minerals are found to do the like, as may appear by 
m '° l 9 h the odorable fteames of rub'd Brimftone , and Ambers by 
the Corpufcles , which performe the Magnetick Opera- 
tions 



C^9) 

tions, by the Euietick Quality imparted to Liquors by the 
Glaflc of Antimony, and by Crocus Metillorum barely in- 
fm'd in them, without fcnfibly fooling anything, either of 
their bulk or weight ;and by the vertue or killingWormes, 
wherewith Wine, and even Water has been, not only by 
Belmont, but by divers other Phyfitians, obferved to be 
enrich'd , after a Quantity of guickfilver has been for 
fome Houresihaken in it, though without any fenfible 
deperd'tion of the fubftance of the A/ercury. And indeed 
I have fomewhat wondred that many Learned modern 
Phyfitians , either out of an ajfFe&ed Severity , or per- 
haps Animofity againft Chymifts, overlook or even de- Defmp. M t * 
ride all operations of this Nature^Since T remember Gtlen di j^uiuti 
himfelf,not only confirmes the like do&rine, by his reafons bm ubt * 
and Authority , but delivers a very ftrang Example of it 5 
for,under the Title of G/^cA;/^ 3 treatingof/ , t^ l y J He thus 
Difcourfcs , Eft prdterea omnino refit catoria: Ea propter 
baud defperaverim earn ex collo pucrh fujpenfam merit 0 Co* 
mitialem morhumfanare. Equidem vidi puellum qttandoqs 0- 
Bototkmetifthm morbo Comitiali liberuit , ac poftea fortuna 
cum quod h collo fujpenjum crat decidijjetjrotir.ut deuuo ion* 
vulfione correptum^ rurfufqh fufpenfo in locum tlhusalio, in- 
culpate poftea egijfe, Vorro vtfum eft mi hi fatius eji r *'j umG *Vf*™\ 
id collo dettahere 9 certioris experiential gratia: id cum fecif- Vwr, 
fern , ac putt itcrum cftet convulfus, magna m recentis radicis 
partem ex collo ejus fufpendimuf t ac deinceps prorfnm fanus ef* 
je&us efi puer, necfoftea convulfus eft. Rationabtle itaq,e- 
rat, aut partes quafpiam a radice deflucntes , ac deinde per in* 
fpirationem dttractas , ajfectos it a locos curare, aut Aerem 
a radice afftduc mutari & alter art. Nam hoc pacto Su cus 
Cyre/taicus collumellam phle&mone affeftnm juvat & Afelanm 
thion fridum palam Catarrhos & Coryzas dejiccat, Si qun 
id in calidum Unteum , r«r*/ar, liget ajjiducqs cabretn ex 1 0 
per infpirMtiontm in nares attrahat. £>uin etiam fi plurtbus 

Unit 

■ « 

> % 

Digitized by Google 



timk 9 & mtxime matins purpura 9 collo vipers i*je&h 9 iUk 
viper am prsfoces y eaq'^pojha cujufptam collo obvincias^ mU 
njlce profuerk turn Pdriflbmik turn ommbm ik qua tn collo 
expullulatth Nay , that fucb invifible Bodies , by palling 
through grofler ones , and thereby changing the Motion 
and /w*/ or Juncture of their pa rts, may produce lading 
alterations in the Textures f though it be a Paradox) 
feems not at all to me impoffible. For we find the moft 
fluid Body of Quickftlver has been fome times , ( I fay 
ifometimes ) and therefore may , without fenfible increafe 
of Bulk 9 be coagulated by a Metalline Exhalation fo , as 
to be cut like Lead , and to retain that folidity 9 till by 
fome Art or other it be redue'd to itspriftine Fluidnc ffe. 
You may be inclin'd to think , that the hard and folid Bo* 
dy of Iron has a permanent alteration made in it's Tex* 
ture, if you hold a needle during a competent time near 
the Pole of a Vigorous Loadftone without touching \U 
For the Magnetical Effluvia ( as may very probably be 
conceived ) will fo difpofe the parts of the neareft extream 
of the Needle, as that they (hall admit thefteames that 
come from one of the Poles of the Load ftone , and not 
tWe that come from the other: whereas by skilfully 
holding it to the contrary Pole of the fame Stone 9 the in- 
ternal Pores , and confequently the Tcxtnre of the 
Needle 9 will prefcntly be quire otherwife difpofed, 
in reference to the Magnetical Fffluvi^ as we more fully 
declare in another ESSAY where we {hall. I fuppofe,al- 
fo perfwadeyou 5 that the Effr&s of the Load- ftone are 
performed by fubtil Bodies ifluing from, or paffing 
through it. What we have in a former difrouife told you 
concerning our having at PI eafu re changed the Poles of a 
Load«ftone 3 by help of the Magnetica Effluvia of the 
Earth , may let you fee that in Stones , alfo fuch altera" 
tions are p offible to be made. And ia the next ESSAY 

favc 



Digitized by Google 



C*40 

fare onc,we (hall give you another Inftance pertinent toour 
purpufe. For if you heat a (lender piece of Steel ("as a Graver, 
or the like ) red hot , and fuffer it to cool leifurely in the 
Air, it will continue flexible enough ,• and of fo foft a Tex- 
ture | that you may eafily make impreffions on it, with any 
hardned Steel : but if, inftead of cooling it thus (lowly* you 
knock it into fuch a dry body, as wee (ha 1 there name to you, 
it will immediately grow fo hard,as to be brittle. Which al- 
teration , whether it be refolved to proceed from the parti- 
cular Effluvia of the Body, into which it is knocked, or bare- 
ly from the ingrefiie of the (Jorpufcles of Cold '■> (if any fuch 
there be ) it will be however an Inftance not unfit for our 
purpofe. And thofe-, PyrophylHtjhzt arc con verfant in Glafs - 
houfei,may eafily obferve, that Glafs acquires a more or lefs 
brittle Texture,according as(to fpeak in the Glafs - mens lan- 
guage 'it is baked- For if after glaflcs are blown,they be quick- 
ly carried into the open Air,they wont to be much more fub- . 
j eft to break , than thofe , that after they are fafhion'd , are 
plac d in a kind of very long Ovcn(which is wont to be built 
over the Furnace, wherein the m aterials, whereof the Glafs is 
made,are kept in Fufion) 8c are by flow degrees refrigerated, 
and not 'till after fome houres expofed to the open Air : For 
whether this difference of Brittienefs, 8c confequently of tex- 
ture, be afcrtbed to the interrupted Tranfcurfion of fome E- 
therial matter, through the Pores of the Glaffe,or to the infi- 
nuations of the Atoms of the Cold* or to this,that the Parti- 
cles of theGlaffe agitated by the heat, were furpriz'd by the 
Cold before they could make an end of thofe Motions which 
were requiGte to their difpdGng themfelves into the moft 
durable Texture, it is evident enough,that 'tis by no grofs or 
vifible Body, that this permanent difference of Texture is 
produced. Of the like to which we may elfewhere give you . 
Examples, in fome other Concretes. That alfoin an human 
Body, great alterations may be made by very fubtil *§uvU y •jf*iw. 

gg appcarcs 



Digitized by Google 



appeares evidently , not only by the inftances vre have forw 
merly given of the efficacy of fome outwardly applyed Re* 
medics, but by divers other things; as that many are purged 
by the bare Odor of Potions , of which I have been aflured 
upon his own Obfervation by the experienced Town Phifi* 
tun of rlimmouth Dr. D. And of which Stlmttth in his Obfcr- 

Cf«f.3.0&' vations,gives us an inftance in a young Gemlcwoman 3 whom 

' '" ' hefaw more happily purged, by the Odor of a Potion,drunk 
. . by her Sifter , than me was that took the Medicine. And 

/rr!s. 3< " the fame Author tels us, of one«Or. Vfttl an eminent Phyfi- 
• tian,whowas wont>whenhehadamindtobePurged 5 togoc 
into fome Apothecaries (hop, where Electuaries elc&ively 
purging were preparing , to which having a while (melt , 
they would by their Odor , after his return home , work 
with him fix or feven times,as if he had fwallowed the Medi- 
cine it felfc. And Hmricus ah Hccr , in the twenty ninth of 
his formerly commended Obfervation s,tcls us a Of a Woman 
that not only was wont to be copioufly purg'd by drinking 
Bief broth , but having by a fall broken her Leg, us*d no 
other Cathartick , than the bare Odor of that fort of Broth. 
And very Obfervable to our purpofe, is the operation of the 
Air, all along the ridg of the high mountain in Pern, called 

Li*.?.***. FdridCdCM} of which the Learned Jefuite fcfeph Acofla relates, 

of tbtpur ^ at ln0U S n wcnt as WC ^ P rc P arc d as he could,to with- 
i»^^fi^ftandthe Operations ufually produced in Travails, by that 
&* t i tj»f the piercing Air , yet when he approached to the top of the 
ioSsh p a . Mountain, he was ( notwithstanding all his Provilion ) fur- 
riacact a^priz'd with (uch fits, and pangs> of driving and cafting, as he 
* 44 * thought he (hould caft up his Heart too} Having after meat, 
Phlegme,and Choler,both yellow and green, in the end with 
overdriving caft up Blood^and continued thus fick fur three 
or tour houres, Yill he had pafled into a more temperate Air 
than that of the top of the Mountain ; which runs about 
500 Leagucs>and has every where 3 though not equally, this 

difcompofing 



Digitized by Google 



C»43) 

difcompofiog property , having operated upon fome of his 
companions 5 as well downwards as upwards* A greater 
proof of the power of the Stearns upon the Body may be ta- 
ken from the propagation of Infectious Difeafcs,which being Th*>*»tt 
conveyed by infcnnble Effluvia , from a fick into a healthy^" £ /«- 



Body, are able to difordcr the whole OEconomy of it , and/*ffi 
aft thofe fad Tragedies, which Phyfitians do fo often unfuc^"' 4 
cefsfally indeavour to hinder. But you will ccafc to doubt, 
that Corpufcles, though fo fmall as to be below the fenfe , 
mould be able to perform great matters upon humane Bo- 
dies^ if you confider what alterations may be therein produ- 
ced by the bare a&ions of the parts upon one another. This 
may appear by the effects of fcveral Paffions of the mind , 
which are often excited by the bare, if attentive, thoughts of 
abfent things. In obftinate grief 8c Mclancholy,there is that 
alteration made in thedifpofition of the Heart, and perhaps 
fome other p;irts by which the Blood is to Circulate, that the 
lively motion of that liquor is thereby difturbed 9 andob- 
ftrufrions and other not eafily remov'd diftempcrs are occa* 
fioo'd.The bare remembrance ofa loathfome Potion,does of* 
tcntimes produce in me (8c I doubt not,but the like thought 
may have the like Operation in many others ) a Horror . 
attended with a very fenfible Commotion of divers parts of 
my Body, efpecially with a kind of conclufive motion , in 
or about the Sromack* And what power the Paffions have 
to alter and determine the courfc of the Blood, may appear f^fSff^ 
yet more manifeftly in modeft and baftiful perfons,efpccially r*fa*stf 
Women , when meerely upon the remembrance or thought 
of an u neb a ft , or undecent thing, mentioned before them, 
the motion of the Blood will be fo determin'd , as to parte 
fuddenty and plentifully enough into the Checksf and fome* 
times other parts Vo make them immediatly wear that livery 
of Venue ( as an Old Philofopher fry I'd it ) which we call a 
BluCh. And even by joy, if great and fudden, jrnot long'fince 

Kg 3. f'aw 



•Digitized by Google 



fawio perfons of both Sexes, not only the cheeks and Fore 5 
bead,but it leftf as to the Lady ) even the neck and Shoulders 
Died of that Colour. And that Paffions, may not only alter 
the Motion of the Juyces of the Body , but likewife make 
fome reparation and evacuation of them, may appear in grief, 
which is won t,cfpcci ally in Women to make all the Commo- 
tions requifite to weeping: whereby oftentimes a confidera- 
ble quantity of Briny Liquor is excluded at the Eyes , under 
the form of Tears, by which divers ( efpecially Hyfterical ) 
Perfons are wont to find themfelves much refrelhed, though 
with fome it fares otherwife in teeming Women. Alfo that 
vehement defire we call Longing , may well be fuppofed to 
produce great alterations in the Body of the Mother , which 
leaves fuch ft range and lading impreffions upon that of the # 
Infant* fince 'tis the Mother only, and not at all the Infant, 
that conceives thofe importunate defires. 

CHAP. XTV. 

THcre are many Inftahces to be met with in PhyGtians 
Books , to Chew that Imagination is able fo to alter the 
fance$ of Hi Imagining perfons Body, as to work fuch a difpofition 
-vr '/ '**Mn the Spirits, Blood and Humors of it, as to produce the de- 
terminate Difeafe that is exceffively feared. And I rem em • 
ber , that foon after the laft Fair Lady K. Died of the Small 
Pox, I chanced to meet one of her Sillers with her Mask on 
amongft fome other Perfons of High Quality , and wont 
dring to fee her fit Maskt in fuch Company , her Husband 
( who was prefent) told me, That his Wife having been hap- 
pily brought to Bed fome while before her Sifter fell fick 5 
he had carefully kept the knowledge of her flcknefs from 
his Wife 5 leaft the kindnefs that was betwixt them two 
might prejudice her in the condition (he was in, but thar 
after, a while a Lady unawares making mention in her hear* 

kg 



Digitized by Google 



Chi) 

fng of her Sifters ficknefs , (he immediately fancied that 
(he mould have it too > and accordingly fell uck of tha t dif- 
figuring Difeafe , whofe Marks obliged her for a while to 
were a Mask. Nor is it in Women only, but even in Men , 
that conceit may produce fuch real and lulling effeds. For 
many authentick Hi (tones record examples of thofe, in 
whom exceffive Grief or Fear has made fuch a change in the 
Colour of their Hair in a Night , as Nature would other- 
wife have fcarce made in divers Years. And I remember, . 
that being about four or fix Years fince, in the County of 
Cork 9 there was an /r//7i Captain 3 a man of middle Age and 
Stature , who coming with fomc of his followers to render 
himfelf to your Uncle ErogbJl, who then commanded the 
Cnglilh Forces in thofe parts upon a publick profer of par- 
don to the Irtfh thzt would then lay down Armes,he wasca- 
fually,in a fufpicious Place , met with by a party of the fi«- 
gHJb and intercepted. And my Brother being then abfent , 
upon a defigne, he was fo apprehenfivc or being put to 
Death 5 by the inferiour officers , before your Uncles return , 
that that Anxiety of mind quickly changed the Colour of his A***fat* 
Hair after a peci>!<ar manner : of which I ( being then at that J&J JjJ^ 
Caftfc of your Unkles whereunto he was brought ; had h <*w\£„ 
quickly notice given me , and had the Curiofity to examine jjjjjj* 1 
this Captain, and found that the Hair of his Head 3 had not " 
( as in the inftanccs I had met with in Hiftories ) uniformely 
changed its Colour, but that here and there certain peculiar 
Tufts and locks of ir, whofe Bafes might be about an inch in 
Diameter were thus fuddenly turned White all over : the 
reft of his Hair ( of which you know the Irijh ufe to were 
good ftore ) retaining it's former Reddifh Colour. 

Q You will miftake my dcGgnSjrophylMJy if you conclude 
from what I have faid , concerning the Power of Effluvia to 
work upon theBody,that I am either fb much an Helmon- 
tUm as to condemnc thcllfc of all thofe Remedies that make 

fuch 



Digitized by Google 



fuch more grofle Evacuations ( if I may fo call them ) as are 
made by Vomit,Seige, 8c the likejor that I would have you, 
or am my felfe fo credulou6,as to believe all the Vertues that 
are,ev'n by Eminent Writers, afcribed to the remedies cal- 
led Specificks: For (to mention here but this ) we have ob- 
ferved , that the hopes built upon evn excellent Specificks, 
unle(Te they be of fuch a refolving and abfterfive Nature, as 
to be able to make way for them felvcs into the Recedes of 
Tl&tbtA** ^°dy* arc oftentimes difappointed,where Come Emetick 
ihmWcwrs or Cathartick Remedy has not been firft us'dto free the 
etntttnwg Stomack and Guts from thofe vifcous Humours , which ob- 
%ltoUMgbfi tu ®* n % tne paflages much enervate the Vertue of the 
to be under- Remedy , if they doe not altogether deny it accefs to the 
ft 60 * 9 innermoft parts of the Body. That then which I aim at, 
is firft to keep you from being prejudiced by the Confidence 
of fome Lamed Doctors , who laugh at the very name of 
Specificks;, and will not allow any Diteafe to becurable,but 
by vifible Evacuations of ftore of what they call peccant 
Matter 5 And next to give you caufe to think that fuch Spe- 
cificks , as men of judgment and credit do recommend upon 
their own Experience ought not to be rejected without 
Trial, upon the bare account of their not being either Laxa- ' 
tlve or Vomitive, Sudorifick, orDiureticah Nay, norfo 
much as for this , that they are not endow'd with any Emi- 
nent Degree of any manifeft Quality, fuch as Heat, Cold, 
Drincffe, Odor, Taft , Attrition and thelike* nor able per- 
chance to work any confiderable alteration in a healthy Hu- 
mane Body. For Iconfider the Body of a living man, 
not as a rude heap of Limbs and Liquors , but as an Engine 
confifting of feveral parts fo fet together , that there is a 
ftrange and confpiring communication betwixt them , by 
vertue whereof, a very weak and inconfiderabie Imprtfiion 
of adventitious matter upon fome one parr may be able to 
Work on fome other diftant part , or perhaps on the whole 

Engine, 



Digitized by Google 



Engine , a change far exceeding what the fame adventitious 
Body could do upon a Body not focontriv d. The faint 
motion of a mans little Finger upon a final 1 piece of Iron 
that were no part of an Engin, would produce no confidera- 
ble Effcd 5 but when a Musket is ready to be (hot off , then 
fuch a Motion being applied to the Trigger by vertue of the 
contrivance of the Engine,the Spring is immediatly let loofe, 
the Gock fals down,and knocks the flint againft the Steel , 
opens the Pan, (hikes Fire upon the Powder in it, which by 
the Touch- hole Fires the Powder in the Barrel, and that 
# with great noife throw s out the ponderous Leaden bullet 

with violence enough to kill a Man at Seven or Eight hun- n«tbe p«f- 
drcd Foot diftance. And that alfo the Engine of an Hifr» ***** Sin* 
mane Body is fo franVd, as tojre capable of receiving gre!t "nJ^QSm 
alterations from feemingly (light impreflions of outward oj «■ b****e 
Obje&s^upon the bare accompt of its particular contrivance, bo f 
may appear by feveral inftanccs befidc thofe which may be- £f,'/" / 
long to this Argument in the foregoing part of this E S- theft impef* 
SAY- When a man goes fuddenly out into the Sun , it^ 0 "' 4 
often happcns,that thofe beames which light upon his Head, 
and would not fofbort a time have any difcermble effect 
on the leaft Hair of ir, do almoft in a moment produce that 
ftrange and violent motion in the head and almoft all the 
Body , which we call Sneezing. Men that from the top of 
fome Pinacle, or other high and fteep place do look down to 
the bottome of it are at firft very apt by the bare profpeft, 
(which yet convey 's nothing into the Body but thofe images, 
if yet there intervene corporeal ones in fenfation of vifiblc 
Objects that enter at the Eye; to become fo giddy,that they 
are reduced to turneaway their Eyes from the Prarci pice 
for fear of not being able to ftaod upon their Leggs. And 
many that look'd fixedly upon a Whirlepoole , or upon a 
very fwift ftream have had fuch a Vertiginous Motion there- 
by imprefled on their Spirits , that they have been unable to 

keep 



Digitized by Google 



CM ) 



keep their Bodies upright , but have fallen into the Water 
they gazed on. And it is no lefs remarkable , that when 
a man is fomewhat difcom pos'd at Sea, and yet not enough 
to Vomit freely 5 the Seamen are wont to advife him to 
look from the fide of the Ship upon the Water, which feem- 
ing fwiftly to pafs by the VelTcl , has upon the gazer the 
operation of a rapid ftream , and by making him giddy ba- 
ttens and facilitates his Vomiting, as I have fometimes tried 



into a fit of Sea-Sicknefs. If a perfon be very Ticklifh and 
you but gently frrokc the Sole of his Foot with the top of 
a Feather, that languid Imprcffion on the bottome or the 
fopr f {hall, whether he will or no, put all thofe Mufcles and 
other parts into motion , <*fcich are requifite to make that 
tioife,and to exhibite that Chape of the Face ( fo far re diftant 
from the feet ) which we call Laughing $ and fo the gentle 
Motion of a ftraw tickling the Noftrils is able to excite 
Sneezing. Moft men may obferve in themfelves, that there 
are fome fuch noifes as thofe made by the grating of an un- 
greaf'd Cart-wheel upon the Axle-tree , or the tearing of 
courfe Paper, which are capable of Getting the Teeth on 
edge, which yet cannot be done without exciting a peculiar 
Motion in feveral parts of the Head. 1 had a fervant , who 
fometimes complained to me of a much more remarkable 
and unfrequent diforder* namely , that when he was put to 
whet a Knife, that ftridufous Motion of the Air was wont to 
make his Gummes bleed. Hettrkus *b Heer ( in his Twenty 
ninth Obfervatioo) Records a Story of a Lady, to whom he 
was fern for, who upon the hearing of the found of a Bell, or 
any loud noife 5 though Singing, would fall into fits of Sound- 
ing , which was fcarce diftingutfhable from Death, and we 
may confirme that this difpofition depended upon the Tex- 
ture of her Body in reference to Material founds by what he 
fubjoyns,that having well purg'd her,and giving her for two 




Months 



* 



Digitized by Google 



f249) 

Month s the s/><M»waters,and other appropriate Remedies he 
throughly cur'd her. And it often enough happens , that 
when a Woman is in a fit of the Mother, another Hyrtcrical 
pcrfon (landing by , is by reafon of a peculiar Difpoiitiop of 
her Body , foon infefted with the like ftrange dilcompofure* * 
And to mew you, that a diftcmper'd Body is both an Engine, 
and alfoan Engine difpofed to receive alterations from fuch 
Impreffions as will make none on a found body , let me put 
vou in mind that thofe fubtile Steamcs that wander through 
the Air before considerable changes of Wearher difclofe 
themfelves, are wont to be painfully felt by many fickly Pcr» 
font ,and more conftantly by men that have had great Bruifcl 
or Wounds in the parts that have been fo hurt* though nei- 
ther are healthy men at ail incommodated thereby , nor do 
thofe themfelvcs that have been hurt, feel any thing in thofe 
found parts, whofe Tone or Texture has not been aker'd or 
enfeebl'd by outward violence. I have known fever al alfo 
f and the thing is obvious) whofe body's and Humours arc fo 
fram'd and conftituted , that if C as men commonly fpeak ) 
they ride backward in a Coach,that Motion will make them 
oiddy and force them to vomit* And it is very ordinary 
for Hyfterical Women to fall into fuch Fits as counterfeit 
Epilepfies, Convulfions, and I know not what violent di- 
ftempers by the bare fmell of Musk and Amber , and ot hec 
ftrone perfumes, whofe fteames are yet fo farre from having 
crtit much \tffcjm b Effects in other Humane body's that 
almoft all men, and the generality evn of healthy Women 
are not affected by them, unlefs with fome innocent del ifshfe 
And that even on men, Odours ( how minute and umfible 
bodies foever ) may fometimes have very great power, may fc ^ ^ 
be gathered from rhe ftory told us by S*cut*t Lucttan* r, ot ^.^.^ 
a Fifoerman, who having fpent all his life at Sea and being /«wr. ». 
grown Old there, and coming to gaze upon a folemne re- 
feptigrvnade -In a MaritincTownc,*, Scbaflian King of£r- 



Digitized by Google 



(250) 

tugdl, was, by the perfumes plentifully Burnt , to welcome 
*thc King,immediatly caft upon the ground thereby into a Fit, 
which two Phyfitiaos judg'd ApopleAical , and Pbyfick'd 
him accordingly, 'till three days after the Kings cheife Phy- 
* fitian, Thomas a Vega % gueffing at the caufe of the difeafc, 
commanded him to be remov'd to the Sea fide and cover'd 
with Sea Weeds, where, within four Houres, the Maritine 
Air and fteames began to open his Eyes , and made him 
know thofe that were about him,and within not many Dayes 
reftor'd him to health. We may alfo con jc&ure how much 
the alteration produced in the Body by (icknefs may diipofe 
it to receive ftrong (mpredions from things that would not 
otherwifc much affeft it 5 by this, That even a man in perfeel: 
health , and who is wont to Drink cold without the lea ft 
harm, may, when he has much heated himfelfe by excrcife, 
be caft by a draught of cold Drink into fuch fad den 9 formi- 
dable,and dangerous diftempers,as,did not dayly Experience 
convince us, we mould fcarce think poffible to be produe'd 
in a Body , free from Morbid Humours, by Co familiar a 
thing as a cup of fmall beer or water; infomuch that Benivc- 
nius relates a Story of one,who after too vehement excrcife 
Drinking a Glaflc of very cold Water fell into a fwoun, that 
was quickly fucceeded by Death* And yet , to adde that , 
on this occafion,in Bodies other wife difpos'd a large draught 
of cold Water, Drunk even without tbirft, may very much 
relieve the Drinker , and prevent great fits of the Mother , 
and partly of the Spleen^ efpedally upon fuddain frights, to 
which purpofes I know fame Hyfterical Ladies that find in 
this Remedy, as themfelvcs aflure me,more advantage than 
one would eafily imagine. 

And ( further ) to (hew you that the Engine we are 
fpeaking of is alterable? as well for the better as for the 
worfe, by fuch Motions of outward Bodies, as, in them- 
felvcs confidcr'd,arc languid,or at leaft may fecra dcfpicable 

or 



Digitized by Google 



(350 

or in reference to ficknefs or recovery * 3 Let me call upon yoti 
to confidcr a few,not unobvious 3 things,which may alfo (erve 
to confirme fomepart of what has hitherto been delivcr'd. 

£ The true Moffe growing upon a Humane Skull,though 
I doe not 6nd Experience warrant all the ftrange things fomc ^ 
Chymical Writers attribute to it for the ftanching of Blood, ^4 „ 
yet I deny not , but in fome Bodies it docs it wonderfull e- humane sk*H 
nough. And I very well know an Eminent Virtuofo who^'*"* 
has affiir'd me, as bis Phyfitian likewife has done , that he 
finds the Effects of this Mofs fo confidcrable upon himfelfe ■> 
that after having been let Blood, his Arme falling to Bleed 
again, and he apprehending the confequences of it, his Phy- 
fitian , who chane'd to be prefenr, put a little of the above- 
mentioned MoG into his hand, which barely held there, did, 
to the Patients wonder , (ranch his Blood, and cave him the 
curiofity to lay it out of his band , to try whether the Mofs 
were thecaufe of the Bloods fo odly flopping its courfe, 
whereupon his Arme, after a little while , beginning to Bleed 
afrefh ■> he took the Mofs again into his hand , and thereby 
prefently Itanch'd his Bleeding the fecond time: and, if I mif- 
remember not, he added , that he repeated the Experiment 
once more with the like fuccefs.The fmoak ofburnt feathers, Bmut ft*. 
or Tobacco blown upon the face of an Hyfrerical Woman,'*"""*' 
does oftentimes almoft as fuddenly recover them out of Fits X^%£ 
of the Mother, as the odour of perfumes did caft them there- Mficru*ifts. 
into. ] 

And now I fpeak of Cures performable by fumes , it 
brings into my mind,that a friend of yours and mine , and 
a Perfon ofgeat Veracity profefles to have ftrangly cur'd 
Dyfenteries by a way ufually enough, which hto make the 
Patier* fit over a Chair or Stool clofc on the fides, and per-£""*^ # 
forated below, fo that the Anus and the neighbouring parts f««m. 
may be expos'd to the fumes of Ginger , which muft be 
thrown upon a Pan of Embers 3 plac'd juft under the Patient, 

H h 2 who 



Digitized by Google 



(*50 

who is to continue in that pofture, and to receive the Fume 
as long as he can endure it without too much fainting. And 
when I mcntion'd one of the Cures that was thus pejform'd, 
to one that is look d upon as a Matter of Chyrr.ical arcana 
againft Difeafes $ he prefer 'd before it ( as he faics upon ex- 
perience ) the {havings of Harts home us'd after the fame 
manner>ar)d the Remedy feems not irrational. But if in this 
dittemper , i he Aftual heat applied to the abovemention'd 
part of the Body concurrcnot to the Effect , we may too , 
warrantably enough 3 adde, that Cures may be perform 'd by 
far more minute corpufcles than thofe of fmoak, infinua ting 
themfclves from without into the Body. For I know a very 
de xtrous Goldfmith.,who,when he over heats himfelfe, as he 
often unawares does at hammering of Plate, is fubjtft to fall 
'Anih fi'imt * nto ^ripings °f tnc Belly, which lead to Fluxes* but his ufu- 
n « bot An* al and ready Cure is , affoon as conveniently he can, to heat 
wfc bis Anvil , and fit upon it for a great while together,hearing 
it hot again if there be need. But to return to our Medi- 
cinal Smoaks/tis known that feme find more good againft 
the FitsofcheCoIick, tbeGlyfters oftheSmoak of lob&cco^ 

c"ukt i oV tnaD ^ v an ? otner P n y^ tDe Y ta ^ e ' *° tnat tknow wealthy 
fien *f the perfons, that relying upon the benefit they find by this Rev 

ton'* T ' : mel *y 5 ha ve ^ °^ fending for their Phyfitians to eafe them 
of tbeCoIick. And indeed, when I confider what an odde 
Concrete, even common Soot is, and that many Concretes, 
by being refol v'd into Smoak> may* be either more or other- 
wife unlock'd , then they would be by the Stomack of a 
Man ( fo that I may elfewhere entertajn you of the great 
heightning of fome Emctick and Cathartick Simples in 
ch*hei€kft their operaoon.by their being redue'd into Smoakjand that 
p t 'jL- alfo probably the Operation of fome Fumes and Odours 
mav be mucbch*»ng'd & fmprov'd by their not getting into 
the Body by the Mouth, but other parts? lam inclinable to 
think that there might be made further ufe of them, ifPhy- 

fitians 



Digitized by 



055) 

Htians pleas'd , than hitherto has been . For I have made 
fuch trial of the Vertue of Sulphureous Smoak,to prefer ve 
fome Liquors, as I was much pleas'd wiih. And not only Pa- 
racJft/f 9 but Hdmont highly extol , as a grand Spccirkkin 
fits of the Mother , the Smoak of the Warts that grow upon 
the Legs of Horfes , conveigh'd to the parts fuppos'd to be 
primarily afFc&ed. And I remember, that lately I met 
with a Gentleman curious and intelligent) who, as himfelfe 
aiTur'd me, was by the Scurvy and ill conditioned Ulcers,and 
other obftinate difrempcrs brought fo low,that he was fcarce 
able to turn himfelfe freely in his Bed, and thereupon refol v*d 
again ft taking any more Phyfick, partly out ofdcfpairof re- 
covery , and partly of wearinefs of the tedious cour fes of 
Phyfick the Doctors had in vain made him patfe thorow : 
But that fome of his Friends bringing him a certain Su-geon, 
whom they affirm d to have ftrangly cur d many defperate 
diftem pcrs , by wayes very unufual and not troublefomc to 
the Patient,this Gentleman was content to put himfelfe into 
his Hands? the Surgeon promifing that he would not give 
him any other Phyfick , but now and then a Cup of Sack by 
way of Cordial $ his way of Cure being to fumigate the Pa - 
tient very well every Morning with a certain Smoak, which 
that Gentleman thinks , by what he took notice of , in the 
Powder that yeilded it , to have been fome Vegetable fub- 
ftance. And with this remedy in a (hort time he grew per- 
fectly well, and came home a while Once in very good health 
from a- Voyage* which the confufions of his own Country in- 
vited h m to make as far as the Eafi- Indies* This Surgeon, 
whofc name I cannot hit upon , dying fuddenly , his fecret 
C which was try 'd upon divers others betides this gentleman) 
is for ought we know, dead with him. 

{_ But as for the efficacy that may be found in appropriated 
Fumes and Steames. We have more than once by barely un- 
stopping and holding under her Nofe a f m al Phial of highly 

rectified 



Digitized 



(«4) 

rc&ified Spirit of Sal-Armoniack, or even of Harts-horn al- 
mod prefently recover' d a Young Beauty, I need not name 
to You,out of ftrange Fits that were wont to take her more 
fuddenly than thofc of the Falling Sicknefs, and werelook'd 
upon as Epileptical, though perchance they were not meerly 
fo. To which I (hall adde,that a Lady that both You,Pj/v/>£/- 
/w 9 and I know and love very wel 1, though (he have been long 
fubjecr to violent and tedious Fits of the Head- ach , and 
though that di (temper have been much increas'd by a great 
concur Hon of her Head , occafion'dby the overturning of a 
Coach , yet (he is wont prefently to be relieved , barely by 
holding her Head a pretty while over a ftrong deco&ion of 
t,and breathing in the Steames of it. "} 
And now I am difcourdng of Cures made by Steames, or 
other feenringly flight means 9 I muft not permit a thing 
of the fuddenCo remarkable, that if it were more generally known in F«- 
SE5f ro ? e 9 1 ^ ou ^ tnm ^ If fomcwhat ftrange to find it fo little 
Qunl ciyroreneded on by Phyfitians j and that is, the conftant and 
in Junt. almoft fuddain earing of the Plague, how raging foever, in 
the almoft incredibly populous City of the Grind Cayrom M- 
gypt towards the latter end of J**f 5 about which time in moft 
Countries in our Hcmifphere it is wont to fpread fafteft and 
be moft rife. The truth of this is attefted by fo many Tra- 
vellers of feveral Nations, that 'twere injurious to doubt of 
it, and not only the Dexterous Mr K.whom you well know , 
and who lived at Cayro 9 has confirm 'd to me the truth of it, 
But the Learned Profper Alpinus^ who both was an excellent 
Phyfitian, and fpent many Years in JEgypi , gives us this 
particular account of it , Peftis Cayri at que in omnibus lock 
DtMe&cini JEgypti invadere eos populos foUt intuntt Septembri men >fe , 
^^up^Kf^adJunium: his enim omnibus menfibus , a Septembri ad 
ynnium nfq\ 9 Pejlk aliunde per contagium illnc ajportata earn 
gentem invadere folet : And after a few Lines , Junio vero 
men fa qudlifcnnque & qmntacunqut fit ibt Pcftilenti f, Solepri* 

mam 



Digitized by 



C»5S) 

mim Cdncri partem ingredient e % omnini tollitur, quod ntultk 
plane divinum effe non immerito videtun Sed quod etiam v ai- 
de mirabile creditur , omnia fuppclleQilia , Pejiifero contagio 
infe&a , tunc nullam Ctintagii effeSum in earn gentem ednnt 5 
it a ut tunc ea vobk in tutijfimo & tranquillijftmo ftatu reduca- 
tur, ex fumme morbofo : atque morbiparticulares, fporadici, a 
Cr£ck vocati > tunc apperere incipiunt , qui nufquam gentium 
tempore Peflis apperebant. And in the next Chapter , inqui- 
ring at large into the caufes of this Wonder, he denyes it to 
proceed from the increafe of the Nile, which happens to be 
coincident in point of time with the extinction of the Plague, 
becaafe that the Infection ceafeth before the fwelling of the 
River is confiderable ; and afcribeth it rather to the altera* 
tion of the Air , produe'd by the Northenly Winds which 
then begin to blow, and fome other Circumstances : fpeak* 
ing of which , Use ( faith he ) per id temporis incigiunt obfer- ibidem, 
vari a quibusfortajfe non immerito caufam extinuionis Peflis 
morboSq 5 in falubrem (latum mutationk pendere arbitrer : 
quando nulla alia ax confervatricibuj caufis % quas vulgus medi- 
corum res non naturales appelht , a'ere except 0 , ibi eo tempore 
appareat , in quammorbofi ftdtus in falubrem mhtatronew re- 
fer re pojfumus : ideo neceffarium erit hujufce mutation is caufam 
Aerk mututioni accept am referre, &c. Upon this I nfta nee, 
fyrophylut, I have prefum'd the longer to infift , becaufe 
(if you duly reflect on it) you will, I fuppofe, difcern, that 
it much credits and elucidates a great part of what hath been 
delivered in divers of the foregoing Leaves, concerning the 
poffibility of Natures doing great matters againft Difeafes y 
without the help of grofs and fenGble Evacuations. 



CHAP. 



« 



CHAP. XV. 

ANd fince we have rcprefcnted a humane Body as an En- 
gine, wcftialladde, that it may be altered both tor the 
Body m ty bt better and tor the worfe 9 by fuch bare motions or impulfcs 
of external Bodies , as ad but in a grofs and confeffedly Mc- 
ah in a Grofs chanical manner : For 'tis known, that out of iucb fpeedily 
MftHmntI killing * un fef s feafonably remedy'd Diitempers, as Fits of 
Mintcr^ Swouning, Patients of either Sex ,arc often recovered with- 
pnvVbj 4. 0 ut any inward Medicine, by being barely pinch d in feveral 
ww inftgn- j } tnat jj ave endured great and dangerous Sicknefles, 

have (carce ever found any lo violent for the time, as that 
which the bare motion and fmell of a (hip and Sea Air hath 
put me intOjCfpecially in rough weather,till I was fomewhat 
accuftomed to Navigation 5 and yet this violent and weak- 
ning Sickncfs , as it was not produced by a peccant Humor 
in the Body , (bit was quickly removed by the Air , And 
Quiet of the Shore, without the help of Phyfick. And the 
like may be obferved more fuddenly in the newly mention 'd 
Inftances of thole , in whom, the bare agitation of a Coach 
will produce fuch violent Fits of Vomiting, and fuch Faint- 
nefs , that 1 have known fome of them apprehend they 
(hould prefently die, fo the bare reflation of that difcompo* 
ting motion foon relieved them. Wee fee in our Stables , 
what operation, the currying of them carefully , hath upon 
our Horfes. And Helmont fomewhere tcls us, Thathirrw 
felfe, as I remember, could by the Milk of an Afs, tell whe- 
ther (he had been that day diligently curry cd or no > and fo 
confiderable an alteration in Milk (hould.me-thinks,ftrong- 
ly argue, that a great one is in the Blood or other Juice , of 
which the Blood is elaborated , and confrquently in divers 
of the principal parts 'of the Body muft have preceded it. 
But to prefer our conGderation from the Bodies of Beafh to 

thofe 



Digitized by Google 



thofeof Men, 'tis remarkable what Pifo confeffeth , the illi- 
terate Braftlian Empericks are able to perform with Frifti- 
ons,evcn as unskilfully as they order them Mira equidem 9 
faith he, turn tuend* fanttatis ergo, cum in plerifque morbit fa- Kf/hn for: 
nandis, fraSione & unUione frequenti incoU prsfiant, ill am *! <t ' ltb : 2t 
frigidioribus, & chronicis % banc in acutioribns adhib enter. 
g)jt£ remedia lubenter advent imitantur 9 & ut par eft, ex /e. 
gibus artis bde & plura medendi Empiric or urn genera modcran- 
tur* And as Galen himfeJf highly extols a skilfull Appli- 
cation of Cupping-glaflesin the Colick^foin *r«f^/they 
find that the like Remedy is ftrangely fuccefsful : For Cho- 
lera ftcca, faith our candid Pifo in another place , cifdem fere u tm ftt , „j 
Remediis (of which he had been fpeaking) curat ur , maxim 
firtgioni hepatk comet cucurbituU applicentur. De qui bus 
merito hoc teftor, quod Galenus de Juk cucurbituU /, qua* in Co* 
lico affe&u incantamenti inft.tr operari tradtdit. 

We (hall adde, for further confirmation, that notwith- 
ftanding all the horrid Symptomes that are wont toenfue 
upon the biting of that Poyfonous Spider, the Tarantula^ 
that lafting and formidable Difcafe, which often mocks all 
other Remedies, is by nothing fo fuccefsful ly oppof d , as by 
Mufick. Some determinate tune or other* which proves fuit- 
able to the particular Nature of the Patients Body, or that If \bt 
of the Poyfon producing there fuch a motion, or deter mina- tit biwngri 
tion of fome former motion of the Spirits , or the Humors, J^JjHjJj 
or both h as by conducting the Spirits into the Nerves and tkuitiij m4k 
Mufclcs infervient to the motion of the Limbs , doth makef'* 
the Patient leap and dance till he have put himfelf into a 
Sweat that breaths out much of the virulent Matter which 
hath been probably fitted for expullion , by fome change 
wrought in its Texture or Motion 3 orthofe of the Blood, 
by the Mufick. For if Sweat and Exercife, as fiich, were all *^ 
that relieved him , why might not Sudortfic kj 5 or leaping 
Without mufick , excufc the need of ¥ idlers? which yet is 

I i fo 



Digitized by Google 



M*f*rgJib>9* fo grttt, that Kircbet informs us, That the Aputian Ma- 
€4 f 4. giftrates arc wont to give Stipends, at the publick charge, 
to fucb,to relieve the Poor by their playing. And not only 
He hath the memorable ftory of RobtrtHsTantarns^Tarantme 
Nobleman , whofe Difeafe being not known to proceed 
from the biteing of a Spider.could by noRemcdies be cured, 
he was at length, even upon the point of death, fuddenly re- 
liev'd, and by degrees reftored to perfect health by the ufe 
of Mufick : But Epiphaniu* Terdinandus^ in his accurate Ob» 
fcrvations concerning thofc bitten with the Tarantula , to- 
gether with Matbiolus 9 and other Authours bear witnefle 
thereunto, by refembling Narratives. Now that a Sound 
("not barely as a Sound, but fo modified.) may powerfully 
operate upon the Blood and Spirits , I, who am very MuU* 
cally given, have divers times obferv*d in my fclf , upon the 
hearing of certain Notes. And it might be made probable, 
both by that which we have formerly faidof the effect of 
skreaking upon the Teeth and Gums , and by the Dancing 
Fit, into which not every Mufical Sound, though never fo 
loud, but fome determinate Tune is wont to put the bit- 
ten Patient. But it may be more manifeftly prov'd, by the 
^^7^following teftimony of our inquifitive Jefuite, wherein he af- 
CfiMJgtftai firmes , That the Spiders themfclves may, as well as thofc 
fHbikk m H i th have b ittCD be made to Dance by Tunes fuited to 

their peculiar Conflitutions. * 

tarr r medium 

foiatiuma* an duV) curare confntvtrunt , cd curat pitientmm certiut ftcilinfque gccelirgndat t pri- 
mo et in}r <tk qggrtre foltnt nb't , quo loco , gut amoo , gut t*f* tolork Tgrantuia trgt , k quo morfui ip. 
fit fn infltSm. Qjn fgSo iudicgttm locum protintu, ubt frtauentet numero gtqu* muii gtnnh r«r«». 
tit'd rcttum tcKtn.hrum Uboribw mumbunt % gecedere folent Medtct CUbttradt.vgrigfuetcntgre ferment* 
arum gtntrg : ad qui mirnm it ^u, nunc has nunc iB*tfg!Utt no* fecm as Ouornm ptljcbordorttm tquglittT 
concinngtorum, perfongt»ne ill* chorda, quaftmltt fbifnmnt m«, & aqughitr tenfa mnxntur, rehquj, 
jmmotH, itg ut *ro tmUundmt ff conittioneT*.rgntu'*rum uunt bat nunc iBm ftltovt comptnunt.Cum tr- 
r , iui cokrtt Ttrawuhm qua a ptttente indtutg fuertt in f ahum ptorumptre vidsrint , pro ctrv$mo 0g* 
r0 inherit, moduUm fe bthrrt verumtf certum bumori venenoje t*&?17(o}t& prepmiongtum,*^ a J 
turgndm fptifftmumt quo ft utaxtut inftttibllm tor* tff<8*mf< (onjequi affuevtfltnt.fiiichu, Muforg* 

And 



Digitized by Google 



(*S9) 

And this I the lcfs wonder at, becaufe Efiphattiuf Ferdi- 
nands himfelf , not onely tells us of a Man of 94 Years of 
age, and fo weak that he could not goe,unlefs fupportcd by 
his Staff , who did , upon the hearing of Mufick after he was 
bitten, immediately fall a dancing and capering like a Kid j 
8c affirmes,That the Tarantulas themfelves may be brought 
to leap and dance at the found of Lutes, fmall Drums , Bag- 
pipes, Fiddles> &c. but challenges thofe that believe them 
not to come and try, promifing them an Ocular conviction: 
and adds what is very memorable and pleafant, That not 
only Men, in whom much may be afcribed to fancy , but 
other Animals,being bitten,may likewife, by Mufick, be re- 
duced to leap or dance : for he faith, He faw a Wafp, which ' 
being bitten by a Tarantula wbil'ft a Lutanift chanced to be 
by h the Mufitian playing on his Infrrumcut , gave them the 
fportof feeing both the Wafp and Spider begin tp dance- 
annexing, That a bitten Gock did the like. 

CHAP. XVL 

I Might alfo, TyrophiluS) confirm what I told you , when \&vm Ufa* 
faid, That Sicknefs may produce fuch an alteration in thet"°/'* tf 
Fabrick of the Body, as to make it capable to be very much 'y t " f 9*P* m 
affected , as well for the better as for the worfe , *by fuch « 
things that would not fcarce at all affect it if it were (bund, of particular 
from the confederation of thofe many and ft rang i^°^ r ^" M ^l^jj m 
or VtcnUarithS) to be met with in fome Perfons in Sicknefs t ^ HS 4n j ,/ 
and in Health. For though many of thefe differences be- '*« cmm\u 
twecn healthy Men, are not likely to be greater than may be JJ JJ^JjjSwj 
obferv'd between the fame man when well, and himfelf as by, 
theOcconomyofhis Body may be dif-compofed by fome 
Difremper} yet we often fee, that fome Perfons have the 
Engine of their Body fo frarnd 5 that it is wonderfully difor- 
df red by fuch things as either work not at all on others, or 

Ii 2 work 



Qjgitized by Google 



work otherwife on them : as it is common enough for Men 
to be hugely difturb'd, and fome of them to fall into Fits of 
trembling and fwouning, upon the fight or hearing of a Cat. 
And to fuch an affection I know a very eminent Comman- 
der obnoxiou?,Your late Unkle, the laft Earl of Barry more, a 
very gallant Noble Man, and who did his Countiy great 
Service in the Irifti Wars, had the like apptehenfion for 
Tanfcy. I cannot fee a Spider near me 3 without feeling a 
notable commotion in my Blood , though I never received 
harm from that fort of Creature , and have no fuch abhor- 
ring againft Viper9, Toads , or other venemous Animals. 
You know an excellent Lady (marryed to a great Perfon 
that hath more then once Govern'd Ireland) whofe Antipa- 
thy to Hony , which is much talked of in that Country, 
hath difplay'd it felfupon fcveral occafions ' notwirhftand- 
ing, which, her ex periene'd Phyfitian imagining that there 
might be fomething of deccipt in her Avcrfion, took* an 
oppertunity to fatisfie himfelf , by mixing a little Hony, 
with other Ingredients, of a Remedy which he applyed to 
a very flight and inconfiderable cut or fcratch , which fhe 
. chanced to get on her Foot , but he fbon repented of Cu- 
riofity, upon the ftrange and unexpe&cd diforder which 
his (in other cafes innocent) Medicine produe'd , and which 
ceafrng Upon the removal of that , and application of other 
ordinary Remedies, fatisfied him , That thofeSymptomes 
were to be imputed to the Hony , and not the bare hurt. 
The fame excellent Lady, I remember, complained to me, 
That when {be was troubled with Coughs , all the Vulgar, 
Pectoral and Pulmoniack Remedies did her no good, fo that 
(he could find relief in nothing but either the Fume of Povr- 
dred Amber, taken with convenient Hearbs in a Pipe , or 
that Balfdmum Sulpkurh which we have already taught you 
in this Effay. 

LI 



Digitized by Google 



1 1 know a Perfon of Quality, tall and ftrong made, who 
lately asked my Opinion , Whether , when he had need of 
a Vomit, he fhould continue to make ufe of Ca*fhy 9 in re- 
gard it wrought fo violently with him : This gave me the 
occafion, as well as curiofity, of enquiring particularly both 
of Himfelf and his Lady , concerning this odde Operation 
of Cauphy upon him b and I was told, Thar an ordinary 
Wine-glaffe full of the ufual warm decoction of Cauphy, 
boy I'd in common Water, was wont , within about two 
hours, to prove emetick with him, and before Noon did 
give him eight, ten, or fbihetimes twelve Vomits , with fo 
much violence, that he was lefs affected by the infufion of 
Crocus mtullorum^ or other ufual emc ticks , and therefore 
was deliberating whether he fhould not change Cauphy for 
fome of theny hough rinding its Operation very certaih, he 
had for fome Years accuftomed himfelf to take that Vomit : 
And that which isal(b remarkable in this matter, is, that he 
tells me, That fcarce any Vomit is more troublefome to 
him to take, then that above-mentioned is grown of late, fo 
that even the odour of Cauphy , as he pafleth by Cauphy. , 
houfes in the Street, doth make him fick $ and yet that Sim- 
ple is to moft men fo far from being Vomitive , that it is by 
eminent Phyfitians. and in fome cafes not without caufe, 
muchextoll dasa ftrcngthner of the Stomack. And this 
very Gentleman, himfelf, ufed it a pretty while againft the 
Fumes that offended his Head, without finding any Vomitive 
Quality at all in it-3 

The Books of fober and learned Phyfitians, afford us Ex- 
amples of divers fuch, and of much more ftrange Peculiari- 
ties, and likewife of fuch Perfons who having defires of cer- 
tain things very extravegant, and even abfur'd (ordinarily 
not only improper, but hurtful to their Diftempers) have 
been cured by the ufe of them, of very dangerous and fome- 
timcs hopclefs Difeafes : Of which kind of Cures I may 

alfo 



Digitized by Google 



alfoelfewhere tell you what I have obferved, and fome crc . 
dit may be brought to fuch t\cl ation s, by what we ordinari- 
ly fee more greedily devoured ( without much harm ) by 
longing Women , and Maids troubled with the Green- 
ficknefs. 

But now 5 Tyrophilus , fined the Engine of an humane 
^ ^J.^ Body thus appears to be fo fram'd, that it is capable of re- 
fill im*** ceiving great alterations from fuch unlikely things as thofe! 
ns from f*cb we h avc DCCn mentioning, Why (hould we haftily conclude 
^J^'againft the efficacy of Specificks, taken into the Body, up- 
a ^Kfnr-r«i»/fonth«bare account of their not operating by any obvious 
cllfe ^tthou- quality^ if they be recommended unto us,upon their own cx- 
nu not VZ perience by fober and faithful Perfons i And that fcarce fen- 
•bvms&ssh-ffoic quantities of matter , having once obtained accefsto 
$Jt the mafs of Blood ( which is very cafily done by the Circu^ 

lation ) may, by the contrary and fwift motion, and by the 
Figure of the Corpufcles it confifts of, give furh a new and 
unnatural impediment or determination to the motion of the 
Blood, or fo dif-compofc either its Texture, or that of the 
Heart, Brain, Liver, Spleen, or fome fuch principal part of 
the Body (as afparkof Fire reduccth a whole Barrel of Gun- 
powder , to obey the Laws of its motion , and become Fire 
too? or as a little Leaven is able 5 by degrees, to turn the 
greateft lump of Dow into Leaven) need be manifeftcd by 
nothing, but the Operations of fuch Poyfons, as work not 
by any of thofe C which Phyfitians are pleated to call) 
Mamfefl £Halttits, For though I much fear, that moft 
of thofe that have written concerning Poyfons , fuppofing 
that Men would rather believe then try what they relate, 
have allowed themfelves to deliver many things more 
ftrangc then true^yet the known efftds of a very fmall quan- 
tity o(Opinm 9 or of Arfenic 4, of the fcarce difcernable hurt 
made by a Vipers Tooth, and efpecially of the biteing of a 
mad Dog (which fomctimes , by lefs of his Spittle then 

would 



Digitized by Google 



would weigh half a Grain , fubducs a whole great Ox into 
the like madncfs, and producerh truly- wonderful Symptoms 
both in Mens Bodies and Bealts)are iufficient to evince what 
we propofcd. 

And that Man's Body may be as well (bmetimes cured, as 
we fee it too often difcompof'd, by fuch little proportions 
of Matter, may (not now to mention the queftionablc Vir- 
tues afcnb d to many Antidotes) be gathered from that Ex- 
periment, fo common in Italy and elfe where , of curing the 
in venom Yl biting of Scorpion 5, by anointing the bitten and 
tumid place with common Oyl, wherein ftore of Scorpions 
have been drown'd and freep'd. And a refembling Example 
of the Antidotal Vertue, Wherewith Nature hath enrich'd 
(bme bodies, is given us by the abovc*co mm ended Vtfo y in 
hhMe'dicittd Brafiliefiflr, where (treating of the Antidotal 
Efficacy of the famous Brafiliam Herb Nbanby % eaten upon ii$, 4 . f . 4 y; 
an empty Stomack) he adds this memorable Story ■> That 
he himfelf faw a Brdfllia*, who having caught an over-grown 
Toad, and fweli'd with Poyfon ( fuch a one as Brafilians call 
Cnntru) which ufeth to be as big again as the Enr*pean Se * *'f<*e 
Toad, and defperately venomous (which perhaps our Toads tf&Tkt'il 
arc not) he prefently killed him, by dropping on his back * Curum. " 
the Juice of the Flowers & Leaves of that admirable Plant. 
And you may remember, that the fame Authour formerly 
told us , in effeft , that as great and falutary changes may be 
produced even in humane Bodies , where he rclates,That he 
had known thofe that had eaten fcveral forts of Poyfbn, 
Snatch d, in a trice, from imminent death, by only drinking 
fome of the Infufion of the Root he calls jaborandi? and 
this, after I know not how many Alexipharmaca and Thcria- 
caS Antidotes had been fruitlefly adminiftrcd. 

You will perchance tell me, Pyr$philus , that thefe three 
or four laft Inftances are of Poyfonous Diftempers and their 
Antidotes* not of ordinary Difcafcs* and their Specifick Re- 
medies* 



Digitized by Google 



1 



f*«4> 

medies. But to this 1 have a double Anfvrer : and Firft, many 
of thole Diftempers that proceed from poy Ton, a rc really Di- 
feafes,and both call'd by that Name, and treated of, as fuch, 
by Phyfitians* And indeed they may well look upon them 
but as Difeafes,exafperated by a virulent Malignity 5 which 
yet appears to be not always eafily difHoguifhable from that 
of Diicafes that proceed not from poyfon, by this, That o- 
therwife the Phyf it i ans of Princes and great Men , if after 
having conlidered all the inward parts of their dif-boweH'd 
PatientSjCould not fo often doubt and difpute , as they do, 
whether or no Poyfon were accefiary to their death. And Pifo 
( who learn'd divers of their deteftable Secrets from the Br a- 
Jf lions) relates,That Tome of them are fo skilful in the cur fed 
Art of tempering and allaying their Poyfons, that they will 
often hinder them from difclofing their deleterial Nature for 
fo long a time,that thefubtle Murtherers do as unfufpectcd- 
ly as fatally,execute their Malice or rVevenge.Thefe Difeafes 
indeed are wont to differ in this from Surreits,aod other re- 
fembling ordinary Difeafes s that in the one> the venomous 
matter that produceth the difeafe , is at firft much more 
fmall,then in the other the morbifick Matter is wont to be. 
But the activity of this little quantity of ho (tile Matter doth 
make it pernicious, that the Diforders it produceth in the 

Body, being much greater then that of ordinary SicknelTes 
is ; the cure of fuch Diftempers is the fitter to manifeft how 

powerfully Nature may be fuccour*d,byf\.emedies that work 

not by firft or (econd Qualities, lince fuch are able to deliver 

Her from Difeafes hcightned by a peculiar and ve^ 

malignity. 

To this firft T (hall fubjoyn my "flfc 

vers Parages of the formerif 

have related concerning 

and of the K ings- E v 

nary Difeafes ( r 




ficks, as thofe produced by Poy fon are by Antidote*. 

You may alfo fay, Pyrophilus , "But what if a recommended 
Specifick,do not only feem unable to produce the promt fed Effe& y 
but have Qualities which according to our Notions of the na- 
ture of the Difeafe 9 feem likely to con/fire With it and in- 
creafe it ? 

I Artfwer, 

Firft, That though it is better for the Patient to be cu- wkttitt** 
red by a rafhly and unskilfully given Medicine , then to die *■» '** 
under the ufeof the mod skilfully adminiftred Pbyfick* yet Jgf 
that the Phyfitian who loofeth his Patient,af ter having done crufi ibt Di- 
all that his art prefcribed to fave him , deferves more com-f" /f * 
mendation then he that luckily chanceth to cure his Patient 
by an irrational courfc. And therefore in fuch a cafe as you 
pur, Vyrophilus* I think the Phifitian ought to be very well 
fatisfied to the matter of facr 5 before he venture to try fuch 
a Remedy,efpecially if more ordinary & unfufpected means 
have not been im ployed and found ineffectual j for it is not 
one lucky Cure that ought to recommend to a wary Phyfi- 
tian the ufe of a Remedy 9 whofe dangerous Quality feems 
obvious, whereas its vertue muft be credited upon Report. 

But then fecondly, If the Phyfitian be duly fatisfied of the 
efficacy of the Remedy, upon a competent number and va- 
riety of Patients, I fuppofe he may, without raflinefs, make 
ufe of fudi Remedies at leaft where ordinary Medicines have 
been already fiuitlefly try'd. 

CHAP. XVIII. " 

* 

to wonder at my daring to fay this, 
^fFer to you Three or Four Parti- 

cft to thofe that are inquifitivc , That 
Kk .the 



* Digitized by Google 



(266) 

*fffif th h " tr *e true Nature and caufes of fcverall Difeafes , arc much 
ordinary* Me- 1^ certain , and much more difputed of amongfl: the Do- 
tbod$f?by- &ors themfelves, then thofe that are not inquiiltive ima- 
^ gine : Nor is the method of curing divers particular Difeafes 
more fetled & agreed on, that depending chiefly upon the 
knowledg of thofe Caufes,which,as I was faying, are contro- 
verted. 'Tis not that I am either an enemy to Method in Pby« 
fick,or an Undervaluer of itjbut I fear the generality of Phy- 
litians (for I intend not, nor need all along this Effay fpeak 
of them all) have as yet but an imperfect Method, & have by 
the narrow Principles they were taught in the Schools, been 
perfwaded to change their Method rather to the barren prin- 
ciples of the Peripatetick School, then to the full amplitude of 
Nature. Nor do I find that Phyfitians have yet done fo fit a 
thing,as (erioufly (and with the attention which the impor- 
tance of the thing deferves) on the one tide* to enumerate 
and diftinguifti the feverall Caufes, that may any whit pro- 
bably be affign'd, how the Vh£ttomend of that disordered 
ftate of humane Body , which we call a Difcafe, or its Sym- 
ptomes , may be produced. And on the other fide, by 
how many and how differing ways the Vhtnomtn* may be 
removed, or the Difeafes they belong to deftroy 'd : And if 
this were analytically and carefully done, I little doubt but 
that Mens knowledg of the Nature and Caufes of Difeafes, 
and the ways of curing them, would be lefs circumfcribd, 
and more effectual then now it is wont to be. And I am 
apt to think,that even Methodifts would then find that there 
are divers probable.if not promifing-, MethodsCproper to di- 
vers cafes} which Ways they yet over- look : And though in 
a right fenfe it be true,that the Phyfitian is but Natures Mi-, 
nifter, and is to comply with Her , who aims always at the 
befU yet if we take them in the fenfe thofe Expreflions are 
vulgarly ufed in, Fmay elfewhere acquaint You with my 
Exceptions at them 5 8c in the mean time coDfefs to you,That 

I 



Digitized by Google 



r 




• 





(*&7) 

I know not whether they have no 
the advancement of Phyfick, fafcinating the mindesof Men, 
and keeping them from thofe effectual Courfes, whereby 
they may potently Alter the Engine of the Body^and by re&i- 
fying the motion and Texture of its Parts, both confident 
and fluid, may bring Nature to their bent , and accuftom 
Her to fuch convenient Courfes of the Blood & other Juices, 
and fuch fit times and ways of evacuating (what is noxious 
or fuperfluous &c.) as may prevent or cure divers ftub- 
born Difeafes , more happily then the vulgar Methodifts are 
wont to do. 

And indeed, it is fcarce to be expected, that till men have 
a better Knowledg of the Principles of Natural Philofophy, 
without which 'tis hard to arrive at a more comprehenfive 
Theory of the various poffible caufes of Difeafes, and of the 
contrivance and ufesof the parts of the Body, the Method 
which fuppofes this Knowledg (hould be other then in ma- 
ny things defective , and in fome erroneous 5 as I am apt to 
think 9 the vulgar method may be (hewn to be, as to fome 
particular Difeafes. Of this I may perhaps elfewhere ac- 
quaint you more particularly with my fufpitions, and there* 
fore I (hall now only mention the lafr Obfervation of this 
kind I met with, which was a Gentleman, You and 1 very 
well know , who being for fome Months much troubled 
with a difficulty or breathing, and having been unfuccesfully 
treated for it by very Eminent Phyfitians,we at laft fufpe&ed 
that 'twas not the Lungs, but the Nerves that ferv'd to move 
the Diaphragme and other Organs of refpiration , upon 
whofe diftemper this fuppos'd AfrbmA depended, & accord- 
ingly by a taking or two of a Volatile Salt of ours, which 
is very friendly to the gtnus Nervofum , he was quickly 
freed from his troublelbme diftemper, which. afterwards 
he was fully perfwaded did not proceed from any (luffing 
up of the Lungs. To be (hort , how much efteem foever 

Kk2 we 



we have for Method, yet fince that it felf and the Theories 
whereon men ground it, are,as to divers particular Difeafes, 
fo hotly diluted of j even among Eminent Phyfitians, that 
in many cafes a man may difcern more probability of the 
fuccefsofthe Remedy , then of the truth of the received 
Notion oftheDifeafe 5 In fuch abftrufe cafes me-thinks it 
were not amifs to refleft upon that reafoning of the Ancient 
Empericks ("though on a fomewhat differing occafion) which 
is thus fomewhere expres d by Celjus : Neqxefe dicere con- 
filio nsedienmnon egere , & irrationabile Animal haneattem 
pojfe prsflare 5 fed has latentium reruns conje&uras ad rem non 
pcrtinere^ia non interjtt,quid morbumfacidtjed quid tollat. 
And as the controverted Method in the abovemention'd 
Difeafes is not yet eftabliftiedor agreed on in the Schooles 
themfelves, fo divers of thofe that are wholly ftrangers to 
thofe Schools , do yet by the help of Experience and good 
Specificks,and the Method their Mother- wit does, according 
to emergencies, prompt them tqtake, perform fuch confide- 
rable cures, that Vifo (ticks not to give this Teftimony to 
the utterly Unlearned Brajilian Empericks. Interim , fays 
stiff. N<t. frhe, fen/ores & cxercitatiores eximii font Botanic i , j*ciliq$ 
jftrrALift. z> m g 0 ti 0 omnis generis medtcamina ex nndiquaqs in fylvis con- 
qutfitis conficiunt m gu£ tantafagacit ate interne & externe 
ilios adhiberc videas-> pracipue in morbis e veneno natis, ut quis 
iUorum manibus tutrus & Jecuritst fe tradat , quam mtdicaflris 
tsoflris fciolis , qui f creta qu<cdam in umbra nata atque educate 
enpant perpctuo , & ob has Rationales dicivolunt. 

Secondly, There are divers Medicines, which though 
they want not fomeone quality or other, proper to enexcafe 
the Difeafe, againft which they are adminifh'd , are yet con- 
fidently us'd by the moft judicious Doftors, becaufe that 
they .ire foinrich d with other qualities, whereby they may 
do much more good then thtir noxious quality can do harm? 
as in a Malignant Feavcr » though the diftemper be Hot,and 

though 



• Digitized by Google 



( a« 9 ) 

though Treacle and forae other Antidotal Sudorificks be hot hjianeet tf 
alfo,yetthey areufefully adminiftrcd in fuch Difeafes, be- {^TJelZ 
caufe the relief they bring the Patient by oppugning the Ma- dtmifi f*r 
lignity of the peccant matter, and perhaps by eafing him of s * x '* m an ^ d 
fomt of it by fweat, is more confiderable then the harm they vf e f7v!" 
can do him, bj^ncreafing for a while his Heat. 

The very experienced Boutins , Chief Phyfitian to the 
Dutch Plantation in the Eaft- Indian in his Methodtts medendi 
Indica, Treating of the Spafmus 9 which ("though here unfre- dp. 2, 
quent,) he reckons among the Endemical Difeafes of the 
jW/e/ 5 commends the life of guircet anus's Landanumpf rhy- 
loncum ,and principally of an extraft of Opium and Safron 9 
which he defcribes and much Extols } and leaft his Readers 
fhould fcruple at fo ftrange a prefcription , he adds this me- 
morable paflage to our prefent purpofe. Fortafps ( faies he ) 
Sciolut quifpiam negabit his remcdik , propter vim flupif*8i- 
vam ac narcottcam nervifq\ inimicam , efe utendum. Speciofa 
qui dew hac prima front e videntur fed t amen vana funt % Nam 
prtterquam quod calidiffima hujus Climatis temperies re- 
qttirat, certtfftmum eft in tali neccjfitatei fine his aJgrum cva* 
derenonpojfe. Adde quod nos tarn rite Opium hie prtparamut ut 
vel infanti innoxie detur : & fane (ut verbo abfolvam) fi Opia* 
ta hie nobk deeffent in morbis calidis his grdffantibus fruftra 
1 re media adhiberemus quod etfi imperitis durum ex progreffu ta- 
.men me nihil tcmere dixifie patebit. 

The drinking freely, efpecially if the Drink be cold Wa- 
ter, is ufually (and in moll cafes, nor without much reafon.-J 
ftri&ly forbidden, as very hurtfull for the Dropfie , and yet 
thofe th.n frequent the Spaa^ tell us of great cures perform'd 
by pouring in plenty of Waters into the patients already 
diftended Bellv i and I know a perfon of great Qu rrfity •» and 
Vertue, who being by an obftinate Dropfie, befides a com- 
plication of otrtT formidable Difeafes, brought to a defpe- 
rate condition, was advisd to Drink Innbridg Waters ^ when X- • 

happn'd 

I • 

I t • Digitized by Google 



C*7<0 

happn'd to be there,by her very skilful Phyfitian : Who told 
me, that the Do&ors having done all (heir Art could direct 
them unto in vain, (he would be curd by Death, if (he were 
not by thefe Waters; from whence Cthe weather proving ve* 
ry feafonable for that fort of Phy lick) (he return 'd in fo pro- 
sperous a condition of recovery^sexadrxd b|g> his and my 
wonder.That the Dcco&ion of fo heating a Simple as Gusja* 
would be lookt upon by the generality of Phyfitians, 
both Galemfts SiChymifis^s a dangerous Medicine in Phthi- 
oftbeVU »/fical and other Confumptions, you will eafily grant : and yet 
aSSSS^u fomc cmincnt Phyfitians, and (particularly Spaniards') tell us 
*ni Mercary of wonderful cures they have perform'd in defperate Ulcers 
for Piifyti. Q f t h e Lungs,by the long ufe of this Decoftion,not withftand. 

ingits manifeftly and troublefomely heating Quality. And 
I know a Phyfitian eminently learn'd, and much more a Me- 
thodift, then aChymift, who allures me, that he has made 
trial of this unlikely way of curing Confumptions with a 
fuccefs that has much recommended thefe Paradoxical Spa- 
niard to him. Tis alfo bcliev d, and not without ca ufe, 
by Phyfitians, that Mercury is wont to prove a great enemy 
to the Genus Hcrvofum^ and often produces Pal fey s 5 and other 
diftempers of the Brain in the Nerves: and yet one of the 
exa&eft and happieft -Methodifts I know,has contend to me, 
that Mercurial preparations are thofe which he ufes the 
moft fuccesfully in Partlyiical and the like diftempers ofc 
what Phyfitians call i he Gtnns ttervejum. And on this occa- 
fion, 1 remember that a Gentlewoman being confin'd to her 
Bed by a Dead Palfey, that had feiz'd on one fide of her Bo- 
dy, a Phyfitian eminent for his Books and Cures, giving 
her a dofc of a certain Preparation of Mercury , corrc&cd 
with a little Gold , which I put into his hands for that 
purpofcjWas pleafed to bring me word, that by the firft tak- 
ing of the Powder, which wrought but gently by Siege 
• without either Vomits or Salivation, (he was enabled the 

fame 



Digitized by Google 



(a 7 0 

fame or the next day to quit her Bed , and walk about the 
Room. 

Thirdly, there are many things which fcem to be againft 
reafon, whileft they are barely propofd and not prov'd, for 
which we afterwards difcern very good reafon : when ex- 
periences, having fatisfied us they are really true , has both 
invited us, and alfifted us to enquire into their caufes.Of this 
we have elfewhere given divers not Medical InftanCes in our 
ESSAY Concerning improbable truths ; And I could ea- 
fily enough, if I durft be tedious , give you fome Medical 
Uluftrations of the fame truth. But I dare now only invite 
you to confider this one thing, which may be of great ufe to 
explicate many others, both in Natural Philofcphy , and in 
Phyfick too, which is, That there are divers Concrets, fome 
of them, as toSenfc, Similar , or Homogeneous 9 whofe differ- rbtt there are 
ing parts are endow "d with very differing and fometimes con- 
contrary Qualities* And this not only appears in the Ghy- falhrnbfe 
mical Analyhs of Bodies made by the fire , where the dugere** p*rt$ 
difference of what Chymifts call the feperated Principles of ^JJ""'?^ 
Concretes is often very manifeft and great, but cv o in di- Rhubarb w 
vers Bodies that have not beenrefolv'd by the violence ofoyioiire. 
the Fire s as is evident in Rhubarb taken in fubrtance, whofe 
fubtiler parts are purging , and its terreftrial aftringent : 
Nay, if thofe parts which do in much the leffe quantity con* 
curre to the conftitutiou of the concrete do but meet with a 
Body difpos'd to receive their Impre (Eons, it is very pofli- 
ble, that they may work more powerfully on it then the o- 
thcr Parts of the fame Concrete, of which the Eye judge t h it 
altogether to confifh 

This I have made out to fome ingenious Men,by {hewing, 
that though Sailer Oyl be generally reputed to confift of Fat 
and Undnous Particles, and therefore to be a great re- 
fiftcr of Corrofion ; yet it containes in it Qiarp and piercing 
parts.which meeting with a difpofed fubjcd,do more power- 

fuHy 

Digitized by Google 



(*7*) 

fully operate than the more purely Oleaginous ones. Ai 
we endeavoured to cvince,by keeping for a fhort while in a 
gentle warmth , fome pure Oyl-Olive , upon a quantity of 
Filings of even crude Copper : For from them the Liquor 
extracted an high Tin&ure betwixt Green and Blew, like 
that which fuch Filings would have given to Diftill'd Vine- 
ger, which according to Chymifts Notions obtains that Co* 
lour , by making with its Acid and Corrofive Salt a real fo- 
lution of fome part of the Copper , as may appear by therp- 
coverablenefle of the mettal out of it. Another proof or two 
of the Acrimony of fome of the parts of Oyl we may elfe- 
where give you. But now we (hall rather confirme our An- 
fwer to your Qiieftion , by two or three Examples of Cures 
perform'd by unlikely Remedies. 
ofimmbd' I went once to vifi| an Ingenious Hclmontim 9 whom I 
bit cures y'xzt found Sick on his Bed, and having, by the Symptomes of his 
b\ uuda- Difeafe, difcern'd it to be a Plurify \ I talked with him of fea* 
rum opU- fonably opening a Veine, but he was refolv'd againft it, and 
tum- told me he would cure himfelfe by a remedy, which af firft 
feems as likely to encrcafe fuch a difeafe as Phlebotomy is 
to cure it, namely by the ufe of Helmonts Laudanum Op- 
0tum 9 which in crTecl: did in three or four days cure him, and 
(ince, he, without Blood letting, cur'd fome others with it 5 
which I the lefle wonder at, ( becaufe of my having obfervd 
. that Opium ( with which unskilful men feldome tampar with* 
our danger ) ifduely corrected and prepared, proves fome- 
timesa great refolver,and commonly a great Sudorifick; in- 
fomuch,ihat I have known it make a perfon copioufly fweat, 
who often complain'd to me , that other Diaphoreticks had 
no fuch operation on him. 

I hive oftentimes fecn Coughs ftrangly abated by the 
ufe of a Remedy, which I have not long fince told you, how 
I prepare: & with which (I remember) In a pretty Child you 
(Pjrropbjtlus ) know,and who is now very well,l was fo happy. 

as 



Digitized by Google 



tm ) 

as to rcprcffe in a few Hou res a violent Cough,that threat- of . . 
nedher withfpeedy Death h and yet thib Medicine has fo cLtbTtfd 
eminent a faltnefs , that the Tongue, can fcarce fuffcr it* and Ctafimftwv 
how much the ufe of Salt things is by many Phyfitians con- Jif^'"' Mt ' 
demn*d in Coughs ( and indeed in many cafes not without 
Rcafon ) I need not tell You. And with exceedingly piercing 
Effence or Spirit of Mans Blood, I have known , not with- 
(landing its being very Saline, and its manifeftly heating the 
Patient, cfpecially forthefirft Four or Five days, ftrange 
things perform'd even in a deplorable and hereditary Con- 
fumption. This, Pyroplylur, brings into my mind, fome- 
thing, that, it may be,you will think oddc, which is, that ha* 
ving had occafion fo advife for a Pcrlon of high quality,with 
a very ancient Galermt , that in his own Country was look'd 
upon as almoft an Oracle , and particularly in reference to 
Phthifical Confumptions, which was there a vulgar Difeafe; 
Hecorrfefied to me, that though his having fallen into it 
himfelfe, made him very folicitous to find a cure forit h and 
though he had in his long and various pra&ifc, made trial o£ 
great variety of Methods and Remediesibr the cure of that 
Difeafe, yet that with which hecur'd himfelfe,& afterwards 
the generality of his chief Patients, was principally Sulphur 
melted and mingled in a certain proportion to make it fit to 
be taken 3 in a Pipe, with beaten Amber or a Cepbalick Herb. 
The particular circumfrances of his Mefbod I cannot now fet 
you down , not having by me the Paper wherein they were 
Noted* but, if I mifrake not, the Herb, with which he 
mingl'd the Brimfrone of Flower of Sulpbur^was Coltsfoot Cru ' IHg 
or Betony* and I well remember, that what he look'd upon rbthificitcon 
as thecheif and fpecifick Remedy in his way of curing, wasfj^JJ* 
the fmoak of the Sulphurjhe other ingredients being added, Sma ^/Sul- 
not fo much for their being proper enough for the Difeafe,asP hur * 
their helping to fill the pipe, and thereby to allay the pun- 
gency, where with the Sruoak, if afforded by a Pipe filld wirh 

LI. Brimftonc 



Digitized by Google 



Brimftooc alone , would be qualify'd. But yet this Sulphu- 
reous Smoak is fo predominant in the Remedy , that he us'd 
to have a Syrrup in readinefs to relieve thofc, whom the A- 
crimony of the Fumes fhould make very fore , and perhaps 
blifler on the one fide of their Meuths,or Throats,which ac- 
cident he provided for, by that cooling and healing Syrnip 
without being thereby difcouragcl from profecuting the 
cure with the kmc Remedy $ wherewith a pcrfon very Cu- 
rious and Rich,has folemnly alTurd mc,that hiir felf has cur'd 
divers Confumptions, and particularly in a Lady, even in 
health very Lean , that he nam'd to me, as being one I then 
knew. Now we know that Phyfitians generally, and in moft 
cafes juftly, forbid Acid things to thofe that have exulcera- 
ted or tender Lungs, and how highly Acid and piercing the 
Smoak of Sulphur is, the Chymifts can beft tell you, who, 
by catching it and condenfing it in Glafles fhap'd almoft 
like Bells , obtain from it that very corrofivc Liquor , which 
readily diflblves Iron, being the very fame that is commonly 
calTd oleum Sulphur is per catxp&nam 5 and yet it feems that 
either the Theory *of Confumptions is mrhmderfrood or 
that the drying quality of the Sulphureous ftcam , and its 
great power to refift putrcfadion,and as it were embalm the 
Lungs and fcafon the Blood, are coafiderable enough to ac- 
cou nt for the Harm which its Acidity may do. 

Eeles are focomrtonly eaten by perfons of both Sexes 
without being taken notice of for any Quality, except their 
r* »f r C l udii ? > * at one would fcarce bel*cvc fuch a (linking and 
STSUi odious Medicine, as that of their Livers and Galls dried 
•ni Gdits «/ flowly in an Oven,fhould be more proper for any t hin g t ban 

itlhttbl to make the takcr Vom,t ' and ? et Helm °»t in divers places 
t>*Td Labw fp^ks °* l h c Medicine as if it had kept multitudes of YVo- 
tf tromtn. men from dying of hard Labour. And fince him, PdnsraU 
m his New Obfervations highly extols k. And I knew a 
very famous Emperick , who had very few other fecrets,and 

fcarce 



Digitized by Google 



fcarce any one fo great to get reputation and Money by. 
A ad I remember alfo, That fo m e years force I bad occafion 
to give it to the Wife of a very ingenious Phyfit ian, of whom 
the Midwives and her Husband al mod defpair 'd,and ( as Qig 
afterwards told me her felfe ) each Dofe made her throwes 
("which before had left her ) return, and at length (he was" 
fafcly delivered, (he fcarce knew how. But I found double* 
the Dofe prefcrib'd by Helmont , requifite to be ufed at laft* 
and that the quantity of a Wal-nut of the Powder of thefe 
Livers given in Rhcnifh or White- wine, and when the Sto- 
mack was moft empty 9 was no more than fuch a cafe re- 
quired. 

Scerpfcns being Venomous Creatures, to fuffocate and T f, e uniity 
infufe them in Oyle, might feem the way to make it Poyfo- Cm ofy e - 
nous 5 if experience did not aflure us , that this Oyl is fo far 
from being fuch, that it Cures the invenom'd bitingsof 8 
Scorpions , which effec~r 5 now tnat the Phyfitians find it upon 
trial to be true , they confefle to be rat ion a U and afcribe it, 
how juftly I now examine not,to the attraction of the Poy fon 
ifceiv'd into the Body, by that which is outwardly applied 
to the hurt. And Pifo informes us that amongft the Brajslians^ 
whofe country is fo much infefted with Venomous Crea- 
tures, Vis the moft general Cure to draw out the Poy fon by 
applying to the hurt the Beaten Body of theBeaft that gave 
it. As likewife in Italy 9 they account the crulhing of the 
very Scorpion^hat has bit a Man,upon the bitten place, for a 
moft fpeedy and effectual Remedy And I remember that 
herein England the Old man, whom you havefeen going a- 
bout with Vipers , Toada , &c # to fejl, told me that when he 
was dangeroufly bitten by a Viper&nd all fwel'd by the Poy- 
fon of it$a great part of his cure was tl e outward application 
of Venomous Creatures ftamp'd 'till they were brought to 
a Confidence fit for that purpofe. 

The Flnxes are the general and Endcmical Difeafesm 

L 1 2 IreLnd, 



(*70 

Ireland,! need not tell you* and yet I remember , that have- 
ing occafion to confult the ancienteft: and moft expericnc'd 
Phyfitian of that Nation. Dr F. about the cure of it, he 
affur'd me, that though during his very long Practice he 
had found divers Remedies very profperous > fornc on one 
fort of Patients, and fome on another h Yet the Medicine 
he molt relied on , was this. To takeunfalted Butter, and 
boil it gently 'til a pretty part was confum'd h Skimming 
f it diligently from time to time, whU'ftitftands over the 
iffrrjbbmlr 5 an d « tD > s Butter melted, to give now and then a con- 
melted. hderable quantity 9 according as the Patient is able to bear it. 

A R.emedy,which,at the firlt propofal,may fecm more likely 
to put a man into a Flux , than to cure him of one. And 
yet the fame rvemcdy,which he fuppos'd to benefit by mi- 
tigating the (harp humours,and preserving the Entrals from 
their Corrofion.was afterwards much commended to me by 
another Ancient Info PhyfitiSn, who was efteemed among 
the Doctors the next inEminency to him that I have named. 

CHAP. XIX. 
Should not here,P;r0/>6//*r 5 adde any thing to what I have 
already faid above in favour of the ufeof evenodde 
Specificks , bur, that finding at every turn , that the main 
thing, which does ( really or in pretence ) prevail with ma- 
ny Learned Phyfitians ( efpecially in a famous Univerfity 
You have vifited abroad ) to reject Specificks, is, That they 
cannot clearly conceive the diftindt manner of the Specificks 
working^ think it utterly improbabic,that fuch a Medicine 
which muft paffe through Digeftions in the body, and be 
whirled about with the Mafs of Blood to all the parts,ftiou!d, 
neglecting the reft, (hew ft felfe Friendly to the Brain(for in- 
ftancej or the Kidnies,and fall upon this or that Juiceor Hu- 
mour rather thao any other . But to this Objection which 
1 have propos'd as plaufible as I can readily make it,I (hall at 
pref^nt but briefly offer, according to what has been hither- 
to difcouis'dj thefe two things. And 



i 



Digitized by Google 



C *77 ) 

And firft , I would demand of thtfeobje&ors a clear and 
fatisfacWy, or at lcaft an intelligible explication of the man- jH'Ji^ 
ner of working of divers other Medicaments that doc not §*\*ithgitu 
pafle for Specificks* as how Rhubarb Purges Choler , and of 
Hcllebor Melancholly rather than other Humours, how fome [/ ei^T 
Medicines that have endur'd a ftrong fire , as Antimomnm »ni«bv 
Viaphoreticunt , and Bezoirdicum miner alt well made, are JSS,*' 
yet often times ftrongly Sudorifick$ why the infufion of Cro- which *t not 
cms Atttallorum or of Glafle Antimony , though it acquire Jfc^'J* 
no pungent, or fo much as manifeft taft, whereby to velicate * . ' 2 1 ' 
the Palate or the Tongue , are yet violently both Vomitive 
and Cathartick h And how Mercury , which is innoxioufly 
given in many cafes Crude to Women in labour and others, 
doeseafily acquire , befides many other more abftrufe Me- 
dicinal Qualities , not only an Emetick or Purgative , but 
a Salvating faculty. For I confefle, that to me,even many of 
the vulgar Operations of common Drugs feem not to have 
been hitherto intelligibly explain'd by Fhyfitians , who are 
yet, for ought I have obferv'd, to feek for an account of the 
manner, how Diureticks, how Sudorificks, how Sarcoticks, 
and how many other familiar forts of Medicincs,which thofc 
that confider them (lightly are wont to think they un- 
derhand throughly^perform their operations. Nay, 1 much 
quefrion > whether the generality of Phyfitians can yet give 
us a fatisfaclory account , why any fort of Medicine purges 
in general: And he that in particular will (hew me,where ci- 
ther the Peripatetick or Galenical Schools, have intelligibly 
made out, why Rhubarb does particularly purge Choler, and 
Senna more particularly phlegm, erit mm magnus Jpollo.Vot 
I fee not how from thofe narrow 8c barren Principles of the 
four Elements, the four Humours, the four firft Qualities 
(an#thelike} ) ErTeftsjfar Jeffeabftrufethaathe Operations 
of Purging Medicines, can fatisfa&orily be deduc'd.Nor can 
I fiodjthat any thing makes thofe Phvfitiansj that are unac- 
quainted 



Digitized by Google 



07«) 

quainted with the philofophy that explains things by the Mo- 
tk>ns,Sizes, and Figures of little Bodies, imagine they under* 
(bod the account upon which fome Medicines are Purgative, 
others Emetkk 5 (5v. And fome purgative in fome Bodies, Vo* 
mitire in other,8c both purgative and Vomitive in mofe but 
becaufe they never attentively enquire into it. 
But (which is the next thing 1 have to rcprefeht) if we duly 
make ufe of thofe fertile 8c comprehenfive'prmpiples of phi- 
lofophy,the Motions,Shapes, Magnitudes and Texture of Mi- 
nute parts of Matter? it will not perhaps be more difficult to 
(bew 5 at lead in general, that Specificks may have fuch opera* 
tions,as are by the judicious 8c experienc'd a fcrib'd to them, 
then it will be for thofe that acquiefce in the vulgar princi- 
ples of phil ofophy and phyfick 3 to render the true Reafons of 
the mod obvious and familiar operations of Medicines. And 
though the fame objection that is urg'd to prove, that a Spc- 
cifick cannot befriend the kidnies^fbr examplc,or the Throat 
rather than any other parts of the Body, lies againft the no- 
xioufnefs of poy fons to this or that determinate parts Yet ex- 
perience manifefts that fome poyfons do refpett fome parti- 
cular part of the Body, without equally ( if at all fenfibly ) 
offending the reft: and we fee that Catitharida in a ctrtaine 
Dofeare noxious to the Kidnies and Bladder, Quickfilver to 
the Throat, and the glanduls thereabout* , Sirammomum 
That ?o,foMt to the Brain , and Opium to the Animal Spirits and 
*2SS Gems NervojHw. And if you call to mind , what we have 
P plruand formerly deduced to make it out , That a Humane body is 
therefor* M* 2n Engine, and the Medicines operate in it as finding it fo$ 
dutnet m t ) d$ we nee( j not thmk if ^ o n^ ran g e ^ at t nere i^e^g manyStrain- 

ers, if I may fo call them, of differing Textures, fuch as the 
. Liver,Splcen,and Kidnies,and perhaps divers local Fernjgm s 
redding in particular parts, and a Malic of blood continually 
frreaming through all the parts of the body, a Medicine may 
be quickly, by the blood, carried from any one part to any 

other 



Digitized by Google 



(*79) 

©ther, and the Blood, or any Humour mingl'd with it,may 
be as cafi ly carried to the Medicine , in what parts foever it 
be$ and the Remedy thus admitted into the Maflc of Blood , 
may 5 i n its paflage through the Strainers , be fo alter'd, either Gatntntlb 
by leaving fome of its parts there, or by having them alter'd ^Znjm 
by the abovemention'd Ferments* or by being aflbciated theft opera- 
with fome other Corpufcles, it may meet within its paflage h SSy 
whereby the Size, or Figure,or Motion of in fmall parts may pntttf 
be chang'djorjin a word,it may by fome of thofe many other 
ways, which might, if this E S S A Y were not too Proli* 
already Jbe proposed and deduc'd, receive fo great an Altera- 
tion , in reference either to fome or other of the Strainers 5 
or other firmer parts of the Body , or to the diftempcr'd 
Blood, or fome other fluid and peccant matter, that it needs 
not feem impoflible, That by that time the Medicinc(crum« 
bl'dasit were in Minute Corpufcles ) arrives at the p*rt 
or bnmom to be wrought upon , it may have a notable Ope-» 
ration there. I mean Part,* s well as Humour , bccaufc the 
Motion^ Size, or Shape of the Medicinal Corpufcles in the 
Blood, though not bv fenfe diflinguifhable from the reft of 
the Liquor they help to compofe, may be fo conveniently 
qualify 'd } as to rfiape,bulk,& motion }as to reftore the Strains 
crs to their right Tone or Texture , as well as the Blood to 
its free and Natural courle? by refolving and carrying away 
with them fuch tenacious matt*r,as ftuffd or choak'd up the 
flendcr paflagcs of the Straincr^or at Icaft Sraitned its pores, 
or vitiated their Figure 5 And the fame Sanative Corpufcles 
may perchance be alfo fitted to flick to,8c thereby toftreng- 
then fuch Fibres of the Strainers, or fuch other firmer parts 
of the body, as may need congruous Corpufcles to fill up 
their little unfupply'd Cavities. 

Meats that are Salr,and Tartareous,whilft they are whirl- 
ed about in the Mafs of blood, may by the other part of that 
Vital Liquor be fo diluted and kept afunder(o,as not to be 

offeniive 



Digitized by Google 



■ 



offcnfive to any part: When they come to be fcparatedby 
the Parcnchym* of tbeKidnics,from thefwceter parts of the 
Blood t that did before temper and allay them^fhey eafily,by 
their Saline purgency, offend the tender Ureters and Mem- 
branous Bladders of thofe that are troubl'd with the Stone or 
Strangurie. And pftrchance 'tis upon fomc fuch account , 
that Cantbaridet are more noxious to the Bladder than to 
other parts of the Body. And as Salt meat thus growes 
peculiarly offcnfive to the Reincs and Bl adder} fo a Specifick, 
difpos'd to be diffolv'd, after a peculiar manner, may, in the 
Body, either preferve or acquire t as to its Minute parts , a 
freindlycongruity to the Pores of the Kidnics , Liver , or 
other Strainers equally , when diftemper'd j as I formerly 
obfertfd to You, that New- milk fwcetned with Sugar- 
candy , though it be no* wont fenfib/y to affeft any other 
part of the Body, nor would have fenfiblv affe&ed the Kid- 
jiiesthemfclves, had they not been diforderd , yet after the 
troublefome operation of Cantharidej, it had a very freindly 
effect upon the diftemper'd Parts $ Thus a Specifick 
for one Difeafe , may be refolved in the Body into Mi* 
nute particles of fuch Figure and Motion , that being fit to 
ftick to other Gorpufclcs of peccant matter, which,by their 
vehement agitation, or other offcnfive qualities difcompofe 
the Body and make it Feavourifh, may allay their vehement 
Motion , and by altering them, as to bignefs and (hape,give 
them new and innocent qualities 3 infteadof thofe noxious 
ones they had before. 

Another Specifick may diffolve the Gro fs and Slimy 
Humours that obftruct the narrow pa ffages of the Veines j 
as I have obferv'd that Spirit of Harts^horn, which power- 
fully opens other obftru&ions, and refolves fluffing Phlegm 
in the Lungiowill alfo, though more (lowly, refolve prepar'd 
Flowers of Sulphur, crude Copper, and divers other Bodies? 
and alfo it may , by mortifying the Acid Spirit that often- 
times 



Digitized by Google 



08iJ 

tunes caufcs coagulations in the Blood, reftore that Vita! 
Liquor to its Fluidity and free Circulation , and thereby re- 
move divers formidable Difcafes, which feem to proceed 
from the Coagulation. or Ropineflkof the Bloods and on the 
other fide,the Minute parts of fome. Specificks againfr a con- 
trary Difeafe, may fornewhat th<ckcn and fix ihetwo thin 
and agitated parts of the Blood , or of Tone peccant matter 
in it , by aflbciating themfelves therewith: as trie nimble 
parts of pure Spirits of Wine, and thofe of high re&ify'd 
Spirit of Urine,will concoagulatc into Corpufclcs,bigger and 
far leG, Agile . ' And the fame Spirit of Wine it feffe , with 
another Liquor I make , will prefently concoaguktc into a 
kind of foft | but not fluid Subfrance. Nor is it fo hard to 
conceive that a Specifick may work upon a determinate part 
or Humour , and let the others alone : as if you put, for In^ffST 
fiance, an Egge into ftrong Vineger, the Liquor will operate ntt up* the 
upon, and diOblve all the hard mell 5 and yet leave the tender ^Tl^h 
skin untouch'dsAnd if you caft Coral into the common recti- /jfe itjfZus 
fy'd Spirit of Tartar , the far greater part of the Liquor ,°/jjj™M' : 
though ftrong and fpirituous, will remain unalter'd thereby, lfW ' 
and may be, inte^rhviribus^ abftrafred from itjbut the Co- 
ral will prefently find out,or rather be found ont by Acid or 
Acetuous Particles, and by incorporating it felfc with them, 
take away their Charpnefs : as infome cafes Coral has been 
obferv'd to do to Sower Humours abounding in Humane 
Bodies , thofe Humours being eafily., by the Circulating 
Blood, brought (in their paflage^) to the CoraI,whilft it per- 
haps remains in the Stomack or Guts. And though the 
circulation of the Blood be fufficient to bringdittle by little, 
the Acid Particles of that Liquor in its paflages through 
the vefTclsto Work upon Coral 5 yet in other Medicines the 
Operation may be more nimblerThe Remedy quickly d fFu- 
fing it felfe through the Mafs of Blood , to feek ■> as it were , 
anddeftroy the Acid parts 5 whkhit meets with blond td with i 
• Mm the 



(a80 

the reft of the Liquor 5 as Spirit of Urine being infrcad of 
Coral put into the above mentioned Spirit of Tartar will not 
C that I have obferv'd ) fallen it felfc to the Spirituous nor 
the Phlegmatick parts of the Liquor , but only to the Acid 
ones, which it will Mortifte or deprivcof their Sowerntfs by 
concoagulating wiih them. And I fee not why it fbou Id 
be more inconceivable that a Specifick fliould have a pecu- 
liar Vcrtue to free the Body from this or that peccant Hu- 
mour , and a benign congruity to the diftemper'd Spleen or 
Liver, then that tome Cathartick fliould purge Elcdively, 
and fome Antidotes have peculiar Venues againft fuch Poy* 
fons , whofe Malignity particularly invades the Brain or 
kidncis^or fome other determinate partahe.forrrer of which 
the Phyfitians, we rcafon with, fcruple not to reacts and the 
latter of which is taught us not by them only, but by Expe- 
rience too. 

S Of the credibility of Specificks, and of the Efficacy even 
bmc unlikely ones, wee might eafily enough prefent You 
# with more Proofs and Examples But thefe may poffibly 
be fufficicnt for our prefent purpofes cfpecially if yog daily 
confider, that as Phyfick has ow'd its beginning to Expe- 
Tbit WjfAricnce, fothofe that pra&ifcit muft enlarge and rc&ifie their 
fiMtat t P rmc *P lcs according to the new difcoveries, which arc made 
h muff be tu- from time to time of the Operations and Power of the pro- 
Ur S i'j d ^u&ions whether of Nature or of A rt. This confideration 
fc$m%k+ 1 thought -to infift upon in my own Expereffions* but find- 
vaies of e»- ing lately the fame Notion which 1 had , to have been long 
Iftittft. g nce t |j at 0 f tnc ancient Empricks , I will fumme up what 
• I meant to fay in their words, as I find them wirtily deliver d 
by Ce//*/ 3 in that excellent Preface, where having fpokenia 
their Senfe of the Origin of phydck, He continues Sic Mc- 
dicift am ortam , fubinde altorum filutt alurum inUritu ftrni- 
ciofa difcerrtetttcm a falutaribni : Repertii deinde Mzdicintrv 
mdiit, homines de ratiombus coritm dijferere cefijfc 5 nccpefi 

Rati one n 



Digitized by Google 



■ 



Rationent, Medic warn effe invent am $ fed poft invent am Medici* 
nam, Rationem ejfe quafitam. And leaft the roiftaken name 
of Emperick (hould make you undervalue fo ufeful a Con- 
(ideration,which not the nature of their Scdc , but that of the 
thing, fuggefted to thenr-> I (hall ad^Je in favour of what we 
have delivered concerning experienced , though othcrwife 
unlikely Remedies , that 'tis a fentence afcrhVd to Arijlotle 
( and in my opinion > one of the beft that is afcrib'd to him,) 
Vbt res conft At ;fi opinio adverfttur ret 9 qutrendaM rationem 
non rem ignorandam. ^ 

And certainly, fyrpphilu^ though there be fcarce any fort 
of men , whofe credulity may doc the World more mifchief 
than that of Phy fitians j yet perhaps,neit her nature nor man- 
kind is much beholden to thofe, that too rigidly,or narrow* 
Iy 9 circumfcribe, or confine the operations of Nature , and 
not fo much as allow themfelves or others to try whether it • 
be poffible for Nature excited and manag'd by Art to per- 
form divers things which they never yet faw done , or work 
by divers ways , differing from any , which by the common 
principles that are taught in the Schools,they arc able to give 
a fatisfaftory account of. 

To the many things which you may be pleafed to apply to 
• thispnrpofe, out of the precedent Difcourfe, divers others 
may be added, if without tiring you, they may be now infi- 
xed on. It would fcarce have been believed fomeages • 
fince , by thofc that knew no other than Vegetable purges 
andVomits,that a Cup made of a Concrete,infuperable by 
the Heat of Humane Stomacks fhould,by having for a while, 
Wine or any fuch other Liquor,barely powr'd on it to make 
an infudon , without any fcnfible diminution of its own 
bulk or weight,and without any fenfible alteration made in 
the Colour, Tafr,or Smell of the Winc^cotnmunicate to it a 
ftrongly Einetick and Catharrick Vertuc , and prove often- 
times Vomitivcjcv'n when put up in the Ciyfters3& yet that 

M m 2 this 

» * 



Digitized by Google 



tfeis is performablc by Antimony , (lightly prepared with 
Thtttketyt- Salt peter, or withcnit addition, melted into a Tranfparent 
ftiwfibe Giafs , it commonly known to thofc that are not Strangers 
cl^ohfftf to the Operations of the Antimonial Cup , and of the Glafs 
Amimooy made of the fame Mineral. And much more ftrange is that 
Mcraiionim, wn ^ cn * s affirmed by inquifitive Phyfitians upon their own 
would n$t ' Trial of the common Crocus Mitallorum ^ or fomewhat cor- 
h di-liT "* rt< ^ ec * Antimony wont to be fold in Shops , namely, That a 
few Drachmes of it , infus'd into fome ounces-of Wine, will 



make the Liquor work fo ftrongly,as if fix or eight times the 
quantity had been fteep'd in it. 

Thofe that believe that all Diaphoreticks muft confiftof 
fubtlc , fapid and fugitive parts , as if only fuch were eafily 
feparated from each other , and agitated by the gentle heat 
of a Humane body,will fcarce expeel that any body could,in 

• a moderate Dofe, be a good Sudorifick % that is fo fixt as to 
be able to perfifr divers houres in a good Fire. And yet that 
Antimomum Diafhereticttm is fuch a Concrete , is now very 
well known to many bcfides Chymifts. 

That a Stone , and a Stone too fo fixed , that it will fu- 
ftain the violence of reverberated Fire, and is confequcntly 
very unlikely to be much wrought upon, or digefted by the 
heat of a Humane Stomack,ftiould be capable of agglutinat- 
ing together the parts of broken bones , would feem impoP 

• fible to many , but 'tis very well known to thofe that have 
made trval of the efficacy of the Ldptt vjpfragm t for though 

D'vtrr iifer I have fometimes wondre^d at the Fixtnefs of this Stone , a- 
iitei*tr&* k° TC others, in the Fire, yet being for fome days fucceflive- 
bit. ' ly drunk in Wine,or Aqua Symfhytijo the quantity of about 
half a Drachme, or more, it doth fo wonderfully cement to- 
gether the parts of broken 8c well-fet Bcmes,that it deferves 
the name it commonly hath in the Shops of Olitocolla 9 and 
hath wonders related of it by feveral eminent, not only Cby* 
mical, but Galenical Writers. 

Tis 



Digitized by Google 



Tii almoft incredible what $uiratant relates of what 
himfelfe faw done with it as to the cure of broken Bones, 
without much pain or any of the ufual grievous Symptoms, 
within four or five days 5 fo that totheftupendous Vertuc 
he ascribes to this Stone, borh inwardly given and outward- 
ly applyed , in the form o£a ?»ultis , with only beaten Gc~ 
tdnium and Oyl of Kofes or Olives , he thinks fit to annex 
thefe words : gnod ixcredibih vidert pojfet, nijs prater me ix- 
numirabiles alii eculati & idmei tefies exlarexU And indeed 
thefe need good proof to make a wary Man believe fo 
ftraoge a thing, fince Chirurgions obferve , That Nature is 
wont to be forty days in producing a Callus to fallen toge- 
ther the pieces of a broken Bone. But to make this the more 
credible by the teftimony of Authors more CaUexically in- 
clin'd , hUtthwlus relates , That in many the Bones having 
been very well fet ( which Circumftance he requires as ne- 
ceflary ) have had their broken Parts coogl urinated within 
three or four days: And not only that mofr experienced Chi- 
rurgton Fabricius Hildaxus ufd it much in Fra&nres 3 with on* 
ly a little Cinnamon- and Sugar to make it pleafanto but the ^* Cenr 
Learned Sexxertus,vvho fomewhere cals it Vertue admirable, ef ' 9 °' 
thinks it requifitc,in his Chirurgery , to give us this caution u&s.P«t.s. 
of it : Vcrum in jmvexibxt & its qui boxi fuxt habitus allum p * 
ni mis auget: guaprspter catite & vox xijl in adult ieribus exhi- 
bendus: The warrantaMcnefs of which caution , and confe- 
quently the ftrangc efficacy of OjicocolU , was, I remember , 
confirm'd to me not long fince by a skilful] PhyGtian who 
hath particularly frudyed its nature^and related to me, That 
(bme Tears fince his Mother,ha ving by a fail broken her Leg 
near theKnee^ad too fuddcn!y,by the over- much ufe of this 
Stone,a Callus produced in the part much bigger than he ex- 
pected or defired. 

He that, before the falivating Property of Mermry was 
difcovered, fhould have told Phyfitians of the defpondent 

temper 



, Digitized by Google 



( a86) 

temper of thefe , we are now difcourfing with, that befidci . 
the known ways of disburthening Nature ( namely by Vo- 
mit, Siege, Urine, Stfcat, and infenfible Tranfpiration ) 
there were a fort of Remedies, that would make very large 
Evacuations by Spittle, and thereby cure divers (rubborn 
Difeafcs that had been found refractory to all ordinary Re* . 
medics, would certainly have been more likely to be derided 
than Believed by them* fince no known Remedy , befides 
Mercurj % hath been, that I remember , obferved to work re- 
gularly by Salivation : ( for though Cerufs of Antimony have 
been obferved to make Men, *of fomeConftitutions , apt 
to fpit much, yet it works that way too languidly ,to deferve 
the name of a Salivating Remedy 5 and probably oweth the 
quality it hath of cnclinwg to fpit 9 to the Mercurial part of 
the >*f/«r**r,wherewith the Regulus it is made of abounds ) 
and therefore the greater their experience oftheeffefts of 
Medicinal Operations (hould be fuppofed to be, the greater 
indifpofition it would give them to credit fo unalyed a 
Truth . And yet the reality of the Fluxing Property of 
Quick-filver is long fince grown pa ft queftion , and hath 
been found fo ufefuli in the cure of the moft radicated and 
obftinate Veneriai Diftempers , that I fomewhat wonder 
tbofe PhyGtians , that fcruple not to employ as boyfrerous 
wavs of Cure , have not yet applved it to the extirpation of 
fome other difeafes} as Ulcers of the Kidneis,Confumptions, 
and even PalfieF, &c. wherein 1 am apt to think , it may be 
as effectual as in thofe produced by Luft , and much more 
effectual than vulgar Remcdies,provided that the exceeding 
troublefome way of working of falivating Medicines be bet- 
ter corrected than it is wont to be, in the ordinary Medicines 
employed to produce Salivation , which they do with fuch 
tormenting Symptomes, that' they arefcarcely fupportable. 
But if purified Quick- filver be dcxteroufly precipitated by 
a long and competent digeftion , with a due proportion of 

refined 



Digitized by Google 



■ (a873 

refined Gold, Experience hath informed us, that the faliva- 
ting Operation of it may be performed with much lefs unea- 
finefs to the Patient. And that fuch Mercurial Medicines , 
wherein the Quick- filver is well corrected by Gold, may 
produce more than ordinary tffcdb , we have been enclintd . 
to believe 3 by the tryals which we procured by Learned Phy- 
* (itians to be made in other than Venereal Difeafes->of a gent* 
ly working precipitate of Gold and Mercury , of which we 
may elfewherefetyou down the Procefs. 

[_ And now I am upon the Difcourfc of the peculiar Ope- 
rations of Mercury , and of unufual ways cf Evacuation , 
I am tempted to fubjoyn an odde Srory, which may afford 
notable hints to a fpeculative Man , as it was related ro me 
both in private? and before Uluftrious Witnefles , by the 
formerly torn mended Chymift of the Frenr h King : He told 
me then-a while fince , that there is yet living a Perfon of 
Quality , by name Monfeur de Vatteville , well known by 
the Command he hath or had of a Regiment of Smzers in 
France , who , many Years agoc following the Wars in the - 
Low- Countries , fe'I into a violent Diftemper of his Eyes, cvlffiihttm 
which , in fpight of what Phyfitians and Chy rurgions could «/' h * Mtr- 
do , did in a few Months fo increafe, that he loft the ufc of ******* 
both his Eyes , and languinYd long in a confirm 'd Blindnefs* 
which continued till he heard of a certain Empcrick at Am- 
fierdam 9 commonly known by the name of Adrian Glaf- 
mikcr ( for indeed he was a Glafier ) who being cry *d up for 
prodigious cures he had done with a certain Powder, this 
Colonel refortcd to him,and the Emperick having difcoutPd 
with him , undertook his recovery, if he would undergo the 
torment of the Cure ? which the Colonel having under- 
taken to do? the Cnyrurgion made him fnuff up into each 
Noftril about a Grain of a certain Mercurial Powder, which, 
in a ftrangely violent manner, quickly wrought with him al- 
ffloft all imaginable ways 5 as by Vomit , Siege 9 Sweat , U- 

line, 

- 

« 

Digitized by Google 



( 288) ■ 

rioc, Spitting and Tears , within ten or twelve houres that 
this Operation lafted , making his Head alfotofwell very 
niuch .* But within three or four days after this (ingle taking 
of the DrafKck Medicine had done working,he began to re- 
• cover fome degree of Sight , and within a Fortnight attain- 
ed to fuch a* one, th3t he.himfelfe afi'ur d the Relater,He ne- j 
vcr was fo Sharp-fighted before hib Blindnefs. And the Re- ^ 
later aCTur'd me, that he had taken plcafure to obfervc, That 
this Gentleman , who is his familiar Acquaintance , would 
difcern Objects farther and clearer than moft other Men. 
Headded, That Monfitur de Vattcvtlle told the Relater, he 
had purchaf'd the way of making this Powder of the Empc- 
rick, and had given it to an eminent Chirurgion, one Benotft 
( an acquaintance of the Relaters ) by whom he had been 
cured of a Musket (hot that had broken his Thigh-bone, 
when the other Chirurgions would have proceeded to am- 
putation$ and that this Beneeft had with this Powder , admi- 
niftred as before is related,cur'd a Gentlewoman of z Cdmcr 
in the Brefh All which, and more, was confirmed to the Re- 
later by the Chirurgion himfelf. But in what other ftubborn 
and deplorable Caies they ufe this Powder, I doe not parti- 
cularly remember. The Preparation of it, which a Chymift 
did me the favour to tell me by word of mouth , ' as a thing 
himfelf had alfo made, was in Ihort this : That the Remedy 
was made by precipitating Quick- Ml ver > with goodOyl of 
Vitriol , and fo making a Inrbttb, which is afterwards to be 
dulcified by abftrafting twenty, or twenty five, times from it 
pure Spirit of Wine , of which frefh muft be taken at every 
abfiraction . But i would not advife you to recommend fo 
furious a Powder to any , that is not a very skilful Chymifl: 
and Phyfitian too, till you know the exa& Preparation, and 
particular ufes of it 3 the reafon of my mentioning it here, 
being but that which I expreffedat the entrance upon this 
Narrative* 1 

CHAP. 



Digitized by Google 



CHAP- XX. 

YOU will perchance wonder, Vyrophylus^ that having had 
fo fair an opportunity as the fubjeft of his Effay afford- of 
cd me of difcourfing to you about the Univerfal Medicine, Medina. 
which many Vtrdctlpfins , Hdmontians^ and other Chymifts 
talk of fo confidently : I have faid nothing concerning the 
cxiftence , or fo much as the poffibility of it • But till I be 
better fatisfied about thofe Particulars than yet I have been, 
I am unwilling either to feem to believe what 1 am not yet 
convinced of, or to affert any thing , that may tend to dif- 
couraee Humane Induftryj and therforel (hall only ven- 
ture to adde on thisoccafion, That I fear we doe fomcwhat 
too much confineour hopes, when we think, that one ge- 
' mus Remedy can fcarce be cffeftual in feveral Difeafes , it 
their caufes be fuppofed to be a little differing. For,the Thcc 
rv nf Difeafes is not , I fear , fo accurate and certain as to 
rnake it fit for us to neglect the manifeft or hopeful V ertues 
of noble Remedies, where ^ever w< ^cannot reconcile bemto^^ 
that rbctry . He that confiders what not unfrequently hap- ctuft aivcrt 
pens indiftempered Bodies by the Met a ft afis of the Morbi-DiM<s 
fi^ue matter ( as for inftancc , how that which in ithe Lungs 
caufed a violent cough removed up to the head may pro- 
duce (aswehaveobferved) a quick decay of Memory and # 
Ratioci nation , and a Palfie in the Hands and other Limbs ) 
mav enough difcern that difeafes that appear very differing, 
mav cafil y be P roduced b y 3 P eccant matter of the fame na- 
ture only varioufly determined in its operations by the con- 
ftitution of the parts of the body where it fetleth : andconfe* 
quentlyit may feem probable to 1 him, that the fame : fearch- 
ins Medicine being endowed with qualities deitructive to tne 
texture of the Morbifique matter, where ever it finds it, may 
be able to cure either all, or the greateft part,df the Diieaie 
u * N n . which 



Digitized by Google 



which the various tranflatioa of fuch a matter hath been ob- 
ferved to beget. Moreover 5 it oftentimes happens that Difca- 
fes , that feem of a contrary nature , may proceed from the 
lame caufc varioufty circumftantiated} or(if you pleafejthat 
of divers Difeafes , rfiat may both feem primary , the one is 
but Symptomical or at moft Secundary in relation to the 
other 5 as a Dropfy and a flow Feavcr may , to unskilfull 
men, (eem Difeafes of a quite contrary nature, ( the one be- 
ing reputed a hot and dry, the other a cold and moift Dif- 
temper ) though expert phyfitians know they may both pro- 
ceed from the fame Caufe, and be cured by the fame Reme- 
dy. And in women experience manifefts, that a great variety , 
of differing Diftempers , which by unskilful phyfitians have 
been adjudged diftindt. and primary Difeafes,and have been, 
as fuch, unfuccesfully dealt with by them,may really be but 
difguifed Symptomes of the diftempers of the Mother or 
Genus Nervejkm 5 and may , by remedies reputed Antihyfte- 
r/W,be happily removd.To which purpofe I might tell you, 
V)royh\lti! % That I, not long fince, knew a practitioner, that 
with great fuccefs ufd the fame remedies (which were chief- 
ly Volatile and Refolving Salts ) in Dropfies, and in ( not , 
Symptomatical , but ) Effential Feavers. And our felves 
have lately made fome Experiments of not much unlike na- 
ture, with a preparation of Harts-born, of equal ufc in Fea- 
vers and Coughs, both of them primary. I might on this 
occafion recur to divers of the Remedies formerly mention *d 
in feveral places of this EfTayjfince divers of them have been 
found effc&ual againft Difeafes , which, according to our 
common Theory , feem to be little of kin one to another : 
And by telling you what I have obferved concerning the va- 
Andtbe fmt r jous operations of Ht\toon?% Ldudannm , of our Ens Veneris , 
rT/*T W 'and even, of a Medicine devifedby a Woman, the Lady 
Kents powder, I might illuftrate what I have lately delive- 
red: But it is high time for mc to pafi on to another fubject $ 

and 



Digitized by Google 



« 



(&9) 

and therefore I (hall rather defire you, in general, to confi- 
der, whether or no fevcral differing Difeafes, and ev'n fom* 
commonly fuppofed to be of contrary natures,be not yearly 
cured by the spaa-watcrt in Germany. 

And to aflifr you in this Enquiry , I (ball addrefs you to 
the rare ohfervitions of the famous and experiene'd Henricus 
ab Heer 9 and to his Spadacrene ; in the 8 th Chapter of which 
he reckons among the Difcafes which thofe Waters cure , 
Catarrhs, and the Diftempers , which ( according to him ) 
fpringfrom thence, as the palfie, Trembling of the Joints, 
and other Difeafcs of kin to thefc, Convulfions, Cephalal- 
gia, ( I name them in the order, where I find them fet 
down ) Hcmicrani* , Vertigo , rednefs of the Eyes, of the An hffmte 
Face, the Erjjipelata, Ruftut cont/nui 9 Vomitut, Singultus ijjjjj**^ 
■Obftru&ions, and even Scyrhus's, if not inveterate, of the 
Liver and Spleen , and the Difeafes fpringing thence* the 
Yellow Jaundife ^Melancholia flatulent a ft* Hypochondriaca , 
Dropfies , Gravel , Ulcers of the Kidneis , and CaruncnU in 
meatuurinario 9 Conorrhffaf 9 and rcfembling affections, Efc- 
fhantiajls or the Leprofie, fluor albus mulierum , Cancers 
andScyrrhus's of the Womb, Fluxes and even Dyfentaries* 
the Worms ( though very obftinate , and fometimes fo co- 
pious as to be voided in his prefence , even with the Urine ) 
Sterility, and not only the S.abies in the Body and Neck of 
the Bladder, and clammy pituitous Matter collected therein, 
jfides Ulcers in the Spkyn&et of it h but he relates, upon 
the repeated Tcftimony of an eminent perfon that he names, 
and one whom he ftiles Vir omni fide dignijfimus, That th^s 
party being troubled with a very great Stone in his Bladder , 
and haveing had it fearchdby divers Lytbototniftf, before he 
came to theSpi* , did, by very copioufly drinking thefe 
Waters, find, by a fecond fearch made by thofe Artifb, 
that his Stone was much deminifhed the firfl: Year , and ( by 
thefamewayoftryai ) that it was fo the fecond Year. .And* 

N n a of 



Digitized by Google 



of the Cures of thefe Difeafes , the Phyfitian mentions in 
the feme Chapter, as to many of them , particular and re- 
markable Inftanccs ; and in the beginning of the next Cha- 
pter, having told his Readers that he expects they mould 
fcarce believe thefe Waters can have fuch a variety of Vcr- 
tucs,Cdef <r//«,faies hejf in Spaa mature & conftantibus natural 
libut , vitalibufqtj facultatrbus venerint } aquafq'^uo dicemus 
modo biberint , indubii qua dixi vera cjfefatebuntur : And 
though we be not bound to believe ( nor doth he affirm it ) 
that the S/>i4- waters do univerfally cure all the afore-men- 
tioned diftempers yet it is very much , and makes much 
for our prefent purpofe , that they (bould in fo many Pati- 
ents cure moft of thefe diftempers , and lefien, if not cure , 
the reft. And we may fomewhat the better credit him, bt« 
caufe even where he reckons us the Vertues of the Spaa , he 
denys it fome , which other Phyfitians afcribe to it. And it 
is very confiderable , what he fubjoyns in thefe words: Van- 
citfimof enim vcl nulla s Spa da In colas Capitis doloribus^ Car- 
dialgia^ Calculo , obflru&ionibus renum , He pat is , Lienit , 
Atefaraicarum , labor antes inucnies $ \8ericos , Hydrops 
cor 9 Podagricos , fcabiofos , Bpilepticos , quod fciam , nullos. 
But that which I moft defire you to take notice of, is, That 
befides all the above-mention'd Difeafes, I find that he 
afcribes to thefe Waters the Vertues of curing fuch as are 
counted of a contrary nature, & are thought to require con- 
trary Remedies. For befides that, he exprefly affirms,in the 
beginning of the eighth Chapter , That thefe Waters being 
endow'd with the Vertues both of hot and cold Minerals , 
they cure both hot and cold affe&ions, in the fame Patients, 
and in differing Bodies, and that contrary Effects are per- 
formed by them : He hath, after fome Pages, thisPaffage, 
which may goe for an Illuftrious proof of that he had affert* 
ed : Inter cdtera ( faith he , fpeaking of the Spaa- Waters ) 
Menftbut wovendis inprimis rdoeea , quod millits experientia 

comprobavtt 



Digitized by Google 



C*90 ' 

comprobavit. Et tamen nimium eornm jluxum qnovis alio me* 
dicamento fecilins fiflir. 

Thcfe Tcftimonies, Tyrophylus > of our experience Au- 
thor would perhaps obtain the more credit with You, if You 
had fcen what I lately had the opertunity to obfcrve in a hot 
and dry Seafon, at our own Tunbridge- Waters in ICe*/,when 
I was there to drink them. And therefore I (hall again invite 
You not only to confider , Whether one potent Remedy , 
fuch as it may be , may not be able to cure variety of Dif- 
eafes,and fome fuppofd to be of contrary natures. But whe- 
ther or no divers Perfons , on whom the received Melhodns 
medendi hath been long and fruitlefly employ 'd, be not by 
their tyred and defpondent Phyfitians themfelves fent thi- 
ther, and there cur'd of their abftrufe and obftinate Difeafcs, 
by Remedies prepare! by Nature without the affiftance of 
Art 5 For if you duly reflett on this confpicuous Obferva- 
tion, and confider how much it is poffible for Art to melio- 
rate and improve moft(efpecially Minera!)Remedies,afTord' 
ed us by Nature , you would probably dare to hope , That 
Medicines might be prepared of greater Efficacy, and appli- 
cable to more difeafes,than they who think the more receiv- 
ed Theory of Difeafes ( from which yet very eminent Phy- 
fitians> in divers Particulars ^fcruple not to recede ) incapa- 
ble of being rectified, and that judge of all Remedies by Of theretfon 
them t that are publickly Venal in Apothecaries Shops, will Jjf 

allow themfelves fo much as to hope* difctujfe€tif 

If now you demand , Vyrophylut , if I think that every JjJjfcS 
Particular which hath contributed to fwell this Difcourfc in- mcdendS 1 * 
to a bulk fo difpropcxtionate to that which the Title of an «»* to *■ 
Bflay promifed , to diredly belong to the Art of Phyfick t \ c ^]^ 
I (hall leave it to the Judicious Celfus ( whom Learned Men Un ubhb 
have ftiled T&e Roman Hippocrates) to anfwer for me, and hejjjj *f. 
will tell you , That guanqHam mnltafitst ad ipfas artes non y ^ 
pertinentia y tamcn e as adjuvant excitando artific'uingenium* Mm. 



Digitized by Google 



( 29O 

1 fuppofc I need not remind You, Tyrophylus^ that it was not 
my defign, in what hath been reprefented , tofubvert thofe 
principles of the Methodut mcdendi , from which no fdber 
Fhyfitians themfdves recede, and in which they unani- 
moufly acquiefs : And that I much lefs intend to counte- 
nance thofe venturous Empcricks, who, without any com- 
petent knowledge of Anatomy , Botanicks , and the Hifto- 
ry of difeafes , thick Receipts or proceQes alone can enable 
them to cure the SicknelTes they know not , and who would 
perfwade Men to lay by,as needlefs , a profeflion 5 of whofe 
Ufefulnefs to Mankind we may elfewherehaveoccafion to 
difcourfe. No> Pyrophylus , without peremptorily afl'ert- 
ing any thing , I have but barely reprefented the Notions T 
have mention cl concerning the Methedus Medcndi % as things 
probable enough to deferve to be impartially confiderccU 
That in cafe they prove fit ro be declin'd , they may appear 
to have been reje&ed not by our fupcrcilioufncfsor lazinefs, 
but ( after a fair tryai) by our experience; And in cafe they 
feem fit to be approved , they may prove additional Inftan- 
ces of the Ufefulnefs of Natural Phtlofophy to Phyfick. Which 
Ufefulnefs, Pyrophylus^ iflhavein any confiderable meafure 
been fo happy as to make out,I (hall not think the time(and 
much lefs the paines ) I have beftow'd upon that Theme , 
mifjpent. For, I mutt conftfs fo you, Tyrophylut^ that to me 
it feems , that few things ought more to endear to us the 
Study of Natural Philofephy^ than that ( according to the Ju- 
dicious Sentence of our Cclfus , Ktrnm Nature cotttcmplatio , 
faith he , qu&mvis nonfitciat Mzdicum 5 aptiorem tamen Jlfe~ 
diaxa reddit ) a deeper infight into Nature may enable Men 
to apply the Phyfiological Difcoveiies made by it ( though 
fome morcimmediatly » and fome lefs directly ) to the Ad- 
vancement and Improvement of Phyfick. 

And I well enough know, Pyrophyfur , that if inftead of 
Writing the ElTay to fach a one as You, I (hould Write it 



Digitized by 



to the more critical and feverer fort of Reader*, they would 
beapt to think both that it is impertinent for me,who do not 
profefs to be a Phyfitian, to treat prolixly of Matters Medi- 
cinal j and that it may appear fomewhat below me, in a 
Book 5 whofe Title feems to promife you Philofopbical 
Matters, to infer t I know not bow many Receipts : But I 
(hall not fcruple to tell fuch a Perfon as ryropbylus , That 
fince my Method requir'd that I mould fay fomething to 
you of the 7 hcrapcutical part of Phyfick J thought that Chri- 
ftianity 8c Humanity it felfe, oblig'd me not to conceal thofe 
things, which howdefpicablefoever they may feem to a fpe* 
culative Philofopher, areytt fuch , as, betides that fome of 
them may perhaps afford improvcable Hints touching the 
Nature of Remedies, if not alfo of Difeafes, Experience hath 
encouraged me to hope , that others may prove ufeful to the 
fick. And as for the inferting of Receipts , even in Books 
of Philofophical Sub jccls , I have not done it altogether 
without example . For not only Vliny , a Pcrfbn of a great 
Dignity as well as Parts , and Friend to one of the greateft 
Roman Emperors, hath left us in a Book, where he handles 
many Philofophical Matters, ftore of particular Receipts ; 
but our great Ghancellour , The Lord VcrnUm^ hath not dif- 
dain'd to Record fome. And as for that Induftrious Bene- 
factor to Experimental Knowledge , the Learned and pious 
Merfcnnuss his Charity made him much more fearful to neg- 
lect the doing what good he could to others,than to venture 
tolefien his Reputation by an Indecoruw , that in a Ma-the- 
matical Book , and in a Chapter of Arithmetical Combi- 
nations , he bring* in not only a Remedy againft the Ery- 
fipeUs % but even in a Medicine for Corns, where he tels us, 
That they may be taken away,by applying and dayly renew- 
ing for ten days , or a fortnight,the middle Stalk that grows 
between the Blade and the Root (for that I fuppofe he means 

by the unufual Word Thallum) of Garlick , bruif d. Nor is 

• 



Digitized by Google 



performance of whit his Confcience , his Country, "his Fa* 
mily, his Ncceffities , and perhaps his allowable Curiofuy 
challenge from him, that I wonder not fo much ar thofe An* 
tient Heathens, that being Poly thrifts and Idolaters, thought 
themfelves oblidg'd, either to referre fo ufeful an Art as that 
of Phyfick, to the Gods or God-!ikc Perfons } or to adde 
thofe, that excell'd in fo noble a Faculty, to the number of 
thofe they worrtiip'd. For my parr, Vyrophtlnf ^ a very ten* 
der and fickly Conftitution of my own , ( much im pair 'd by 
fuch unhappy Apcidents as FaHs 5 Bruifes, &c.) hath, befidei 
fas I hope) better motives of Companion, given me fo great 
a fenfe of theuneaftnefiTes that are wont to attend Sicknefa* 
that [confefs,iff ftudy Chimiftry, 'tis very much out oi hope, 
that it may be ufefuily imploy'd agiinfl ftubborn Difeafcs, 
and relieve fome languishing Patients with Iefs pain Sc trou- 
ble, then otherwife they are like to undergoe for Recovery. 
And really > Tyrophdut , unlefs we will too grofly flatter our 
felves,we can fcarce avoid both difcerning and deploring the 
inefFe&ualnefs of osr vulgar Medicines, not onely Galenical- 
but Chymical 5 (Tor an aftive Body may yet be but a languid 
Remedy.) For belides that many that recover upon theufe of 
them, endure more for Health , then many that are juftly M «KS-\U 
reckon 'd among Martyrs,did for Religion* Betides thisj&y, 
w« daily meet with but too many in the cafe of that bleeding. 
Woman , mentioned in the Gofpel , of whom 'tis f*id 5 That 
(he had fuffer'd many things of many Phyfitian* , and had 
fpent all that (he had, and was nothing better 'd, but rather 
grew worfe. And therefore I reckon the inveftigatioo and di- 
vulging of ufeful Truths in Phyfick, and the difcovcring and 
recommending of good Remedies among the greatest \ nd 
moft extenfive Ads of Charity, and fuch, as by which a Mati 
may really more obliige Man-kind , and relit ve more di- 
ftreflfed Perfons , then if he built an Hofpiul. Which per-, 
haps you will not thiak raflily (aid, if you pleafebjutto con- ' 

O o fider 



Digitized by Google 



08) 

fider, bow many the knowledge of the Salivating, and other 
a&ive Properties of Mercury , and of its enmity to putrefa- 
ction and piftempers fpringing thence, have cur'd of feveral 
Difcafes , and confequently how many more Patients, then 
have recover'd in the greateft Hofpital in the world,are ob- 
lidg'd to Carpnt and thofe others, who ever they were , that 
were the firft difcoverers of the medical efficacy of K?fil~ 
ver.And for my own particular,?/™/^//*/, though my Youth 
and Condition forbid me the pra&ice of Phyfick,and though 
my unhappy Conftitution of Body, kept divers Remedies 
from doing me the fame good they are wont to do others ; 
yet having more then once, prepard , aod fometi mes occafi- 
onally had oppertunity to adminifler Medicines, which God 
hath been fo far pleas'd to blefs on others, as to make them 
RclievcTeveral Patients, and feem (at leaft)to have fnatch'd 
fome of them almoft out of the jaws of death 5 I cfteem my 
fclfby thofe fuccefles alone fufficiently recompenc'd for any 
toil and charge my Enquiries into Nature may have coft me. 
And though I ignore not, that 'tis a much more fashionable 
and celebrated Practice in youngGentl cmen,to kill men,then 
to cure them 5 And that, miftaken Mortals think It the no- 
Tt^fjbi/Ein.hleftExercifeof vertue to diftroy the nobleft Workman- 
phjmtut i» (hip of Nature, (and indeed in fome few cafes the requifite- 
\blmuL nc ' s an< * danger of deflruSive valour may make its AdHont 
jbiontblt of become a vertuous Patriot.) yet when I confiderfthe Cha- 
dtth*fmt ra cler, given of our great Matter and Excmplar,in that Scri- 
pturc, which fays, That He went about doing good, and Healing 
all manner of Sickpefcand all manner ofDifiafe among the peo- 
Mftto.it. pf e> i cannot but think fuch an Tmployment, worthy of the 
* 24 ' very nobleft of his Difciples. And I confefs, that, if it were 
alfow'd' me to envy creatures fo much above us, as are the 
Celeftial Spirits , I (hould much more envy that welcome 
John. j.i 4 . Angels Charitable imployment, who at fet times difFus'da 
arf«r 19.35 healing vertue through the troubled waters of Bethefdajhcn 

that 



1 

Digitized by 



that dreadful Angels fatal imploy merit, who in one night de- 
ftroy'dabovea hundred and fourfcore thoufand fighting JJlriflB? 
men. But, of the Defireablenefs of the skill and willingnefs employment at 
to cure thefick , and relieve not only thole that languiQiBcthcrda^ 
in Hofpitals,but thofe that are rich enough to build them,^*"^^' 
having el fe where purpofely difcourfed, 1 muft now trouble de/troy'dint* 
you no longer on this Theme, but Implore Your much need*. Sj^JJJJ 
ed pardon for my having been (beyond my fir ft intentions ) 
fo troublefome to You already. . 



O o a 



\ 



Digitized by Google 



Digitized by Google 



APPENDIX 

TO THE 

FIRST SECTION 

OFTHE 

Second Part. 



. • Digitized by Google 




Digitized by Google 



sAdtertifements touching the Jollovning 
APPENDIX. 

* 

J Scarce doubt,but it will beexpetted that I fhould annex 
to the foregoing Treatife, thofe Receipts and Proctfles, 
which feem to be here and there promis'd in it h But I 
defire it may be confidered, that fome paffages,which an un- 
attcntive Reader may have miftaken/or abfolute Promifes, 
are indeed but Profers conditionally made to a partkrulat 
PerTon* and fo not engaging me, till the condition ( which 
was his dcfiring the things mention'd to him^ be on his part 
^perfornVd- And as for the other things, which every Rea- 
der may fuppofcto be promis'd Him, I have at hand this 
general cxcufe $ that at leaft I promis'd nothing to the Pub- 
lick , whatever promifes I may have made in the foregoing 
ESSAYES, having together with them been addrefs'd to a 
private Friend. And I have two or three fpecial Reafons to 
inGft on this excufc * for divers of my choicer Books and pa- 
pers having not long fince unhappily mifcarried through the 
negligence of fome Men, or the Fraud of others, it is not 
nowpoffible forme to retrieve fome of the things I was 
Matter of, when I promifed them. And then to revife care- 
fully all the papers that remain in my hands of Affinity wuh 
the pad Treatifes , would take up more time then is allow'd 
me by other Studies and Employments, which I think of 
greater moment, or at lead wherein I am much more con* * 
cernd, then to give this Book at prefenta full or accurate 
APPENDIX. 

■ 

But though I might upon thefe and other Reafons Wholly 
excufe my felf from the trouble of adding any Append ix;yct 

becaufe 



13- 



Digitized-by Google 



that (I fay not the great Phyfitians or Chymifts 5 who may, 
if they pleafe, leave them unperus'd 5 but) thofe for whom I 
principally intend my Directions will think my having made 
them Co particular a very excufable fault. And I make the 
lefle difficulty tofuffcr fuch things,as perhaps, I judge to be, 
in companion of others , but trines, to pafs abroad , becaufe 
findngof late years, that manypcrfons of quality of either 
Sex, who fcarce read any other then Englifti Books , have 
(as I hope) out of Charity, or CurioGty, or both , begun to 
addi&tbemfelvestoChymiftry, and venture to be tamper* 
ing with Spagirical Remedies, it may not be unfeafonable 
to fupply them with fome Preparations that may both fave 
them time and Charges, and put them upon theufe of Re- 
medies, which,without being languid, are, if any thing di- 
fcreetly given > fafeand innocent, and wherein a little Error 
either in the making or the admiaiftring will be far lefle pre- 
judicial to the fick, then if it were committed in the more 
vulgar (oftentimes, either falfly or obfeurely prefcrib'd) pre- 
parations they are wont to make of Acid Salts, Mercury, An- 
timony, and other Minerals, whofe Activity for the moft 
part make them need to be skilfully prepared, and judicious- 
ly given. 



p p. . 



To 



Digitized by Google 



C3°0 
To the Sixty -ninth Pigc. 

The Irifli Lithotomifts Receipt 9 far the Stone in the Bladder. 

s 

REc. Aquar. Melon. CitruUor 9 FilipcnauUjetrofelin 9 fyu 
e 5 radicibus-ifjr.de B fsvtiis.ana^ unc. ij Oxymelit cow p. 
unc.j. tnifcctfuartam mixti partem Camas mane jejunus^ 
& poftea per 080 horas acibo & potu abftineas 9 aliam fumas 
partem eodem die poftcxnam cum icflum intrarevolueris\ denj% 
fequenti die relique fumantur partes ut prim£j tertio verb die, 

Rec % Ele8. lenit.dragnuiij.fyr. Rofat.folutjragm. ij. pulp. 
Tamarind, dragm. j.mifceantur ac infcrila8isum.iij.diJ/0U 
vantur: totum bib as mane quatuor horis ante jus , quirt 0 die fu- 
mas mane Jequentis pulv. dragm. j. mixti ittfcquentis Apozema- 
its unc. iiij. & olei Amygd. dulc. unc.fem. 

Rcc*Cinerun vitri* 9 & Scorpionnm pulveris^Lapid.Spongi^ 
&lap. c judaict 9 Mori, fern. Xlthe£ 9 MiUiifolis 9 Saxifragii ana 
dragm. j.f cm. la&ucd ,4 fern, frigid, majornm ana dragm. fern. 
Trokifcor. A\k$k**gK pimpinell* ana dragm. ij, fiat pulvis 
fubtilis. 

Apozema. 

Rec. Varietari^ rdd. Alt h. ana Mj. fcm.petrofelinifilychyr- 
rhiza ana unc. fern, halicacabi 3 unc. j. Cocu in aq. pluvia 9 fext. 
a. & vini albijftmifext.j. ad medictatis confumptionem,& co- 
htura meUe hybernico dulcoreiur m 

Turn quarto illo die pafirculum Trogloditemfale anted can- 
ditum edas una cum cvna 9 Et pofi cosnam lumbi, pubes 9 & tot a 
renum regio olcise grants Citri & fcorpion. lint ant ur 9 etft pofji* 
bile effet pr*di8a olea per meatum urindr.in vcficam injiciantur 9 
@t% deinde pulvcre 9 Apozemate 9 Troglodite & oleis omni die ate- 
re 9 donec arenuU aut lap.fragmcnta una cum expuljh apparuerint. 

Loco cinerum vitrifumi poffunt cinercs C a mini C?* vires cine' 
rumjcorpionumfufplere pot eji pulvis lumbricor. t err eflr. probe 
in vino lot ovum CP poftea exficcatorum. 

HE. 



Digitized by Google 



KB. Q As far as I could conje&ure by the Difcourfe I 
had with the owner of the Receipt , by AQics of Glafs he 
meaues the fuperfluous Saline fubftance , which the Glafle- 
men are wont to call Sandivcr 3 but becaufe he did not ex- 
plain himfelf fo clearly, and we know not yet a way of Burn- 
ing Glafs to Ames,! think it will be moftadvifeablc tofub- 
ftitute the Wood A(hes,which in the Receipt it fclfe towards 
the clofe of it are appointed for a Succedamum. ] 

To the One Hundred and Tenth Page? 
£ Where the Virtues of the Pilula? Lunares are toucht 4t. ] 

T He great benefit that has redounded to many patients, 
from the ufe of the Silver Pills , here briefly mentioned, 
and commended, invites me to communicate asaconfi- 
derable thing,the preparation of them,of which I do riot pre- 
tend to be the Inventer , having divers years fince, learn'd it 
by difcourfing with a very Ancient and experienced Chy* 
mift, whofe name that I do not mention , will perhaps fitem 
fomewhat ftrange tothofe Readers that have obferv'd me 
not to be backward in acknowledging my Benefadors in 
point of Experiments , and therefore I hold it not amifs to 
take this opportunity of declaring once for all, that 'twere 
oftentimes more prejudicial than grateful to one that makefc 
an advantage by the Pra&ifc or Phyfick, to annex in his life- 
time his name to fome of his Receipts or Procefles} becaufe 
that when»aManhasoncegota repute,for having a Specifick 
in any particular Difeafeor Cafe 5 his Patients, and their 
Friends will hardly forbear to apply themfelves to him for 
that Medicine , though the fame Medicine , but not known 
to be the fame, mould be made ufe of by a ftranger, or di- 
vulged in a Printed Book. Moft Patients being not apt to 
rely upon Medicines, that come only that way recommen- 

Ppa dedj 



(*o8) 

dedswhcreasiftt were known that the Printed Receipt is the 
felf fame, which the Phyfitian employs, not only other Pby- 
Ctians would quickly make as much advantage of it as he, 
but many Patients would think themfelves by that difcove- 
ry difpens'd with, in point of good husbandry , from going 
to any Phyfitian at all, as knowing before band thebeftpre- 
fcription they are Jike to receive from him. The Procefs of 
the PilnU Lunarts is this h 

Take of the beft refined Silver as much as You pleafe, 
7he Frtfau. diffolve it in a fufficient quantity of clens'd fpirit of Nitre, 
'^unl'es! FiI ' or M HA t ofUs > tncn evaporating away the fuperfluous moy- 
fture, let the reft (hoot into thin Chryftals 3 thefe you may 
in fome open mouth'd Glafs place in fand, and keep in fuch 
a degree of Heat, that by the help of very frequently ftirring 
them , the greateft part of the more loofe and ftinking 
Spirits of the McnjlrMnm may be driven away> and yet the re- 
maining Chryftals not be brought to Flow : Thefe Chry- 
ftals of Silver you muftcounterpoife with.an equal weight 
of Chryftals of Nitre h 8c firft difiblving each of them apart 
in diftill'd Rain*water, You mud afterwards mingle the So- 
li: tions.and abftracl or fteam away the fuperfluous moyfture, 
till the remaining Mafsbc dry, which you muft keep in an 
open Glafs, expofed to fuch a temperate heat of Sand , that 
the Matter may not melt (which you muft be very carefull 
of ) and that yet the adhering corrofive Spirits of the 
McnQrmm mi^ht be driven away. And to both thefe ends 
You muft from time to time ftir the Mafs , that new parts of 
it may be expo fed to the Heat, and ntw onesno tfce Air^ till 
you cannot defcry inthe remaining white Powder any offen- 
fivc fent of the Spirit of Nitre, or ot the Aquafortis. And 
You muft take the Crum of good white- bread, made 
with a little moyfture into a ftifF Paft , and exa&ly mingle 
with the newly mentioned Magiftery or Powder as much of 
this Paft, as i* neceffary to give it the confidence of a Mafs 

of 



Digitized by Googl 



. C 309 ) 

of Pills,which you may tficnce form at pleafure,and prcfcrve 
io a well flopp'd Glafs for ute. 

NB. Firft the Silver employed in this Operation, ought 
to be very pure and more exquifitely refin'd , then much of 
that is wont to be , which here in E*gU*d is bought for fine ' 
Silvcr$for if the Copper wherewith Silver-Coyns are wont 
to be alloy'd, be not carefully feperated upon the Cupel , it • 
may , .being turn'd by the Acid Mmjlruum into a kind of 
Vitriol, when iris taken into the Body , either provoke Vo- 
mits, or otherwife difcompofe it. 

2ly, The Spirit of Nitre, or (which in our cafe comes 
almoftto one) the Aqua- fortis that is us d about this Me- 
dicine, ought to be cleared, as onr Refiners phrafe it , before 
the Silver be put in, for ( as I elfewhere Note ) in Salt Peter, 
there is oftentimes an undifcerned Mixture of Sea-falt,whofe 
Spirit coming over in Diftillation with that of Nitre *, is 
apt to precipitate the Silver, which the Spirit of Nitre has 
diflblv'd. This I take to be the Reafon of that pra&ife of 
the beft Refiners to purifie their Aqua fortis 8 by cafting in 
fome fmall peice of Silver, that they may afterwards fecurcly 
put into it greater Quantities of the fame Mettal to be 
diflblv'd. For the Saline Spirits fall to the bottome, toge- 
ther with the corroded Silver,which they precipitate as long 
as there is any of thefe Saline fpirits left in the Menftruum y 
which after this may be decanted clear 5 and though you had 
put a little more filver then needed to it», it neither does 
harm nor is loft,the/ty*<f- fortis prcferving none unprecipitaN 
ed,but what there were no more .saline Spirits to work vpon> 
fo that thefuperfluous filver put in is already diflolvd to 
Your hand. 

3dly,Thedry Mixture obtainM from the Solutions of Chry- 
ftals of Nitrej& Chryftals of Silver, mutt be often ftirr'd and 
kept longer in the Sand.btforc all the effeofive Spirits will be 
driven away , then till Experience had inform'd me ^ I did 
imagine. Fourthly, 



Fourthly , if the Cbryftals of Silver be confiderably 
Blew or Green , 'tis a fign the Silver was not fufficiently 
purg'd from Copper, clfe the Mixture we have been fpeak- 
ingof, will look of a White, good enough. Andpoflibly 

* 'twas by reafon of the not being careful to take fufficiently 
Refin'd Silver , and of the not knowing how to improve the 

• Chryftals of Silver, by the addition or thofe of N//rc 9 and 
efpecially how to free them from the (linking and Corro- 
iive Spirits of Aqua»fortrs 9 thsLt it is come to p*afs,that though 
there being lomeChymical Writers, Proceffesnot very un- 
like this , yet the Chryftals of Silver have been cenfur'd and 
laid afide as not always fafe even by thofe, who otherwife 
much magnifie the Efficacy of thofe they us'd. • 

Fiftlyj When you are about to makeup this Mixture 
with the Crura of Bread into a Mafs , and fo into Pils, 'twill 
not be amifs to difpatch that work at once, forufualiyit 
leaves an ugly Blacknefs on the Fingers , that cannot under 
divers days begotten off. 

' Sixthly, In taking of the Pills care muft be had , that they 
be fufficiently lapp'd up either in a Wafer wetted with milk, * 
or the Pulp of a Roafred Apple, or fome fuch thing , that 

5/v ffticje* ^ ev ma y pot touc ^ x ^ c P a ' at > or the Throat, becaufe of the 
Ftas. extream and difgufting bitternefs , which is to be met with 
in the Chryftals of Silver , and which is not the leaft thing , 
that with. nicer Perfons does Blemifti thefe pills. 

Seventhly , The Dofe is fomewhat uncertaine} becaufe 
they work much according to the Conftitution of the Bod}', 
and efpecially according as it abounds with Serous humours} 
Wherefore 'tis advifeable to make the pills of the fize of very 
fmall peafe , or which one given at Bedtime , is a fufficient 
dofe for fome Bodies , others will require twoj and in foir.e 
wemuft afcend to three; and if the Patient be Hydropi- 
cal,or beotherwife much molefred with ferous Humours, it 
is obfervable that fometimes one dofe will work two days , 

or 



Digitized by Google 



or four days, ( may be five or fix ) fucceffively, but yet mo^ 
derately and ufually, without weakening the parient,in pro- 
portion to fuch copious Evacuations. 

Eighthly , Befidcs the Dropfie , wherein we have men- 
tion'd this Remedy as a Specifick ^ it often proves very avi- 
lablein other Gafes , wherein Men are troubled with ferous 
Humours. But the firft diftempers , which I heard it Mag- 
v nified for, were thofe of the Head, and Genus Kervofums and 
a great Virtuofo of my acquaintance that inherits a difpofi T 
tion to the palfie, has feveral times told me. that if when he 
begins to find himfelf difordered, he take a dofeofthefe 
pills , he is thereby conftantly reliev'd. But of the particu- 
lar Cafes wherein we have had oppertunity to take notice of 
their Effects , we have not now,but may perchance another 
time have leifureto entertain You. 

Laftly, That skilful and fuccesful Chymift D' N. N. who 
doth much both ufe and efteem this Remedy, being defir'd 
by me to let me know, if he had any objections againft it, in- 
formes me , that when he hath given thefe Pills oftentimes, 
and without intervalls,though they did not either Salivateor 
Vomit,or much weaken the Patient,yet they would at laft be 
attended with a kind of Incipient Leucopnlegmatia^ which he 
eafily^revents by intermitting for a while the uCc of the pills, 
after every fecond or third time that he adminifters them, 8c 
giving when he expects it to be requifitejome Crocus MartfS 9 
Extract of Juniper^or other aftringent or Hepatick medicines 
to corroborate the Vtfccra and preferve their Tone. 



TSe Cure mention'd in this place, having been perfornVcl 
by that Medicine , which from the Name of that Great 
Commander as well as Virtuofo, who was the Author of it, 

pafles 



To the One Hundred thirteenth Page. 
(Where mention is made of the Cure ofone, concluded 
to have a Gangrene, by an inward Medicine. 




Digitized by Google 



« 



(313) 

paffes under the Name of Sr. Walter KmUigbs Cordial ,and 
this being but one of many remarkable (andfomeof them 
ftupendious) Cures which have been wrought by it from 
time to time, efpecially of late that it hath been more us'd, I 
am induced to annex here the yet unpubliuYd Receipr^partty, 
becaufe there are divers Receipts that are each pretended to 
be the true , magnify 'd by their feveral Pofletibrss And I 
had the liberty of looking it out in a Receipt- Book, preferv- 
ed by the Authors Son *, and partly becaufe, though f will 
not affirm, that a skilfulJer or more promifing Compofition 
of the fame Ingredients could not have been devifcd s Yet 
the following Receipt has been abundantly recommended 
by Experience. And I remember that but a while fince, a 
Perfon of Note having fent tome, todefirea taking of this 
Cordial for a certain Knight , who after all that Skilful 
Phyfitians could do, had long lain a dying 5 I the other day 
chanc'd to meet this Knight at Wbtte*Hal/ 3 well , lively , and 
with a Face whofe Ruddinefs argued a perfect Recovery , 8c 
vet he is not very farre from feventy Years of Age , and had 
before he grew fo ill, long conflicted with i. tedious Ague, 
and feaver, which had reduced him to that Extremity, when 
the Cordial was brought, that, as himfelf told me,he neither 
was fenfible when they gave it him, nor had known what he 
did, or what was done unto him, during the fpacc of feveral 
dayes before. 

Sr Walter Rawleighs Cordial, after Sr R.K. bit way 
(fet down verbatim as Itbe Autbour received it,) 

* 

TAkc Burrage-Flowers , Rofemary- Flowers , Marigold- 
Flowers, Red July- Flowers, Rofafolis, Elder- Flowers, 
of each one Pottle, after they are dryed in the Shade. 

Take alfo of Scordium, Carduus, Angelica* Baulm , Mint, 
Marjoram, Setwall, Betony ana four handfulls 3 after they 
are dry d in the shade. 

Take 

Digitized by Google 



Take alfo of the Rinds of Saffafras of Virginia, LignYt Aloct 1 
4»<t,four ounces beaten topowder$ ofKermes, Cubebs, Car- 
damoms 5 Zedoary,<i//^one ounces of Saffron halfe an ounce 5 
Juniper Berries, Tormentil Roots, Round Birthwort Roots 
of each one ounce, of Gentian Roots halfe an ounce. 

Draw the Tinfture or Extraft of thefe with Spirit of Wine 
in Balneofe fave all the Ingredients after you have taken out 
the tmtturcs,& burn them,& put their fait into their tin&ures. 

Take fix ounces of the Extra&s of all thefe with their Salt, 
and put thereto of the Tinfture of Coral three ounces* Terra 
SipUat a four ounces*: Pearl prcpar d two ounces jBezar-ftone 
three dragmesjhartf-horn calcin'd four ouncesjamber-greefe 
four dragmes} Musk, £r.xxxs Sugarcandy one pound and an 
half, ground very fine, and fearfed through a fine Searfe. 

Then the musk & amber mud be ground,^ by little & lit- 
tle mingl'd with it,the more you grind the amber 3 the better. 

Then put to the Sugarcandy all the dry Materials before 
dire&ed, and make all as fmall aspoflibly You can. 

Then upon a great hollow grinding Stone mingle the Tin- 
clures, and dry things together : ( which muft be done by a 
ftrong man ufed to that work:)8c whil'ft 'tis in grinding,put 
of fyrrup ofLimmons,8cfyrrup of Red- Roles equal parts in- 
to it,elfe it will be fo dry , that twill neither grind nor mingle. 
How to make the Tinfture of Coral * — 4? 



for Cordial, f \ 

Take eight ounces of Coral, and put it unbea- \ 1 
ten into a calcining Pot Unluted, 8c let it frand V / 
twenty four Hours in a calcining or Glafs- fur- 
nace* 'till the Coral be as White as Snow s then 
put it in three quarts of diftill'd Vineger in a 
long Glafs with a narrow mouth,and with ano- 
therfmall Glafs or Vialputinto theMouthof 
it, the Belly upwards, to fave the Vineger from 
wafting, ihns'-i And fet it in a fand furnace, j 
fo as the fand may be as high as the Vineger. 

Q.q Let 




Digitized by Google 



Let it boy! without intermiffion twenty four Houres, 
by which time Vineger will become red 5 fo, when 'tis 
cold 9 pour off the Vineger into a Glafs-Bafon , or a Bell- 
Clafs, and vapor away all the Vineger in Balneo 0 and gather 
the Coral 9 being perfectly dry, for your Life. You may 
ftrike down Your Pearl with Oyl of Vitriol , and Oyl of 
Sulphur requal parts, which is accounted the beft way to pre- 
pare the Pearl: but S r R. K. did ufe to prepare his Pearl by 
juyce of Limmons. 

[ The Dofis for a Man is about thebignefs ofafmall 
Hafil- nut , but where prevention only is aim'd at, or fome 
fuch ufe as the diflipating the Fumes of the Spleen , as they 
call it, the bignefs of an ordinary Pcafe, may lufficejfo in ur- 
gent Cafes theDofe maybe increas'd to the quantity of a 
Nutmeg. It isufually given by it felf upon an empty Sto- 
mack ( the Patient being kept Warm after it to promote 
Sweat ) in Feavers , Want of Spirits, violent Fluxes,and fe- 
veral other diftempers , where Diaphoreticks and Antidotes 
are proper , and ( especially ) potent Cordials arc re- 
quir'd. ] 

Q To the One Hundred thirteenth Pages 
Where a Receipt that cur d Fiftula's is mentiond.l 

A Water for a Fiftula, and all manner of Wounds and 
fwellings, or oldVlcerr, Cankers, Tetters, Boiles, 
or Scdbbs in any place, or Green Wounds. 

a 

TAke of Bole-Armoniack four ounces, of Camphire one 
ounce,of White Vitriol four ounces j Boyle the Cam- 
phire and the Vitriol together in a little Black Earthen 
Pot till they become thin , ftirrihg them together till they 
become hard in fetlings than Bruife them in a Mortar to 
powder , and Beat the Bole-Armoniack it felfe to powder 9 
and then mingle them together , and keep the powder in a 

Bladder 



Digitized by Google 



Bladder, till fuch time You ufe it h then take a pottle of Run- 
ning Water, and fet it on the Fire till it begin to feeth, then 
take it from the Fire, and put in three good fpoonfuls of the 
powder into the Water whilft it is hot, & after put the Wa- 
ter and powder into a Glafle, 8c (hake it twife a day to make 
the Water ftrong : But before You ufe it,let it be well fetled 
and very Clear, 5c apply it as hot as the Patient can well fuf- 
fer it} 8c lay a clean Linnen Cloath,four double,to the Sore, 
it being wet in that Water ? and bind it faft with a Rowler to 
keep it warm b do it Morning and Evening till it be whole. 
This Water rnuft be put into an Oyftcr-ftiel, not in a Sawcer 
when you drefs the Sore,for the pewter will fuck it up. Re- 
• member You put three as good Spoon- fuls of powder as you 
can prefs into the Spoon.Take heed no one Drink of this wa- 
ter,for it is Poyfon. To make it ftronger, beat an ounce of 
Alom to powder, and mingle it with the other powders. 

Take of Bole- armoniack halfe an ounce, white Vitriol one 
ouncc,of Gamphir two ounces, make them all into powder} 
then take a Pottle of Smiths- water.and as much Spring- wa- 
ter,and mingling them, fet them upon the Fire, asfoon as it 
begins to Seeth, put in the powder very foftly , ftirringit 
all the whiles as foon as the powder is in, take it off the Fire, 
and dreffe the wound with it twife a day , laying a Cloath 
folded four times and wetted in the water,it being very hot 4 
and foapplyed to the wound. 

N£. £ This is the Receipt VtrbAtim as I find it among 
my old Papers, but I am not fure that among thofe I cannot 
now come by,there may not be fomething concerning a way 
of making a fmall pliable Tent that may accommodate it 
felf to the crooked Figure of the Cavity of many Fiftula's. 
For methinks I remember,that the Chirurgion prefcrib'd the 
conveying the Medicine by the means of fuch a flexible tent 
a great way into the cavity, ifnottothc Bottom oftheFi- 
ftula, which was thereby to be cleanfed. ~\ 

<lq2 g To 

Digitized by Google 



To the One Hundred fourty firft Page. 
Where Soot is mentioned. 

SOot, Tyrophyhs , is a Production of Fire, whofe Na- 
ture is almoft as fingular, as in the manner of its being 
produc'd, for it is ( if I may fo call it ) a kind of volatile Ex- 
tract of the Wood it proceeds from, made inftead of a Men- 
firnum by the Fire , which haftily diffipating the parts of the 
Body it acts on , hath time enough to fever it into fmallcr 
Particles , but not leifure and aptitude to reduce it into fuch 
differing fubftances as pafs for ChymicaLor Peripatetick 
Elements , but haftily carries up the more volatile parts, 
which being not yet fufficiently free'd from the more fixt 
ones, take them up a long with them in their fuddea flight , 
and fo the Aqueous , fpirituous, faline, Oleaginous and 
Terreftrial parts afcending confufedly together , to fatten 
themfelves to the fides of the Chimney in that loofe and 
irregular Form of Concretion,which we call foot: An enqui- 
ry into whofe Nature , as it may be confider d in the furvey 
of the diftin&ion of falts, muft be elfewhere lcok'd for* Our 
mentioning it at prcfent , being only to take occafion to tell 
You, that as ill fented and defpif d a Body as it is, Bartman , 
Cone of the moft experiencd and happy of Ghymical Wri- 
ters ) fcruples nof to reckon the fpirit and oyl of it among 
the Nobleft Confort antra 9 fuch as prepai d Pearle, Coral, 
HartmtBS Amber- grecfe , and other eminent Cherifliers of Nature , 
wr*tion of His preparation is for fubftance this , Take of the beft foot 
ffSwt? C ^ ucn as adheres to the lower part of the Chimney , and 
fhines almoft like Jet ) what quantity you pleafe , and with 
it fill up to the Neck a very well coated Glafs Retort, or an 
Earthen one , and luting on a capacious Receiver, diftil the 
matter in an open fire intended by dtgrees,whereby you will 
drive over the Phlegm, the whitifh fpirits, and the Oyl 
firftofa yellow Colour, and then of a Red, feparate the 

Phlegm, 



Digitized by 



(317) 

Phlegm •) and for a while digeft the fpirit and the Oyl toge* 
ther, on which afterwards put half the quantity of fpirit of 
Wine and Diftil them feveral times , whereby you will ob- 
tain together with the fpirit of wine, the fpirit of foot,' 
and alfo a very depurated Oyl , fmelling like Camphire. 
Out of the Calcin'd Caput mortuum after the common way 
extract a fait, which Hartman commends as a molt excellent tt^tm, ?rax, 
curcr of exulcerated Cancers, This fait, faith He , is drawn ckm - * l 2 * 
with- Vineger, in which Liquor is a Cold moift place, it is 
again DilTolv'd , and therewith the Cancerous Ulcers being 
once or twife annointed, the venenofity will be viiibly drawn 
out like a Vapour , and then the forementioned Oyl being 
lightly fprinkled upon the place will breed on it a kind of 
Cruft like a skin , which Spontancoufly coming off in five 
or fix Days , will by its falling off, argue the Confolidation 
of the Ulcer. What this fo extoll'd Remedy will perform 
I know not,having never made trial of it,nor thinking it ve- 
ry likely , that a bare Alcalizate fait (hould have fuch Speci- 
fick.Vertucs , nor is it requifite I (hould infill: on it, being here 
to difcourfe to you of the diftill'd Liquors of foot} in profe- 
cution of which defign , let me tell You, that Hartman pre- * 
fcribes the ad'minifrring of the fpirit from fix to ten Grains , 
of the Oyl from two or three drops in wine , or any other 
convenient Vehicle , & concerning the Oyl he adds, That if 
three Drops of it be given in Vineger to an almoft gafping 
Man, he will be thereby wonderfully refrelh 'd,and as it were 
reviv'd, to which he annexeth thisPrognoftick , that if the 
Remedy produceth Copious fwcats, it will recover the Ta- 
ker} but if not* he will Die. 

That this fpirit of foot defcrib'd by Hartman may be a 
very good Medicine I am very apt to think } but becaufe 'tis The Autbort 
not a meer fpirit of foot , but a mixt one of fpirit of wine , Jj2jJJJ3 
and fpirit of foot , we have rather chofen to proceed with ntms fam 
the foot ("of wood) without addition, both as to the diftil- S"'- 

lation 



Digitized by Google 



(3i8) 

lation of it,and the ordering of the difthTd liquors, after the 
manners to be mention'd ere long, when we fliall acquaint 
You with our preparations of Blood and Harts horn, which 
if You pleafe to apply to Soot, You may favc Your felfe^and 
me , the labour of Repetitions. Yet it may be not amifs to 
advcrtife You here of two t hings : tfce one, that if You em- 
ploy very good and fat Soot, and fill up the Retort with it to 
the Neck 5 You muft be very careful to encreafe the Fire 
orderly , and but by moderate Degrees * or elfe you may 
chance to make the matter boil over out of the Retort into 
the Receiver h as it lately happen 'd to us , when having wa- 
rily orderd the Fire for feveral houres we thought our felvcs 
paft any fuch danger : Andtheothe/, that as to the Medi- 
cinal Vermes ofthefpirit, and fait of Soot, I (ball not now 
particularize them , partly that I may fave time, and partly 
becaufe they may be well enough gather'd from their affinity 
to the Volatile falts and fpirits of animal fubftances here- 
after to be treated of, and from what I (ball haveoccafion 
to fay, of the perfuming of the fait Soot towards the clofe of 
this APPENDIX. 



u 



To the 

one Hundred Fowrty third V age* 

Rine is a Body , which , as homely and defpis'd as 'tis 
wont to be , may,by skilful ways of ordering it , be 
made either a!one,or in conjunction with other Ingre* 
% JJySJj! : dfentMo afford fuch a variety of ufeful Subirances,that I find 
infofvme* Keufnerus publiuYd an Entire Treatife, which yet I never 
could get fight of,under the Title of Synopfis Remedrorum ex 
Vrina prsf at riorum , befides what other Chymifts have fince 
divulg'd on the fame fubject 9 which I forbear to mention? 
becaufe feveral of them I have not try d, and many others I 
think fcarcc worth trying. But becaufe even all our own 
Obfervations concerning the Preparations and ufes of things 

afforded 



Digitized by Google 



afforded by Urine , would take up more time and Room , 
then 1 can now allow them, I (hall here only take this occa- 
• fion to intimate thus much in general , that the Spirit and 
Salt of Urine may be made far greater ufe of, than Men yet JJ 
are prone to think? not only in Phyfick, but in Chymiftry , 
and perhaps I durft add in Natural Philofophy too. And 
though Hclmont be not wont to lavifh his praifes upon 
worthlefs Remedies, yet he cals it Nobile ad ifterum , aUoJqh 
tnorbos, Remedium , And in another place, fpeaking of the 
Saline Chriftals of Urine , he hath this expreffion : £>u* 
qu inqnam ad Veteres ExcrcmtntorHm Oppilationes conferunt , 
nihil tamen adverfus httkUfin h which feems , by denying 
to the Salt of Urine, fome Vertues afcrib'd to it by many 
other Chymifts , to bring (bme credit to his praifes of it. 
( And indeed a friend of mine , that has try'd it in the Jaun- 
difc 9 affirmes it to deferve the Commendation he gives it in 
that Difeafe.) And though I fear our Author Hyperbolizeth, 
where he ( elfewhere ) thus writes : Spcrmit eos fapientia 
( he means fure, that which is proper to the Spagyrifts ) qui 
Mat tr 7 am ex qua difpofttiones , Contenta, Proprietates , Pro- 
grejfum & Jignificatitnes Lotii addrfcere recufarent per ignem j 
Yet perhaps the Hyperbole is not altogether fo extravagant 
as naoft Readers will think it. And I remember,that a while 
ago , conferring with the Publick Minifter of a Foreign 
Prince, who is a very inquifitive and experiene'd Perfon,He 
freely told me,that though he had Travelled very much, and 
divers times not in a Capacity, yet the greateft Chymift that 
ever he could make acquaintance with, us'd to tell him, that 
Salt of Urine was fo precious a thing , that 'twas a pitty it 
mould be us 'd in ordinary Difeafes 5 But what his Reafons 
were for valuing it fo much,he would not declare 5 and there- 
fore I (hall lay no great weight upon hisTeftimony. And yet 
I muft not at this time particularly declare , upon what ac- 
count it is shat I doe fo value the volatile Salt of Urine , of 

whofc 



whofeVertues (whilfr 'tisfingle.) fftiall only in a Word ob- 
fervc to you now ( what is pertinent to the occafion of my 
mentioning it at prefent, ) namely , that when 'tis well pre- 1 
par'd [ according to the way plainly enough , though but very 
briefly couch' d olreadyjt differs fo little in fmeI 3 tafr 9 volatility, 
penetrancy and fome other manifeft Qualities, from the Sale 
of Harts- horn , and that of Mans Blood j that fuch effe&s , 
though perhaps fomewhat lefs powerfu!,may be not impro- 
bably exfpefted from it, as are produced by the other. 

To the One Hundred Fourty fourth Page. 

oftbtprtpf Though I have not in this place made fny abfolute Vromife , 
MtMblLd. °f wcxing any thing, wore particular* touching the Spirit 
fif Blood 5 and though I cannot now find,and J fear may have 
loft thoje of "my Papers concerning that fubjeGl , which werf 
the leaft unaccuratc? Tct,fetting ajidc former try ah , a recent 
Account brought me by a Phyfititn , whom I had entrufted 
with fome of it, reprefents it as fo very good a Medicine, that 
I am content to fubjoyn , what particulars I have lately found 
among my loofe Papers concerning it t as 1 mtny years agoe 
fettt them to a friend^ and this J rather do , becaufe there 
being annexed to the Procefs divers Obfervations of gene- 
ral Import to fuch kind of Preparations, i hey will be the better 
underjtoodwith it, then without it, and J have not now 
the Uifure to new-mould them. Thus then? 

* 

TAke of the Blood of an healthy Yor.ng man as much 
}f / as you P^ ca ^ e 5 anc * whilft it is yet warm, addetoic 

mifrmtrnker *twicc its weight of good Spirit of Wine, and incorporating. 

tbe them well together, (hut them carefully up in a convenient 
ZXldin GiafsVeffel, wherein the matter muftbe fet todigeft in 

tbe txgfitfl of 

mi Experiments ef this kjnd, but it feems lobe Effentitlto the £Qodnefs of tbe Rente dp : tbe Spirit of 
Wine ferwg <bt>fly but n hep the Bhodfrtm torjupiing, 

Balftce 



Digitized by Google 



(3*0 

BafoeO) orHorfe-dung, for fix weeks, or mores then in a 
Glafs head and body, placed in Arties or Sand, draw off with 
a gentle Heat as much Liquor as will come over without ne. 
celfitatingyoutoimprefsany Empyrean* a upon it , the re- 
maining matter oiuft be taken out and put into a ftrong and 
capacious Retort, which being placed in fand,and accommo- 
dated with a large Receiver carefully luted to it, the matter 
thcrin lodged muft be gradually prefled with a vehement 
Fire , which muft at length be encreafed till it be ftrong e- 
nough to give the bottom ofthe Retort a red heat. There 
will firft come over '( after perhaps a little Phlegm ) Spi- 
rit, either accompanied or clofely followed by a copious vo- 
latile Salt,faftning it felfc to the fides and top ofthe Receiv- 
er} and much about the fame time there will alfo come over 
an Oyl, or two, or more ( for 1 have not obferved the olea- 
ginous part to come conftantly and regularly after the fame 
manner ) the Receiver being taken off ? all that it contains 
may be poured together into a convenient Vial, to be there- 
in digefted for a Moneth, if you pleafe:or otherwife without 
that previous digeftion,you may wafh down the volatile Salt, 
adheiing to the fides of the Receiver , with the Spirit and 
Oyl well (haken about it , and pour altogether into a large 
Glafs Funnel well lined with Cap- paper, firft moiftned 
with the Spirit of fair Water , through which the Spirit and 
as much of the Volatile Salt , as it and the Phlegm can dif- 
foive, will p3fs firft, leaving the Oyl behind them in the Pa- 
per, which muft befeafonably fet afide, or elfe the Oyl alfo, 
though more flowly, will pafs through the Filtre : The 
phlegm , Salt and Spirit, muft be rectified with a very gentle 
heat , fo often , till the Phlegm be perfectly feparated, and 
they leave no faces : The oyl alfo may be rectified two or 
three times from it's own Caput Mortunm calcin'd , or elfe 
fromSaltof Tartar to deprive it of its muddinefs. Thedi- 
ftempsrs wherein this Arcanum or Spirit of Man's Blood is 
9 & r proper, 



( 

proper arc , divers , but cbeifly Aftmah's, Epileptics, acute 
Feavers, Plurifies and Confumptions. But to comply with 
my prefeot haft, ! (hall advertife You in the general , as to 
the ufeofthts and the other Remedies to be fubfequently 
mention'd , that for them I muft refer you to the particular 
Narratives, which I (hall fcarce if You feafonabiy defire 
them refufe You: And in the meane time,becaufe the volatile 
Remedie$ are near enough of kin to each other , I (hall add 
to this firft Proccfs ( which is at the leatt one of the nobleft 
of them ) fome Obfervations of a more general nature, we 
may both of us avoid the trouble of ncedlefs Repetitions. 

ObfcrvatioHf. 

I. I ignore not that there are extant in Burgravius , £e- 
obfervitians guinut , and divers other Chimical Authors , very pom pous 
and promifing Procefles of the Effence of Mans Blood , to 
duvrirg the which they afcrihe fuch ftupendous faculties asl (hould not 

Md's'Jhs'of on ^ wonc * €r t0 ^ nc * truc 5 Dut admire that they can hope the 
s«/r the Reader ihould believe them fo.But of thefe Preparations, 
and other fab- fome being as that of Burgravius in his Eiolychnmm^xogy my- 
fi^ArSfttal anc * unlikely^and others, like Begumus his ^E*s*ngui- 
mtiKwgdom. hnmani^ exceedingly laborious and not fo clear, I have ne- 
ver put my felf to the trouble of making them, but I fliall be 
very forward to acknowledge their excellency , if any Man 
(hall vouchfafe me an Experimental Convidion of it. For 
though I think the preparation .of Blood no bad one, yet I 
am far from daring to affirm there cannot be a better. 

a. He that intends to have any confiderable quantity of this 
fpirit and falt,muft provide himfelfe of a large proportion of 
Blood,or elfe he is like to fall far fhort of his expe&ation^be- 
caufc as full offpiritsas Blood is fuppofed to be, ityeilds 
commonly ( at lead the beft I have hitherto met with ) no 
lefs than two thirds,or more s of Phlegm, befides a not defpi- 

cablcf . 



Digitized by Google 



cable quantity of terrcftrial and unfcrviceablc Matter. 

3. It is rcquifite , both that the Retort wherein the dryed 
Blood is diftilled be pretty large and ftrone , and that the 
Fire be very carefully and gradually adminiltred,lcaft either 
the copious Fumes break the too narrow Vends, or the 
Matter too haftily urged boil over into the neck of the Re- 
tort or the Receiver , both which dangers this Advertife- 
ment may help you to avoid at a cheaper rate , than I, who 
have not been forwarn'd of them but by unwelcome Ex- 
perience. 

4 . There is a Friend of mine , an excellent Chymift , 
whofc rare Cures firft gave me a value for Remedies made of 
Blood , who ufeth ( as himfeif afl'u ret h me ) to mingle with 
the fpirit that other Liquor 5 drawn over at firft in a Head 
and Body , and twice or thrice rectified by it felf. But that 
Liquor confiding almoft totally of the fpirit of Wine , and 
the not over-grateful Phlegm of the Blood , though there 
may perhaps be patted ki to it fome of the more fugitive Par* 
tides of the volatile Salt : Yet they being fo few as fcarce 
difcernabie, this Liquor (eems fitter to be made a Vehicle 9 
than an auociate of our fpirit , and perhaps too is not in alt 
cafes the moft proper vehicle in which it may be adminiftrcd:- 
C though if it were not for the fpirit of Wine, I mould fome- 
what fufpe& that the Phlegm,t hough fo deftitue of the more 
active Ingredients , as to be (it to be kept feparated from 
them, may not it felf be quite devoid of fpecifick Vertues.) 
But my eftcem of the Artift I have mentioned ,doth make me 
think it fit to acquaint You with his Pra&ife , notwithftand- 
ing that hitherto his authority be the chief thing that recom- 
mends k to me. 

5. Divers ways may be propos'd of purify ing this fpirit 
and Salt we are difcourfing of, but having tryd fevcral, that 
which F now ufeis this that follows : 1 put the Salt Phlegm, 
and fpirit together, in one of the higheft and flendereft Bo. 

R r 2 dies 



(334) 

dies I can get, that the Phlegm might not be able to afcend 
eafily into the Head, and that the volatile Salt may be the 
better feparated: Then in a very gentle hear( I moft ufe that 
of a Lamp FurnaceJ there will afcend a pure white and vola- 
tile Salt , adhering to the cheeks and nofe of the Glafs- head, 
which if I defireby it felf , I fweep it away before the Spirit 
begins to rife^but moil: commonly I fuffer the DiftiHation to 
proceed, and the afcending Spirit to carry down part of the 
volatile fait into the Receiver , and fo I continue the fame 
degree of heat , till there arifc fo weak a fpirit that it plainly 
begins to diflblve the volatile fait: Then mifting the Receiv- 
er, I referve the ftrong fpirit and volatile fait by themfclves, 
& take the fucceeding weaker fpirit'by it felf alfo* to which, 
if I pleafe to fortifie it, I add as much of the volatile fait, for- 
merly referved, as it is able to diflblve. In the bottom of the 
Cucurbit or Vial , there will remain a phlegmatick kinde of 
Liquor, which ufually containes fome of the fait or fpirit,and 
fometimes too f which is fomewha*odde ) fome of the o- 
leaginous part of the Blood , which did not before appear to 
have been aflbciated with the fpirit, and to have palled 
through the Filtre with it. This naufeous Liquor may be 
fcept by it (elf till you have a fufficient quantity of it , to be 
worth the trouble of fevering from it the nobler parts: The 
fpirit and fak above mentioned may be again rectified, per fe 9 
with the like gentle heat as before , fo often , till they leave 
behind them no feces nor Phlegm at all. But this is requi- 
fite tobe done only when to matter fome ftubbom Difcafe, 
the Medicine is to be exalted either to its fuprcme, or at Jeaft 
to fome approaching degree of Purity and Efficacy , for o- 
therwife fo exquiftte a Depuration is not always neceflary. 

6. As for the Oleaginous part which the Fire forceth out of 
Blood , my obfervations of it hitherto have fo little agreed, 
that, I dare as yet fpeak but hsefitantly concerning it. For 
fome times but one Oyl hath been drawn over, fometimes 

two: 



* 



Digitized by- Gopgle 



0 325) 

two: And I remember, laft Year,a parcel of Blood, that was 
kept in a Dung- hill for many Months, yielded us a blackifh 
and muddy Oyl , a purely red one, and another of pale Am- 
ber colour 9 which would not mingle with the darker 5 of 
each of which forts I yet rcferve fome by me . This diffe- 
rence may poffibly proceed partly from the previous prepa* 
ration, or unpreparedntfs of the Blood, and partly from the 
various adminiftration of the Fire employed to diftil it. But 
for the mod part we find thefe Animal fubftances f if the de- 
grees of Fire be orderly adminftred, and the heat fufficient- 
ly intended towards the clofe of the Diftillation ( to yeild a 
double Oyl : the one more light and pure^which fwims up- 
on the fpiritj the other more muddy, aduft and ponderous , 
which finks to the bottom of it . The ufe* of thefe Oyls 
bath , by reafonof their Fetidnefs , been by mod Authors 
abfolutely rejected $ and even thofe few that doe not alto- 
gether reject them, forbid their inward ufe, and allow them 
to be but externally employed: But confidering, Fjrophjt/ttf, 
how much of the efficacy both of Plants and Animals is ob- 
ferved to rcfide in their oleaginous part,it feem'd not impro- 
bable to me » that thefe Oyls might deferve a better ufage , 
then cither to be wholly thrown away, or confin'd to out- 
ward fervices j and therefore havetng not long fincc given 
a Friend of mine fome pure yellow Oyl of Man s Blood,dif- 
folved in fpirit of Wine , to try upon a Patient of his , Gck 
of a He&ick Feaver ( in which Difeafe I had feen the fpirit of 
Blood very fuccesful)within a few days he brought me word 
of the unexpected recovery of his Patient, to whom he ad- 
miniftred our Medicine ( that I may not conceal from you 
that circumftance) in Balfamus Samech, made with fpirit of 
yineger inftead of fpirit of Wine h the remaining part of 
this yellow mingled Oyl I keep yet by me, to make further 
tryals with it . And that fuch Oyls may not be loft, I have 
been attempting ( for I am yet upon my tryals) feveral ways 

to 



Digitized by Google 



to make them ferviceable. Some of them that are of a more 
pure and defecatecLnature 3 I have ( which is not unworthy 
• » your noting) found capable of readily uniting with fpirit of 
Wine, with which they may be allayed at plcafurerln others 
I have feparated the finer and more volatile part,by drawing 
them over with a very gentle heat in a Retort half full of 
Water , which will carry over the lighter part oftheOyl 
with it into the Receiver , wherein the Oyl will fwim upon 
it , and may be afterwards fever'd from it by a feparating 
Glafs, or any other convenient Way (but I fear that this me- 
thod , though it finely clarific Oyls , may rob tbem of the 
beft part of the Efficacy they may perchance derive from the • 
latent admixtipn of fomewbat of the volatile Salt : ) at the 
bottom of the Retort there will remain a dark and thick 
fubftance , whofe nature I have yet had opportunity to en - 
quire into. Out of fome Oyls (drawn from unprepared Ma- 
terials) which would not diflbl ve in fpirit of Wine, have , 
by difgeftion with fpirit of Wine , drawn much of the lent 
and taft , the fpirit probably imbibing fome of the finer 
parts of the Oyl , or elfe affociating to it felf fome volatile 
fait that yet lay lurking in it : For fomctimes I haveoMer- 
vedOyls 5 after long keeping, to let fall a volatile fait undif- 
ccrned in them before. Having aHb fometimcs mingled the 
heavier and lighter Oyls of the fame Body with dephregma- 
ted fpirit of Wine,and in a low Retort drawn over what will 
rife in a very gentle heat ( inferiour to that of a Balneum ) \ 
have found the fpirit of Wine to carry over with it fo many 
of the more fubtile and afrive parts of the OyK that it was 
more richly impregnated therewith, then you will be apt to 
Cxpcft. But of what ufe this .oleaginous Spirit may be irr 
Phyfick, I have not yet had time to confult Experience s 
which I hope will, ere long, teach me better ways of improv* 
ing the rejected Oyls we have becnfpeaking of, than are 
thofe almoft obvious ones hitherto mentioned, wherein T am 

very 



uigmzea Dy uuu 



(3V) 

very far from aquiefcing 5 efpecially , fioce I cannot but 
fufpeft but fuch a&ive parts of fuch Concretes , would be 
found very capable of a great Improvement, ifwewereas 
skilful to give it them. 

7. The terreftrial Subftance that remaines after the Li- 
quours are drawn of, if the Blood have been duly prepared, 
affords but fo inconfiderable a quantity of fix *d Salt , that 
unlcfs the Ctput mortunm be exceeding copious , the Alkali 
will hardly be worth extracting # Befides that, if it could be 
obtain'd in a not defpicable quantity , I mould , what ever 
is pretcnded,vcry much doubt whether it would be endow- 
ed with very extraordinary Vermes, the violence of the Fire 
ufually depriving fixd'd Salts of the Specifick Qualities of 
their concretes: and even in the firft Salt of Serpents them- 
fel ves, I have not difcerned other, Than the wonted Proper- 
ties of Alkhdlizate Salts. f 

8. Becaufe you may fometimes not have the lei fu re to 
wait fix weeks for the Preparation of Blood * and becaufe 
oftentimes the occafion ofufing the Medicines wehavc been 
defcribing , may be fo hafty and urgent , that unlefs fome 
fpeedy courfe to relieve them be taken before the Phyfick 
can be prepared/the Patients will be dead. I think it not 
amifs Pyrophylui , to advertife You , That though without 
any previous Preparation of Blood you mould immediately 
diftilit, provided an orderly gradation of heat be carefully 
obferued , it will yield you a rcddifti Spirit, and ( befides an 
Oylortwo) a volatile Salt which being reft ified , are fo 
little inferiour, in any Properties difcernable by the fmell or 
taft, to the Salt and Spirit of predigefted Blood , that 'tis 
very probable their Efficacy will emulate,though not altoge- 
ther equal that of the more laborioufly prepared. 

9 . And becaufe it is difficult to get the Blood of healthy 
Men, and perhaps not fo fafc toufethat of unfound Per- 
fonss and becaufe many have a ftrong Averfion, and fome 

an 



an Tnfuperable , though groundlefs abhorrency , from Me - 
dicines made of Man's Blood, 1 have thought it not a mifs 
to try whether that of fome other Animals prepared the 
fame way , might not afford us as hopeful Medicines : And 
becaufe the Blood of Deer is chiefly (and perhaps not cauf- 
lefly 'commended by Authors,wehave handled it according 
to the foregoing Procefs,and thereby obtained of it a Spirit^ 
and Salt > andOyl, whofe penetrancy 5 and other refemblan- 
ces, makes us hope that they may prove good Sttccedamea* in 
the defeft of thofe Analogous Remedies ( drawn from hu- 
mane Materials ) which we have been treating of. 

And to this let me 9 Vyrofbylut , on this occafion , annex 
this Advertifement , That though in thefe Papers,and what 
I have further written of Preparations of this nature h I name 
not any great number of Concretes , as having drawn their 
volatile Salts & Spirits,yet Ijiave endeavoured in thefe Dif- 
courfes to give You in the Inftances I infift on , fo much va- 
riety of Examples -j that either by the Procefles therein fet 
down , or by the Analogy to them , You tnay, I*fuppo(e 9 be 
direfred with the help of a few tryafs , to obtain the volatile 
Salts and Spirits of moft Concretes that belong to the Ani- 
mal Kingdom , and that are capable of affording any. For 
by the method we prefcribe, a little vary according to the 
exigences of particular Bodies tobcdifHli'd we have drawn 
the Spirits, Salts and Oyls of Sheeps-blood 5 Eelcs, Vipers f 
&c. the latter of which yield a Salt and Liquor , which in 
Italy , by divers Learned men , is fuperlatively extoll'd a- 
gainft obftruttions , foulnefs of the Blood , and I know not 
how many Difeafes proceeding from thefe two general 
Canfcs. And though I dare not deny that divers of thofe 
Praifesmaybe well enough deferv'd 5 by the Remedies to 
which they areafcrib'd,yct I am not apt to think them much 
fuperior to the generality of volatile Salts : And even the 
fpirit and fait of Shccps blood it felf, did , by their pene- 

trnncy 

• 

* Digitized by Google 



(3*9 J 

trancy of tafte and fugttivenefs in gentle heats, promife little 
elfe Efficacy then thofe others fo much celebrated Medicines. 

10. Nor is it only by being adminiftred it felf , that one 
of this fulphureous and fubtile kind of Spirits may become 
a good Remedy, but alfo by its being made a Mcftflrnum to 
prepare other Bodies: For it will extract Tinctures out of 



fh\» to dim 



feveral fulphureous and refinous Concrets,whofe fijier parts, Tinti'm^ 
by being aflbciated with fo piercing a Vehicle, may probably of Suiphor 
gain a more intimate admiffion into the Body,and have their ^/^w'fj** 
vertues conveyed further then otherwife they would reach. 
And a Learned Doctor, to whom I recommended fuch kind 
of Remedies, confeffed to me, that by the bare extractions of 
appropriated Vegetables themfclves, with Spirit of Urine,he 
perform *d no fmalj matter. But one difficuk-y You may meet 
with in drawing the Tincture of Minerals, and other very 
compact Bodies, even with good Spirit of Urine. ( for that I 
account to be the cheapeft of thefe volative Mtttflrtutft , and 
the molt eafie to be obtaind in good quantities ) For we have 
found, but with a little heat, the more fugitive Particles to 
afcend to the upper parts ofthe Glafs,and there fatten them- 
fclves in the form of a Salt * by whofe recefs, the debilitated 
Liquor was^difa bled from drawing the Tincture fo power- 
fully as was expected, wherefore we were redue'd to make 
our Extractions in (hort neck'd Glafs Eggs or Vials ex- 
qmfitely ftop'd ("which may alfo be plac'd looping in the 
Sand) and when we percciv'd much to be lodg'd in the necks 
of the Vcffels, bv barely inverting them , the hot Liquor 
foon reimbib'd the Salt, and was fit to be plac'd again in 
Sand, to that notwithftanding this difficulty, we were able 
b? this means, in no long time, to impregnate the Spirit of 
Urine, or of Harts horn (for I do not perfectly remember 
which it wasj with the Tincture of Flowers of $«//rfwr,which 
may probably prove a noble Medicine in divers affections of 
the Lungs, (ince in them thefe volatile Liquors alone have 

S f been 



Digitized by Google 



(330 J 

been found very eff e&ual. And I remember, I have fome- 
timesmadea much fliorter 8c more odde Preparation (which 
at any time You may command) of Crude Sulphur, whereby 
in not many hours I have,bv*the means of Salts, brought over 
fuch a fulphureous Liquour or Tincture , as even in the Re- 
ceiver was of a red Colour , as well as of a ftrongly fulphu- 
reous Scent. 

£ To the rage 1 5 j , 1 5 5, & c. where Ens 
Veneris // treated of % 

• 

BUt before I enter upon particulars , I think it will not be 
amifs to tell you how this preparation firft occur'd to 
Us, becaufe by that Information, Your happier Ctnius may 
peradventure hereafter be prompted to improve this Heme* 
dy 5 or to devifc one more approaching to the Nature and 
r*r Excellency of that which we endeavour 'd,but with very im- 
bsppened ufon pefeft fuccefs to light on , or equal 5 by our Ens Veneris. I 
ibepreparantn mu ft then tell you,that an Induftrious Ghymift ( of our Ac- 
tfEBS VcDC * quaintance J and I, chancing to Read one day together that 
odde Treatifeof Uelmont , which hecals Butler y when we 
had attentively perus'd what he delivers of the Nature as 
well as fcarce credible Vermes of the Lapis Butleri he there 
mentions, we fell into very ferbus Thoughts, what might be 
the matter of fo admirable a Medicine , and the hopefulleft 
manner ef preparing that matter. And haveing freely pro- 
posed to one another our Conje&ures , and examiVd them 
by what is deliver d by Helmont ^concerning the Preparation 
of Sutlers Stone 3 or feme emulous Remedy we at length 
concur cl in concluding that either the Lapis Butleri ( as our 
Author cals it ) or at leaft fome Medicine of an appoaching 
Efficacy might , ( if Helmont did not misinform us) be pre- 
oar'd by ^deftroying ( as far as we could by calcination) the 
body of Copper , and then fubliming it with Sal Armontack. 
And becaufe the Body of Vems feems lefle lock'd up in 

• * good 



Digitized by Google 



CisO 

good Vitriol, then ita its metalline form, we concluded that • 
it was beft to calcine rather the Vitriol, thentheGopperit 
felf, and, having freed the Colcotharitoxn its feparable Salts, 
fo to force it up with Sal Armoniack. But the Perfon I 
difcours'd with, teeming fomewhat diffident of this Procefs 
by his unwillingnefs to attempt it, I defir'd andeafily per- 
fwaded him at leaft to put himfelf to the trouble of trying it 
with the requifitcs to the work w ch I undertook to provide, 
being at that time unable to profecute it my felf for want of 
a fit Furnace in the Place where I then chane'd to lodge. And 
though at firft we did not hit upon the beft and moft com* 
pendious way 5 yet during the Sublimation,he being fuddenly 
furpris'd, as both himfelf and hisDomefticks twodaies after 
told me, with a fit of ficknefs, attended with very horrid and 
fcemingly Peftilential Symptomcs, was redue'd to take fome 
of this Medicine out of the Veflcls before the due time, and 
upon the ufe of it found, as he told me,an almoft immediate 
Ceflation of thofe dreadful Symptoms, but not of the Pal c- 
nefle they had produe'd. This firft profperous Experiment, 
emboldned us to give our Remedy the Title of Primum ens 
Veneris, which, for brevities fake, is wont to be call 'd Ens Vr 
merit, though I am far from thinking, that it is the admirable 
. Medicine to which Udmont gives that name, at leaft if his 
Ens Veneris did really deferve half the praifes by him afcrib 'd 
to it. But fuch as Ours is, I (hall now ( as time and my yet 
incompleat Trials will permit ) acquaint you with that Pro» 
cefs of it, which ( among fome others.) we are mofr wont to 
employ, as the moft eafie, fimple, and genuine. 

Take then of the beft Unnganan^ or if you cannot procure n& Pr9(e f t 
that of the bcftDantzick, or other good Venereal Vitriol, ufcj iy the 
what quantity you pleafe, Calcine it in a ftrong fire, till it be tl 
of a dark Red, Dulcifie it by fuch frequent affufionsof hot em vera is. 
Water, that at length the Water that hath pafs'd through it, 
appear full as taftlefs, as when it was pour d on it. Let this 

S f 2 thus 



Digitized by Googl 



» 

♦ thus cxquifitely dulcified Colcothar, whfcn it is thorowly dry, 
be very diligently ground with about an equal weight o£ 
good Sal ArmoniAck.^ and let this mixture be put into a Glafs 
Retort, and either in as ftrong a heat as can conveniently be 
given in tfand, or clfe in a naked fire, force up as much of it 
as you can to the top of the neck of the Retort, and this 
Sublimation being ended, out of the broken Retort ( laying 
the Caput Mortunm afide) take all the Sublimate , and grind 
it well again, that if in any part the Sal Almoniack^ appear 
fublim'd by it felf, it may be reincorporated with the Colco* 
thar 9 Refublime this Mixture per fe in a Glafs Retort as be- 
fore, and if you pleafeyou may once more elevate this fe- 
cond Sublimate, but we have not found That alwayes nced- 
fuL And for the better underftanding of this Procefs , be 
pleas'd to take notice of the following Particulars.* 
Vivtrfe fe- Firft, We have alwaies preferr'd fuch Vitriol as abounds 
mtiverTont w,t ^ Copper, before our common EnglHh Vitriol, about the 
Z'Jnnwgtbe making of thofe that keep the Copperas work at Detford 
T<et*utmt t are wont,as themfelves have upon the place informed me, to 
ufegood ftoreof Iron to increafe the quantity oftheirVitriol. 

Secondly, ff You be unwilling to loofe the Phlegm , 
Spirit and Oyl of that Vitriol with which You defign to 
make Ens Vttieris , You may diftill them away in an earthen . 
Retort, or one of Glafs well coated. But though it be well 
known that the diflillation of Oyl of Vitriol requires a very 
intenfe and lafting Fire ( Co that unlefs you have need of the 
Liquors, the beft way will be without any Ceremony to cal- 
cine the Vitriol in a naked Fire and open , yet afterwards it 
will be for the moft part requifite farther to calcine *he Caput 
Mortunm in an open Veflcl, For you muft take notice , that 
unlefs the Vitriol be very throughly calcin'd, it will be ve- 
ry troublefome for you to dulcifie it , and fometimes we 
haveobferv'd that the Caput Mortunm which look'd Red and 
fcem'd indifferently well calcin'd , hath been , almoft like 

Crude 



Digitized by Google 



Crude Vitriol diflblv'd in the fair Water which was pour'd 
on it to duicifie it. The weight of the Calx in reference to 
theVitriol,of which it was madc,we cannot eafily determine 
but we have fometimes found it neceffary to reduce the Vi- 
triol to lefle^perhaps much leffe then half its weight to make 
it fit for Du'cification. 

Thirdly, The Water that hath been pour'd of the firfr and 
fecond time to edulcorate, the calcin'd Vitriol , may be fil- 
trated and fteamed away , till it come almoft to the con- 
fidence of a Syrrup or Honey, and then may be put into a 
cold place to {hoot} for after this manner we have fome- 
times had many very regularly figur <d Chryftals or Graines 
of Salt, I (ay fometimes , becaufe fometimes alfo you may 
find it neceflary to abftradr. all the Water,to obtain the Whi- 
tifh Salt of Vitriol, which we have known us'd as a good Vo- 
mit, and which An&elus SaU none of the Jeaft fober of the 
Chymical writers doth highly extoll as an excellent Erne* 
tick in his Ternary ofVomative Remedies^ where he difcourf- 
cth at large of the Vertues of it, and the way ofadminifrring 
it* And of this Salt, as Chymifts are pleas'd to call it, we 
have had out of calcin'd Copptras a very great quantity , and 
have fometimes obferrv'd it to have been almofl: as deeply 
colour d as the Vitriol it felf was before Calcination. 

Fourthly , Wefeverall times tryedto fublime dulcified 
Colcothar with Sal Armoniack,* in Retorts and Urinals plac'd 
in Sand , but whether by reafon of the fixednefs of the 
CcJcotbar>ox becaufe the Furnace we were fain to ufe,thoogh 
no very bad one, was none of the belt, we never could that 
way obtain any considerable Quantity of the defir'd. Subli- 
mate, and that which did afcend was but of a faint colour : 
wherefore,unlcfs you have an extraordinary good Sand Fur- 
nace, if you will make ufe of Glafle Veffels, which is the 
cleanlieft way, you will find it expedient to fublime Your 
Celcot barm coated Retorts with an open Fire, except you 

have 



Cm) . 

have the Dexterity to fublime in a naked Fire with Glafs , 
retorts uncoated,whtch we have divers times feen performd 
by heating the bottome of the Retort by degrees, and then 
placing it upon Embers , with Coales round about it 5 but 
to be kindl'd at a diftance from it,for if this courfebe watch- 
fully follow'd, the Retort will be fo well neai'd, before it be 
reduc'd to endure any intenfe degree of heat , that after 
a while You may fafely lay thoroWly kindled Coales , not 
only round about it,but upon the top of it (which needs not 
tobedone,till towards the end of the Operation)and there- 
by drive moft of the Sublimate into one lump, and into the 
Neck of the Retort. And by this way you may fublime 
any Furnace upon a bare Hearth , but if you defire to give a 
more intenfe heat , you may lay firft fome warm allies in an 
ordinary Iron pot 9 and haveing with them, and a few fmall 
Coals well kindled , neai'd your Retort , you may after- 
wards profecute the Sublimation in the fame pot, which 
being once throughly heated it felf by the Fire , will after- 
wards considerably increafe the heat of it. 

Fifthly, Though it be moft commonly requifite to re- 
fublime the Sublimate , that comes the firft time up 5 tbat the 
Salt and Colcothar may be more exquifitly mix'd, yet as far 
as we can gueffe by fome tryals , it will not be expedient to 
refublime it above once ( or at moft ) twice. For in tbofe 
Tryals we have found the Mns Veneris oftener refublim cl of 
a paler colour , than that which was refublim'd but once. 
And(N£. )perhaps,by further fubIimation«,the fait infteadof 
being more intimately united with the Colcotbar 9 m2y be al- 
moft totally fever'd from it, according to what weelfwhcre 
in other cafes declare. 

Sixthly Ofthefc Sublimates, that which hath the higheft 
Colour,feems to be the beft, as being moft enrich 'd with the 
Colcothtr , from whence the rednefs proceeds. But at the 
firft Sublimation I have often obferv'd a pretty part of the 

Sul 



Digitized by 



(MO 

Sal Armomdck. to come up firft white by it fclf, efpecially if 
it had not been very diligently mix'd with the Colcothnr. 
But at the fecond fublimation the ingredients ( which we 
have fometimes almofl: totally fore'd up without leaving a 
Caput Mortitum in the bottom of the Retort ) will be more 
accurately mix'd and the Sublimate will appear Yellow, and 
and perhaps Reddi(h 3 of which fort we have fometimes had) 
when the Operation hath been very carefully manag'd. 

Seventhly , How great a proportion of the Ingredients 
committed to Sublimation , will arife in the form of Ens Ve* 
neris^ we dare not precifely define but Sublimate amoun- 
ting to the fourth part of the whole Mixturc,you will fcarcc, 
if you work skilfully, faile of. 

Eightly ,* We fom times made a Sublimate of equal 
parts of pure Sal Armomacfand Salt of Tartar, both of them 
very throughly dry 'd ( for elfethey will be apt to yeeld ra- 
ther a Spirit than a Sublimate , ) wWl ground together ,and 
fo fublim'd; And whitb this Sublimate inftead of Simple Sal 
Armon'tAck. we intended to make Ens veneris , but by fomc 
intervening Accidents and Avocations we were not able to 
perfect the Experiment , of which we neverthelefs think it 
fit to give You this hint,bccaufe of the great Efficacy , which 
an excellent Phyfitian of my acquaintance , to whom ! gave 
fome of it, aflurcs me he has found in it againft Obftru&ions 
and fome Diftempers that arc wont to fpring from them. 

Ninthly , When you are about to make Your firft Sub- 
limate, You may if You pleafe, lute to the Retort, whereinto 
You put the Ingrcdients,a fmall Receiver to catch the liquor 
that oftentimes comes over^ For that Liquor, though you 
will very feldome get much of it , yet may it be worth your 
prefcrving by reafon of the Volatile & Urinous Salt where- 
with it will fometimes fo abound 9 that it may pafle for a 
weak Spirit of Sal Armoniac^. 

Tenthly , The Qafnt Mortnum that remaines after the 

firft 



Digitized by Google 



( 33« ) 

firft Sublimation, may be put into a clean Clafs , and fet in a 
Cellar, where it will run Per deliquium, into a thick and high 
colour'd Liquor, very richly impregnated (as we clfcwherc 
manifeft on another Occafion) with the fomewhat opened 
body of Copper % from whence if half thofe praifes be trtfe^w^ 
even the befl: Chy mifts are pleas'd to give to Copper 9 [t may be 
very well concluded to have deriv'd no fmall Vertues againft 
Ulcers,8c divers ArTedions,w c h we are not here to infift on. 

Eleventhly, We have fomtimes doubted whether or no our 
Ens Veneris did realy contain any thing of Cypreous or Colco- 
tbarine in it,partly, becaufe of the fixednefs or fluggifhnefs of 
ColcothtrfiL of the Copper therein contained partly becaufe 
that if Sal Armoniackbe 2 or 3 times fubliro'd by its fclf , its 
Flowers frequently enough will afcend Ycllow,like the paler 
fort of Ens Veneris. But firft, that Sal Almoniack is capable of 
carying up even fix'd 8c fluggilh Bodies feem'd probable to 
us,partly upon our incorporating St fubliming it with finely 
powderd Corals (from which, though but very little of it af- 
cended,yet fomeof that Jittle was no lcfsred,then the Corals 
themfelves before their being beaten)8c partly upon our Tub* 
liming it from Copper^ both Crude & Calcin'd, fince of either 
of thofe Bodies it carry 'd up a little with it,as appear'd by the 
Blew Colour of fome parts of the Sublimates. 

And Secondly , that the reddifhnefs of our Ens Veneris 
proceeded partly , if not altogether from the Colcofhir^ 
feem'd probable to us, not only by the tuft, and fome other 
Properties of it, but alfo by this, that having knowingly 
committed the firft fublimate to aFire too weak to refublime 
it, and having after (bme Hours, taken the Vcflcl out of the 
Sand, we found that the Fire which we fuppos'd was not 
ftrong enough to carry up the whole Matter , had rais'd the 
Sal Armoniach^ to the upper part of the Urinal in Flowers, 
that were either White, or but pale Yellows whereas 
the remaining part of the Mixture, that lay in good quantity 

• 



Digitized by 



(337) 

that were either White , or but of a pale Yellow 5 whereas 
the remaining part of the Mixture , that lay in good quantity 
in the .bottom of the Veflell, was of a deep Red, and a frag*, 
ment of it of about the bigneflfe of alargcPeafe, being caft 
upon glowing Coals, and nimbly blown with a pair of Bel- 
lows, coloured the Flame with a fomewhat greenifli blew like 
that,but more faint,whicb we elfewhere have obferved to pro- 
ceed from the well opened body of Copper. 

But thofe Tryals, I confefle, would rather increafe my 
Doubts then leflen them, becaufe in our Ens Veneris the Co- 
# lbur is not Blew , but Reddifli , if I did not conftder y that 
Colcothar is a body that confifts of forae other matter be- 
ll Jcs common Coj>per ( as it is alfo far more difficult to re- 
duce, though but in part, into a mettal, than is vulgar calcin'd 
Copper; and confequently when Corpufcles of differing 
Natures are by the Sal Armoniack elevated together , that 
which is not Metalline , may with the afliftance of the Firef 
Operation alter the Nature of what is , and thereby produce 
a Colour differing from Blew. But to dif patch what ever fur- 
ther Tryals mail inform us, touching this Queftion , whether 
or no any true and reducible Copper do make an Ingredient 
in our Ens Veneris , yet there being in Colcothar other parts 
as well as thofe > that by Fufion you may reduce into a pure 
Mettal > and our Remedy (eeming by its Somniferous pro- 
perty to partake of them , it will not be neceflary to the 
giving our Medicine a Right to the Appellation I com- t 
monly choofe of Flores Colcotharis , that in it there is 
fomething of the Colcothar carryedup, though poflibly the 
quantity be but fmall , and not all reducible into a Metalline 
- form: but perhaps the Quetiion is not worth a longer Debate* 
it being fuTficient to excufe the the name, and recommend the 
thing to fuch'a Perfon as You , that Colcothar is employed 
in- the making of it, and that the thing prepared is a noble 
Medicine , and hath fome of the great Virtues afcribed to • 

tt Vitriol 



Digitized by Google 



Vitriol ; whether that Mineral! bea a ingredient of it, or no: 
Hit Dofc and TheDofisof Ens Veneris may be very much varied: To 
ufe of £»j Vt- little Children , we give fometimes one, fomerimes tw,o, and 
nertl ' fometimes three Grains for many nights together, as we finde 
them able , without inconvenience, to bear the Operation. 
To perfons of ripe Years we commonly adminifter four, five 
or fix Grains at a time. But one,to whom we have given quan- 
tities of k to lie by him, tels us, That he hath taken to above 
thirty Grains at once without any inconvenience. We are wont 
to give it in two or three Spoonfuls of Sack,or other Wine,i£ % 
the Confutation of the Patient, or the Nature of the Difeafe* 
do not forbid it * and, in fach cafes, we give it m any Cordial! 
Liquor,that is temperate,or any other convenient, Vehicle. 

To Children it may be given in Beer, or Ale, or clear 
Poflet- drink , but not in Milk. If the Patient hath flipped 
at a feafonable Hour , we commonly adminifter it , when he 
ft going to deep. It works for the moft part by fwcat 
and a little by Urine , but more by fweat at the beginning , 

}han after the body is ufed to it , yet to fome bodies it proves 
b Sudorifick, that two Grains or lefle of it, have oftpn made 
me fweat. That it hath once proved Emetick I have heard) 
but never obferved it my felfe to provoke Vomits. 

As for the Medicall ufe of Ens Veneris , divers great Phy- 
ficians will perhaps think it were not defpicable, though it 
were no other than oftentimes to prove a fafe and moderately 
fomniferous Medicine in Feavers, without having any thing 
ink of opium , whofe Narcotick power they finde as difficult 
to correct, as it oftentimes proves dangerous, when being not 
well corrected, it is adminiftred without very great Circum- 
spection. But-************** 



To 



. (aft 

To the ? 6&\ 1 6?\ 1 58 th , x and 1 70 th Pages. 

[ Finding Among my hofe Notes, together with thofe thjt do im- 
mediately eoncetne the Preparations of Sulphur and Harts* 
horn (deliveted in thefe Pages) fome other Particulars that 
may alfo ferve ^either to afford fome light to Readers lefs skilled 
in chymtftry, or contribute fomewhat or other towards the re* 
lief of fome Patients , / am content to let thofe Pafers go to- 
gether , as I long ft nee addreff :d them to a Friend ] 

TJ Arts- horn, Pyrbfhilus , is a Heteroclice Body in Na- of Haru-hon*. 
* -cure, -which hath but few. refem biers in the univerfe, 
for it grows to a confiderable bulk like a Vegetable, and is 
( unlike moft other Horns of Animals ) at certain fet Periods 
of time, deciduous, and though it be of a Bony fubftance, 
yet that middle part of it which differs from the reft in Co- 
lour, does (atleaftingrownHornsJ much more relemble 
the Pith of fome Plants than the Marrow of Bones : And 
yet this Plam>Animal ( if Imay fo call it ) does , when skil- 
fully expofed to the Fire, afford the fame differing fubftances, 
with the Blood. Flefh, and other parts of Animals. It is no 
wonder therefore , if Phy ficians and Chymifts have hoped to 
find extraordinary Virtues in fo extraordinary a Subject, 
of which we fliall paiTe by the Ufuali Preparations , as not fo 
pertinent to our prefent defigne, infinuating only in the gene- 
ral', That though e\ren the more Vulgar Preparations,as well 
as that which Phyficians have been pleafed to call Philofo- 
* phicall, afford us Medicines not defpicable-, y et thefe arc much 
interiour to thofe Remedies wherewith dexterous Diftilla- 
tions are capable of prefenting us * and certainly if we allow '« 
of the Chymicall Theory , ( whofe Truth in thefe Papers I 
queftion not ) Harts-horn being generally acknowledged to 
be endued with properties very friendly to our Nature, and 

tti even 

• Digitized by Google 



even thofe wayes of prepa ;ng it wne?€/n the nobler aiia 
more active parts are not truly freed from ih 0 fe camber - 
fome ones that fetter him , and hinder them to diipiay thei? 
powerful .energies , proving yet oftentimes not Qnvailabk. 
The Spirit and Salt of Harts-horn would be in morercqur 
were not Men deterred from making tryals of it , partly by 
the over apprehended unpleafantnefl'e of the f mell , and part- 
ly by the difficulties commonly met with, in its Diftillation % 
the latter of which Deterrements hath fo frighted even Chy» . 
mifts from diftilling this Cordial Subftance,that we have very 
rarely feen any, either Spirit or Salt of Harts- horn, fave what 
our feives have been induced to prepare. 
Three wayes of There ai e three wayes propoled by the Authors I have met 
AftMing . with, to diftill Harts* horn •* The one in coated Glafs Retorts." 
Karn-hoin. the olher in E artncn oncs 5 an( j t |j e third in GUubers fecond 

Philofophical Furnace. 

In the firft of thefe wayes, fome very skilful Diftillers that 
have often phactifed it, have fo complained of their frequent 
breaking their Veffels by the copioufnelTeand impetuofity of 
the Fumes that ruftiout of the Matter , when it once be- 
gins to be preft with 3 confiderable heat , that I confeiTe to 
You ingenuoufly , Pyropbtlus , 'they have hitherto frighted 
ine from making tryali of that way ; though I fee no very 
great reafon why, by a llovv and regular gradation of the Fire, 
the mifchances incident to this way of diftillation may not (ac 
leaft moft commonly) be avoided. 

To diftill the Matter we difcourfc of iff Earthen Retorts , 
is a fafer way then the former, if the Earth" be dofeand good, 
and have been iufficicntly baked as we find in the right 
Hafian Retorts , wherein we have known the Operation 
proceed very profperoufly , though a confiderable quantity 
of the M itter hath been diftilled at once, but the Retorts 
made of Earth that is fpongy or any other wayes unfit , or in 
ivhofe baking Fuell hath been f pared, are commonly fas Ex- 
- peneace 

Digitized by Google 



(340 

perience hath Informed usj improper for this fervice , where* * 
in they are earl ly broken: Besides that, it is much to be fea- 
red that all Retorts made of Earth, except it be cxtraorcjinarir 
ly compact and baked, are apt to imbibe the more fubtle and 
more penetrant parts of Harts- horn , and other volatile SuU» 
fiances diftilled in them $ which we have bbferved in fome, 
wherein the Matter hath tranfudated quite through the iub- 
ftance of the Retort , and been manifeftly difcernable on the 
out fide of it. 

The third way of diftilling Harts-horn,is performed by the 
Inftrumcnt defer ibed by Glauber , in his fecond Fhilofophical 
Furnace : But neither is this way without its inconveniencies: 
for befides that, if the Earth whereof the Veflellto be em- 
ployed is made , be not of very good and well- baked Earth , 
it will be apt to crack,in fo violent a Fire as is requifite in this 
way of Diftillation , or elfe it will imbibe part of the fineft 
Spirit it fhould tranfmit into the Receiver: And befides that 
it is difficult to work long this way , without letting fome of 
the active part of th^Spirit efcape between the wide Orifice 
of the Retort and the Cover : Befides thefe Inconveniencies, 
I fay, it is to be feared that the Matter being to be caft imme- 
diately into the VeJTel, made red hot before-hand , it will re- 
ceive a ftronger Empjreuma or impreflionof the Fire, than 
it would do in the ordinary way of Diftillation, wherein the 
fire being orderly and fucceflively increafed,much of the Spirit 
and Salt comes over into the Receiver, before trtft laft degree 
of Fireis admihiftred * which is requifite chiefly toforce over 
the more fluggifh and heavy Oyle, which therefore ( to fpeak 
congruoufly to the moft received Theory of Diftillation) fa* 
vorsmuco more of the Fire, and is grown alraoft infamous 
for its adult ion. 

■ But nbtwitbftandmg thefe Inconveniencies, PyrofhUus t 
we have found thfcfe Retorts of Glaubers not unferviceable, 
when we have had occahon to Dili ill confiderable Quantities 

• tt 3 of 



(HO 

• of fuch Materials , as were not fo pretious ] as to make the 
lofle of a part of what they were to afford us, confiderable. 

Aqd this Advertifcment may take place , efpecially if yoo 
take along with yoo , what we have declared , touching the 
Wayes we fubftitutetoavoidas much as may be, the newly 
objcdcd Inconveniences. But having in other Papers taken 
notice particularly enough of the Wayes we mean, I fliall 
forbear to mention them in this place, though one of them 
may eafily be made applicable, as Experience hath alTured us* 
even to ordinary Retorts-,for it is not difficult toapply to Thefe, 
the perforated Receivers, which being almoft of the fhapeof 
Pears , open at both ends , by holes of about two or three 
Inches Diameter ( according to the capacity of the VefifeUJ 
may be with great facility taken afunder and made clean ••and 
may, by the convenient Infertion or their Extremities into 
one another, be eafily luted together (in a level; two or three, 
or as many of them, as neceffity fhall require: and then, provi- 
ded there be applyed to the remoter extremity of the laft of 
them, fome convenient Veflell open bu.t at one end , the Re- 
ceivers will very feldom break:The fumes that come over too 
copioufly to be contained in one of them, parting freely thence 
into the iecond or the third (for we very rarely exceed three in 
all ) which will be mani reft ly cool, and fo, fpeedily turn into 
Limior, the Fumes it receives, whii'ft the fir ft Recipient is 
perhaps hotter then the Hand can endure : But of thefe Me- 
chanicall Contrivances, elfewhere. . 
An;madmfi- Now whereas GUuUr prefcribes to mingle with the Di- 
ons on fomc ftjji'd Liquors of Harts* horn rectified Spirit of Wine, to 
HaK of warn out the volatile Salt, and directs the Diftilling again of 
Gtokrud both thoie Spirits (ofWineand Harts horn) together: his 
uattm**. method of proceeding may be juftly queftioned: For firft, 
dephlegraed Spirit of Wine will not fo readily, in the way he 
fuppofeth, diftolve the volatile Salt of Harts-horn: And 
next , the Spirit this way drawn is not a fimple Spirit of 

HartS- 



Digitized by Google 



(143) 

Harts-horn, bnt acompotmded Liqaor of the Spirit of Harts- , 
horn, and that of Wine: the latter of which may poflibly , 
in diver, cafes , rather impair than improve the Virtue of the 
former. For Spirit of Harts-horn , by reafon of its opening 
and refolving, as well as Cordiall Virtues , is fafely and fuc- 
cefsf ully given in Feavers , wherein it is not obfervedio in- 
flame the Blood , whereas Spirit of Wine in Inch cafes is 
counted dangerous. And this brings into my thoughts a ve* 
ry queftionable preparation of the experienced and ingenious 
Hartman, who much extolls, for the Worms in the Stomach, Vr&dtjm,^ 
Spirit of Harts- horn in generall, but efpetially that which he 
is pleafed to call Efenftficsted ( that is 1 , as himfelfe expounds 
it ) with which its own fixed Salt, extracted with fome conve- 
nient Water, and its volatile duely depurated, have been^iif- 
folved and united. For firft , The fixed Salt of Harts horn 
hath been perhaps never yet prepared by any Man : and if 
Harts- horn doth yield a fixed Salt fas I dare not abfolutely 
deny, but that out of many Pounds a few Grains may be ex- 
tracted ; it may well be doubted whether that Salt be endow- 
ed with fpecificall Virtues : And next, The Spirit of Harts- 
horn, it it be well dephlegmed, will not /for ought I could 
ever finde ) diifblve its own Salt , uniefle aflifted by the Ex- 
ternal warmth of the Ambient Air: Infomuch that 1 ufually 
keep theSpirit and Sale in the fame Viaii , whercthey remain 
unmixed j and the Spirit that will diflolve any of its own Salt 
I account not .fufficiently dephlegmed, but to have yet an 
Aqueous alloy,whereby the Salt is imbibed. And I remember 
that having onceexquifitely rectified fome Spirit of Hatts- 
horn i and clofedit up in a Viall , after divers moneths it let 
fall a confiderable quantity of Volatile Salt,fo far was it from 
being able, without the help of fome peculiar way , to have ■ 
dffibl ved more,had I caft more into i t.I deny not that the S pi- * 
rit of Harts- horn may by the mediation of beat,bc brought to 
takeinfome of the Salt of the fame Body: but of what ule this 

violent 

. Digitized by Google 



CJ44) 

p 

violent impregnation of the liquor can be, unleffeic be quick- 
ly adminiftred, I do not yet'undcrftand-, having often feen the 
Spirit let fall again in the cold , the volatile Salt it had dif- 
folved by the aflfiftance of heat. 

, And having thus, Pjrophilus, laid before you the difficul- 
ties we have met with in the above mentioned waves of ma- 
a fourth w» of king of Spirit of Harts-horn propofed by Authors (neither 
preparations of of which we would yet have you altogether reject ) I muft 
SS'& acquaint you with our having attempted a fourth way, which* 
thor? when the matter to be diddled is not very much , I chooie 
rather to practice than any of the other, as hitherto Teeming 
morefafe and free from inconveniencies. Take then (for Ia- 
ftance ) two pounds of Harts-horn broken on an Anvil into 
pieces, each of about the bignefleof ones finger (for if it be 
tafped there is danger that it mould emit its fumes too plenti- 
fully at once ) and put it into a ftrong glafs Retort uncoated, 
big enough to contain at leaft twice as much matter : Set this 
in Sand, and fit to it a pretty large and ftrong (either fingle or 
double^ Receiver-, then give a flow fire tor three, tour, or 
fix hours , to fend away fiift the Phlegme , and more fugitive 
parts of the Spirit: then encreafing the fire, but warily, and 
gradually for divers hours, drive over the Spirit (which is 
wont to drop down fomewhat tincted) and the morg volatile 
parts of the Salt*and at length intend your fire till the bottom 
of the Retort be glowing hot, and heap alfo at laft quick coals . 
upon the fmd round about the Retort to give, as it were, a 
fire of Suppreifion , and fo force over the more fluggifli 
remaining parts of the Salt , and with it the Oyle : all which 
are to be afterwards proceeded with , according to the Dire- 
ftions given concerning the Spirit, Sa!t and Oyle of Mans 
Blood: which having been fuflkiently infilled on before, 
will not (I fuppofe)nced to be repeated now. Only it may n«t 
be impertmet to advertife you. i .That we have more than once 
bad the bottom of the Retort melted , yet not broken j the 

melted 



Digitized by Googl 



045) 

melted glafle being fufported by the fubftrated fand. i . Thac 
fome times in Fikration,fome or the thinner parts cf the Oyle 
have unpercfcivedly pafled through the paper with the Spirit 
and Salcand have not been difcovered , but by Rectification, 
wherein I have almoft admired to fee the Oyle with a gentle 
heat of a Lamp afcend to the top of a very tall head and body : . 
touching which circumftjnee it may yet be further enquired , 
whether it proceed barely from the voiatileneffe of the Oyle it . 
felf , or alfo from its being carryed up by the Salt and Spirit 
wherewith it was alTociateJ. 3. That by this way of diftil- 
lationweufually have out of a pound of Harts- horn between 
four and five ounces , (fcldome or never fo little as fbure, 
and often nearer five) or volatile Salt, Spirit, Oyle, and 
riegme 5 (of the laft ofwhich, if the Harts- horn be not re- 
cent, there will be no great quantity ) and when he diftill'd 
two pound of the matter at a time, we found the operation to 
fucceed altogether as well , and to yield us a fully proportio-' 
cable quantity of Liquor. 

The venues of the Spirit and Salt of Harts- horn, which ThciifcaM 
differ not much in Dofe, or Efficacy, are probably very great ^^l^ 

• j.a » . f 1 : °i ~ Sp>nt of Salt 

in divers dtftempers, wherein we have yet made no tryalof c f Harts horn, 
them. For they are confiderable irt refitting Putrefaction , l, « 
comforting nature, opening Obftruclions , mortifying the of ,c * 
Acidities it meets with m the blood 5 3nd, by rendring that 
volatile, promoting its Circulation, we have known confide- 
rable effects ofitinFeavers, Plufifies, Obftruclions of the 
Meflentery,and Spleen and chiefly ( which perhaps you will 
think ftrange) in Coughs and Diftempers of the brain, and 
nervous parts: in fo much that I have,by Gods blcffingjome* 
times ftopt very violenrfbut not inveterate CcughsJ with this 
medicine in a few hours. And prefcribing it to one who was 
almoft daily afTaulted with Epilepticall fits , a few D*fts of ic » 
did in a pretty while at firft make his fits come but feldome, 
and after, not at all: But whether he be \ ei fe&iy cured not ha- 
• u u ving 

• ■ 

Digitized by Google 



fa*) 

ving heard of him of late,nor having hafl opportunity to make 
further tryal of the medicine in that difeafe , I am not certain. 
Weprefcribeditlikewife, not long fince, to a Perfon who 
had long bine both did racked, and almoft bed- rid, and was 
in a fhort time ftrangely relieved by the ufeic, though not 
perfectly cured ( perhaps becaufe the Patient took but little 
of the medicine, we being then not well ft ored with it; ) and 
on fome that have been by Feavers rendred ftupid, it hath had 
very eminent Operations : but for a further account of its 
vertues , I mud referre you to the particular Narratives, I * 
may, when we meet, give you by word of mouth : and till 
then it may fuffice to tell you that it works chiefly by Sweat 
(and fome what by Urine) without being obiervtd to leave 
behind it fuch heat as divers Sudorificks are wont to do : only 
there muft be care not to adminifter it when the Pr/mdvu 9 
and pafTages are too much fluffed and cboaked up by grofie 
'Humours, left by agitating the blood , and putting it into a 
nimble M otion,i t occafion greater Obftru&ions. The Dofe 
is from five drops, or grains, to adrachme (ten or fifteen 
drops are wont to make me fweat ) in Wine , Cdrdum Bc*f 
ditto* water, or any vehicle appropriated to the difeafe * only- 
taking care that nothing acid be adminiftred with it, becaufe 
Acid and Sulphureous Salts mortifie,and difarm one another. 
H Art man commends it againlt the worms of the ftomack , 
again ft which it may very probably be available, by reafonof 
its penetrant,and falinenature,anditsemnityto Putrefaction t 
GUuber writes , that the Oyle reaifled from Salt of Tartar , 
cures Quartans, and inward wounds, and cures the pains pro- 
proJuced by Falls, Contufions, &c. being adminiftred from 
fix to twenty drops to a Patient placed in his bed to fweat 
after it : but of this, my Experience will not enable me to fay 
any thing. And I fear, PjrofhUm, that I have already too 
long entertained you about Harts- horn : and yet I fear too, 
that you e*pe& that, before I forfake this Subjeft, I fbouW 

fay 



Digitized by Googl 



(347) 

fay fomething to yon concerning a reach controverted pari 
ticular relating thereunto. The Inquiry is, Whether od ^-^^ 
no , when it is Milled , the Salt difpofe it felfin the Re- ^ iw 
ceiver into the figures of Harts- Horn , the Affirmative is hom.ihc s a ic 
maintained by many Chymifts , and a friend or mine who is V^ re 
very fevere, and not at ail credulous , having aflured me that 0 f the Horn, 
he himfclf had obferved the in fide of his Receiver over- laid 
with fuch figures or horns, I dare not deny, but that acciden- 
tally the particles of the volatile Salt may fame times repre- 
fent as well the fliape of Harts- horns , as of divers other 
things. But for our parts , having ft voral wayes , and not un- 
frequently diftilled that matter, we could never fee the pre- 
tended Saline Harts- horns, fo clearly as we thought we 
faw caufe to efteeme that thofe who affirm* d they conftaody 
faw them fo diftinctly lookt through the fpe&acles of pre- 
pofleft Imagination: not to mention , that it is .the nfualt 
method of nature in Salts to make the bigger Concretions of 
the fame figures with the fmaller grains, as we obferve in 
Nitre,R ock- allum.^rf . And the grains of the Salt of Harts- 
horn, though I have attentively enough confide red their 
(hapes, I remember not ever to have obferved of a figure like 
that of the horns they came from : but it is ttae>*atnre of 
volatile Salts to fatten themfelves to the Receiver in various 
figures according as the degree of fire that urges them up,and 
other concurrent circumftances do chance to exa& - and con* 
fonantly hereunto we have often obferved the volatile Salt of 
the fame Harts-horn to be very variqufly figured in the fame 
Receiver: and I remember that not long fince fcibliming 
fome volatile Salt of Urine,it adher'dto the upper part of the 
veflel in figures, much liker Harts- horns , than ever I had 
feen their volatile Salt make up i fo that unlefie we will 
merrily fay , that the mao whole urine wasdiftill'd, had horns 
given him by his wife, wee mil ft acknowledge that nature 
feems to give her iclf liberty to play in the Configuration of 
i u 11 2 volatile 



Digitized by Google 



volatile Salts,and that cafualities haveno anufual influenceon 
them | or, to fpeak more properly , that the various degrees 
of Fire, the differing copioufnefle of the Fumes, and many o- 
ther intervening accidents do keep thofe Configurations from 
being conftantly regular : and I remember that a while fmce, 
filtring through Cap- paper a Tincture of glafTe of Antimony, 
made with Spirit of Vinegar and Spirit of Wine,almoft accor- 
ding to b a fili us: the marter which remained in the paper 
(which was placed in a glafTe funnel, and was of the famefhape) 
did of it felf, when it began to grow dry , cleave into the fi- 
gures of trees, whole trunks, greater boughs, and fmaller 
branches, were both for their (hape, and proportion, as lively 
reprefented as if they had been drawn by the curious penfill of 
fome skilfull Painter * which paper I fhewed to (ome prions 
that beheld it not without wonderland for ought I know I am 
yet able to mew it you : nor is this the only Instance I could 
give you if need were , rf 1 had not trifled too long already to 
manifeit at prcfent, that now and then,Chancc may make Na- 
ture feem to emulate Art. 

hOZ ma kt bc But 35 ,on 8 as 1 have **dt,^rJfWwjOO this Subjc&,be- 
fubrt.tmcdfor fore I pafle to another 5 I muft not forget to advei tife you, 
sugs horni. that in cafe Stags- Horns cannot be procured for the prepa- 
ration of the above- mentioned Remedies , you may without 
much difadvantage fubftitute Bucks* horns to their (lead: 
for almoft all the trialls wee have had opportunity to make 
of the Medicines we have been lately dtfeourfing of, have 
been made with Remedies, whereto Bucks- horns afforded 
Materials. 

How to keep l had almoft forgot, Pyrifbilut, to tell you, That to keep 
Sfc^fSSj the redified Spirit of Harts- horn, Blood, or the like, is more 
hota, aneafie, then any thing but trial would make one think ; and 
yet to keep the Volatile Salt is more difficult , than to pre- 
ferve the Spirit : for more than once, when I have kept thefe 
fugitive animal-Sales by themfclvs s,ihey have penetrated the 

Corks, 



Digitized by 



(34P) 

Corks»and fcarceleft me in the well flopped Glaffes any foot- 
fteps of their having been there, and therefore thofe Chy- 
mtfts that are not ftrangers to thefe Salts , have taken much* 
pains to no great purpofe to keep them from A volation,fom« 
of therecenteft and ingenioufeft are Wont, that they may mo- • 
derate their uncurbed wildnefl'e , to pour on them as much of 
fome fuch Acid Spirit, as that ot Salt of Vitriol, ejrc. as will 
produce any maniieft conflicl with the Volatile Salt, never 
confldering,tbat as this courfedoth indeed dcvelt themof their 
fugacity,fo it doth in effect deveft them of a great part of their 
Nature,and confequently of their peculiar Venues. For I have 
elfewhere fliewn,that the Saline Corpufclts.obcainable by the 
Fire from Urine , being united with afufhcient proportion of 
Spirit of Salt, willceafeto be what they were, and with tht 
Saline parts of the Acid Liquor , will make up a kind of Sal- 
K^irmoniack. But it is eafier for me in this our cafe to fhew 
that another roans Expedient is not good , then to fubftitute 
a good one* especially in this place,where for fome Reafons 
I muft not (et down the way that I the beft approve ot : only 
I mail tell You, that my way long was(nor do I yet delpife it) 
to preferve volatile Salts in their own re&ified Spirit^ which 
fwimming over them, kept them from the immediate contact 
. of the Air , and prefcrved them fo weih that by this means I 
have fecured even fmall parcels of the fugitive Salt of humane 
Blood for many Years. 

[_3ut price the Spirit and Salt even of this fort of Horns , mS 
net, J fear, be found (o ea fie for every Man, especially , if be be 4 
Novice in Chjmiftry to procure in any conpder able Quantity .>and 
pnee the declared intent of my communicating to the Reader my 
obfervations abwt thefe Spirits of Harts-horn, Blood, Sec. xvm 
to-furmjh him with fuchctjmiidB Remedies, that men may by 
their eaftne[fe andebeapnefje be invited to provide them for tl* 
nft of the Poor-, J pre fume it mil not be improper to prefen* 

u u 3 * him 



Digitized by Google 



him with a foccedaoemn or two, that may be eafily enough #A- 

tain'dfrom Sal- Armoniack , though tbefe preparations have 
fuch Connexion with divers other Parages , wherewith they were 
Written to the Per (on I here cad Pyrophilus, that, to Avoid the 
• too much difmembring thofe Pafers , and to make theft Process 
the better under flood, I muft content my ft If to leave out thofe 
T articular s that can be ft be bared, hoping that the reft will be 
eafily excufed , at leafi by thofe who know how much feme Cby- 
mifts themf elves havchcen deluded in their Trials of the di- 
vulged ProceQes, divers of which are either falfe or very uncer- 
tain, and others, though thej Jhould fucceed, would give but a fo* 
fhi/lical fpirit t much of the obtained Liquor coming from the 
Dt pliable concretes that muft according to fuch Proceffcs be 
. mingled with the Sal- A r moniack,^ which 1 could eafily give in* 
fiances, even out of modern and aff landed Writers.^ 
5 f thc S >wwi- ^** c $V ltit °* Sal- Armoniack, Pjrofbiltai t hath fuch won- 
u\ $ tnddWtn ders afcribed to it by Chymifts, that, if I fliould conclude 
attempt, and thefe Papers touching Spirits of an Urinous nature , without 
Sng \l ^ m 8 f° mctni og to you of that , you might tbtnk I had left 
the confiderableft of them unmentioned ; but as I the rather 
acquaint you with the little I know of it, becaufe, though I 
have met with divers Authors that extoll it, I have fcarce met 
with any that teaches intelligibly,and candidly how to prepare 
it » which perhaps mod of them did not know themfelves, fo 
1 hope you will exact an accurate account of it the leiTe rigid- 
ly , becaufe I can prefent to you but little on that Subject, 
befides the fcwObfervations wherewith my own Curiofity 
has fupplyed me? having fcarce ever (to my knowledge) 
feen any Spirit of Sal- Armoniack (aye \vhat my own Fur* 
naces have afforded me , and therefore without prefuming to 
fet down folemn proceiTes about a fubject , wherein I have 
found a fmall variation of Circumftances hinder the opera- 
tions made on it from producing uniform effects, I ijiall con- 
tent 



Digitized by Googl 



tent my felf to give yon as true an infonnation as my memory 
will afford me of a few of my proceedings with this nice Salt, 
and the fucccfles of them / only prcroHing in a Word,thac by 
Sal Armon tack I here mean the Fa&itious and Venal, confi- 
ning of Urine,Soot,and Sea fait. 

And firft,accordiog to the way propofed by Glauhri in the 
fecood part of his Philofophicall Furnaces ) we diftiilcd it one 
of an open Retort (with a Cover to clap on and take off as oc- 
cafion requires)with« mixture of Lapis C a Laminar ji ; and once 
we,that way, obtained a quantity of Liquor, which feemed ex- 
ceeding ffrong , but before we could make any tryals with ir, 
the Vial that contained it having been accidentally broken % 
we loft the opportunity of fatis tying our fcl ves of the efficacy 
of it: and having not long fince attempted to make fuch a 
Spirit the fame way , there came over indeed a Liquor which 
Teemed to be the Spirit of Sal-Armoniacks but when wee 
came to Re&ifie it in a gentle beat,the greater part of it to our 
wonder, coagulated in the Retort , wherein to it was put to be • 
diftilled,into a perfect Sd-^4rmonUck y (a pretty quantity of 
which I yet keep by me)and thereby betrayed the above- men- 
tioned Liquor to have been little elfe then the Sal- Arm*nlack 
it felf,forced over by the violence of the Fire, without having 
fuffercd any reparation or its Ingredients. Nor is it by us alone, 
that the Proceffe fet down by Glauber , hath been unprofpe- 
roufly attempted , and yet perhaps it might hive conftantly 
enough fucceeded with him, and the difference of the Lapis 
Calaminaris(in which we have obferved much difparity accor- 
ding to the places it comes from ay have produced the com* 
plained of variety of SucceiTes. 

We alfo attempted to diftill a Spirit from Sal- Armoniack 
(to pretermit divers other tryals J by mixing it with equal 1 
parts of Sale ofTarfar $ but in this experiment we met with 
variety of fucceffe, for having exquifitely incorporated the 
two Salts by the help of a little faire Water , we have divers 

times 



Digitized by Google 



times had the upper part of the rccciVcr (carefully luted on 
to a fomewhat large retort ) all candyed over on the inGde, 
with Volatile Sales of feverail fhapes 5 and the Liquor after- 
wards forced over , hath fometimes remained long enough in 
the form of a very fubde and penetrant Spirit , and fometimes 
again , it hath in the very receiver almoft totally coagulated 
it felf into a lump of Cryftalline Salt : and when we had mitt 
theSalt ot7artar, and "SAl^jirmonUck^ without any Water 
or other moifture at all,our fuccefles h3*e been vei y like thofe 
above mentioned. Upon this occafion I dare not omit ac- 
quainting you with an Experiment , which yet I learn't not 
upon this occafion. Take of pure Salt of Tartar, and of good 
Sdl> Armoniack , equall parts (let them be both very dry, or 
cUe you may loofe your labour ) and grind them very acu* 
rately together, though^ou be deterred from continuing that 
toy le,by a very fubtle and fetid Urinous (learn , wont to ex- 
hale from the mixture * thefe Salts being thus exquificely 
incorporated , you muft put them into a large Glade Retort, 
to which you may fit a Receiver to catch a tend Liquor that . 
fometimes wee have obferved to come over $ then admioi- 
ftring by degrees a very ftrong Fire, the top and Neck of the 
Retort,will be lined with a pure white Sublimate, which feems 
to partake as well (though nothing neere fo mnch ) of the 
Salt of Tartar, as oi the SAl-\~Almontack and of its Qualities, 
and yet to differ from either : and though this Sublimate 
be farre enough tram being the true Volatile Salt of Tartar 
fo highly extolled by Paracelfus and ficlmont ; yet it is no ig» 
noble Medicine in obfti u&ons, and fome other dt (tempers: 
And 1 remember one of the moft expert Chymifts I know, 
having.made tryjl of fome I prefented him, told me he found 
fucheffecls of it , as made htm divers times very prefling and 
follicitous for more. The Fetid Liquor that will come over 
wee have found fometimes to be very little , and at other 
times much more copious, without being able to difcerne 

clearly 



Digitized by Google 



clearly whence thedifparity proceeded ; and the Caput Mor- 
Hum remaining in the Retort, by Solution, Filtration, and 
Coagulation, affords a pure Salt of greater Dieurettcal effica- 
cy, than almoft any I have hitherto met withall Another 
way by which we attempted to attain a Spirit of SaI Armo- 
niacky was, by accurately mixing two parts of it, with three 
or four of Quick- lime,whofe virtue had not been impaired by 
being expoted to the Air, This mixture being diftillcd in a 
Retort, placed in fand, wkh a ftrong fire afforded us ( toge- 
ther with forae dry fublimate in the neck or the Retort, and,as 
I remember, a little volatile Salt in the Receiver) in a very 
ftrong and yellowifh Spirit, fo exceedingly penetrant , and 
(linking, that it was not eafie to hold ones nofc co the open 
mouth of the Vial wherein it was kept , without danger of 
being ftruck down, or for a while difabled to take breath, by 
the plenty and violence of the exhaling Spirits: But the Liquor 
forced over by this method, trough exceeding vigorous as to 
its Qjialities,W3$ inconfiderable,as to its Quwtityj and there- 
fore we now chufe to vary a little this way of proceeding and 
let the Q^ck lime lie abroad in the open Air (but pro- 
tevfted from all other moifture, except that of the Air ) for 
divers dayes-, in which time the imbib'd humidity of the am- 
bient Air would in fome degrees (lake it , and make it fome- 
what britler than it was before* and the Lime thus prepared, 
being mingled with Salt- Armoniack , and difttlled in all cir* 
cumftances after the former manner, afforded us a Liquor fo 
copious, and yet fo ftrong, that we hitherto acquiefce in this 
way of diftilling this wild Salt, as the bed we have yet met 
with. But note, that we ufed, towards the latter end, to en- 
creafe the fire to that degree, by heaping up Coals on the up- 
per part of the Retort, that the Mixture in the Retort hath 
been brought to flow. Note alfo, that though even the Spirit 
thus drawn perfevered long in the form of a Liquor, yet 
yefterday coming to look upon a Vial of it , which we 

xx rcferved, 



Digitized by Google 



(354) 

referved,to try what effe&time would have on it, we found 
that about a fourth or fifth p3rtofith3d fpontaaeoufly coa- 
gulated it felfe into exactly figured graines of a Chryftalline 
Salt, the Liquor fwimming ahout it * rctaining^everthelefle, 
a very Grange fubtlety : Which Obfervation concording with 
divers others makes mee apt to doubly whether or 00 this fo 
celebrated Spirit of Salt- Armoniack be really much, if at all, 
other then the refolved Salt of Urine, and Soot, of which that 
body confifts, fomewhat fubtiliated by the fire, and freed 
from the clogging Society of the Sea- fait , to which they 
were formerly affociated and united; though 1 confefleic 
feemeth not improbable, by the greaF&aergy which may be 
obferved in this Spirit, when it is dextroufl y drawne, that the 
entire Concrete,and the Quick- Time, may afford it fomething 
that it could not receive from either of the Ingredients, 
whence the Mixture did refult, as we fee in Attn a Regis, which 
diflolves crude gold, though neitherthe Salt- Armoniack, nor 
the Peter, nor the Vitriol alone affords, by the ufuai wayes , 
Spirit capable of producing that efted. The great virtues , 
and ufesof Salt-Armoni3ck, efpecially in Phyfick, I cannot 
now ftay'to treat of, but you will find them largely enough 
fet down by Glauber whofe Encomiums never thelefle, muft 
not be all adopted by me , who in this place mention the 
Spirit of Sal- Armoniack , but as a Medicine that is near of km, 
and may ferve for a Snccedancnm to the Spirits ot Hartshor-n, 
Urine, Blood, &c. 

But although the laft mentioned way, Tyrofhilus, be the 
leaft imperfect one we have hitherto met with, of diftilling 
Salt- Armoniack , yet becaufe you may fometimes need a 
Spirituous liquor impregnated with the adiveft parts of that 
noble concrete when you want either Ketorts to diftill in, or 
Furnaces capable of giving ftrong fires,! dare not omit to in- 
form you, tint, we have fometimes drawn overfuch a liquor, 
of Salt- Armoniack after the following manner. DuTolve pure 

Salt- 



• 

Digitized by Google 



fSSS) 

Salt* Armoniack in a fmall quantity of fair water , then in 3 
Cucurbit put fuch a quantity of ftrong Quick- lime powder V> 
as may fill up a fifth or fixth part of the vefl'eH, and water i c 
very well by degrees with the former Solution of the Salr 
Armoniack,and immediately clap an Alembick on the Cucur- 
bit, and faften a Receiver to the Alembick, clofing the joy nts 
very acurately* and from this mixture, by the gentle heat of a 
Bath or a Lamp , you may obtain a Liquor that fmells much 
IikeSpiiitbf Urine, and feemsto bemnch of the fame na- 
ture-, and this volatile Liquor being once or twice reclified 
ferfc, with a very mild heat , grows exceeding fugitive and 
penetrant , and works by Sweat , and a little , perh-ps, by 
Urine ; and I remember that when I fir ft made it, having been 
induced by fome Analogicall Experiments , I had formerly 
made, to give it to one that had a Patient troubled with an ex- 
treamly violent Cough,I had an account quickly brought me, 
th3t he not flowly, but wonderfully mended upon the very . 
firft or fecond Dofe ; and indeed the tryals th3t have hitherto 
been made of it, makes me hope that it will prove little inferi- 
• our in efficacy to the other above mentioned more coftly 
Sprits, fcarce any of which being preparabie by fo fafe , and 
compendious a way, if this Medicine emulate them in Virtue, 
theeafinede of the preparation (wherein little time needs be 
(pent, and lefle danger or breaking veflels incurr'd) will much 
endear it to me. But, Pyrefbilw, becaufe I would affift You to 
make variety of Experiments about Volatile Salts,and becaufe 
diverfe tryals may be more conveniently made, when the Sa- 
line Corpufcles are in a dry form, then when they are in that 
of a Liquor % I will take this occafion to mention to You a 
way by whofe Intervention a change on the fixt body em* 
ployed about the newly mentioned Experiment, hath fornc- 
times afforded me ftore of volatile Salt. This way was only to 
mingle exquifitly a quantity of Sal- Armoniack, wjth aboux 
chrice its weight of ftrong Wood-allies. For the Spirit that 

xx 2 we 



Digitized by Google 



we this way draw oat of a Retort plac'd ia Sand, did quickly 
in the Receiver Coagulate into a Salt and this Method was 
again experimented with like fucceiTe. And the Salt thus 
made,we found fo extreamly fubtle and volatile,that it feem'd 
to be much or the fame Nature with that orU ine* and if it 
be indeed, ( as probably it is ) only the Volatile Salt of the 
Urine , snd perhaps alfo of the Soot, whereof the Sal Armo- 
tuck confifts, this may pafle for a more compendious way of 
obtaining fuch Salts, than others that are hitherto wont to 
be pradhfed amongft Chymifts. But I will not undertake 
that this way of obtaining rather Salt than Spirit fhall con- 
ftantly fuccecd. Yet if you find it do not,I ftiall not perchance 
refufc You a better way. But if you could devife a Method 
(which poffibly is not unattainable) of bringing over into a 
Spirit not the b3re Urinous and fuliginous Ingredients of Sal- 
\jttumiatk but the whole Body * it may bc,y ou would have 
a tMenjlruum that would make good , if not furpafs even 
Renanm\ and Glauber % Elogies of the Spirit of Sal-Armo- 
niack. 

of preparations The affinity betwixt Volatile Salts and Sulphurs , doth, 
of saiioc and ffrifbUw\ as well as your Curio II ty , invite me to acquaint 

Sc! d h L?° u$ y° u > w ^ * omc °^ Trials we have made about the Pce- 
c i iquou. p arat j ons 0 j Saip^urcous Fetid Liquors, which I am the more 

inclined to do, becaufe, though 1 find mention made of fome 
of them in Chymical Books, yet they are there delivered 
with fo little incouragement, amongft many other procefTes 
of which it appears not that the prefcribers made triall 3 that 
when! had diftilled fome of thofe Sulphurs, divers expert 
Chymifts were very defirous to have a fight of them to fatisfie 
themfelves that fuch Liquors could be fo prepared. The 
way of making the common Balfam , or Ruby of Sulphur, 
is too well known to need to be long infifted on. Only, be- 
caufe thereis fome little variety ufed by fcverall in the prepa- 
ration , it will not perhaps be araifle to inform you that we 



Digitized by 



057) 

are wont to make it by mixing about three parts of Oyleof Thevwofmt: 
Turpentine, with two of good Flower of Brimftone,3nd fet- J^ 1 ^™" 
ting them on a ftrong Urinall flightly ftopt in an heat of Sand, Ruby is«7-° r 
only great enough to make the Liquor with a little crackling ptar, 
noifefwhencefoever that proceeds ) workeupon t\\z Sulphur, 
till it be all perfectly reTolved into a Blood red Balfam 
which will be performed in fix,cight,or ten Ho ures according 
to the quantity of the Ingredients to be united this Balfam, 
which is indeed in lb me cafes no defpiable Remedy , is by 
vulgar Chymifts, according to their cuftome , very highly 
extolled, and fometimes employed in Diftempers and Con- 
flitutions,wherein,in(tead of performing the wonders by them 
expected, its Heat doth more harme, than its drying and Bal- 
famick properties do good : but yet apparent it will be, by 
what we (hall fay anon , that by this preparation , the Body 
of the Sulphur in fomewbat opencd,and therefore fas we faid) 
in fome cafes the Ruby of Sulphur may prove no inefFe&uall 
Rcmedy,whicb miy probably be improved if it be prepared 
by bare Digeftion in a very gentle heat , by which courfe we 
have profperou% prepared it, though not in fo fhort a time, 
when we made it not in order to fome other Medicine. 

To Volatilize the Sulphunhus Refolved we tooke the Bal- ^VoMk 
fam made the former way in a few Houres, and putting it in suljftar, 
a Retort, either with,or without fair Water,which is fuppofed 
to help to carry up the fuperfluous Oyle,we placed the Veifel 
in a Sand Furnace-, and,with a gentle heat drawing oft as much 
of the Oyleof Turpentine as would in that heat come over, 
we (hiftedthe Receiver, and carefull luted on the new one j 
and laftly, giving Fire by degrees, we forced over a Liquor of 
a deep and darkifh Red, extreamly penetrant, but of a fmcll 
fo Sulphureous and difFufi ve of it felfe,that it was fcarce to be 
reftramed byCorkes, and was by great oddes ftrongerthan 
that of the Ruby before diftillation. 

The like Experiment we try ed in a Glaffe head and body 

x x 3 pieced 



Digitizedjpy Google 



?\aced in Sand , and through that way , likwife we obtained 
a Volatile Balfam of Sulphur, yet we found it too inconve- 
nient to be equallable with the former. What long Digeftton* 
of this Liquor will do, to take away , or leflen its Empyreu- 
matical and offenfive Odour, we have not yet been by expe- 
rience fatisfied,no more than of its medical Virtues * though 
probably , the great penetrancy of the Liquor confidered , they 
will not be languid. 

Authors alfo prefcribe the making a volatile Balfam of 
S ulphur,by driving over, after the above-mentioned manner , 
a Solution or Flower of Brimftone in Linfeed Oyle,and this 
Remedy they highly extoll$ but though it may probably 
prove a good Medicine, yet fi nee they commend it but by 

- conjecture, and not upon Experience , I fee no great reafon 
why it mould be preferable to the other 5 for we find that ex- 
prelTedOyles are much more apt to receive an offenfive Em- 
fireuma then Oyle or Turpentine, which being much more 
volatile than they , requires nothing near fo violent a heat to 
make it afcend ; and, unleflfe it be found that the Sulphureous 
par tides are able to mitigate the corroilve ones, the diftilled 
Liquor of an exprelTed Oyle may prove noxious in the Body. 
For by purpofeiy ( for tryals fake ) diftillingOyle Olive, by it 
felf, though not in a naked Fire, we obtained a Liquor of th3t 
exceding lharpnefs, that it would ( taken inwardly) probably 
corrode, or fret either the Stomach or fome other of the inter- 
nal Parts, 

There is another way of preparing a Sulphureous Balfam, 
to which Penotus no ignoble Chymill , afenbes fuch ftupen- 
dious virtues,that though I have not yet made tryal of it in DU 
PrwwfciPrc feafts , yttl dare not leave it altogether unmentioned* the 
Sv"c°^ procefs being briefly but this. Take good Balfam of Sulphur 
naifam wiih made with Spirit or Oyle of Turpentine* and having freed it 
Advmffcmemj * vom ns ru P^ ^ U0US Oylinefs.pour on it well dephlegm'd Spi- 
upoflk. rit of Wine, and therewith draw by affuflioo of new Spirit as 

often 



Digitized by Google 



(359) 

often as need requires a fufficient quantity of a Red Tin&ure, 
which by filtration and abftraclion in Balneo muft be redu» 
ced toa Balfamick confidence * this Liquor you may if you 
pleafe by degrees of £ire drive through a Retort placed in 
Sand, and thereby obtain a volatile Baffam of very great pe- 
netrancy, and probably of no fmall efficacy 5 but the Triall I 
have made of this procefle , gives me occafion toadvertife 
You 5 

!• That, unlefs your B3lfam be reduced toa ftifftHick- 
nefs, and almoft to drynefs it felfe , the Operation will hardly 
fucceed, we having fruitlcfly digefted for fome months Spirit 
of Wir\e upon Balfam, whofe confidence was fomewhat too 
-Liquid. 

2. That as foon as the Spirit of Wine is fufficiently tin&ed, 
it ought to be Decanted, and fucceeded by new left by too 
long digeftion, inftead of heightning its Tincture, it let fall 
that which it hath already acquired. 

3. That upon a very flow abftraclion of moft of the 
Tinned Spirit inadigefting furnace, we once found the re* 
maining Liquor not to be in the form of a Balfam , but to 
confift partly of Spirit of Wine * and partly of a feeming 
diftind Oyle , whereinto the Sulphureous Tincture W3s redu- 
ced. The Balfam of Sulphur thus made without Diftillati- 
on feems likely to be an innocent er and nobler Medicine than 
the common Ruby of Sulphur , made with a hot and ill fcented 
Oyle of Turpentine, and by this preparation may alfo appear 
the truth of what we formerly faid, when we told you , that 
the body of the Sulphur was opened by Solution in Oleagi- 
nous Liquors : for out of the common thickned Balfam , as 
you may be informed by this procefs, well Rectified Spirit of • 
Wine will,in a (hort time,extra& a blood red Tincture, where* 
as by long digeftion of Spirit of Wine alone upon pure, but 
nndiflblvcd^ , flowers of Brim ft one, we could not difcern any 
change of colour in the Mtnftruum 5 though I dare not deny- 

* the 



Digitized by Google 



(l6o) 

• the poflibility of what forae Authors affirm , who write \ 
that Spirit of Wine very excellently Dephlegm'd, will in 
time i of it (elfe, draw a Tincture from flowers of Sulphur, 
which Tincture they yet pretend not to make of a higher 
then a Lemmon colour. And, by the way, let me tell you, 
th3tour red tincture formerly mentioned istif it be well made) 
fo ftrong of the Sulphur, that probably it would make a very 
penetrant, and effectual outward remedy in £ches, and divers 
other cold diftempers of the nervous parts 5 tor it hath been 
already found, that good Spirit of Wine alone is one of the 
powerfulleft Fomentations in divers cafes of that n ,ture-,(info- 
much that it hath been fomctimes found to arreft (he fpreading 
Mortification of Gangrenes * ) and therefore being fo richly 
impregnated with Sulphur: which is, even without the affi- 
ftanceof fo fubtlea vehicle, very available in-many diiTjffe- 
ctions of the Genus Ncrvofum - 7 'tis probable that the skilful 
aflociation of two fuch active remedies may produce confider- 
able Effects. 



of an Excel- Take of pure flowers of Sulphur one part, of the beft Oyle 
su7phw nSc Olive four or five parts, mix them well together in a ftrong 
only w.thoyi- earthen pot, able to contain a much greater quantity of the in- 

TV common 8* e di eocs tnan ls t0 De P uc '° ,c » ^ ec cms ve ^ over a moderate 
way o^prc^a- fire of Charcoals, throughly kindled , till the Oyle , though 
nng>t, {lowly, hive perfectly diflolved all the Flowers of Sulphur, 
which will (if you work it well ) be performed in about half 
an hour, or an hour (according to the quantity of your Ma- 
terials J But you muft have a great care, during the wIid Je 
■ Operation,fir(t,that the Oyle catch not fire.whereby it would 
not only be loft it felfe, but perhaps en danger the firing of 
the houfe* and next that the Mixture be kept nimbly, and 
conftantly ftirring from the fii ft beginning of th&Oyles acti- 
on on the Sulphur, till the Solution be fully made j and the 

Pot 

• 

1^ y Google 



Pot (having been taken off the fire J be grown cold again. 
The chief Signs whereby yon may perceive, that, you have 
not erred in the Operations, are, Fir/l, if the Sulphur be 
perfectly dillblved in the Oyle, which you mud often try 
before yon take it from the fire , by taking up with the tip 
ot a (lick a drop or two of the Liquor yec in Preparation , 
and letting it coole on white Paper, or on your naile, where- 
by you may difcern , when the Solution is perfectly made, 
by the deep Rednefle ,- and Tranfparency of the Liquor , 
and by its containing no more in it any undiflblved Flow- 
ers of the Brimftone $ Next , by the Confidency of the 
Bal fame which ought to be neither too Liquid (as you will 
find it, if it hath not (laid its due time on the Fire : nor too 
thick fas it is apt to become if you remove it not feafonably 
from the Fire*, ) but of the confidence of fomewhat thin Ho- 
ney 5 and iaftly, by the fmell which ought to be ftrong of the 
Sulphur jbut not of the Fire-, for though the Sulphureous Stink 
is, in this Remedy, to be expected, that Empyreumaticall one, 
which proceeds from burning rand by skilful 1 noftrils may 
be eafily difcerned ) is very poflible to be avoided. 

The Dtps of this Balfam , when it is to be inwardly ufed, 
may be from two to fifteen, or twenty drops, according as 
the greatnefle of the diftemper, and chiefly the drcngth, and 
Condicution of the Patient (hall require and bear. It may be 
givco upon a fading Stomack, either alone, or brought to the 
Confidence ot Pills, or of a Bolus wit h powdered Sugar, Li- 
quorice , ejrc or eife diflblved in any convenient Vehicle , 
wherewith its Oleaginous nature will permit it to mingle. 
Outwardly it may be adminidred either by bare Inunction of 
the part affected, or elfe by incorporating it with any other 
convenient Oyntment, or P lay der: after which, we are wont 
to prefcribe to have an application made to the part of two or 
three little Bagges filled with Sand, as warm as the Patient can 
eafily endure it , and Jhifted as foon as either ox them begins 

y y , to 



to cool , that by this means, the Pores being opened, the Ver- 
tue of the Baifam, by being made more penetrant, may reach 

the farther. 

I Vi3ve been thus particular, Pyrofhilus, in the mention of 
this Remedy, becaufe though it feem but a flight and trivial 
Preparation, yet Experience hath given us better opinion of 
it , then I fear the flightneffe of the Preparation will as 
yet allow You. And indeed its Vermes, I am apt to think 
more then I have yet had occafion toobferve, and therefore 
muft referre you to Rulandus his Centuries , where they are 
often mentioned: but outwardly in Strains, old Aches, 
Bruifes, and the like, it is wont to be very effectual $ in the 
beginning of Fits of the Gout it hath feveral times e though 
not conftantly) been profperoufly applyed both to Mr. £. B. 
and divers other per ions , and fometimes it hath been found 
not ineffectual even in the sciatica it (elf. And as for Paraly- 
ticall diftempers, I have had by askilfull Phyfician an account 
fent me of fcarce credible things which it hath therein perfor- 
med: to which I fli ill only adde , that a while fince, I had 
great thanks returned me on the behalfe of a faire young 
Lady, to whom I profperoufly prescribed it againft agreat 
Tumor in her heck , which was fuppofed to be the beginning 
of the Kings- evil : But this Tumor was recent enough, which 
circumftance I think fit to fpecifie, becaufe I fear that if the 
Scrophulous Tumor had been inveterate , the fuccelTe would 
not have been fo good. Inwardly the chief life we made of 
it hath been in Coughs , and Diftempers allyed thereunto : . 
but its Balfamicall nature, making it both healing and re- 
fiftive ( if I may fo fpeak ) of Putrefaction, makes it pro- 
bable that its Venues may be moreextenfive* to which pur- 
pofe I remember that a while fince a friend or mine tryed it 
with wonderfull fuccefle in miclu fdnguinis fere deplordte, ha- 
ving fir ft* by a gentle heat reduced it to fuch a Confidence, as 
allowed him to make it up into Pills. But of the particular 

Cafes, 



Digitized by Google 



(3*1) 

Cafes, wherein oar Remedy hath been faccesfull, no more at other wayei of 
prefenti We fhall rather fubjoyn, That though this have bec,n preparing thi$ 
the way which we have the ofteneft employed in the making Balfam * 
of the Balfam$ yet wee mad not conceal horn You, that we 
have divers times met with Accidents, which fruitrated our 
endeavours and expectations. For if the fire adminiftred be too 
languid,the Solution of the Sulphur by the O) le proceeds not * 
well ; rnd on the other fide have found* that not only a ftrong 
heat is apt to burn the matter,or to make the Oyle boy I over, 
and perhaps take fire i but even that upon a very little ex cede 
in the degree of heat, the Oyle and Sulphur would, before it 
could be expected , degenerate together into a heavy and vif- 
cous Lump (almoft of the colour of the liver of an Animal) 
which coagulated matter proved afterwards exceeding diffi- 
cult to be by the affufion of frefh Oyl diflbived and reduced to 
a due confidence. Wherefore we tryed to prepare this Balfam 
by putting the proportion of Ingredients formerly mentioned 
into a ftrong Urinal, which we placed in Sand, and making 
under it no more fire then was (ufficient to make it (lowly 
work upon the Flowers, ( which did often during their Solu- 
tion make a clackling noiie, ; we continued the Operation 
for divers ( perhaps many) hours , at the end of which we 
found the Sulphur diflbived , and the mixture reduced to a 
Balfamick colour and confidence. So that if you diftruft your 
dexterity to prepare this BalQmi by the former way with a 
naked fire,weemuftadvifeYou tomakeufeof this latter way, 
as that which is the fafer, though it be the longer way of pro- 
ceeding. Nay when we had leifureenough.we did,for tryals 
fake, profperoufly attempt the Solution of Flowers of Brim- 
ftone, with common Oyl by the farre gentler heat of bare Di- 
geftion, and by that means obtained a Balfame perfectly 
free from aduftion, but of fomewhat too liquid a confiftence, 
which may be eafily remedied by the mixture of powdered Li. 
cuiorice, Sugar, or any other fuch convenient Concrete. We 

y y 2 mud 

• . Digitized by Google 



(3*4) 

muft alfo advertlfeycu that this Balfam may alfo be prepared 
with Oy le of Nuts, of Poppy feeds, of Hjpericon^ inftead of 
Oy 1- Olive.or any Other expreft Oyie,appropriated to the par- 
ticular diftemper againft which the Phy(ician inten.ls to em- 
ploy the remedy.* only care muft behadthit theSpecifick 
qualities of the Oy le be not fo fugitive, as to be dettroyed by 
the Ebullition requifitc to the making of the Balfam which 
if it be to be enriched with fpecifick virtues in relation toany 
particular difeafc, may perhaps be beft prepared by the laft 
mentioned way (of digeftion) wherein the fubtlc Spirits 
that impregnate theOyleare not in fuch danger to be driSpated 
by the Fire. 

The knowingeft Chymifts themfelves ( Pyropbilus ) are 
wont fo much (and perhaps <iot altogether undefervedly) 
to extoll the efficacy of Antimony, that we were thereby 
invited, befidej divers Preparations of it for internal ufe, to 
attempt the making of fomc remedies ofit,that might alfo be 
externally applicable i and in profecuttonof thisdefign, we 
found that by boyling four or five fingers height of good 
jbSmSi rf °^ Turpentine upon very finely powdered Antimony, 

put with the Liquor into a ftrong Glalfe Urinal , placed in 
Sand, the Oyle after fome hours would grow exceeding high 
Tincled •, and being gently in great part abftra&ed, would 
leave behind it a body or a Ballamick confiftence, and a deep 
rednefle : which may, I prefume, be applyed to refolve, and 
difcufle hard Tumours, and remedy divers other outward 
Evils , with more effect than the fimple Balfam of common 
Sulphur formerly defenbed. And from this Antimonial Bal- 
fam abftra&ed to a differ confiftence, wee found that Spirit of 
Wine would draw a Tin&ure,which I likewife fuppofe might 
prove a very powerful! Fomentation \ though the Spirit we 
ufed ( perhaps becaufe it was not fufficiently Dephlegmated) 
cbd not in a tew dayes attain to more than a very pale red- 
nefle:/ but this Tincture being (lowly freed from the moft 

part 



Digitized by Google 



'(3*5) 



part of the Spirit of Wincbecame of the confidence of (ome- 
what liquid Hony, and of a deeper colour, thereby affording 
us a purer Balfam : which we have not yet,.(bting hindred by 
fome accidents) attempted to bring over the Htlm. Nor 
did we here delift, but by divers tryals found that the An- 
timonial Balfam , above mentioned, being put inro a Ruorr, 
placed in Sand,and prefled by degrees of Fire,would at length 
emit Steams, which would condenfe in the neck of the Re- 
tort, and fall thence into the Receiver in fanguine drops : this 
volatile red Balfam (efpecially if by this volatilization the 
Antimony have loft its Emetick property ) wee cannot but 
think endowed with more then ordinary Virtues, outward 



of the Liquor, and the Energy of the Mineral , with whole 
fubtle pans it is richly impregnated, if it confift not mainly 
of thtm. But we are yet in profecution of this Preparation, 
and therefore till we have ieen how far we are like to improve 
this Remedy,We (hall forbear any further mention of impe- 
rially fince we have already in this very Paper,given you as we 
fuppofe, fufficient pxoofe, 'that We are more follicitous for 
your Satisfy dlion and proficiency , than for our own Repu- 
tation , f of being a fevere Critic k in eftimating of Medicines) 
Ft jrotherwife we mould not have been fo indifcreet, as to ac- 
quaintyou with any Preparation, of whofe medicall Virtues 
we have not yet made much tryal, whileft we are not deftitute 
of other remedies , whofe tffigacy hath been manifefted to us 
by Experiencc.But we have often obferved,that divers ufeful of the obfeure 
Chymicall Prepare {ions are mentioned foobfeurely, and ur> andc ]^ pt j" u 
intelligibly by the Authors that write of them.orelle are with- J chymittll" 8 
out an) particular ,or enaun a Ag note of D ft ind ion mentio- 
ned aroongft a crowd ofothei Frocefles-, fome ofwoich have 
perhaps already been found to be falfe, or trivial, and others of 
which may be rationally enough diftrufted, that mpft Phy- 
Ccians,andCbymifts themfeives are deterred from attempting 



end perhaps toward too : confidering the 




yy 3 



to 



Digitized by Google 



(366) 

to prepare thofe remedies, not fo much becaufe they feem un- 
likely to prove confiderable,as becaufe they are afraid that the 
Proceffes are falfe,*or fraudulently fet down", and confequen- 
ly, that concretes of fuch a Confiftence, Colour, Scent, and 
other obvious qualities , as are afcribed to the Remedies 
propofed, are not preparable by the publiuYt Directions. 

And that you might fee, Pyropbilus, what difcouragements 
I have met with even from Artifts themfelves to keep me 
from trufting to Printed Chymicall Procefles, I think it not 
amifle to mention here a memorable paflage of the famous, 
2nd experienced Alexander Van suchten , who is reported to 
have gotten more by the practice of Chymicall Phyfick 
then any of the Contemporary Profeflors or it: far he, to- 
wards the end of his Book or the fecrets of Antimony (of 
which he clearly difclofeth not any in that TreatifeJ gives this 
account of his Crypticall way of writing ; gnod in hoc Tra- 
ft at u nullum Recipe propofuerim , oh id '{actum eft, quodvos 
feducere nolo •, Recipe cnim ilia feducunt junior es iMedicos: fed 
nequea Theophrafto ullum Recipe Scriptum eft , quod ad Mc» 
dinam.quin occult um [enfum bdbeat , & in quo nihil vol deer it ^ 
vel abundet, & hoc non fit fine magnis c tufts* Wherefore 
make account,that,be{ides that /^changes of the qualities of 
Bodies may afford much light to Naturalifts , he doth Chy- 
mifts no ufelefle piece of fervice, that acquaints them with the 
fuccefleof the nobler fort of Procefles mentioned in Authors, 
though he flioidd give them little or no account of the Virtues 
of the Remedies prepared by thofe Procefles : but this I hope 
is not altogether our cafe $ for befides that our Observations 
are likely tofave You much yfluble, and perhaps fome mis- 
takes, and mif-adventures •••fides that, (I fay) we hive 
had opportunity to obferve fuch eminent effects of feverall of 
the volatile Liquors defcribed in thefe Papers , as may juftly 
give us promifing Expectations of the Properties of the reft , 
which are io their obvious qualities foneere of kin to them. 

And 



• Digitized by 



(3*7) 

And this fort of Medicines having been found fometimes to do 
wonders, and generally to be fafe ( which of a few of the 
known operative, and not Specifick Medicines can be truly 
affirmed ; I am apt to think, that he that (hall bring thefe 
RemedieSjin fpight of their ill Sccnt,into the good opinion of 
Phyficiansmay make no inconfiderable number of Patients 
beholden to him. 

I mould not, Pjrofhilus, proceed to make You repent Your 
Curiofity to know my thoughts of the Urinous, and Sulphu- 
reous Remedies it hath hitherto made me treat oft were it not, 
that there yet remains fomething to be faid , without which, 
all that hath been faid , will fcarce fignifie very much towards 
the effe&ual recommending of thofe medicines toYour efteem 
and pra&ife. 

For I do not ignore, fjrofhilus , that not only the Ge* Concerting 
ncrality of the Galtnicall Phyficians , but divers of the * chJK' 
more eminent, and judicious of the Chymifts themfelves, e*"aa$ and 
have been pleafedtocondemne the internal! ufe of Liquors £ft c ^ n ^ 
driven through a Retort, by the violence of Fire, upon "^b^hTGaTe- 
the fcores of their being ofTenfively Empyreumaticall, and n J"ii and thofe 
Stinking : among which fort of Liquors I cannot expe&, that JJubv" 
our Spirits of Blood, H3rts* horn, drc. will efcape the being the MethodifU. 
reckoned. But forafmuch as the profperous Effects I have had 
opportunity to fee, of divers Remedies of that Nature, have 
given me for them rather an efteem, then either a detefta- 
tion or contempt i I fuppofeit may prove no unfeafonable, 
piece of Ju ft ice to the Spirit of Blood, and the other Noble, 
though fetid Remedies I have been fetting you down * nor 
no unferviceable piece of Charity to Men, if in this place, and 
once for all, I fpend fome lines in endeavouring to refcue thefe 
criminated Medicines from the great prejudice they fuffer un- 
der, and from a reputation, which whileft jt render tjiem ' 
more odious then even their fmeli can do, is likely to make 
men deny themfelves the benefit of them. 

i 



•v 



Digitized by Google 



I might here on this Occafioo call in Queftion, whether doc 
only Galenifts, but even many Chymifts themfelves, be not 
fomewhat more afraid than they need be, of what they call 
EmfjreumA. Butl will fufptnd'4 while that Queftion, and at 
prefent conftiTe to You, that I have fometimes doubted 
AndwhetKer whether or no that (link which is generally called bj the new- 
ncfffrfd.ws ly mentioned n3me, do alway es, and neceflanly proceed from 
chymtcaiiMe the Imprtflions or a violent Fire. For to make a pure Spirit, 
tx^thT^ and Salt of Urine, there needs nothing, but to let it in a well 
Icnce of X ftopt vefl'el purrifie for a competent time ( as we elfewhere 
Fire, or the na- teac h ) j n 3 Dunghil, or any refembling warmth, ( and that it 



turc ofthe Mat; 



felf,perhips,is not neceflary to its Putrefaction;) snd then to 
draw off an eighth or tenth part of the Liquor that firft afcends 
by the gentle heatjof a Bath. By which, or by the yet milder 
warmth of a Lamp- fur n3ce , it may be fufficiently rectified, 
and brought to yield , befides the Spint , good ftore of Salt. 
And (ince the Spirit thus made differs fo little in Smell or 
Tafte from thofc of Blood and Hiits-horn , that moft mens 
Nofes are not criticill enough to diftingu'fti them , (and We 
have fometimes taken pleafure to make Chymifts themfelves 
to miftake the one of thofe Liquors for the other.) It feems 
worth confidering, whether or no the fetid and urinous Tafte 
and Smell , which in thefe Spirits is faid to be Empyreuma- 
ticall,and to proceed from the Aduftionof the Fire, be not the 
Genuine Tafte and Odour of the Spirituous & Saline particles 
of the mixed Bodies themfeives,which they would manifeft if 
they werecopioufly extricatedftofpeak in tbeKings language) 
feparated horn the other Principles or Ingredients and aflbcia- 
ted into one Bo^y , though without ths violence of the Fire. 
For to diftill the Spirit ot putrified Urine, wherein the like 
Smell and Tafte are eminent, there needs (as wefatd) np-grea- 
ter heat then that of a Lamp furnace,or of Horf-dung, flince 
in the latter of thtfe only, Urine too long kept,and but negli- 
gently ftopt, hath been obferved to have loft its volatile Salt 

and 

Digitized by Google 



and Spirit, before it was taken out of the Horfe-dung. And 
fuch a Heat feems not great enough to imprefs an Em;yreumd 
upon fuch a Liquor, For we tee that moft things diftilled in 
the greater heat or a Bath, are commended by Phyficiansand 
• Ch> raids , for their being free from Empyreume. And' 
what Activity may be acquired by the fubtle parts or a mixed 
Body, by the convening (if I may fo fpeakj of fuch Spiritu- 
ous Particles,difengagcd""from thofe other parts which doggM 
or imprifoned them, without any Empyreumaticall Lnprtlfi- 
on, from any violent external Heat, may appear by the Chy» 
micall Oyles of Spices. For though they be ufually drawn 
by Chymifts and Apothecaries , by the h< lp of Water in 
Limbtcks ; and though they have by us been drawn after 
anothei manner (which we may elfewhere teach You) with a 
much gentler heat ( fometimes not -exceeding that of an 
ordinary Balneum ) yet thefe well Dephlegm'd Liquors, re* 
taining fo well the genuine Tafte and Smell of the Concretes 
they were drawn from that they pafs unaccufd of Empyrenme, 
are fome of them mach ftronger and hotter than the Spirit or 
Salt of Mans Blood, or of Hartf- horn. As may appear ef pea- 
ally by the Oyleof Cinnamom, which rf pure, is more pene- 
trant and fretting, than any thing but tryall could eafily have 
perfwaded me. And left you (hould object, that the Fire doth 
confiderably contribute to the ftrength of thefe Liquors 
otherwife than by difengaging the Particles they confift of 
from the una&ive parts of the concrete, and affembling them 
together;! mud advertife You,that I have obferved little lcfle 
Heat and Penetrancy, than in divers of thefe, in fome Liquors 
feparated without cheatfiftance orDiftillation: as for in It a nee, 
in the purer foi t of the ttue Peruvian Balfam, and in another 
kind of natural Balfam, almoft of an Amber- colour, which be- 
longed to an Eaftern Prince (who carried it up and down 
with him as a Jewel ) whofe Domefticks at his death fold it; 
whereby I came to procure fome or it , and found caufe to 

2 z ' won- 



Digitized by Google 



wonder at its ftrength both upon the tongue', and in its 
Operation. But granting Pyrophilus, that the Volatile R erne- 
dies treated of in thefc Papers , may have their offenfive 
Smell and Tafte imputed to the Fire, yet perhaps Phy ficians 
would more flowly, and more tenderly cenfure theReme- ' 
dies in queftion for their Empyreumaticall ftink, if they did 
but con iider, that they themfclves fcruple n5t to ufeftoname 
thofe among many others ) Senna and Scammony , though 
the former be wont to gripe the Gats, and the latter have an 
Acrimony, Heat and Mordacty fo unkind to the Bowels, 
that a few grains exceeded in the Dofe turns it into poyfon $ 
becaufe the ill Qualities of thefe Medicines, may by proper 
Correctives be fomewhat mitigated, and the Good they do r 
doth more then countervail the Inconveniences that attend the 
nfeof them.For the very fame Confiderations,P;r#/>£/7**.wilL 
be applicable to the excufe ot thofe fetid Medicines, for which 
we Apologfze . For though the Empjrtttma or Impreflion of 
the fire, for which they are rejected, be the Quality, whofe 
abfence from them were very defirable $ vet may that Emfy- 
r turns, by dextrous Preparations . be in (ome meafure corre- 
cted finfomuch that I have known highly- rectified Spirits of 
Urine, by being digefted for divers months in anexquifirely 
ftopt Glafle, brought to be of a Scent, which to me feem'd 
fcarce at all (linking, and to others even pleafant) and the pre- 
judice that may be juftly feared from what remains, is acvanta* 
geoufly recompenc'd by the benefits accruing from the efficacy 
of their more friendly Endowments. And in effect we find,thac 
the Dogmatifts themfelves are grown not to fcruple the ad- 
miniftiing the Spirit of Salt, though extorted (if it be of the 
beft) by a much greater ftrefle of Fire, then is requifite to the 
Diftillation of any of the Medicines we defend. And not only 
the famous Rivtrim (as we have el fewhere noted) extols the 
Spirit of Tartar, and Soot, which are yet fufficiently fetid 
and Eropy reumatical , but icverall other ( and among thofe 

fome 



Digitized by Google 



C370 

fome of our eminent Englifh) Phyficians frequently ufe, and 
commend theOyleof Guajacum^ forced through a Retort. 
And no lefle do divers learned Doclorsefteem, and employ 
the Empyreamatical Oyl ot Amber: Though^to note fo much 
by the way) That he in divers cafes far inferiour to the Vola- 
tile Salt, which (if the fire be skilfully adminiftredj may at 
the fame time, and by the fame Operation be obtained. This 
Salt befides the Efficacy afcribed to it in the Convulsions of 
Children, having been lately found by Experience to be an 
excellent Medicine againft the Elepfies, even of well grown 
Perfons, being adminiftred in the Dofe of not above a Scru- 
ple or halfe a Drachme, in a due Quantity of Pciony water, oc 
fome other proper Vehicle. 

And on this occafion You may alfo be pleafed to take no- 
tice, that Foliated Gold,is ordinarily and without Scruple em- 
ployed by Phyficians,not only to cover Pils*but as a main In- 
gredient (though how properly I define not; of feverallof 
their richeft Cordiall Compofitions extant in Difpenfato- 
ries* and yet to how gre3t afireGfW is wont to be expofed 
before it be melted out of the Oare (wherein 'tis ufually (at 
lead as far as we have obferv'd ( blended with other metals , 
and Minerals) and to purifie it upon the Cupel ; either with 
Lead or Antimony * he that is unacquainted with the Opera- 
tions of Mineralifts, and the Arc of Refiners, will not eafily 
imagine. And, Pyofhilut, to facisfie You yet farther, that the 
ftrong Impreffion of Fire in the Medicines, doth not alwayes 
make them fo noxious as they are commonly reputed let 
me dcfire you to take notice, that there is fcarce any Medi- 
cament more generally given , and applauded, even by Me* 
thodicall Pnyficians than Sleel, which is often adminiftred in 
Subftance, made up with other Ingredients, into the Form, 
either of Pills,or Electuaries. And yet we have wondred to fee 
what great Fires, and violent Blafts of huge Bellows, moved 
by Water engines, are ufed to melt Iron firft out of the 

222 Stone, 



Digitized by Google 



( 37» ) 

Stone • and if it be to be farther refined into Steel (much of 
thacufed in Phyfick being factious; a new violence of the 
Fire is requifite: And though after all this to makeadrin- 
gent Crocus Mart is pgr [e (which is accounted one of the bed 
preparations of it ; they are wont to keep Mars ( as the Chy- 
mifts (peak J amidft reverberated flames , or in tome Glade- 
mans Furnace for many hours, yea fometimes for divers 
cay es $ Yet this Medicine is with more I uccefle than Scruple 
daily adminiftred by learn'd Phyficians,in Dyienteries, Fluxes, 
and other didempers where aftri&ion is required. And 'tis 
fame what Grange tome, that the having beenexpofed to no 
greater a Fire than is requifite to diftill Spirit of Blood, or of 
Harts-horn, mould be much urged againft thofe Medicines , 
bythofethat fcruplenot to commend, and do al mod daily 
and oftentimes (uccefsfully , prefcribe the lixiviat Salts of 
Plants,and particularly of Wormwood, though thefe are not 
rightly made, but by the cxpofing the Concretes even to the 
violence of an incinerating fire. And as tor the unpleafantnede 
of the Smels of our SpilMbf Biood, Hartf-horn, &c. befides 
that,to very many Perfons there is no Odour foloathfome,as 
that of a Potion.We find that the Galenifts themfel ves fci uple 
not in the Fits of the Mother (which yet very rarely prove 
mortall) to rcprefle (as men are wont to fuppofe) the unruly 
Fumes by the Smell of Ca/tormm f yyifia fartida, and even the 
Empyreumatical OJour of the burnt f eathers of Partridges : 
nor do they decline to uie thefe homely, and ungrateful Re- 
medies to Patients of tendered Sex , and higheft Quality, 
and indeed in dangerous cafes I haveTcnown fair Ladies con* 
tent to think it fitter to take down aft ill Scented Medicine, 
than venture the having their own bodies in few daies reduced 
to worfe Perfumes. And certainly we may judly fay of 
Health, as no lefle than an Emperour faid of the gain brought 
him in by Urine, That it [mills mil, from what thing focverii 
comes. 

But* 



Digitized by Google 



(37i) 

But, Pyrtphilui, if Your Noftrils were fo nice, that they 
muft needs be comply 'd with, though with the hazard of itn- Wayc$ rf tak; 
pairing the Virtues of the Salts they are offended with, I ing off the f c - 
could pi opofe an Efre6u3ll Expedient to gratifie them $ and j j"^^ 001 
being now invited by fo preffing an Occafion , I (hall not HwtChoinX' 
fcruple to annex fomething of it, and tell You, that if we may 
judge of the Virtues of the Spirit and Salt of Soot ( which I 
am wont to make without addition) by their fenfible Quali- 
ties: they muft be much of kin to thofe of the Spirit of Hartf- 
horn, and of Urine * (though thefc be animal Subftances) 
And therefore having elfewhere more particularly, and by di- 
vers Experiments declared the affinity between thefe Sales in 
divers regards 5 it will not, I prefume, be looked upon as an 
unufefull or unfeafonable Hint, A give Youafummary, 
though but imperfect Account of what I remember my felfe 
to have done, in order to the freeing of the Volatile Salt of 
Soot , from that very offenfive fmell , which may poflibly 
make many, even of thofe that need them , abominate thofe 
Medicines how piercing and Noble foever, which it blemifli- i 
eth. The Procefse is as followeth. ' 

Take a Quantity -of well DeflcgnVd Spirit of Wine pro- 
portionate to the Quantity of Salt, whofe Odour You defire 
to correct* into this Spirit, drop as much Oyle of Rhodium jjr 
of any other Odoriferous Chymical Oyle, as will fuffketo 
make the Liquor as ftrongly fcented as You defire it .* make 
the Oyle and Spirit well togcther,and if they were both well 
made, the latter will imbibe the former, and fometimes be 
thereby turned into a whitifli Sub ft a nee • with which if it fmell 
not ftrong enough of the Oyle, You may by Agitation incor- 
porate more Oyl, and if You judge the mixture too ftrong al- 
ready , if ou may dilute it at pleafure, by the affuficn of more 
Spirit of Wine. This done put the Salt of Soot into a 
Bolt head, or Glafs Egge (according to the Quantity that You * 
intend to lublime,) furnifbed with fomewhat along Neck or 

z z 3 " Stem 



Digitized by Google 



t 



.074) • 

Stem, and afterwards pouring on leafarely Your Odoriferous 
Liquor, You may wich it wain down the Salt that is wont to 

• ftick in the Neck of the Glade. After this^youmuft very care- 
fully ftop the Veflell with a Corke > and ftore of hard wax, if 
you cannot conveniently make ufe of an exa&er way of clo- 
fingit. This Glafl'e You muft place in a Lamp- furnace, or 
fome other , wherein You may give a very moderate hear, 
for that will fuffice to elevate to the neck and upper part of the 
Veffel the pure white Salt of Soot , imbued ( at the fecond 
time, if not at the fir ft) with the Scent of the Odoriferous 
Oyle, which You impioyed about the Preparation. 

This Experiment, Pyrophtlut , may prove of that Ufe in 
Phyfick that it may deferve as well for its Nobleneffe, as the 
watchful neiTe, which is rSjuifite in him that makes it, to be il- 
luftrated by theenfuing 
Obfcmtions . . . obfcrvtthns. 

concerning this i. Then it is requifite that the Spirit of Wine be very 
mctho^of «- good,For that which is not fufheiencly Dephlegm'd, will not 
s mwrcma. '' readily and perfe&y receive into it felfe the Odoriferous Oy le, 
wherewith it is to be performed.Nor would every Chymicall 
Oyle,although it were well fcented,be fitibr this Preparation 
for divers of them as Oyle of Turpentmcand Oyle of Amber 
will not fufficiently mingle with Spirit of Wine, uniefle they 
be prev'toufly fubtilized after a peculiar manner. 

2. The Proportion betwixt the Spirit of Wine, and the 
Oyl that it is to be diflol ved in,'tis not eafie to determine; for 
a lefler Quantity will fuffice of fome Oyles,than of other. And 
the Proportion of them muft be varied , according as You 
would have the fubWd Salt to participate more or lefle of 
their Odour,and other Qualities. 

3. Great diligence muft beufed inclofing the top of the 
Glafle,becaufe of the great fugacity, and fubtlcty of the Salt, 

• whofe Avolation is to be prevented : But then much geater 
care is to be had,that the Heat be not too ftrong,but as equal! 

as 



Digitized by Google 



(375) 

as may be , and much inferiour to the Moderate heat of ah 
ordinary Chymical Btlneum. For 'tis fcarce CredibIe,how ea. 
fily this unruly Salt will be excited either to make an efcape 
at the mouth of the Glafs, or to break it in pieces. And I re- 
member,among fuch^other Accidents which hav#befallen us in * 
the Preparation of this Odoriferous Salt, that having once fet 
fome of it to fubiime from* perfumed Chymical Oyl,though 
we adminiftred fo gentle a heat , that wee thought the Vef- 
fel out of all danger of being broken, or found open. Yet 
in a (hort time the fugitive Salt did with^ great noife blow 
out the Cork that was waxed to the top of the Veflel, leaving 
in the bottom nota limpid Oyle,but a Liquor of a red colour, 
and a Balfamick Conliftence. But if the Glafle be wide 
enough to allow thefe fumes competent Room, and if the heat 
be wanly adminiftred , the Sublimation may be well enough 
performed. 

Of the Medicinal Quality of this Aromatical Salt, P;r#- of the Medic,; 
fbil**> we have not yet had opportunity to make tryall, but S*/2wwi» 
fome efteem may be made of them by calling to mind the zed Sales. 
Virtues of the fimpleSalt of Soot, and confidcring the Na- 
ture of the Liqaors,from which in this our preparation it bath 
been Sublimed. The Principal if not the only thing , that 
feems to be feared, is, that the Salt of Soot being it felfe hot, 
and Chymical Oyles being for the moft part eminently fo 
too, our Salt may prove unfit for Men of Hot and Cholerick 
Completions, and in fuch attempers, as proceed from Ex- 
cefs of Heat. But then it may be confidered in the fir ft place, 
that theSalt of Soot, being of anextreamly apertivcrefolving, • 
and Volatile Nature, and carrying up with it in Sublimation 
only the more fugitive parts of the liquor horn which it is fub* 
lim'd 5 It is very likely that the heat produe'd by a Medicine, 
which by reafon of its fugacity would ftay but a very fhort time 
in the Body, will not be fo lading as that of ordinary Sudori- 
ficks, which are neverthelefs often adminiftred with good fuc- 
cefs, even in hot Difcafes< Second- 



Digitized by Google 



. Biit whether or no this Aroraatick Salt be a fafe Medicine 
in all Hot Bodies and Difeafes, it feems very probable, that 
k will prove a very powerful I Remedy in thofe Diftempers 
for which it is proper. For firft, whereas Spagyrifts have, 
With much ftudy, but without much (ucceiTe,endeavoured to 
make Oyles capable of being mixt with other Liquors, by de- 
priving them or their oleaginous forme, in which Hclmont^ 
hirafelt complains that they are offenfive, we have, by our 
Preparation, their fined parts aflbciated with the penetrant 
and volatile Salt : by whofe afliftance they are not only fit to 
communicate their Virtues to Liquors, but aflifted to pene- 
trate exceedingly and perchance alfo,thercby to obtain fuch 
fui accede to the innermoft parts of the Body, asisfeldome 
allowed to Vegetable Medicines. Secondly, Wt may have 
by this Preparation one of themoft noble and volatile Salts 
of the World, not oBly free'd from its ftink, but imbued with 
the Odour, and perhaps divers or the Virtues , ofwhatChy- 
micali Oyles we pleafe. And (ince thefe Chymicall Oy les are 
by Chy mifts and Naturalifts thought to contain the mod no- 
ble and active parts of the Vegetables whence they have been 
diftill'd and fince alfo the Salt of Soot foblim'd from 
them, carries up withitthefineft parts of thefe Oyles , Why 
may it not be hoped, that no fmall number of diftinc"t. Reme- 
dies may be afforded us by this fingle Experiment ? Thefe 
Remedies too may be the more acceptable both to Phy ficians 
and Patients , becaufe they have not in them any thing thae 
is Minerall, and notwithftanding their great Pcnetrancy and 
Efficacy have in them nothing of Corrofive, as many of the 
Saline Remedies prefcribed by Phy licians in their Difpenfa- 
tories. And thirdly, That the Salt of Soot thus fublim'd 
may be alfo enriched with the Sulphur or Ballamick patt of the 
Spirit of Wine , which was employed about its Preparation, 
may appear probable enough to him , that lhall examine, by 
his tafte anu othir*ue , fuch redified Spirit of Wine as has 

aaa h j 



Digitized by Google 



aw 

had a fuffi cient quantity of Volatile Sales fublim'd from ic- 
And how fialfamicall a fubftanceis difhifed through pore Spi- 
rit of Wine, may be guelfd at by the great change which is 
made in the Cauftick Salt of Tartar, when it is io dulcified 
as to make that Excellent Medicine , which Htlmont extolls 
againft inward Ulcers, an J calls Balfamus Samecb- which if one 
rnd the abftrufe Art of fo preparing the Salt and Liquor , as 
to fit them for Conjunction , might be made only by di- 
alling very frequently pure Spirit of Wine from very fine 
Salt of Tartar. For by this means the fixed Salt,retaining the 
Sulphureous Salt or Balf3mick parts or the Spirit of Wine, 
(as may appear by the Aquofity of the Liquor that comes 
over the Helm in this Preparation) is thereby fo deprived ofc 
its cauftick tafte,that when it will rob no more Spirit of Wine, 
but Tuff er it to be drawn off as ftrong 3sit W3S poured on, it 
will eafily in a moid place run per deliquivm, into a liquor not 
of a Cauftick,but Balfamick (and as it feem'd to us a pleafant) 
Tafte. 

And whereas, Pyrophilus , we have complained of the Dif- 
ficulty we have met with, to mannage the unruly Salt of 
Soot, and keep it from breaking Prifon* we muff, to make 
this Experiment be more practicable and ufeful , advertife 
You, that you may, if You pleafe, inftead of Saltof Sooc 
Aromatize that of Harts horn,or mans Blood. And 1 might 
adde, that a very ingenious Friend of ours Dr*NM has lately 
Pra&ifed yet a more eafie and preferable way of preparing 
Medicines of this Nature : But though I have partly tryed 
his Method , and found it to fucceed well enough yet fince 
I had it but by communication from him , and that he makes 
a confiderable Advantage of it, I muft forbear imparting it 
to You , till I mail have obtained his Confent to difciofe 
it. 

I know not, Pjropbilm^ whether I (hill need to adde, That 
of thefe foetid Remedies , which are Volatile, and fomewhat 

Sulphur 



Digitized by 



Su1prroreous,as I chofc to mention to You bat a few, to com- 
ply with my prefent hafte, which would not allow me to infift 
on many : fo in what I have delivered concerning thefe few, 
I have fet down Particulars the more fully and e*plicitely, 
becaufe 1 find the Doctrine of Volatile Salts (though in my 
poor judgement worthy of a fcrious Enquiry) perfonclorily, 
sndindiftintfly enough, hancled by the C by micall Writers 
I have yet met with, which made me the willinger to contri- 
bute the few Obfervations I could readily find of thofe I have 
had opportunity to make about them , t owards (he Ii I u ft rat ion 
of fo important a Subject, of which having elfewhcre fpoken 
in relation to Phy fiology ( as thefe fugitive Bodies belong to 
the Commonwealth of Salts ) I thought it might not be un- 
acceptable to You, i f I a, lo confidered them a while in relation 
to Phyfick, and prcfented You with fome hints concerning 
their Medicall Ufcs. 

° • 

[f$thei$$& P*gt> where the^yfuthorpromifesd DeeUratiorf^ 
hew be would have his Praifes of CMedicines under (hod ]. 

A Nd now, Pjropbil**) having finifhed what I thought fit 
*• to adde ( at prefent ; inthepaft APPENDIX; I 
fliould likewife put an end to the prefent Exercife of your Pa- 
tience i but that this being my firft Treatife written to You 
concerning Medicall Matters, and not being likely to be the 
lad which you will meet with among the Papers defign'd 
You, I think it requiiite, and not unfeafonablc to declare 
to you here once for all , with what Eyes I defire you fhould 
look upon what 1 have written, and lh.il write, to you con- 
cerning matters of that Nature. And firft , I muft advertife 
You that I am not lo much a Mountebank as to recommend 
to you the Remedies 1 mention as certain Cures in the Cafes 
wherein they are p: oper. For he muft have been extraordi- 
narily happy, or very much unacquainted with the Practice of 

aaa 2 Phyfick, • 



Digitized by Google 



Phyfick, that has not found, that even thofe Medicines whichi 
are mod celebrated by the beft Authors, both Galenicall 
and Chymicall, do fometimes prove inefFeduall as well as 
often prosperous-, and the Remedy prefcribed by the fame 
Phyfician to twenty Patients lick or the fame Difeafe^ has 
more then once been obferved, though it have fucceeded in 
nineteene, to faile in the twentieth. And indeed the Caufes of 
Difeafes, the Conftitution of Patients, and the Complica- 
tions of Diftcmpers are fo very various, intricate 5 and obfeure, 
that it is extreamly difficult even for the moft knowing and 
experienced Phyfician to make an accurate, and content Ex- 
periment in the Therapeuticall part of Phyfick; and confe- 
quently fuch Experiments are much lefle to be expe&ed 
from Me, whofe Condition as well as Difabtlities forbid me 
to make the Pradice of Phyfick my bufincfle, and allow me 
only to adminifteritocvafionally , either to my own parti- 
cular Acquaintance, or to fuch poor people as are not able to 
gratifie Phyficians, or fuch as I meet with where there are 
not any : And thereby I am reduced to learn the Virtues of 
clivers of the Remedies I have prepared by very few or none 
of my own immediate Trials, but the Relation of Phyficians, 
who do me the Favour to adminifter them for me. And there- 
fore, though I endeavour to put them into the hjnds of faith- 
full, as well as ingenious men $ Yet not being allowed to be 
my felf a conftant eye witnefTe of the Effe&sthey produce, 
1 muft here for all thefe reafons folemnly piofcfle to you, 
that as I do not fet down Medicinal Experiments , with the 
fame pofitivenefle that 1 do Phyfiologicall ones , fo I do not 
intend to venture the repute of being a faithful Relator of 
Experiments, upon the fuccefle of any Medicinal Receiptor 
Procefle. 

Yet in the next place I muft tell You, that You would per- 
haps do Me but right, to think not only that the Chymicall 
preparations ol Remedies are, if you underftand them arighr, 

candidly 



Digitized by Google 



(39D 

candidly fet down , though the Virtues afcribed to thenWo 
not conftantly upon all Tryals difphy themfelves but that 
1 have not nuMy and inconfiderately , or upon uncertain Ru- 
mors recorded the venues of particular Remedies, which may 
be good , though thev be not infallible. Ic being i uflicient to 
make a Medicine deferve the title ot Good , that it be often 
(infome degree at lead) fucceflefull, though now and then ic 
prove not availeable-, efpecially if ic be other way es fo fafe and 
innocent, that even when it proves not profperous,it weakens 
not nature, nor is other wife noxious. And we muft not, Fjr- 
rofbjlfv, be fo timid as to fufFerour felves to be perfwaded, 
that if a Patient mifcarry # £fter the ufe of the Remedies , the 
fault muft neceflanly belong to the exhibited Medicine. For 
oftentimes Nature will in fpight of Remedies make a u\fe- 
taftafts of the peccant matter, and fo em pair the Condition 
of the patient * and much oftner before deach>the Conflict of 
ftruggling Nature, and the conquering Difeafe doth manifeft 
it felf 10 horrid and dreadfullSymptomes, which fome envious 
or ignorant Dodors (for the more learned are wont to be 
more equitable, and lelTe partiall ) injurioufly impute to the 
Chymicall Remedy, given before the appearing of thofe 
Symptomes , never considering that the like Accidents are 
wont to attend dangerous Difeafes, and dying perfons, where 
Galenicall Remedies only, and no Chymicall ones at all,have 
beenadminiftred# And that divers of the moft eminent, and 
Methodicall of our Modern Phyficians fciuple not to ufe fre- 
quently both Crocus Mcullorum, Mtrc. Dultis , and fome ^ rs c f'|j d " 
other Chymicall Remedies, and to impute the mifcarriages chym"aiur.d 
of the Patients that ufe them to their Difeafes though not En->pir;«n 
many years fince, all the frightfuli Symptomes accompanying JK^flJ. 
the dying perfons to whom they had been exhibited, were uon. 
confidently imputed to thofe Medicines. To which let me 
adde, Pjrcfhtlut^ that oftentimes ic may be very juft to prize 
an Empiricail Remedy more then a Galenicall , though the 

aaa 3 Metho- 



Digitized by Google 



ll9D 

Methodift and the Erapirick have each of chem by his re* 
fpe#ive Remedies, performed Cures of divers Patients in the 
fame Difeafe-, partly becaufe Empirical Chymifts are feldome 
reforted to but in defperate cafes, or till Nature be almoft 
fpent, either by the violence of the Difeafe, or the unprofpe- 
rous operation of the Medicines employed to remove it ; and 
fartly, becaufe the Mcthodift helps his Remedies by premi- 
liog the wonted Evacuations ( by Vomit, Seige, or by Phle- 
botomy ) by varying them according to Emergent Circum- 
ftances , by skiltully and feafonably adminiftring them , and 
by fir nft rules of Diet j whereas the Empirick oftentimes ufcth 
but a (ingle Remedy, and ufually without premifing gene- 
ral Evacuations, exhibits it not to the greateft Advantage in 
relation to him, and other circumft anccs , and is much more 
indulgent to his Patient in point of Diet: So that when an Em- 
pirick, and a rational Phyfician do both in fcverall Patients 
cure for infhhce the fame Plurilie , the Difeafe may be very 
often judged to have been removed in one of the Patients 
chiefly by the Phyfician, and in the other by the Reme- 
dy. 

ThatChymical In the third place, Pyrophtltts, I muft advertife You, that 
Pioccffcs ftand though I mention more Chymicall Remedies then G Jlemcall, 

of°ciear Reil- veC 11 ls not out °* an y partiall fondnefle of the former , and 
tion$, than Ga- much lefle from any undervaluation of the latter* but partly^ 
icnicaii. becaufe Chymicall proceiTes being wont to be more unfaith- 
fully, or obfeurely, fet down by Authors then Galenicall Re- 
ceipts, I thought it might fave You fome labour to receive 
from me a frequenter account of thofe,than thefe ; and fartly^ 
becaufe in many Chymicall preparations, divers confiderable 
Changes being to be wrought upon the Concretes to be pre- 
pared by them , there is oftentimes fo much of Philofophy • 
to be learned by fuch Proce(Tes,that the fucceiTe of them may 
prove inftru&ive to you, though it fliould acquaint you with 
their Truth only, ?s they are Chymicall preparations, and not 

4>S 



Digitized by Google 



(m) 

as they arc Medicinal Receipts. But otherwife I love to look 
upon both Chymicall and Galenicall Remedies , with an im- 
partial eye, and think true neither the former ought to be dc- 
fpifed for the Iatrer,nor the Litter for the former; for as Chy- 
micall Remedies have commonly the advantages of being 
more durable, Icfle clogging by their quantity,3nd leiTe nau- 
feated by Patients $ fo Galenicall Remedies have, when they 
are of equal Efficacy,the Advantages of being more che; p,(ac 
leaft quantity for quantity J more procurable, and fooner pre- 
pared. And fuch is the variety 01 Cafes ariiing from the variety 
or ConlHtutions and Diftcmpers , that in fome of them the 
former fort of Remedies, may be more proper, and in others^ 
the latter may feem requ(ilte-,and in fomealfo, both forts may 
alternately be fo ufefull, that neither of them can well be 
fpared. 

In the fourth place, Pjrephilus^ let me advertife You, that 
divers Chymicall Remedies , and fome Specificks alfo which 
are not Chymicall, have feem'd upon try al lefl'e effectual than 
indeed they are, becaufe they have been tryed by fuch Phy- 
ficians as weaken their Efficacy by not adminiftring them 
as they mould. For fome Phyficians will never exhibite a 
Chymicall Remedy, till the Patients ftrengthhath been al. Errors in the 
moft tired, if not quite fpent with the unprofperous ufeof of ^ y a ^ call ° 
divers others clogging and debilitating Medicines. Others Remedies., 
are fo diffident ot Chymicall Remedies tharthey never dare 
to exhibite them in a full Dofe, nor by themfelves , but will 
blend a fmall quantity of a Chymicall Medicine or a Sped, 
fick with other Ingredients 5 which either conftitute with it a 
Medicine of new qualities reiulting h orn that mixture, or ac 
«, leaft much clog or enervate the a&ivity and viitue of the 
Chvmicall or Specifick Ingrediens : by which, even in fo in- 
considerable a Dofe, thefe diftruftfull Doctors dare yet re- 
quire that great matters fhould be performed. Of which inju- 
rious way of adminiftring the Remedies I recommend to yor* 

PjrothilHty 



Digitized by Google 



f3#4) 

fjrofhilm, I do not caufclefly defire yoa to beware : as I may 
hereafter have occafion to (hew you by particular inftances 
of the Reafonablenefl'e as well of this Advertisement as of the 
others which I either have given You,or (hall give you,in this 
and other Papers. And another fore of Phyficians there is, 
who are of fo defpondent and rather partial an Humour, that 
ifaChymicall Remedy or a Specifick, do not prefently per- 
fbrme the hop'd for Cure, though they find, that even upon 
their difadvantageous manner of adminiftring it, it doth 
good: yet they will quickly deilft from the life of it: And be- 
caufe it doth not do Wonders, they will not fcruple to affirm 
that they have tryed it and found it do nothing ; whereas they 
are Wont to continue their own Courfes of Phyfick without 
difcouragement, though it be ufually fome weeks before the 
Patient find any good by them , and oftentimes (as numbers 
of the printed Observations of Phyficians as well as daily Ex- 
perience teftifiej the Patient is by the tedious Courfeof Phy. 
fick he has gone through,very little better'd, if not much im- 
pair U Which I fpeak,/y*/^//#*,not with an Intention to dif- 
parage Phyficians in generall, the moft learned and ingenious 
of them being free enough from the Partiality I here take no- 
tice of; but to keep good Remedies from being difparaged 
by the envious or anskilfull ryals of bad Adminifters : And 
though indeed (o*r.e Chymifts are fo vain-glorious or un- 
wary , as to promife that rhe Operation of their Remedies 
fliould be as well fuddain, as effectual I •, yet if the Medicines 
them fetves be found availeable, although not fwurfy fo, that 
flownefle ought to make us but con jemne the Boaftings of 
the man; not reject ibe ufe of rhe Remedies. 

And in the taft phccPyrepbtlusy I muft Advertifeyou, not 
to expeft that every one of the Remedies 1 commend mould 
be Phyfick and Phvfician too; I mean, that it mould of it 
felf fuflice to perform the Cures of thofe Difeafes againft 
which it is commenced. For Medicines are but Inftruments 

in 



Digitized by Google 



095) 

in the hand of the Phyfician , and, though they be never fo 
well edg'd and tempered , require a skilful hand to mannage 
them and therefore I cannot but admire and difapprove their 
boldneflfe that venturcopon the Pra&iceof Phyfick, wherein 
it is fo dangerous to commit Errors, barely upon the confi- 
dence of having good Receipts. For though by Convention 
with eminent Phy ficians, I have found the learnedeft of them 
to difagree fo much about the Nature and caufes of Difeafes, 
that I dare not deny but that he may profptroufly practice 
Phyfick that either ignores or diilcnts from the received Thataco , 
Doctrines of the Schools concerning the caufes of Difeafes, mMeafacS 
and fome other Pathologicall particulars * yet I cannot but Knowledge it 
diflike their boldnefs who venture to give^aSive Phyfick , V 
either in intricate or acute Difeafes , without at leaft a Medi- Praa.fcr of 
ocrity of knowledge in Anatomy, and fo much knowledge of ph J flc «- 
the Hiftory of Difeafes, as may fuffice to inform them in a 
competent meafure what are the ofual Symptomes of fucha 
Difeafe , what courfe nature is wont to take in dealing with 
the peccant matter, and what difcernable alterations in the 
Patients Body do commonly forerun, and thereby foretell, a 
Crifis , or otherwife the good or bad event of the Difeafe. 
To all which is to be added fome tolerable meafure of Know- 
ledge, not only of the Materia Medica^ and the chief wayes of 
compounding feverall Ingredients into Medicines of feverall 
Forms and Confi ftencies, as circumftances may require •, but 
alfo of the. orderly and feafonable ad mini It ran on of the helps 
affordable by them. Thefe particulars , Pjrofhilm^ might 
eafily be enlarged on but having neither the leifure nor de- 
ft gne, to handle them commonplace- like , I (hall only give 
you this account of my requiring in the profefs'd Praftifer of 
Phyfick fome knowledge both of the Materia Medica, and 
the Method of compounding and adminiftring Remedies » 
that (excepting perhaps the Arcana Ma\ora y as Chymifts 
call them ) even the btft Medicines by being unfeafonably 

bbb s or. 



Digitized by Google 



or p report eroufly adminiftred , efpecially io acute Difeafcs 
where Natures motions are to be diligently watcht , and fe- 
conded, may do a Patient as ranch harm as the orderly and 
skilful adminiftration of them can do him good. And that he 
th3t has nothing but one good Receipt for a Diftemper, and 
knows not how to vary it by adding, omitting, or tubfticja- 
ting other parts of the Matena Medietas urgent occafion (hall 
require, m3y oftentimes find himfelfe reduced either to fufter 
- his Patient to languiih helpleflc, or to venture by curing him 
of one Difeafe to cart him into another. For fometimes the 
Patients conftitution makes the Medicine prtfjribed by the 
Receipt unfit to be adminiftred * and fometimes too, the Di- 
feafe, for which the Receipt is proper, is in the Patient com- 
plicated with fonrie other Diftemper which may be as much 
encreafed by the Specifick, as the othjr Difeafe may be lef- 
fened. I know for inftance fome eminent men that are wont 
to Cure very rtubborn Venereal Diftemper$,by a Chymicall 
preparation (which fome of themfelves have been pleafedto 
difclofe to me ) of the Jndun Plants , Sarfdpdrilla, Cm] scum, 
&c. But if thefe Men met w.th Patients, fuvh as thofe wnich 
Euftachius Rudttss mentions himfelfe to have often met with, 
who upon the afe of theleaft quantity of Guajacum, though 
corrected with cold ingredients, were wont to be prtfently 
afledted withfuch fharpnefle of Urine, and Inflammation of 
the parts, to which Urine Relates,as hazarded their lives ? they 
would be reduced, as well as our Author confefleth himfelfe 
to have been, to have recoui fe to Mercurial or other Reme- 
dies. To which we may adde, that the ufe of SarfafarilU y 
and Guajacum is generally forbidden by the warier fort of 
Phyficians,in thofe Patients, whofe Venereall Diftempersare 
compile ted with heat or Inflammation of the Kidnies or 
Livers. And fometimes alfoit happens,that the very outward 
form of the Medicine prefcribed by the Receipt is not fit 
or perhaps pofiible to be adminiftred. For, not to mention that 

• divers 



Digitized by 



t 



'-(397) 

diners Patients can retain no purgative Phyfick exhibited in 
the form of a Potion ; and fome others areas apt to Vomit up 
what ever is given them in thejform of Pills $ not to infift on 
this 1 fay, I (hall content my felf co relate to you a memorable 
Cafe that hapneda while fince to a Phyfician of my acquain- 
tance. He was called to a lufty young Woman, who upon an 
accidental but violent Cold was fuddeniy taken with fucha 
. Confhi&ion of the parts infervienc to Speech and Deglu- 
tition, as made her altogether unable either to fpeak or fwal- 
low any thing at all i and having thus continued fome dayes in 
fpight of Glyftersor other Remedies prefcribed by a very 
Learned Phyfician., and in fpight of Endeavours to excite Vo- 
miting, by making her hold emetick things in her Mouth; 
the poor Woman was in great danger (when my acquaintance 
came toher)of perifliing for hunger- What in this cafe could be 
expected from the beft Remedies that mad neceflarily be ta- 
ken in at the Mouth f Wherefore the Phyfician finding her 
yetftrong enough, and without Feavcr,and yet her cafe al- 
moft defparate, did as judicioufly as luckily prefcribe a Gly- 
fter, wherein tp ordinary ingredients were added (as himftlfe 
a very few dayes after told me ) about four ounces of the In- 
fufion of Crocus Metallorum, with an advice that it fhouldbe 
kept in as long as poflibly She could, and by this Medicine, 
Nature being fumcientlyirritafpd, there quickly followed 
upon it fome violent Vomitings, and upon them a liberty 
both of Swallowing and Speaking. Q And fince this, a young 
Gentleman and Fellow- traveller of mine, had the Organs of , 
deglutition fo ftrangely weakened without any manifeft caufe, 
that though he were able to make me a Vifit , and acquaint 
me with his Cafe yet he was very 3pprehenfive, he fliould in 
a very few Dayes be ftarved , and being unible to f wallow 
Remedies, had quickly perithed in defpight of the Korean*} 
Major a themfelves $ had he been mafler but of fuch of them 
as (likethofe wont to be magnified by Chymifts; rauftbe , 

b b b 2 taken 



Digitized by Google 



(39*) 

taken into the body % if a very happy Phy fidan to whom I tfi- 
re&ed him , had not by a very Efficacious and Specific k Me- 
dicine externally to be applyedi feafonably refcued him from 
fo unafuall and defparate a Cafe.] But, Pjropbil/t*, as I would 
not upon the (core of good Receipts have the Phyficians skill 
defpifed,or thought ulelefle; fo I wifli that the Phyficians skill 
may not make him difpife good Receipts- For we have often 
feen (efpecially in outward affections; not only Empericks • 
and Chii urgeons,but even Ladies and old Wives,withalucky 
compofition prefcribed by a Receipt, perform more conftanc 
andeafie Cures of the particular Diftemper, for which that 
Receipt is proper, than even Learned Phyficians by their ex- 
m Auimnt rcm Porary , though pompous and Artificial! Pre fcri prions. 
scim. ub. 4. And the illuftrious Lord VtruUm (one of the mod judicious 
Th' l A v Naturalifts that our Age can boaft,) thinks fit to take notice 
ratauMge-' °* it as a Deficiency , that Receipts by long Experience ap- 
mem,Th«ap- proved, are not moreclofely, and as he fpeaks religivuflj 

E d n«t^ < dher>d t0 > but altercd °P° n evcr X lj & ht occafion % And in 
altered) but rc- the fame C hapter to an(wer the Principal, as well as the moft 
litfoudy ad- obvious Objection in this Matter. a Thar, fay es He, any man 
« a tft. „ i n< j ucec j by fome Specious Reafon mould be of opinion,that 
"it is the part of a Learned Phyfician (refpetftng the Com- 
u plexions of Patients,their Age, the feafon of the Year, Cu- 
"ftomcand the like) rath* to accommodate his Medicines - 
^asoccafions fuggefts, then to infift upon fomecertain Pre- 
c< fcriptSjis a decet vable A(l'crtion,& which attributes too little 
<c to Experience, too much to Judgment. And a little above 
cr*$*s jiidg- He goes much farther than we pretend to do , for fpeakine 
in,jndthe Au- of the Negltdi of the ufe of particular Receipts , which, as 
thor concur* He fpeaks, by a kind of propriety , refpe# the Cure of par- 
««t PblftSSl cicular Dl feafes, He addes,(ev«rely enough, ("That the Phy- 
tc ficians have fruftrated and taken away the fruit of Traditions, 
u and approved Experience by their MdgtftrAlitits^ in adding 
* and taking out,aad changing Ingredients of Receipts at their 

* c pleafure 



Digitized by Google 



(399) 

* *pleafure,and almoft after the manner of Apothecaries, put- 
w ting in 3*id pro quo, commanding fo prefumptuoufly over 
cc the Medicine, as the Medicine can no longer command the 
< ( Difeafe. Thus farre our Judicious Author : But I will ra- 
ther choofe to exprefTe to You my fenfe on this whole Sub- 
ject of Receipts, in the Words of that Experienc'd Phyfician c$*fL%%u 
to three Em per oars, Johannes Crate : De Morbi Ndturd(hyt$ 
He ) cdufs, locoque dffecJo y Medic us diligent er cogitet, At que in 
to plus qudm in emit medic amcntorum mirificis formis fttum 
put a. ^Me die mam tdmtn expert dm cum r -at tone adhibit am pita 
vdlere qudm euqud inter dum fa hi to k Dotfiffimo etiam Media 
magna rat tone exhibit a excogitdtm % non dub it o : tque hoc in 
pdrte Rationales etiam Medicos Empetricis cedere deberede [en* 
tentiaWppficratis jlatuo. Only I muft adde by way ol Expla- 
nation,That this Sentence is to be undcrftood to exprcfleray 
ienfe, when the Medicines ufed are not very extraordinary, 
but iuch as Crdto employed , and hath left us in his Writings: 
for there may poflibly be fuch effe&uall Specificks , andfuch 
powerfuil and commanding Remedies, that the Efficacy of 
the Medicine may fat leaft in fome particular Difeafes excufe 
and rcp3irc much want of skill in the Prefcribtr. 

If the Teftimony of Helmont concerning the Arcand of Helmnt t9 Afm 
Fdrdcelfta be confiderable, even in a Tradr (where cither outc«. Paracttf. 
of Emulation or Judgement , he endeavours (omewhatto de- gf t 7 ^. 7 ' rcatec 
predate both them and their Author) much greater things ^rm*™" 
might be boldly affirmed of fome Arc and-, for Fateor Lnbc»s y more UnferTal 
( fayes he, fpeaking of Pdrdcelfm) Me ex ejus fcrlptts profit 
multum, iltumqut potuiffc , per Remedid ad unit aits Symbolum *htch mayep. 
ddfcendentidJdnare Leprdm^^A ftbma.Tdbem, Pardlyfrn.Epi- f* nfalc . £* . 

i r — i j w, J « i • / want of jkill m 

lepfiamtCdlculumtH-jdropem^Podagram^ Cancrum, dtqueejuf- t h e Prefcribw. 



modi vulgo incur dbtles morkos : at t a men Pdracclfufutfje igndrit utimntjn au 
rddtcis vitd long* y tdm ex t\m fcriptis & medtc amtntbus qua J£fc2lJ 
ex obitu collegia &c. And in the fame Traft, juft before He 
comes to enumerate PdrdceJfvt's Arcana •, Concedo , faith he, 

b b b 3, Uni~ 



Digitized by Google 



(400) 

Univerfdies aliquot ^Median**, qua fub um[cno Ndtura lon'ge 
grat}Jsjmo,infenftbiliter poft [cvsnftum educunt hoftem , cum 
egregia Orginorum.depuratione^ Concede pariter appropriate 
aliquot quo Univcrfalis amplrtudintminfpccifcis morborum di- 
retliontbus amuLntur. And among thofe Arcana them fel ves 
that is rank'd but in the fecond place , of which he gives this 
Chara&er -.Scquitur dein Mercurius Vita^ Stibiif roles integri, 
que omntm morbi ncrvum pent t us ab for bet. 
, And becaufe another Arcanum doth noc fo powerfully 
renovate.as that lafl mentioned a and two more 5 He allows to 
thofe three others the precedencies of that whereof He yec 
faith : £*vto \oco eft CMercurius Diaphorcticussmellc dulcior 
& adignemftxus, foils Horizontes omnes propr scutes habeti 
perficit enimquicquid iMedictu & Cbirurgm pvffwt opt are [a- 
71 at, do. But becaufe, thatany Medicines mould bequalified 
todeferve fuch fuperlative Encomiums, mayftemea thing 
fitter to be wtfhed than credite J , I would not dill wade You 
rill the Chy mifts Cures have made good their Mailers brags, 
to be altogether of our Authors Mind, who fomewhere pro- 
Cowfuiron of Mf^-Scmrbum non dtttinguercfi Kemediu ( furc he ipeaks of 
the point in fuch Remedies as he thought he had )fit fumma bonitas. But 
<ontiovcrfic. vet Y0U may perchance afenbe much more even to Reme- 
dies far inferiour to the ^Arcana Majora, in the cafes wherin 
they are mod proper, than many are willing to believe. Info- 
much that I have fometimesobferved with wonder, that an 
Excellent Ptrfon (whom I need not name to You) Cures 
the Rkkets generally in Children of feverall Ages and Com- 
plexions without having hitherto failed ( as me profeffes ) in 
any one , by preicribing no other Remedy than the fingle ufe 
of the above dei'cribed Colcotbarine F lowers y whkh I presented 
Her with. And a couple of Phy ficians alfo,to whom I recom- 
mended them, tell Mee, They have tryed in the fame Difeafe 
with the like fuccefs, as this Lady hath hitherto met with. And 
I remember that eminently Learned & experience Phy ficiao 

Dr. 



Digitized by Google 



Dr. G. Boat ; (of whofe skill both your excellent Mother and 
You have had good proof; folemnly allured me,as I elfewhere 
alfo note. That he knew a Phyfician who conftantiy cored 
within two or three Fits all Agues , whether recent or radica- 
ted, in Pcrfons of all Ages,Sexes, and Comple<aions,indifcri- 
minately with one fingle outward Application to the Patients 
Wnfts 5 but that this envious Doftor would never part with 
it to our Friend , or any elfe, no not upon his Death- bed : 
only Dr. Boat difcovered , That Spiders or fomething com- 
ming from them were main Ingredients of his Pericarpia. 

And indeed there are certain Preparations and Com por- 
tions of Remedies io lucky, and whofe SuccefFe doth fo much 
exceed Expe&ation, and the Erficacy of c ommon Com- 
pofitions: that the fame Phyfician, whofe they are, may 
upon feverall Occafions prefcribe an Hundred others, each of 
which he may think as rationall as any of thofe, which never- 
thelefle Hull be all of them much inferiour thereunto. And 
therefore I wonder not, th3t the moft Learned of the Metho- 
difts themfelves have much valued and celebrated fome pe- 
culiar Procefles and Receipts, as here amongrf us (to mention 
no others) the famous S r . Theodore Majewe,was wont almoft 
in all Obftra&ions , Cachexies, and Hydropicall Diftem- 
persto magnifie andufe that peculiar Salt of 'Steel othis, 
which he wjs pleafed to call Ant ma he fat is. 

And to thefe Domcftick Inftances ( which I might eafily 
accumuhte ) of the efteem eminent Phyficians have made of 
Receipts, I might a !de very many Forreign ones, Nay Galen 
himfelfe, who has fo copioufly treated of the Materia Medic a* 
and the Compofttian of Medicaments , though he were fuffici- 
ently expert at drawing up Receipts , doth yet in his Book 
De Compofttione Medicament or um , and elfewhere tranfuibe, 
and fometimes commend (and mention his having ufed)divers 
of the Compofitionsof Ancienter Phyficians, and efpecially 
magnifies Andrmuhus his Treacle. 

I 



< 



Digitized by Google 



I might, Tjrcfbilm here mind You,That we fee that Chymu 
(try, as incompleat as yet it is, has been able fo much to im- 
prove the preparation of Remedies,as to afford us fome,which 
are fo innocent as well as Efficacious, that in the Dileafes they 
principally refpe&, they require not , as of Neccffity , neer fo 
much ofTbcoricall skill, as others do in the Adminifter % I 
might like wife take notice , That experience alfo tcacheth, 
cfpecially by what we fee performed by the Spd* , and fome 
other Mineiall Waters , that one Medicine mdi be fo richly 
endowed,as to be more effe&ual againft feveral Differing Dil- 
eafes, rhan even the better fort of other Remedies againft any 
one particular Difeafe. 

1 might further reprefent as fome thing that makes yec 
more to my prefent purpofe , that though every Body can 
advife his fick Friends to an Air that is famoufly healthful , 
if there be any within a convenient Diftance from them j 
Yet their are fome Aires fo eminently good , and that noc 
upon the Account of any one predominant Quality that 
makes them oppofite to a Difeafe fpringing from its contrary, 
but from a hidden Temperature , or certain friendly cffluvU* 
that they alone often cure Variety of Difeajes in Perfons 
of differing Ages and Completions : as Navigators obferve 
in the Ille of S r . Helen where the SpAnUrM and fome other 
Europeans in their paiTage to the Indies , often leave without 
Phylicians great numbers of Sick, whom they find for the 
rooft part recovered at their return. And that fometimes even 
the acuteft Difeafcs may by the Sanative Steams that inricb 
the Air be cured almoft in a trice, is allured by thofe that have 
lived in grand Cairo,w\[o haveaffirm'd to me, what the learned 
Profper v-/47 f '/tf*f,who fo long pra&ifed Phyfick there,aflures 
Us, That upon Nil$us beginning to ovei flow , though in the 
Heat of Summer, there enfueth a fuddain Recovery of thofe 
multitudes of Perfons of differing Ages, Temperatures, 
Sexes, &c. which there happen at that tjme to lye Sick of 

the 



Digitized by Google 



the Plague. Thefe things T fay, Pyrtpbiluf ,and more I might 
adde, to what You may find difperfed here and there in the 
£ s s a y e s which this Paper accompanies towards the 
inferring that we (hould not nattily conclude it Jmpofible thit 
there m3y be found fuch Medicines as may be more than 
particular and Specifick Remedies without requiring the Gi- 
ver to be a great Phy fician. But to draw at length to a Con- 
dufion, 1 (hall rather Summe up my prefent thoughts of this 
Matter, Thus. 

Ordinary Receipts without an Ordinary Meafure of skill 
^ in Phyfick are not rollily to be relyed on, efpecially in Acute 
Difeafes$ where, by giving Medicines, otherwife innocent 
enough , to lofe the opportunities of adminiftring proper 
ones >m ay be very prejudiciall: and where fometimes the feve- 
ral feafous of the Diieafes do squire fuch differing Remedies 
if they be but Ordinary ones, that a Medicine proper enough 
for the Difeafe at one feafon of it, may do Mifchief at another: 
But if indeed there be Noble and Extraordinary Arcan*, that 
work rather by ft rengthnlng and rcftoring Nature j and Re- 
folving,or otherwife deftroying, the peccant Matter they find 
any wherein the Body, than by irritating and weakening Na- 
ture 01 putting Her as it were to a troublefome Plunge : the 
life of fuch Remedies may deferve to be a little otherwife 
confidered, as that which may not Ordinarily (for I fay not 
Ever ) require more Inftru&ion then may be afforded to Per- 
fons not Indifcreet by fuch Diredions and Cautions as may 
be Divulged, or otherwife Communicated, together with the 
Remedies themfelves: As we fometimes fee that by the help 
of fuch Inft ructions unlearned Pcrfons, and even old Wives 
do with fomeone Soveraign Plsifter, Balfam, or other out- 
ward Remedy, Cure many and various Tumors, Ulceis,and 
-cither Sores in Pcrfons of differing Sexes, Ages, and Com- 
plexions. And becaule You will eafily grant that this Ex. 
ample does iar lefle accommodate our prefent purpofe than 

c c c does 



(404) 

does the Cafe it felf,as 1 j uft now put i t ,1 hope You will allow 
me to repr efen t further, That at lead it feems not Co Ration all 
to judge of all the Remedies that Art improving Nature can 
afford Q$ by thofe that are hitherto in Ufe , either among Me- 
thodifts or Vulgar Chyroifts , but rather to think that the 
Noblenefle of Remedies will be advanced according as the 
Art of preparing them (hall be promoted; and that it is not fo 
fafe and ealie, positively to determine the Efficacy of the for- 
mer, otherwife than in Proportion to the Difcoveries we have 
attained to in the Latter. 



TbeEndoftbt APPENDIX. 




• 



7U 



* 



Digitized by Google 



7he CITATIONS Engltfh't. 

AD Pdg. 6. In Cor fore, Sec. But I dare not try thofe 
things opon Humane Body, which have not been be- 
fore tryed upon former Experiences $ For the End of 
fuch ram Experiments may be theruine of all Lives, 
Ad Ptg. 9. N*turdltum,&c. This is the Courfeof Na- 
torahfts and Phyficians who profecute their Art Philofophi* 
cally, The Naturalift ends where Medicine begins,and Medi- 
cine begins where the Nacur alift endeth. 

jdfdg.il* Sunt enim,&c. The parts of Humane Body 
are unknown, and therefore we ought to confider them by the 
parts of other Animals, to which they are 1 ike. 

Ad Pag- 19. Hoe in, &c This I have more than once Ob- 
ferved in Lizards which I kept in my own Houfe. For rav 
Children being at play , when with a Rod they had ltrook off 
the Ltzards Tails I faw them within a day or two come oat to 
£eed , and their Tayles then by littleand little (till encreafing 
and growing bigger. 

Ad pdg. 73. Nequty &c Nor may we be ignorant that in 
acute Dileafes , the Notes of Life or Death are more falla- 
cious. 

Adpdg.jy. QatddmJb.Q* One who before he fell into the 
French Pox was blind or a Cataract in one of his Eyes , by 
being anointed with Quick- fllver, was recovered, not only . 
from the chief Difeafe,but (which was moft fhangej from his 
Catarad. Nor is it irrationall that Cataracts lhould be dtflbl- 
ved by fuch anointing x when Experience teacheth, That hard 
Tumors clogg'd together of pttuitoas Matter are powerfully 
diflolved by Mercuriall Inunctions. 

CCC 2 Ad 



uigmz 



( 400 

kjU fMg.i%.E]ufoue % &c. And they urge many Inftances 
of it even to my admiration. 

lb. A'tunt , &c . Yet they fay that the Seed of the Cdcho9f\ 
grown'd, and taken in any proper Water doth dififolvcthe 
Stone into a very Dirt, which being voided doth harden again 
into a ftony fubftance.l faw a Young Man, to whom' v iipon my 
knowledge) this accident befell.Whenhewas tormented with 
the Stone in the Bladder, which I under flood both by the Li- 
thotomift who felt it, and by the Symptomes which he fuffe- 
red : I fent him to a Fountain , which takes its name from 
S c Peter : when he had (laid there two Moneths, he returned 
Free from the Stone,and brought home with him ail the Dire 
which he had voided b>* degrees, in a Paper, coagulated as it 
were into fragments of Stone. 

Adfse.Ss. tf/V,&c. He loaths nothing that ftinks, oris 
otherwite unpleafant , He b3th been often i'een to chew and 
fwallow Glafle,Stones,Wood,Bones, the Feet of Hares, and , 
other Animals together with the Hair, Linnen, and Woollen 
cloath, F imes,and other Animals alive : Nay, even Mettals, 
and Di(hes,and Globes of Tin. Befides wfiich,he devours Sew- 
ct.and Tallow Candles, the Shels of Cockles, and the Dungs 
of Animals, efpecially of Oxen, even Hot,aflbon as it is voi- 
ded. He drinks the Urine or others mixt with Wine or Beer$ 
He eats Hay, Straw, Stubble, and lately he fwallowed down 
two living Mice , which for half an Hour continued biting at 
the bottom of his Storaack h and to be fliort, Whatfoeveris 
offered him by any Noble Perfons, it goes down with bim 
without more adoe upon the fmalleft reward , infomuch that 
within a few Dayes he hith promifed to eat a whole Calfe 
Raw,together with the Skin an 1 Hair : Among divers others 
1 my felf am a WitnciTe of the Truth of thefe, &c t 

v^id p4g.%6.C4ufam,drc. To find in the CarcalTe,the caafc 
of this Voracity,will bequeftionleflc very difficult: Someone 
perchance would refexre it to that which Columbus obferved in 

the 



Digitized by Google 



(407) 

the Carkaffe of Uzatw the Gl afte-eater, and refblvc that the 
fourth conjugation ofNervcs which nature ordain'dfor rafting, 
come neither to the Palate,nor theTongue.-But fo there would 
only be rendred thecaufeofbis want of Tafte, and not why 
he mould be able to take fuch uncouth things without offence 
to his S to mack and die eft them, which without doubt ought 
to be the particular and lingular conftitution of his Stomach 
and Guts , which yet may not appear to the Eye by the Ef- 
fects. 

Adpag.^l, DC Ldudano, &c. Of his Laudanum ( that 
Name he gave to little Pills,which in the extremity of Difea- 
fes headminiftredas a mod Divine Medicine, alwayes giving 
them in an odde Number ) hefcruplednottosfhrm that by 
that Medicine he could puc life into thofe who were as good 
as Dead and that while I was with him,he made good m fome 
Experiments. 

Ad fag p^. Ofortetubi^&C' Where a Medicine anfwers 
not, we ought not fo much to efteem the Author as the Pati- 
ent,and to try fome what farther and farther. 

Ad fag.gj. idem fit, &c. The fame is made of LMandhcs, 
Potato's, Turkifh Mullet, Rice,and other things which being 
chewed by old Women,and Spit toge her with much Spittle, 
this Liquor is ftrait put up into Veflels, and there kept until! 
it ferments 3nd aft down a Sediment. 

\^4d fsg, i o 3. Hoc eft, drc This Birchvwer hath a fweet 
Sharpnefle and very pleafant Tafte $ it allayes Thirft, and the 
cry nefle of the Entrails 5 It tempers the Heat of the Bloods 
It opens Obftiu£ions,3nd drives out the Stone. 

Ad fag. in. CQtfictnnt^ They make Drink of that 
Mulli) rubbing it gently in their bands in Hot- Water , untill 
they have rubb'd out all the Sweetnefle , they ftrainethat 
Water.aod keep itthreeorfour Dayes,untill it fettlcand then 
it becomes a very clear Drink : The fame Water boil'd turns 
into good Hony—Of this Fruit boil'd with Water according 

ccc 3, to/ 



Digitized by Google 



to different Manners is made Wine ,or good Drink, or Vine-; 
gar, or Hony. 

Adf. 1 1 2.IVrr*,&c.Then by cutting the Shoot with a Ra- 
zor-blade made of a Flint, there runs out of the Cut a certain 
Liquor in fuch a quantity ,tbat(which is wonderful) out of one 
fingle Plant,fometimes Fifty or more Arobs run out: From 
which Liquor there is made Wine, Vinegar, Hony,and Sugar. 
For the Liquor Sweet of it felf, is by being boird made much 
fwecter and thicker, fo that it at length kerns into Hony. 

Kjid p . 1 1 3 Seme /, &c. 1 f once in a Moneth one eac or Drink 
to excefle, the Day following , if he be weighed ( though 
he hath fuffcred no fenfible Evacuation ) Yet then he 
will weigh lighter then is LI fa a II . A conftant Diet wants the 
help of thofe that once or twice in a Moneth do exceed; For 
the Expulfive Faculty being opprefled by toogreat Repletion 
ft irs up fo much of perfpiration , as without the Staticks no 
one would believe. 

Ad p. 1 23. In urbe^Sca In the City S. fames'* that is 
in the Province oi chyle , certain Captive Indians cut off the 
Calves of their Legs , and for hunger eat them , and ( which 
is ftrange) applying the leaves of a certain Plant to their 
Wounds, immediately they ftanch the Blood. 

Ad pag. 1 24. CM e mini, &c. I remember that the Limbs 
of Souldiers wounded with Gunfliot, to have been cut oft by 
the advice of our European Surgeons , both Dutch and Portu- 
gal 5 thofe Barbarous people by recent juices Gums and Bal- 
fams to have freed them from Knife and Cauteryes ,and happi- 
ly cured them. I alio am an Eye- witnefi e,that with the juice 
of Tobacco alone,they havecured Wounds given over by our 
Surgeons. ■ 

Ad fag. 131. Experiment is, &c. It is approved by many 
Experiments, that its Virtues are excellent againft the Plague, 
Malignant Feavers, the buings of Venemous Creatures, the 
Diarrhea and other Fluxes. 

Ad 



Digitized by Google 



f46p) 

Ad fig. 1 3 T • &c. He made not Vc^ 

tjcmc to be our Poifon,for neither made he Death nor any De- 
le ctry Medicament upon the Earth 5 but fo , that by a flight 
industry and endeavour of our own they might be turned into 
great pledges of his lovejfor the life of Men againft the cruel- 
ty of Difeafes, which were in procefle of time to arife. For in 
thofe Venomes is the help that more benigne and familiar 
fimples cannot yield and thofe mod frightfull Poifons are 
yet preferved in Nature for the more great and Heroick ufes 
ofPhyficians. 

Adpag. 136. That the Lapis Cancrorum refolved into 
the form of its rlrft Milk, affords an Antidote againft the vio- 
lence of many Vegetables that are infamous for their being 
over laxative. 

Ad Pag. 150. iMilUy&c. Our Court hath tryed the Effi • 
cacy of this Salt in a thoufand Experiments in the Difeafes of 
Melancholly ,in all Feavers,continuous and intermit tenr,in the 
Stone, Scurvy, Nay more wee have obfcrvcd more 
than once that it hath procured fleep , efpecially in perfons 
Melancholly. The Dofe is from one,to two Scruples* we ufe 
divers pounds of it in a Year, 

Ad j>4g. 1 5 o, 1 5 u C dtemm cuantum^ &c But for the ex- 
ceeding and portentous Virtues of the Bezar-ftone, 1 have 
found by a thoufand tryals that they are not fo very great. 

lb. Nil fcrro, &c. I fpeak no more of thefe Stones, left I 
fhould feem by my Commendation of their Virtues to pro- 
voke Lithotomifts to make difle&ions at any rate. This! 
have moft certainly Experienc'd, That the Stone found in 
Mans bladder doth well provoke Urine and Sweat. And parti* 
cnlarly in the time of that Plague,which in the Years riband 
itfij. miferably vexed Ours, and all other the Cities of Hoi- 
Und, for want of the Bezar-ftone, I remember, Iprefcribed 
this and found it, ( let me tell YouJ a more great an excellent 
SudorificJc. 

^ Ad 



Di 



Ad pag.iS9. Credd y &c I believe Simples in their own 
limplictty are fufficient for the Caring or all Difeafes. 

Adfsg.19. gu*d 9 &c, But if You come not to that Area* 
mmoi pjrotcrfwj) learn at leaft to make the Salt of Tartar 
Volatile, that by means of it You may perfect Your Soluti- 
ons. Which though it leave thofe things which it diflblveth 
equally Homogeneous,being digefted in Us 5 Yet it borrow- 
eth fome of their Virtues which it carrieth along with it fclf to 
overcome Difeafes. 

AdpAg.199. Dicam^drc I will fpe3k it for their fakes, who 
are ingenious,that the Spirit of Salt ot Tartar, ir it diflblveth 
Unicorns Horn,'Silver,QuickiilveriCrabs Eyes,or other like 
Simples , it will Cure not only Feavers but other Difeafes in 
great abundance. 

lb. Mir urn , &c It is a wonder what the very Salt of 
Tartar alone being made Volatile will perform-, for it cieanfes 
the Veins of all the feculencies and the caufes of Contu- 
macious Obftru&ions , and doth difperfe the congregated 
Matter of Apoftems. Of this Spirit of the Salt (and not of 
theOyl) is that faying of PAracelfus true, That whither this 
Medicine cannot reach, there is fcarce any other more power- 
full that lhall reach it. 

K*Ad p*g.2o 1 . yjirs^&c. Art is Long,,Life is iliort. But 
where the End is by gift , there Art is Iliort , and Mans Life 
long if it be compared to Art. Therefore Hippocrates had rea- 
fon to make the complaint , for it even happened to his fol- 
lowers according to his Words. The Art of Medicine con - 
fiftsinphilofophy, Aftronomy, Chymiftry, and Phyficks, 
and therefore it may truly be faid that the Art is long. Far 
there is much time required, throughly to learne andfearch 
thefe fower Pillars of Medicine. 

Ad pAg.ioi. Eft enimt&c. For this Art is.conje&urall; and 
not only Conjecture ^ but Experience it felf doth not all- 
waves anfwer. 

Ik 



Digitized by. 



(4i O 1 

lb. ha wv^i \ &c. Experience is Uncertain, and Fallacious 
Judgment is difficult to be made. 

lb. Hoc mod*) &c. And this was the faftiion of Medicine 
in the beginning , that it had no Theory, only Experience, 
that fuch a thing was Laxative, fuch a thing Aftnngent : Buc 
how,or why they were fo, that was not found out 5 and there- 
fore one was healed, another perirnt : but now, &c. 

lb. Per rAtionem,&c. By reafoh it is not eafie in a Difeafc 
to give Judgement, but is as difficult as any thing imaginable. 

Ik. Neque^&c. For if the truth were eafie to be found ,fo ma- 
ny and fo excellent men as have made it their bufinefl e to find 
it,had never been divided into fo many Se&s and Opinions. 

Adftg.xoi.mnutulus^&cXi is not a Title,nor Eloquence, 
Nor skill in the Tongues , nor the Reading of many books 
( though thefe are Ornaments) which are to be confidered in a 
Phyfician * but 3 prime knowledge of Matters and Myfteries 
which alone may ftand in the fteed of all the reft. It is the pare 
of a Rhetorician to fpeak eloquently , to be able to perfwade 
and to draw the Judge to his own party. It is the part of a Phy- 
fician to know the fcverall torts of Difeafes, their Caufes and 
Syraptomes, and then with skill andmduftry to apply Medi- 
cines and to make Cures of them all, according to their feve- 
rall Natures and Fafliions. 

Ad fdg* 207. ime^&c* Nay ,1 faw divers, as it were in an in- 
ftant,redcem'd from death who had been poifqned by the eat- 
ing or Venomous Mumrooras and other unwholfome things, 
only by drinking a recent Infufion of the Root J*borand y 
while ft ray felf and other of Galen s Difciples blufht to fee 
the inefFe&uall endeavours of all our Altxifharmacd y Tie j. 
cles,and other Antidotes: So that afterwards I fuffered my felf 
to be joyn'd in Confutation with thofe barbarous Collegues, 
not fo much to be arbiters of the condition of our men by 
* their Palfe , as to give their afliftance and counfell in the for e- 
inentioned way (viz,) the prefcribing of proper Medicines. 

ddd . , Ai # 



Digitized by Google 



f4«) 

Ad fdg. 208. tfujusy&c. The Virtue of this Stone is macb 
above that of any other gems*forit ftops the Flux of the Blood 
in any part.--- When the Women perceive a fit of the Mo- 
ther coming upon them, by applying this Stone they are im- 
mediately eafed, and if they al wayes weare it , they are never 
troubled wittnthofe fits aiore.Of this they make faith,by ma- 
ny Inftances. 

lb. Vidimus, 6V c. We "have feen fome that were troubled 
with the Flux ot the Hamorrhoidts , who found Remedy by 
wearing Rings made of that Stone continually on their Fin- 
gers, and the Monthly Flux is ftayd by the fame way. 

Ad fag. 209« Pragnantibut, &c This Stone is not proper 
for thofe who are with Child, for it is fo fure to caufe Abor. 
tion,that the Women of Malaria told mee.that if at any time 
their Monthly Evacuations were obftructed, that if they only 
carried this Stone in their hands , they found Remedy there- 
by. 

i^fdfag.i io. Hoc loco.fiiz. In this place I cannot but relate 
the admirable Virtoes of our Ele&rum which I have ob- 
fervedwithmy owne Eyes, and therefore can attc ft with a 
good Confcience. For we faw Rings ot it which he that wore 
neither felt Cramp,nor Palfie,nor other pain. He was fubjeel; 
to no Firs of Apoplexie,nor Epilepfie,infomuch that if one of 
thefe Rings were put upon the Ring- Finger of a perfonaaa- 
ally in any vehement fit of the Falling (icknefle,that fit would 
immediately all wage , and the perfon as foone come to him- 
felfe. 

\^4d 225. In the City P$fa where I lived certain Yeares,a 
certaine Indian cured all forts of Difeafes by the juice of one 
Plant alone, wherewith he anointed the Limbs and any other 
part particularly off ecled, and then covering them warme with 
Blankets provoked Sweat. The Sweat that came from the 

£arts fo dawbed were meere Blood which he wiped off with 
innen Clothes, and fo he proceeded untill he thought they 

■ . . " had 



Digitized by Google 



had Sweat enough. In the meanetimehe gave them Diet 
that was moil Nourifhing. With this Remedy many defpe- 
rate Difeafes were cured, and the fick per Ton upon the Ufe of 
this Phyfick improved, (o as to appeareyounoer and luftier 
after it. But we could never prtvaile, neither by Money, nor 
intreaty, nor foule meanes upon him to (hew us the Plant, 

Ad fAg.117.MirA) &c. Wonderful 1 things are daily found 
out in Phyfick to the Confirmation of the Operation of the 
Learned Naturalift Pctrus Servitu's Weapon Salve * For he 
ad bred us that a piece of Cloth dipt in the Blood, and put un- 
der hoc Allies flops the Monthly Flux- the Experiment ha* 
ving been often proved. And my Matter Petrus CaJIcUus af- 
finnes,that he found by Experience , that the Hdm$rrh*ids if 
they were touched with the tuberous Hoot Chondrilla, did 
dry away if the Ch$ndrilU dryed, and did Run to Corruption 
if the ChondrilU was corrupted. And therefore after fuch tou- 
ching of the Hemorrhoids, the ChondrilU was ufually put to 
dry in the Chimny. 

AdpAg. 229. Podtgra^ &c. The Gout is ftrangly eafed, if 
Puppies lie with the perfon thac hath the Gout, for they con- 
tract the Diteafe fo as not to be able to go , but the Patient 
thereby findcsEafe. 

Adpag %i6. Primo^ &c. At the fir ft, Phytlck was accoun- 
ted part of Pbilofophy, fotrut the Cure of Difeafes, and the 
Contemplation of Naturcdid both arife under the fame Au- 
thors. Thofe being moft fet upon Medical! Enquiries, which 
had made their Bodies infirme by difquicting thoughtfulnefle, 
andno&urnall Watchings. 

KjidftgMA;. £/?,&c. Befides , it is altogether drying ; and 
therefore I mould not defpaire that it,being hung about ChiU 
drens Necks , might cure the Falling-ficknefle in them. I 
truly faw 3 L.3d , that fometimes would be eight whole 
Moncths free from the Falling- ficknefle, and then, when by 
chance this fell from off his Neck, he became immediately 

ddd 2 fui- 



Digitized by Google 



(4M) 

fur prized with a Fit : and againe , hanging another Root in id 
place, be would continue well $ Therefore, for Experiment 
fake, I thought good to take it againe from his Neck, which 
when I had done, and found that the Lad fell into his former 
Convulfions, we tooke a great piece of a greene Root , and 
hung it about his Neck, and from that time He continued well 
and felt no more Convulfions. It was therefore moft proba- 
ble, that either certaine parts did exhale from the Root, and 
were drawn into the Body by Infpiration , which die fo worke 
upon the affected parts $ or th it the ambient Aire was conti- 
nually changed and altered by the Root: For after this m in- 
ner the Succus Cyenricus cures the fhlegmone upon the Uvw 
U\ fo Catarrhs and other Rheums aredryed up by Mclan*hi» 
um y if it be tyed up warme in fine Linnen, and the hot fume 
ofitbedrawne up into the Nofttils by Infpiration. Nay, if 
you ftrangle a Viper with divers forts of Threeds, andefpe- 
cially with the Sea Purple, and then you tye thofe threeds 
about the neck of your Patient, you (hill cure the fwelling 
of the Almonds of the Eares . and all other fweliings in the 
Neck. 

1* Ad f ^.157- C *V*> The Plague at Grandeur, 
and in all parts of *s£gypt , is wont to invade the Inhabitants 
from the beginning of the Moneth September untiil June: For 
inallthefeMoneths, from September unto fm$$ t the Plague 
from other Nations is brought thither, and is wont to infect 
that Nation: But in the Moneth of fune, of what nature 
and how great foevei the Peftilence be, when the Sun firft en- 
ters Cancer, it is immediately removed 5 which thing many 
(and that not without reafon) take to be a particular Mercy of 
God. But (what is more admirable ) all Houmold-ftuffe, how 
ever infe&ed with the Contagion of the Difeafe, at that time 
ftiews no effect of any Contagion,fo that then the whole Nati- 
on paffesinto a moft fecure and healthy condition, from a mor- 
bid and dangerous .* and then thole Difeafes, which are called 

by 



Digitized by Google 



by the Greeks Spdradiciy begin to appeire,wbicta in 00 part of 
the World are feen to be rife together with the Plague. 

ibid. Hdc t &c. Thefe things are firft obferved about that 
time. From which, I think, and perchance not without reafon, 
the caufe of the extinction of the Plague , and the change of 
the ftate from Morbid to Whoifome doth depend * For no 
other of the confervative Caufes,which are wont to be called 
byPhyfician% Res non- Nttnr ales , appeareth then , befides 
the Aire: to which we may referre this change from Difeafeto 
Healthineffe, and therefore we mult referre this change to the 
change of the Aire. 

Adfsg. 25^. The Inhabitants do Grange things, both in 
preferving Health and curing Difeafes, by Friction and Un- 
ci: on, ufing the fir ft in cold and Cbromcall , the latter in 
acute Difeafes. And Strangers who arrive there, are, as they 
ought,willing to imitate their waies of Fhyfick,& by rules of 
Art to prefide and moderate thefe waies ot Emperical healing, 
lb. cholera Siccd is cured by the fame Remedies , efpecially 
if their Horny Cupping-glafle be applied to the Region of the 
Liver, of which I muft attcft the fame thing that Galen doth 
©fCupping-glafles* which he affirmed to Worke as Miraca- 
loufly as ft their Operation had depended on Enchantment* 

Ad fag. iiWNtqm&c. Nor doth he fay, that a Phyfician 
needs nothing of Couiicell or Deliberation, or that an lrratio- 
nall Man may profefle this Art. But that thofe Conjectures 
of hidden things are nothing to the purpofe. Becaufe it mat- 
ters not what caufeth the Difeafe ? but what removes it, 

lb. Jnterim^&c* In the mean time the Br a {1 It an Brotanifts 
make all forts or Medicines of Simples they find every where 
in the Woods: which they make with fo great Sagacity, and 
apply them both internally,and externally, efpecially to Di C- 
eales that Spring from Venom, that a man may more fecure- 
iy give himfelfe over to their hands , than to our unskillull 
Phy ficians,who brag much of Secrets they have learnt in pri» 

ddd 3 vate, 



Digitized by Google 



t ate, and for the knowledge of thefe will be called Ratlonals 

inPhyfick. 

Ad fig, 272. Fortaffis,8cCi Perchance to me Sciolift in 
Phyfick way affirm that thefe things may not be afed,by rea- 
son of the Narcotick and Stupefadive property . But thefe 
pretences are as vain in effect as fpecious at fir ft fight : for be- 
fides that the hot temper of this Coantrey requires it % It is 
fu re, that without thefe Remedies there can be no Cure. Adde 
that here we prepare opium Co well that you may give it to an 
Infant. And truly, if in Hot Difeafes we had no Opiats we 
ihculd in effect find that the ufeof all other Medicaments 
would prove altoget her vain and fr uitlefle. 

d fag. 287. Si Medic uumjkc* Such was the Origineof 
Phytic k : by the Recovery of fome,andthe Death of others ic 
fit ft made diftmction between things Soveraigne to heale, and 
things which were improper and Deadly. And thus the Re- 
medies being found out,Men began to difpuce of the Reafons 
of them. Nor was the Art of Medicine found out by the 
light of Reafon-,but,Mcdicine being found, the Reafon began 
to be inquired into. 

lb- Ubires>8cc. Where the Matter is certafne,ifit be againft 
the common Opinion, the Reafon muft be fought , and not 
the Matter of fact fcrupled. • 

Ad fag. 791 P**a{}'iiMs 9 &C. You will find very few of 
thofe who dwell at the Spaa who are troubled with the Head- 
ache, Stone, Obftructions of the Kidnies , Liver, Spleen, or 
MefariackVcines-, none at all who were troubled with the 
Jaundice, Dropfie, Gout, Itch, or Falling- ficknefle. 

lb. inter cater a, &c. Among other Qualities it moveth 
\he Monethly Evacuation as hath been prov'd by a thoufand 
trials. And yet it flops the immoderate Flux of them more 
happily than any other Medicine. 

Ad fag, 299. Return, & c. The Contemplation of Nature, 
though it maketh not a Phvfician,yet it fits him to learn Phy- 
fide. FINIS. 



1 



Digitized by Google 



T3 ra 

8 g£> 

3 V O 

±1 Curs 

O 

o 

M 



Qigitized by Google 



Digitized by 



.The INDEX to the Second Pare 



The Second Pari 
Of the Ufcfulneflc of Natural 
Philofophy . 
SECT A. OfitsUfefulnefleto 

P H Y $ I C K. * 

B S S A T I. t 
Containing fome Particulars ten- 
ding to friew the UfefulneiTe of 
Natural Philofophy to the Phy- 
(iological part of Phyfick. • 
"X" He advantage of the Knowlcdg 
* of Nature towards the incrca* 
ftng the Power of Man^andits Ufe a* 
to Health of the Body and Goods of 
fortune. pag.?. 

7 hat in Mans Knowlcdg of the 
Nature ef Creatures conftjls his Em- 
pire over them* 4. 

Thit the Di [cover j of America 
u owed to the Knowlcdg of the Load - 
ft ones Polar it y. 5« 
That the Martial affairs all over 
the World were altered bj the Know- 
lcdg of the Nature of Brim/lone and 
Saltpeter. ib. 

How prejudicial tin mifiake of 
that Aphorifm ( that if teeming 
Women be let bloud they will mif- 
CXty)hath been to Femal Patients. 5 



The inter ef of this Knowlcdg to 
the Happinef c and Life of Man. 6 
The (numeration if thofe Arts to 
which this Knowlcdg is profitable. 7. 

The Method or way tn tended for 
the enduing Difcourfc. . ib. 

7 he Division of Phyfick into five 
parts. 8 
How the Phyfiolcgical part of 
Phyftck is advantaged by the Know- 
lcdg of Natural Philofophy. 9: 
That the Anatomical Doftrine 
of CM an s body receives light from 
Experiments made on other Crca- 
tvres. ib. Proved by divers Inflan- 
fiances, as of the finding the La<5le- 
als and Lymphx- du&sfirft in Bruit 
Bodies. ib 
The Experiment of taking out the 
Spleen in Dogs, ro- The fame thing 
done by Fioravanti tna Woman, ib. 

The Refpiration of Fro^s divers 
Hours, fome times Dates, under wa- 
ter yWtl hout [uffocation. 1 1 i 
What ufe Anftotle and Gilen 
made of the Directions of Bruits. 1 1 
The Anatomy of Man counted now 
in Mufcovy fir inhumane^ and the. 
ufe of Skeletons for Witchcraft, iz 
The Ufe of the comparifon of the 
fff parts 



Digitized by Google 



The IN 

farts of Humane Bod) rvitb tbofe of 
Beafts.xb. lliu ft rated by dtvers far- 
ticuUr Obfcrvations. ib. 

Divers Motions and Actions of 
Frogs after tbeir Hearts were cut 
nut. 1 4 

obfcrvations of the motion of a 
Chicken's Heart after the Head and 
ether farts were cut off. 1 5 

Of the Vivacity of diffccled Vi- 
fers, 1 6.and T or tot fa. ib. 

Whether there be a neceffity of 
the unceaftng influence of the Brain 
to Sen ft and Motion. l J 

That the silkworm butterfly is 
€a fable of Procreation after the lojTe 
if tts Head. ib. 

That the Redneffe of the Bloud is 
not to be afcribed to the Liver f ro- 
ved by the inffetfion of the Liver of 
Chickens un hatch. 1 8 

That the lofs of a Limb in all A- 
fiimals is not irref arable, ib. 

That notwithftandtng the great 
Solution and Digeflion of Meat in 
the Stomachs of Fifhcs no fenftble 
Acidity is found there. 19 
Exfcrimcnts concerning the So- 
lution of Meats y and their change 
ef Colours bj acid Menftruums. 20 

Wayes of Artificial Drying and 
frefervatien of Plants \ and I,t{etfs> 
2 2. and more Mkj Bodies. 23. 



DEX. 

Particularly the Schemes ofdi' 
vers farts of Humane Body. ib. 

Of the frefervatien of an Embryo 
divers Tears by Embalming it mtb 
Oyl of Sfike. 24, 

J r, fiances of men in the Ameri- 
can Mountains ktll'd^ and after- 
war as frefciv 'dfrom futrcfattion 
only by the Wind. . 25 
# Of the ufe of S fir it of Wine for 
the f refer vat ion of Bodies from fu- 
trcfattion. ib* 

That the Examination of the 
fuices of Humane Bodies by the Art 
of Chymifiry may sllu fir ate their Ufe 
and Nature. 2 6 

That the Actions which are com- 
mon to Men with other Animals be. 
ing fcrformd Mechanically , the 
Skill of Mechanic^ muft be of Ufe 
to Phyftology. 37 

ESSAY II. 
Offering fome Particulars relating 
to the Pathological Part of Phyfick. 
That the Naturatifts Knowledg 
mayajjtfl the Phy fit tan todifcover 
the Nature andCaufes ofDifeafes. 
zS.Provd by general Reafon 19. By 
f articular In fiance of the c*ufe of 
the Stone iff the Ktdntes. 3 o. 

The caufe of that D/feafe ill u fir 
ted by the Petrifaction of Wood, 
Cheefe^Mofi jvater, 6cc. 31. 

Tho 



The INDEX. 

The Origin of Helmonts Offa | of the ufe of Zoology to the Know 

ledgof Difeafes. 



40 



albv^Paracelfus ^uelechfy 
the mixture of Spirit of VVtne^ and 
Spirit of Urine, an example of the 
Generation of the Stone. 3 2 . 

That a terreflriqis Sub/lance 
may lark und/fcernd in limpid Li- 
quors, ib. 

The life of chjmifiry in explai- 
ning the Nature of, and aberrations 
injur Vtgeflions. 34. frov'd hj a 
Catalogue of confiderable Qbferva- 
tions. 35. 

That Salt and Sulphur have more 
influence in the cau(attonof Difea- 
fes then the firft Qualities of Heat, 
Cold^c 36. 

obfervations made upon the li- 
quor that di fiends the Aodomco in 
theDropfy* 37. 

obfervations on the Calculus 
Humanus. 38. 

Of the changes that mayreafona- 
bly be thought to happen to our ali- 
ments within the Body. 40. Illu- 
firated by the Example of Juices 
out of the Body. 41, 4* 

Difference between vulgar and 



true Chymifiry % 

The Ufe of the Knowledg of Fer. 
mentation. ib. 

of Periodical Effervencesinthe 
Blood without Fcrmcntation^iW- 



45-' 

Belmont'/ Error refuted jhat the 
Stone is aDtfeafe peculiar to man. 46 
That the Venome of Vipers or Ad- 
ders conftfls chiefly in the Rage and 
Fury wherewith they bite y andnot in 
any part of the Body that hath at all 
times a mortal propertj. 4$ 
A certain Cure for the biting of 
Vipers. "5° 
Of external Application of Poi- 
fons and letting them into the Veins 
of beafts. 

Poftfcript. 
Experiments of conveying Li* 
quid Potfons immediately into the 
Mafs of Blood. Sh&C 

. ESSAY III. 
Containing fome Particulars rela- 
ting to the Semiotical Part of, 
• Phyfick. 
That the Improvement of the 
Therapeutical would alter the Prog> 
nofticks in the Semeiotical part of 
Phyftci.i6.An Inflance to that pur- 
pofe in the PeruvianBark.5 7,5 9,68 
Riverias's Febrifugum, and 
4 3 . • Hew Cure of the Ktngs evil, 5 p 0 



That though no Difeafe fhoulabe 
incurable > yet every Difeafe is not 
curable in every Patient, 60, 
That the Hope of doing greater 
1 iff z Cures 



• « 



Digitized by Google 



The INDEX. 

' Cures then ordinary J;ath engaged Laudanum. ff i 

Artifts to make profitable Trials. 6 \ \ Butler' s great Remedies 82 

Examples of fome unexpected 
and grange Cures. 6l > 6 3 ESSAY IV. 

Examples $f 'the Cure of Cancers. 6 4 Piefenting fome. things' relating to 

An Example of a Cure of one tbeKygiei^al Part of Phyfick. 
that was born with a Cataract in That the Knowledg of Ferment 4. 
tht Eye, 65. and other Examples \ tion is ufiful to make cur Drink* 
of Cataracts ftrangely cured. ib. | wholfome for ^Aliment. 8 ? 

Examples of the Cure of the \ How much Simples may be alter d 
Drop fie and Gout. 66,67 , by Preparation, exemplified by the 

Examples of the Cure of the Stone, \ Indians, making Caflavy out of the 
68. Jhe ufe of Ferficaria for that ! poifonous Plant Mandioca.86. odd 
Cure 69. In fiances in other iMe&i* unhand fome wayes of their making' 
. cines for the fame Difeafe.70. The j Drink from the fame Root, ib. 
Ufe and Succefs of Millepedes. 7 i« j of making Drink from forts of 
The Argument concerning the Incu - j courfe Brt ad. 8 7 

rablenefj e of the Stone anfwered 7 2 . j The Drinks in ufe in C hi na. 8 8 
That there may be a Liquor. able to ! Of chery wine*. 89 
dtfiolve the Stone that may not be | of Excellent Ciders. 
corroftve to any other part. 73,74 Of Hydromelib.Of Sugar Wines 90 

Examples of thofc who coulcLdi- , of other Brafihan and Barbara 
geft Metals and Glafs.. 75,76,77 Wines. ib. 

The Defcriptions of a Mtnftruum The way to make Wine of Raifons.g 1 
prepard from common Bread, able Of Wines from the dropping or 
to drfiw Tinclures from prttious Weeping of wounded Vegetables, ib. 
htont s, Miner alsjkz. 78 of the Tears of the Walnut tree. 90 

Helmont'J Arguments from the The Ufe of the Tear's of Birch , 
JP> -'idcace of Godccttfircd. X :0\ ;i \ 1.) fome other In^rtdtents) for the 

'ike Argument that ^.aacelius S;onc. ib. 
fin* 1 l .tot th.^ibyear cf his Age The wayes to prefrv: thefe Li- 
d lb. rjuors. y$ 

r 'cy of P racelfiis his, ' The ufe of the Tears of Birch 

in 



Digitized by Google 



The INDEX. 

in hot dtfiempers of the Liver , and 
hot Catarrhs. ib. 

The ufe of Daucus Ale, and pro- 
portion of the Seed to the Liquor. 94 

O/The or Tc. ib. 

c/Animal Drinks. 95 

The ufe <?/ Brandy -Wine in hot 
Climates. ib. 

The ufe of Natural Pbilofopbj to 
meliorate Meats. 96 

of preferring Bis ket from put re 
fatfton. 91 

of preferring Fruits. ib. 

Of preferring Meats roafled for 
long Voyages. 98 

of preferring Raw meats. 99 

of falling Neats tongues with 
Salt-petef." ib. 

Of preferring F/eJh in fpirit of 
Wine. ib. 



That chymical Experiments may 
difcorer other qualities in Waters. 

105 

That the Naturalifl ma) difcorer 
the qualities of particular Airs. \ 06 

ESSAY V. 
Propofing fome Particulars, wheie. 
in Natural Philofophy may be 
uieful to the Therapeuti- 
cal Partof Phyfick. 
The Introduction. 107,108 
That the Naturalifl may tnrent 
Medtctnes Chymically prepared 
more p leaf ant then the ordinary Ga- 
lenical ones. 109 
An lnflance in Reftn of Jalap, 
Mineral waters, and the Author's 
Pil: Lunares. 1 1 o 

That the Naturalifl may find out 
inward Medicines able to do Chirur* 



of conferring hy Sugar, and\gical Cures ? prored by direr s in flan 
maltng Sugar of other Concretes ces. 111,112 



bifida the Cane. looficc 
That the Naturalifl may find out 
new wajes to inre ft/gate the whol 
fomnefs or mfalubrity of Aliments, 
prfred by In fiances cut of S-infto 
nus his MedicinaStatica. J 05 



S r W. Rawleiglw Cordial, 1 1 5 
What great ufe the Indians mafia 
of t he Juice of Tobacco. * 114 
Chap. 1L 
That the Search of N.Uure bj 
Chymifirj tn particular dtjeorers 



The difference in tran[pira?io» - the Qualities of Medicines. ii^Scc. 
bciwixi the times after ordinary Of the Nsiro tartareom Salt in 
Diet , shdtfrer bxc< /?, tryed by the fome Vegetables. 1 16 

weighing of Man'! body. 1041 Difference in Operation between 

Drffo trice tn the w<. ight of VVa- cid and Alcah^ate Salts. , ib. 

ib. Iff 3 Of 



Digitized by 



The IN D C X. 

Of Ink made by the Decoction of I The Preparation of Afarum turns 
divers aflringent pUnts with a little it from being Emettck to be notably 
Vitriol. 117 Diuretic all. 1 1 6 



Offome Metalline Precipitations. 

ib. 

That Sulphureous Saltt turn the 
expreffed Juices of Vegetables into 
a Green colour . 118 
of the DtstiUuion of the Calcu- 
lus Humanus and of the Concreti- 
ons that are called Lapides Cancro- 
rum. ib. 

7 he changes in Animal Sub ft an- 
tes made by Fermentation only in 
Urine. 1 19 

of the mixture of Spirit of Salt 
with dtgefted Urine. ib. 
Ghap. III. 
That this fcarch of Nature adds 
much to the Materia Medica. 1 20. 
by employing Bodies hitherto not em - 
floyed. ib. 
Of Remedies newly prepard out 



In fiances in fome of the fecret 
Menftruums. ib. 

That the Preparation of Afamra 
is only the Boy ling it in common wa- 
ter. 1 2 7. 7 ha t the boy ting it in Wine 
alters not its violence. ib. 

Thai the Emetic k and Cat har tick 
properties of Antimony are de» 
flroj'd by Calcination with Sale- 
Fcter, And Mercury fublimatewMj 
be deprivd of its Corrofivenefle by 
bare rcfublimations withfrefb Mer- 
cury. ib. 
Chap. IV. 
A ftrange correction of the Flow- 
ers of Antimony. 128 
That the Naturalifl may afftft the 
phyfitian to make his Cures ieffe 
chargeable. ib. 
inconveniencies of fluffing Re 



#/Zinck. ib. ceiptswttha multitude of Ingrcdi- 

The Cure of the Drop fj by the PiU ents. i2p,&c. 
Lunares. ib. That Acid, and Alcalizate Silts 

Of the ufe of divers Medical Earths being mixed grow t hereby more Osx - 
121. in fiances of Gold, anddtvers ed$ yield mBalneo but a Phlegme 
Menftruums drawn out of them, 132135. The fame is obfervd of the 
Of Medicines out of Arfenick. Mixture of Spirit of 'Urine (bjtt felf 
123. *»/</Bitmutom. 12^ highly Volatile) and Spmt of Salt. \b 



of the Correction of Poifonous 
Medicines. ib. 



Chap. V. 
That the Naturahfi difcovers 

the 



Digitized by Google 



The INDEX. 

the CM if application and life of 
Gem, and divers other coftly Ingre . 
Menu. ib. 

difference bitween the fixed- 
weft if* (Jem.and tfGbfJi of Ant i- 

mo* j. J 3* 

Concerning Aurura Potabile 

Examples of great Medicines drawn 
from urpromtfin^ bodies. 1 39 

The D.ofHolftcin's Panacea da • 
plicata is made of the vulgarly dc- 
ptfed Caput Mfcrcuum of Aqua- 
"orris, ib. 

Flores Colcotharini are made of 
the Caput Mortuum of Vitriolx&p 

i^i£omfari(on between the Be- 
zav's Stone, and the Stone cut out of 
tjMans Bladder. ib« 
Medicines out of Soot* 141 
The ufe of llorfe- dung. • 1 4 2 
An Arcanum of Ivy • B crrics* ib. 
tjAedicincs out of Mans Urin* 142 
^Medicines out of Blood- 144 
The great Effefts of Millepedes in 
the Stone, ib. In Suffuftons of the 
Eyes\tf*AndrealCatarafts. 145. 
In fore Breafls and Fiftulas. ib. 



Chap. VI. 
That the Naturalifl difcovers 



maj be [pared. J 47 

k^A Compart [on of Chymical Re* 
medics with Galenical ones in point 
of CheapncQe. 148 
Of the ufe and commendation of 
Simples even by the mofl able dry- 
mifts, ib. 

Powder ef Pearl more Operative 
the Magiftery.149. So crude Hartf- 
born then Magi fiery. 150 
K^in excellent Simple Medicine 
to ftanch v lood. ib. 

Another like Medicine forffit. 
ting and vomiting of Blood. 1 5 o 
That many times Chymifis bj 
their tedious and $n\udicious pre* 
paratiens alter the Medicine and 
ma\eit worfe. 152 
So the dtfiolving the Salts of 
Vegetables in Aquaiortis to make 
them pure and Chryflalline alters 
their vertues, and makes them in~ 
flammable as Salc-peter. 152,155 
The Preparation and vertues of 
f^Balfamum Sulphuns CrafTum.. 

The Preparation and vertues of 
EfScnce of Harts- horn. 15 8, 1 5*> 



Chap. VIL 
That LMcchanicks and other ex* 



how much of the coft and labour in \ fer mental Learning may teach how 
making many chymical Remedies to Ufjen the charge of Cures by ma- 

ntng 



Digitized by 



The INDEX. 

king more convenient furnaces de-\ of Antimony ,&c. ib. 

That the Naturalifl may find 
out w ayes to p refer ve Medicines lon- 



monflrated in divers p articular s. 

i6o,i6r, &c. 

ClaJSe floppies fittefl for corroftve 
Liquors. 163, 164 

7 hat inflammable f aline Sulphu- 
reous f pints miy be drawn from e- 
tber ftibfances cheaper then Wine. 

Jnfltnces in divers particulars 
how the Naturahfis may find chea- 
per wales of Heating the Chymtfls 
Furnaces* \66 

of charring Coles, fo that while 
it charres it gives an intenfe heat 0/Miffcko of the Oak, 
fit to melt or calcine ^Minerals. 

1*7 

Of Charring Peat. ib- 

Of Digeflton and Diftillations 
without Fire, 1 69 

Wayes of DiftiHing fpirit of V- 
fine, 170. Of Diftilltng it with 
Lime without Fermentation. ib. 



ger^and better then is ufuaL 1 73 
Of fuming Liquors with Sulphur: 
ib. And adding a little of the white 
C oagulum made cf the pure fpirits 
of Wine and Vrine. ib. 

That the mop principal way of 
lepening the charge of Cures would 
be the finding out fltw and more 
efftcfu.il Remedies. 174 
An Htftory of a radicated Epi- 
lepfie that whs cured by the Powder 

US 



Chap. VIIT. 

Other proofs thstthe Naturalifls 
skid may improve the Pharmaceu- 
tical preparation of fimples 177 
of ike be fl waies to cornel Opi- 
um. 178 
of the heft way of correcting 
That [odijlill'd it doth not coagu- Mercurius vitx. ib. 
late fpirit of Wine as in the V\ual An Excellent Medicine made of 
Diftillation. ib. thofc churltfh Minerals ^tickftlver 

of the power of good Menfhu- and Antimony. 1J9 
cms infactlitatingDtflillation. 171 Waies to take awjy the Vomitive 
that the calcmaUon of Gtld is faculty of Antimonial Ghffe* i8o s 
facilitated by malgamatton with 181 
Mercury. 172! A A r ew and excellent way to get 

The power of Vei digress diftil- , the Primum Ens, or £([ence of fome 
led in drawing Tinclures of Claffe Vegetables. 181 

The 



Digitized by Google 



ThelNfcEX. 

fhe influence of theft grima En- 
tia to caufe renovation or rcjuvcnef- 

cence. 9 i *h 1*4 

Of Helmut's Via Media of E- 

lixir Proprietary. i£L . 
'the perfuming it by eohobations with 
OMmk and mber. ib. 

A commendation of Helmont s 
Medicines: L£4 
Of the power of Chymijiry. 



Curing more compendious. 20$. id 
the Kings- Evil* it). ~* In Plurifnn 
• 204. In the Rickets. ib. 
Chap. X. 
That great Cures may be done by 
outward Applications. 1Q6 
of the efficacy of Lap's Nephri- 
ticus, and divers other Appenfa* 

iQ7, :o8 



The Cures of the Dropfte and 
Of the power of Noble Menftru- Schinhus Lienis, by the externall 
urns , particularly. ' ib- | applieattcn of spunges dipt tnLimc* 



The power o/Sal- Tartan Volatt- 

zed. W 

of the pofibilit) ofViolatiztng 
it;. ib. 

That there ma) be ether Men- 
ftr uums hi fides fuch as are Actd , 
Vrinous.or Alcalizate. 

How thefe fever all) dtfarm and 
deflroj one another , and that what 
an \jictd Menftruum Molves an 
Urinoua or Alcalizate e&k precipi- 
tate, ib. of a Menftruum unlike 
to all thefe . . ib. 

Chap. IX. 
7hat Chjmiflry it (elf(much more 
Pbyftology ) is capable of affording a 
New and better Mtihodus Meden- 
di. ' ioo,&c. 

In (lances, to frove that the unu- 
fual Efficacies of New Remedies 
way alters a *d *» 4 *' f * method of 



water. log 
Of flrange Cures performed neer 
Rome in the SerpenrineGrotta.ib. 

Of the Operations of Sulphur 
Cantharides and Quicklllver, and 
Tobacco externally applied. 2_lq 
In fiances in divers Medicines 
which have differing effects in* 
wardly given 1 and outwardly ap- 
plied. !2_l 1,2-12 
That preparation ma), much im- 
prove Simples which are outwardly 
applied. ib. In/lances in divers pre* 
. parations of Gold. ib. 

i^An Oyntment made of Aurum 
fulminans/tfr the Haemowhoides 
and Venereal Ulcers. ib. 

The Cure of a Per fen efleemd 
bewita}ht by an appended Mineral, 

• of the pomr of Jafper to ftanch 

' g g g iW 



xj by Go< 



The INDEX. 



Blood, 2i£ 

The Incontinentia Urina? cured 
by the powder of 4 Toad. burnt alive, * 
and hung about the neck* 215 

Effects afcribed to Witchcraft 
cured Per appenfa. 216 

Paracelfus cured Quartans by a 
Plaifter. 217 

Difeafes cured by Frights. 218 

Phyfick now in China in a good 
condition , without Phlebotomy, 
Potions, or I flues. 212 

Where Praclioners of Phyfick 
are illiterate , there Specificks may 
lie be ft met with, 2 20 

The ufefulncfie of the knowledge 
tftbc Medicines of Bar bar on* Na 
tions. 2 30,23 1,222 

A Compart (on of this Empitick 
■part of Phyfick with the Rational, 

Chap. XI. 
Of other Extraordinary Medi- 
tints which work by LMagnetifme, 
Tr an f plantation, 6cc. 224 
The Cure of an Ulcer in the Blad- 
der by the Sympathetiek Powder. 

215 

The effects of the Weapon falve 
and other Magnet teal Remedies .2.6 

obfervations of the T ranfptanta* 
tie* of Difeafes* 2 28,&c. 

The fometima nM [ueetedingaf 



Magnetic^ Medicines >no fufficient 
caujeto a bandon t heir Ufc, 231 
Chap. XII. 

In [lances of divers Cures upon 
Brutes, and how the[e are appliable 
to Men. 232, &c. 

' Chap. XIII. 
That the handling of Phyftcal Mat- 
ters was anttentiy thought to belong 
to the Naturalift. 2j J 

That the rejecting Specificks ,be- 
caufe they make no vtftbU Evacua- 
tion is irrattonaL • 236 

That great changes- may be made 
only by di (placing without any Eva- 
cuation of the parts. 2. 3 7 

The making of Vinegers u~an 
In fiance of this truth 3 e[pecially in 
the Indies. ib« 

In fiances in Sura, and the Juice 
of Mandioca. ib. 

In the Effects* of Thunder^ and 
Earth ua^s. 238 

Divers In fiances to prove y that 
invtfibie Corpufclesiw4; pafifrom 
Amulets , and caufe great altera- 
tions in the Juices of a mans Body* 

ib. 

Galen'/ Example of Peiony- Root > 

Of purging by the Order of Poti- 
ons, 241 
Of the y urging and Vomiting 

Quality 



Quality of the Air of the Mountain 
Pariacaca. . ' 

The potter of Steams (eeninthe 

Infectious Effluvia. 
1 of alterations made by the Pay 
(ions of the mind* 

Chap. XIV. 
Divers J n ft anas of the power of 
Imagination, 1M 



An In fiance of the Hair of the 
Head chang'd in Colour upon a fud- 

denfear." ?41 
How the Authors dtfccurfe con- 
cerning the power of Effluvia ought 
to be under flood. 



• That the Particular State or drf- 
f option of the Engine of Humane 
Body, is conftderable as to the effecJs 
cfthefe ImprefSions, H7)& c - 
The effects of the Mofs growing 
on hnmane skull tn ftanching Blood. 

• 251 

Burnt Feathers or the smoakeof 
Tobacco remove Hjflerical fits. ib. 
Cures of Dysenteries by fumes. 

tb. 

And by fitting on a hot Anvil. 

Cures of the Colick by Glyfters of 
the Smoak of Tobacco. 

of other cures d$neby Smoik.lb. 

Of the fudden ceaftng cftht Plague 
At Grand Czy ib in June. 254 



The INDEX. ^ 

VChap. XV. 
That Humane Body may be al- 
ter d by ftich Motions as \Jd ft in a 
Gro(fe,and meerly Mechanical man- 
ner, frovd In divers !n fiances. 2 5 6. 

The In/tancc of the cure of the 
biting of the Tarantula byMuftck t 
particularly modified* 2£$ 
Chap. XVI. 
Divers in fiances of the UtMuyto*- 
<noi, or peculiar aver fion of part tcu» 
lar perfons from particular things, 
and of the commotions made in the 
Body thereby. 259 
' • ih'at fmcetbe Body receives [uch 
alterations f no fveh unlikely things, 
there is no ]uft arguing again fl Spe* 
c/ficks , becaufe they operate not by 
any obi'ious Quality. z£z 
Of the Operations of Poyfons^ and 
Antidotes,' i&\ 
What is to be done when the Spc- 
cifick ((cms likely to encreafe the 
1)1 ft a [c ' 26$ 

Chap. XVIII. 
A Difcfuifitton concerning the Oik 
dinar y Method of Phyftck, i66 i &c. 

jnftances of fome Medicines con- 
demn' d for Noxious johtcb yet have 
provd ufrful. 269 
* of the c/r^Guajacum/^r Con- 
fumptions ^ and Mercury for Pal- 

fits. , ■ ■ ' *22 

ggg a That 



3d by Google 



The I 

That there are divers (toner etes, as 
tefenfe fimilar,m/^/> different farts 
have contrary Qualities, as Rhu- 
barb, and Oyle Qitve. 221 

Of improbable Cures, yz of aPlu. 
rifie by a Laudanum Opiatum.272 

Of curing Coughs and Con jump- 
tions by Satin* Medicines, 22$ 

Of the curing I httftcal Confump* 
tions by the actdSmoak of Sulphur. 

it>. 

TheUfe of the Livers and Galls 
of Eels , in expediting the hard la 
hour of Women. * 274 



The unlikely cure of Venome by 
Oyle of Scorpions. • 175 
And of Fluxcr by frefh Butter 
welted. 2 76 

Chap. XIX. 
That it is very hard to five an 
intelligible Explication of the ope- 
ration of Eletftvc and other com' 
won CM edit anient s, which are not 
Specficle, 277 
That Poyfons do refpecJ particu- 
lar parts , And therefore Medicines 

Way do it, 178 

General Explications of the man- 
ner, how, thefe Operations of Sped' 
ficks may proceed. 279 

That Vinegar mil operate on the 
JheU, and not upon the other parts of 
the Egge t with Uke in fiances offpe- 



NDEX. 

cifick operations. 2 &i 
That Pbyftck, as it began by Ex- 
perience, fo it mufl be enlarged and 
recltfi'd by the new difcoveries of 
Experience, ^Bz 9 

That the Operations of the An- 
timonial Cup t Glaffe of Antimony,' 
wCrocus Metallorum,***/^ not 
have been credited in antient times. 

284 

Divers other In fiances alike in- 
credible. \\y t 

A grange Cure of blindmffe by a 
Mercurtal powder. 287 
Chap- XX. • 
ofUniverfal Afrdictnes. 282 
That the fame matter may cauje 
divers Difeafes. fa 
And the fame Medicine cure them. 

288 

An In fiance in the Waters of the 
Spaa. • 289,290 
Of the reafon and defign ofthc 
Author's difcourfe concerning the 
Methodus Medendi , and his de- 
fending to other particulars which 
maype thought improper for Him. 

291,29 2, &c. 
That thit Employment is better 
than the morefajbtonsble ofdeflrur 
clive valour. 2 98 
That the Angels charitable employ, 
meat at Bechefda, £ more defirabU 

than 



Digitized by Google 



The 1 

than his who defirojed in one night 
180000. fighting men. *29_ 



AitAppendix to the. 
First Seftion of the 
Setond "Part. 

Advert i[ement touching thefol 
lowing Appendix- 3Q3>3°4>&c* 

( To the 6$. Page. 
The Irifh fcthotomifts Receipt, 
for the Stone in the B Udder. 306 

To then xo. Page. 

{Where the Virtues of the Pilulae 
Luna res are toucht at."] 307 

The Preparation of the Pilulce 
Lunares.^ goS.&c. 

The Dofeandufe of tbcfe Pills. 

41* 

To the 113. Page. 
(Where mention is made of the 
Cure of one concluded to have a 
Gangrene Jbj an inward Medicine) 

Sr. Walter Raulcighs Cordial, 
after Si K: his wij : (fet down 
Verbatim 4* the Author received 



NDEX. # ^ 

it.) 

How to make the Tincture of 
Coral' for thi s Cordial. $JJ_ 
Tb the 113. Page. 
T Where a Receipt that curtdFiftu- 
la's is mentioned. ) 

A Water for a Fiftula , and all 
manner of Wounds, and Swellings, 
or eld Ulcers , Cankers, Tetjers, 
Boils, or Scabbs in an) place, or 
Green Wounds- 314,315. 

To the 141. Page.- 
Where Soot ism entioned. 3 1& 
Hartmau / preparation of Spirit 

and O fie of Soot. ib. 
The Authors Directions c oncer* 

ning preparations from Soot. 317 

» * 

To the 143. Cage. 
of the ufe of the Preparations of 
Urine. 3 l8 a ji?» 

To the 1 44. Page. 

of the Preparation of iMans 
Blood. 310,321. 

Obfervations touching the man- 
ner of drawing the Volatile Salts 
and Spirits of Blood and other [ub- 
fiancts belonging to the Animall 
Kmgdomc. 31 

How to draw Tinctures , ai of 
Sulphur, &c; with the SafineSpt- 
ggg 1 rUs 



xj by Go 



The INDEX. 



fits 



3-9 



[To the 154,155,^. where 
Ens Veneris u treat* J of. ] 350 
Haw the Author fir fl haprted upon 
the Preparation of Ens Veneris.* 

330 

T£<r Pr ocefs nfed hj the Author for 
the making Ens Veneris. 331 

Divers /articular Animadver 
pons concerning thefe Preparations. 

33^&c. 

The Dofe and U(e of Ens Vene- 
ris. 338 



To the i$6 y 157, 158, 
and 160. Page. 33P 

Of Harts- horn. ib. 

Three wayes of di filling Harts* 
forn. • 340, &c. 

Animadver [>ons on fome prepa- 
rations of Harts-horn of Glauber 
and Harcman. 342 

A fourth way of preparation of 
Harti-horn ufed by the Author. 

344 

Of the Ufc and (ffetfs of Sptrtt 
and Salt of Harts- horn and the Dofe I of Writing of Chymifis^/ 365 



That Bucks horns may be fubfiu 
Medfor Stag horns. 348 
How to keep the Spirit and Sale 
of Harts- horn. ib. 

Oft he Spirit o/Sal. Armsniack 
and divers attempts and wayes of 
preparing it. 350,&c 
Of Preparation of Salinmnd Sul- 
phureous Fetid Liquors. 356 
The way of making the com* 
mon' Balfam or Ruby of Sulphur. 

•357 

T 0 Volatile the Bi If am of Sul- 
phur. • ib. 

Penotus his preparation of a 
Sulphureous Balfam , with the Au- 
thors Advertifements upon it. 

Of an excellent Balfam of Sul- 
phur made only with Oyle- olive. 

"360 

The common way of preparing it. 

ib. 

Other wayes of preparing this 
Balfam. 363 
A Balfam of Antimony. 364 
Of the obfeure and Cryptical way 



Q. Whether tn the Di/lillation 
of Harts- horn the Salt d/fpofe it 
Jelf into the Figure of the Horn, 

347 



Concerning the Empyreuma of 
Chymical Extra [is and their offen- 
fivenejf.compared with the Galeni- 
cal, and thofe which are commonly 
ajedby Meihodtfls. 3P7»&c 

And 



Digitize 



d by Google 



The I N 

And whether theoffenftveneffe of \ 
divirs Chymtcal Medicines proceed 
from the violence of the Fire, or the 
Hnture of tl?c Matter ? 1 68 | 

A Way of taking off the Fetidnefs 
from Spirtt ofUt tne , Harts- horn, 
Sec. 373 

Obfervations concerning this Me* 
thod of taking off the Empyreuma. 

374 

Of the Medicinal Quality of thefe 
aromatized Salts. 3 75 3 dcc. 

X To the 155 Page, Where 
the Author promifes a Declaration, 
how he would have his Praifes of 
kMedicincs under flood.] 389, 

3PO. 

Divers Dif advantages of Chy- 
mical and Empirical Phyftck in the 
way of nfual Mini fir at ion. 391 




That .Chymicall Procefes (land 
more in need of clear relations >than 
Galenic all. 39 z 

- Errors in the Time and Dafe of 
Chymicall Remedies* 39$>394> 

That 4" competent Meafure of 
Knowledge is absolutely necejfary t§ 
a Pracltzer of Phyftck. 395 

The L. Veriilams Judgment , 
That approved Receipts ought not to 
be altcrcd y but religiously adhered to m 

39* 

Crato s judgment herein , and 
how the Author concurretb with that 
Eminent Phyftcian. ibj 

Of the greater Arcana and more 
Univerfal Medicines, the Effscacf 
of which may compenfate the want 
of skill in the rrefcriber* 399 
TheSumme and Conclufton of the 
point in contr over fie * 400. 

• 



FINIS. 



Digitized by Google 




d(eader i 

FOr Expedition fake this feoond Impreffion was com- 
mitted to feverall Prefles , which occafioned the roi- 
ftake of putting the Pages of the former Impreffion 
to the Citations Englifhed at the end of each part in this: 
•but they being referred to, as well by one or more of the 
Latin words of each Quotation, as by the Page, and be- 
ing Printed in order as they lye in the Bookc, thou wilt 
cadly find where each is Englifhed • 



PANDIMIGLIO 

2 1 OIC. 1970 

LEGATOR IA - ROMA 



Digitized by Google 



Digitized by Google 



